positive Adrianna is much better looking than her pictures. Her body is perfection. She is Bulgarian with a really exotic look, silky, immaculate skin, and perfectly toned muscles that show the 3 hours of gym time she puts in daily. She is sweet and outrageously sexy. Smart girl learning the business. Send her your picture before she meets you- she will appreciate it. I used her web contact form with verification. She called me in the morning and we set up a time for the same night. I texted there the hotel address and she showed up on time. She dressed discreetly, but she was beautiful. When she got comfortable I witnessed chiseled female perfection of form wrapped in amazing skin. Her touch, her smell, her movements, and dear god, her perfect ass... I held her from behind as she pressed her ass against me and my hands explored her perfect body. she turned and we kissed before she dropped to the floor and took my cock in her mouther. she sucked me ferociously until I thought I was going to blow. I picked her up and put her on the bed, kissed from her lips down her body until I reached her sweetest spot. She enjoyed my tongue and withered on my face as I ate her sweet pussy. When my patience ran out I slid on a condom, pulled her to the side of the bed and fucked her hard. after a while i pushed her up further and spent time in missionary before turning her over to doggy, pending her sweet ass. then I asked her to ride me. Watching her amazing body on me as she rode my cock was all I could take as I blew inside her. We cleaned up, talked for a while and then she left with a hug and a kiss. Adrianna is a rare find. She is sexy and knows how to turn a man on and drive him wild. She gives you everything you want the way you want and you will find your self taking mental pictures. Pounding her on her back, doggy while making her ass, laying side by side, her riding on top- I don;t know what is best, just that I want to see her again. Adrianna is one of the only providers I have ever met that blew my expectations out of the water. She is incredible. See her, have fun, but treat her well and don't ruin her for us. Thank you Adrianna
positive Mary Jane is an extremely sweet girl. I like slender, beautiful women who are laid back. That's Mary Jane and we clicked immediately. She's originally from the area though has traveled a bit and is not new to the hobby. Non-Members: I'd recommend her. She's beautiful and reminds me of an actress from a well known tv series. I can't tell you the name of the actress as that might out her in real life. I've seen her twice so far and would highly recommend her. I'd consider her girl-next-door in the very best way. She's tall and fit with a gorgeous face but isn't snobby at all in how she treats you. On our first encounter, we chatted about her life and background for 20 minutes then went to the bedroom. The second time, immediately to the bedroom. She's a very passionate kisser. She ran her hands through my hair and gave it a tug to draw me in very close and deep when making out. Aside from having our lips locked the whole time, she's amazing with her hands for both massage and on my member. Lots of mutual masturbation. She is a safety girl so she uses a condom during blow jobs but she does it with enthusiasm. Every position was a variety of pounding or sensual depending on what I wanted. We did the standard positions (missionary, cowgirl, doggie) but I'm sure she'd accommodate whatever your need. She didn't say no to anything that I asked for. She was very much in tune to my mood. Cum on her stomach or breasts and I was done. Multi-shots were encouraged and I did so the second time. She isn't a clock watcher but she has obligations in her life so she can't unfortunately spend all night with me. :)
negative with two differing reviews, I decided to give it a shot. bad idea. TOFTT on this one. total upset from the get go. unless you want to take out a second mortgage on your house, I do not recommend. there isnt much to say on this one. typical two call system. arrived to her location, she told me the room number, I went up, She wasn't the girl in the pics, although she wasn't bad looking, I just wasn't looking for a twiggy african american; I enjoy a woman with curves. she asked for her fee, and then proceeded to tell me that was just for her time, and now I need to tip, (which I am accustomed to..) I ask the ranges of her desired tips, and she says her tips start at $2,000. WHAT? she wouldn't do ANYTHING, for any less. I told her all I had was an additional $300, and she laughed and said that doesn't even get her clothes off. so I walked out. this was a total rip off. Agency bait and switch BS.
positive Claudia is a exotic beautiful woman,I called her assistants and set up an hour that turned into a 4 hour session.when she open the door I was shocked how really beautiful she is and as a bonus she is from Australia/UK. It's a combination we early see.her face photos are are blurred but it's a privacy issue. I never give 10/10 but she earn it.I saw her ever day she visited.I will repeat& repeat& repeat. Claudia has a beautiful face like a movie star you will recognize immediate.she has those sky blue eyes that are 1) in a million and truly amazing .Her accent is a real turn on for me .She welcomed me with a full kiss from the most full and soft lips that I've ever been kissed by.The couch conversation lasted 10 minutes and she asked me what are we going to do with you.we move to the bed and she waits until you unzip her all the while she is kissing me and caressing me.I've never been with a girl so skilled at seduction ,her resume in this industry is amazing.once naked she starts with a BBBj and she works it so well.we moved to MISH. I was so taken by her beauty and skills I called the assistants to stay another 3 hours.I explored every inch of her body.And I couldn't get enough conversation along the way.I would say hurry because she will be hard to see sooner or later.
positive Having used this agency numerous time setup was quick and easy. On arrival I was quickly cleared to go in. As usual, the door opened and behind it was a very pretty young Asian girl. She greeted me warmly with a hug and a brief dfk. Shoes off and on to the bedroom. IU followed the usual k-girl script with friendly enthusiasm, seeming to enjoy herself and making me feel good. She help me disrobe and led me to a very nice shower complete with lots of body to body rubbing and a teaser bbbj. In the bedroom we enjoyed exploring each other's bodies complete with bbbj, 69 and daty. Then it was cover on and an enthusiastic sampling of all possible position. I finally finished cim. My only reservation in declaring a perfect session was IU's inability or reluctance to really dt. Otherwise it was a perfect session. After a final shower I left a satisfied man.
negative Jesus this woman is beautiful. She's so young and energetic! She'll make an older man weak to his knees. And that's the way I like it. I was lucky enough to have my last Vegas visit extended, so I thought I would try out the new girl after catching word of her. If you've ever wanted to have the extremely hot blonde at the club who's too stuck up to talk to the "regular joes" like yourself, this is your perfect opportunity. Her tits, her legs, her beautiful blue eyes and smile, holy fucking shit. You really have to see her in person to appreciate her. As I said before, she's very beautiful and perfectly put together. She's exactly what you look for in a provider. She came through and threw her arms around me and gave me a big kiss to greet me. She excused herself to the bathroom and she came out wearing nothing but wedge heels and a bikini. Fucking perfection. Blonde perfection. We started kissing and she then motioned for me to go over to the bed. She gave me the longest, most intense, surreal massage I've ever had. She was licking my ears, playing with my cock, breathing lightly into my ear. I was so fucking turned on, then she turned me over and sucked my cock like she was poisoned and my cock had the antidote. I was on cloud nine, and I started begging her to sit on my face. I asked if she'd pee on me, but she wasn't gonna do that. No problem. Just loved the way she tasted so fucking much. I came in her mouth and she kept sucking. I let out an audible groan, almost a yelp. I was completely within her power and that magic mouth of hers. I was breathing and making incoherent noises, and she giggled at me about it. She then started massaging me again to get me to relax. I finally calmed down and let her blow me again to get me up and ready. She put on the condom and we were at it like fucking college students at a frat party. I fucking wrecked this perfect girl from all positions and didn't let up. Missionary, doggy, reverse cowgirl, I fucked her tits, then missionary again. I was so fucking turned on by the whole ordeal that I came again inside the condom. All incoherent moans and groans aside, I was very satisfied with how everything went. In fact, satisfied is the understatement of the century. I felt like king of the world. We talked and shared a glass of champagne before she left. Can't wait to see her with her friend next time!
positive Called Pam and she told me she had a new girl in town. You don't need a Passport, so go see Paris! Got to the incall and went up to Paris's incall. She was hiding behind the door and she was wearing skimpy lingerie! This is a taller provider than the usual shorter ones. We groped and kissed each other before heading to the shower. She cleaned me everywhere, but no preview BBBJ. Then back to the room for fun. I brought her black thigh highs and she put them on. She has long awesome legs! She started a nice BBBJ that I did not want to end! She must have slopped on me for about 20 minutes! I put her head over the side of the bed and DT her really hard, but she took like a Champ! I then put her on her back in mish and with her ankles on my shoulders, pounded her hard and heavy! When I knew it was time, I ripped off the the cover and CIM into her mouth, it was a big load I had stored for awhile! I can't wait to say Bonjour to Paris again! Oui
negative I called for Alisa a few days before my business trip from Los Angeles to NYC. I asked her to be discrete and arrive at my hotel by 7pm for a three hour session. She complied with every single thing I asked for and performed both as a professional and seductress for the full three hours session. Her pictures are real and don't do her justice. She has a great body, beautiful face and speaks English perfectly. She is a handful and more. I highly recommend. She is a 10 out of 10 and you will be pleased that you gave her a spin. Alisa is short (5'3") but so am I. What she lacks in size she more than makes up in service and her desire to please. I asked her to come to my hotel and call when she arrived. We had a 7pm meeting and she called from the hotel's lobby at 7:02. I was on a business meeting trip and had a few business partners in the same hotel so I asked her to dress conservatively and to enter the elevator without acting like we were together. She followed those directions to the T. Every guy in the elevator couldn't keep their eyes off of her, she is that hot. Once in my room we took care of the donations and started to get to know each other. I can go on and on about her sexual skills and the way she takes care of a man and all our desires, but I won't. Instead I will direct this post to only the business professionals out there. PAY WHATEVER SHE ASKES!!!!! She also has girlfriends that she will bring with her or she will refer them to you. Because I am from the LA area, she set up a meeting with a girlfriend of hers out in my area. I am flying Alisa out here to LA to meet with her friend for a two on me escape. Use your imagination here gentlemen, she does everything you want, BBJ, prostate, rimming, Nuru, and uses every hole you will need or want, and never rushed a single second or said no to any of my requests. Alisa is a true professional and a pleasure that I will repeat again and again.
positive My plan A fell through so I went for plan B. I have been meaning to see Amy, but stars didn't align until today. Amy is located in nice apt complex in Merrifield with plenty of safe parking. I was given clearance to go up and Amy was hiding behind the door in two piece lingerie. She gave me a warm smile and hug and took me back to her room. Non-VIPs, don't be like me and hold off on seeing Amy. She is DDG and passionate to boot. Amy is very, very, highly recommended!!! Amy's age is listed as 24 in her profile. She is thin build, ~5' 4" tall, 100 lbs, with natural B-cups and gumdrop nipples, round ass, and sports a partially shaved kitty. Her face is DDG resembling a beautiful K-actress. Her next best trait after her gorgeous face has to be her attitude and passionate service. Once we were in the room, we were engaged in long DFK. Amy was an aggressive kisser exploring my tongue with hers throughout the entire session. As we had both freshly showered, we skipped the bathroom routine, tossing our clothes by the bedside and getting right down to action. We explored each other using our hands, mouth, and body, grinding our pelvis together. By the time I made my way down to her partially shaved kitty, her petals were glistening from her moisture. She was appreciative of my oral service and gentle finger softly screaming in pleasure. After cumming strongly, we went back to DFK while she grinded her now drenched kitty against my raging cock. She went down for passionate BBBJ/BLS and sight of her beautiful face making my cock disappear into her mouth was worth the admission alone. I asked for the cover and we started in MISH. Amy was unbelievably tight and I didn't get very far as that's how I finished over her belly in record time. We collapsed into each others arms and chatted with the remaining time. Amy's English is cute beginner, but she was able to get her meaning across. Before too long it was time to go. Amy helped me dress and bade me off with another series of DFK. I am kicking myself for not seeing Amy earlier as she is leaving at the end of the week. Amy is a DDG doll with great attitude and passionate service. Amy is very, very, highly recommended!!!
positive She picked up the phone herself, answered in a friendly tone. Was punctual and didn't keep me waiting. Same as pictures. Definitely worth a visit. I went to see Ariana as I had seen her ads several times before and she looked nice in the pictures. The motel she was staying in was a little bit of a dump, but not too seedy. Your average route 1 motel. Ariana's pictures are real. She greets you with a friendly smile and is ready at the appointed time. She is a little bit pear shaped in the figure, but her skin has a nice creamy white complexion. The room smelt a bit of smoke, but she didn't smoke while I was there. Arian wanted to make sure I was legitimate so she asked me to stroke her soft succulent bare tit, in return she stuck her hand inside my pants and played with my cock. Importantly for me, she turned her phone off before we started. Then we settled down on the bed and took our clothes off. Ariana was very attentive and began kissing and cuddling with me. After a few exploratory touches the kisses got deeper and gfe. At no point did she make any attempt to speed things along. We had both warmed up to each other and so I began to kiss her neck. She is really sensitive there. A red glow of enjoyment appeared. By now I could feel Ariana's erect nipples poking me in the chest, so I moved further down and started to kiss her breasts and nipples, which she enjoyed. Her nipples get quite erect and she enjoyed me alternating between blowing and sucking on them. While I carried on kissing her tits, I reached down between her legs and stroked the outside of her pussy. She particularly enjoyed it when I gently clamped her mound between my fingers in a scissor action. This made her very wet. I asked Ariana whether it was ok to go down on her but she sad not this time. Instead she moved down the bed and began to stroke my cock. After a couple of kisses to my cock she slid on the condom. She is a safety girl. Now she began to give me an enthusiastic and deep blowjob. She complemented the sucking of my cock with stroking my balls and running her nail on the underside of the root of my cock. It made me even stiffer. Now that she had made me almost painfully stiff, she moved up and slid me into her pussy, cowgirl style. Starting with a slow rhythm she moved back and forth. At times she leant forward and I was able to suck on her nipples as she began to work her self up to an orgasm. Sucking her nipples sent over the edge. I began to join in with the rhythm and thrust in time with her. This combined with another bout of nipple worship gave her a second orgasm. She indicated that she was getting dizzy so we switched to missionary position and then I placed her legs on my shoulders and began to fuck her using long, slow strokes. This really got her going and you could see the flush spreading across her chest as she got more turned on. SHe seemed to come again and finally I could bear it no more and unloaded a pulsing load into her condom protected pussy. This seemed to increase her enjoyment and we spent a few minutes together kissing until my cock went down. After cooling down and sharing a couple of extra kisses she offered me a chance to wash in the shower and didn't go near my clothes. I would visit again. She made me feel like she enjoyed making me feel good. I will be visiting again!
positive Saw Isabella's pictures and wanted to give her a try. Had fun would recommend. The other reviews have pretty much hit the nail on the head. She is a big girls but I liked her curvy size. Huge boobs, pretty face and really nice. I think if you were a regular things might spice up a little or that is what I intend to find out. Bella is dressed very nice with a low cut dress that shows off her nice rack. I suggested we start with a massage and she agreed. Little more than some light rubbing so I flipped over. At this point her clothes we're still on and I had the pleasure of helping her out of them. Some light rubbing of my rod as a rubbed her v. At this point I ask her to lay back and helped her slide off her panties. I watched as she rubbed her lips and I had to have a taste. Wow! She was really into it moving her hips so her clit continuously found my tongue. Don't know if she had an O but she was soaked. I laid back and let her go to work on an above average bbbj while she stoked me to the finish. I like full figured women so if that is not your thing I would avoid. Overall a solid B. Seemed a little timid but could be because we just met.
positive I was looking for a reliable massage provider in a safe environment that I could use on my lunch hour. I liked her face from the picture and I was not disappointed when I met her in person. The odd thing is that the office is in a professional office building. I will repeat, VIP's read on. I have a few services I normally see, but sometimes I get curious about other services. Nikki was advertising a $70 special which I thought was so inexpensive I was sure I would have to tip for extras or that it would be just a ripoff. I was wrong. The office building atmosphere is strange, but made for a very safe experience with easily accessible pay parking. She did text me that she would be a little late, which was not a problem on this day, but since I fit these visits into a lunch hour, could be an issue on other days. Nikki is very clean, attractive and fit. I declined draping, and she was fine with that. She was clothed in professional masseuse attire. The massage was EXCELLENT... she is definitely trained and delivered a great deep tissue massage. There was plenty of teasing and brushing, so I was really excited for the flip. After the flip she did a little chest and leg massage before getting to the ending. Once again, great massage. Then ending was SUPERLATIVE. She was still fully clothed but allowed some roaming and mutual massage. Her technique was one of the best I have had. Very sensual, and lots of 'edging'. Once she decided to take me to the end, she stayed with it to the last drop, incredible. She cleaned me up with warm towels. I will repeat. I've seen alot of massage girls and she is in with the top of the tops for service.
positive Called to set up as my usual service was not available. Buzzed in upon arrival to find a short attractive Asian with large breasts. She's lets me in and greets me with a hug and kiss and takes me to the bedroom where the fun began. NonVIPs pay a visit before she's leaves. I walked into the room sat on the bed and got undressed. I asked for a shower, she obliges and joined me to help break the ice. Afterwards I dried and moved to the bed. Once on the bed the fun began. I received light massage which included a lot of caressing and breasts rubbing against my back. Upon my turn I oiled her breasts and received a great russian session with bj. On went the cover and we went through the usual positions; mish, cg and doggy watching her perfect boobs bounce with every thrust until I filled the bag. Throughout the positions watching her breasts bounce had to be my favorite part, they are the perfect combo of perky and youthful. Once done I still had some time left so we ended with more light back massaging with her rubbing her breast on my back which almost put me to sleep. Overall great experience with Mika, I will try to return before she leave. Def pay her a visit.
positive Answered text within minutes. Set up appointment went to location was directed were to go when arrived. Same as pics very attractive awesome hair. Location is comfortable. Very nice pleasant personality. Services provided as discussed. No rushing. Puts you at ease will definitely see again. You will not be disappointed. Aims to please. Great soft wet bj,she deepthroats and does not choke does great cowgirl and grinds down on your cock very attentive she kept saying shit that feels good great dirty talk begs for cum. Stroked my dick with her soft hands so good. Pussy is tight and wet. Really seems into it which was great. Provider is very intimate, her hands are all over you the whole time. Lets you fuck her in all positions doggy on top, missionary. Doggy was best beause her pussy felt like a vise on my cock in that position. Her hair is so soft and she runs it on your dick. Finished in her mouth she swallows. She is very clean. Her body and skin a very soft. Her face is a little pot marked but still attractive. The deeper you fuck her the more she moans maybe shes faking but doesn't seem like it once you get in it and get her wet she seems to enjoy it as much as I did. On finishing she did not rush me out talked a little. Great experience she is a bit of a freak if you push her buttons it seems.
positive Called reliable booker set appointment. Went to location in mid wilshire . Door opens and a cute Korean girl with a nice body opens the door... Dfk at the door head to the shower n get a bbj...head to the bed bbj for ten mins and some rimming and French kiss. Start off missionary switch to doggy than scissors and cum in mouth with a blow job. Talk for a minute and second pop finish missionary with load in condom. Wash up dry up clothes up and I'm out the door. Will repeat
positive Hadn't used agency before but have seen their ads previously. Saw Yumi's ad and based on the pics i decided to take the plunge. Got verified and setup was very easy. Agency was painless to deal with, was slight issue with time with the time zones being a factor but wasn't a big deal. Got room number after i parked and went in. Door was a ajar and on the bed laid a gorgeous latina with one of the best asses i've ever seen. She's gorgeous head to toe, doesn't speak much english at all (i knew that going in) which was a factor but i did know that. She's a fun girl, recommend! Embraced and kissed a bit but i needed to shower. After i rinsed, came back out with my towel. She let me explore her body with some kisses all about. She motioned to the bed for me to lay down. She worked my cock and balls with a great BBBJ...she let me roam with my hands and tongue. She used oil on my and her which was a nice feeling. felt inside her pussy with my fingers (only regret i didn't have the chance to daty). She is pretty sanitary, using wipes but didn't distract much. Was time for the cover and after working me up previously, i didn't last too long with her in cowgirl but it was quite the sight and feeling esp with her body. She then gave a great massage after cleanup. Not top level but was good feeling to be sure! We started to kiss again, another bbbj and time to suit up. Did a number of positions, with doggie a favorite just due to that ass. After we both started to get a bit sweaty, she went back and finished me with a bbbj/hj combo. Not sure if cim was on the menu but i think it was. We cleaned each other off and i decided another rinse was a good idea due to the oil used before. We said our good byes and a couple kisses later, i was out the door. was a great session, if i knew spanish i think it would have been even better b/c that caused the connection no to be too strong. would repeat in future though!
positive I saw an ad for Stacey and texted her. It took a while to get a response, but once we made contact, arranging to meet was easy. Standard two calls and was at her room. She greeted me in a bra and panties and she looked good. We hugged and she gave me a peck, she doesn't like to do too much kissing. Once we both relaxed we began to have some fun. She is definitely worth a visit. She led me to the bed and I dropped an envelope on the nightstand. She took off my shirt, asked me to lie down, and removed the rest of my clothes. She stroked my penis to firmness and then began a BBBJ. Her lips and mouth were warm and soft. I could easily have just laid there and fully enjoyed my time with her that way, but I did want more. I had her lie back and kissed my down her body. Her nipples were firm and responsive. When I got to her pussy it was smoothly shaven and clean and tasty. I was DATY for a good 10 minutes or more and Stacey seemed to be really enjoying it. Eventually she pulled me up and said she wanted me inside her. On went the cover and she rode me CG. It was a nice tight fit and didn't take long before I shot in the cover. She cleaned me up and we laid together and talked for the remaining time. Stacey is a fun girl and I plan to see her again. She isn't into kissing, but I think that will warm up when she gets to know me. She is a sweet girl and should be treated well.
positive Chelsea usually works at their sister location over in the West Side, but she's here in the eastside one to two times a week. ....called in first... then texted me the location.... i texted in a few minutes early.. they asked me to wait... so went into a coffee shop for a few minutes to wait... they texted me the address ... no doorman building in a pretty central area. Vicky (another provider) opened the door and introduced me to Chelsea... a gorgeous chinese girl... she doesn't speak much English.... but our mishmash of chinese i know and her english and we did ok. VIP read on... Non Vip, I would definitely repeat. Chelsea led me to our room downstairs by hand.. then wouldn't allow me to undress.... she insisted on undressing me.... was cute as well as sexy... after getting naked... i helped undress her.... we had to wait for the shower to open up... so she kept rubbing her gorgeous tushie right at me. .... she led me upstairs.. and we showered.... washed me up really well.... i told her most american women were shaved.... and men too..... she pointed at her bush and asked i liked.. i said.. i like both bush.. and non bush...... when we went out.... she talked to the mamasan..... and came downstairs with an electric shaver...... she pointed at me.. and asked me to trim her. ... we spread a towel down.. and i proceeded to trim down her bush to almost her skin... not shaved.. but actually... this trimmed look was super sexy.... she left for a few minutes to go wash up her freshly trimmed groin area off .. she came back.. and had me lie down on the bed on my back.. and started a nice BBBJ..... getting me rock hard in seconds... i asked her to turn around so we could 69.... her freshly trimmed pussy was already wet.. and she tasted very sweet....... she almost had me cumming in her mouth.... I wanted to get into her..... so i pulled her up off my cock... and she rapidly got up and put a cover on me. .... i entered her mish... and we plugged away for a few minutes in that position... LFK and occasional DFK in that position..... i asked her to K9... and i pulled her up.... and as i was moving into position to enter her from behind.. something snapped... i was just about to enter her.. and that twist in my back threw a pain into me that i lost my erection..... we were just getting started.... but i knew i wasn't going to get my erection back today... so i had her lay down.... spread her legs wide and up ...lifting her ass off the bed a bit. and went down on her for some serious DATY..... made her cum loud and shuddering onto my mouth... rest of our time... we talked in our mishmash of english and chinese.... and i wrote some chinese charcters on my cell phone to explain where i was from and what i did... we figured out where she was from via my cell foreign type setting. .... she dressed me up... and when i got upstairs.. Piper and Vicky were both there... Piper DFK'ed me as she greeted me.... and when Vicky learned of my asian language ability.. she asked me for help in deciphering some webpages.... i told Mamasan to go ahead and give any of the girls my cell number to text me for help like that in the future.. . ... i may have to try two girls with Chelsea and Piper next time.. and as soon as i fix my back via my acupuncturist.
positive First time I've tried this agency, so some screening was required over text. I've actually been to this area before from another agency, street is semi-busy. Made an appointment to see Chelsea, but was booked so was told to wait. Ended up waiting just a bit over the appointed time. When I got to the building, I was met with two girls, the one on the phone and the other who I found out was Piper, she gave me a lfk and took my shoes off. After that I was introduced to Chelsea who led me to a very nice girly themed room. She offered me something to drink and off we went. VIPs read on. Non VIP's, Chelsea is really cute so treat her well. When I got to the room with Chelsea, she was wearing a lavender lace see-through top and booty shorts. We started to dfk and my hands roamed around her body, feeling up on those really nice breasts. She asked for the donation and she lead me to the bathroom to shower together. There were a few mongers already in the apartment so it was basically like playing red light green light when entering and leaving rooms. Once in the shower, she started to tease my cock with some light bbbj and the nice changing light bulb was a nice touch. After it was okay to go out and change rooms the fun began. She pushed me towards the bed and we did some dfk. I laid her down and started sucking on her nipples and made my way down for some daty which I did for some time, she is au natural down there which I did not mind because it was a nice change of pace from the usual bald kittens. She guided me by pushing my head down in the spot that she liked but the limited english is a bit hard when trying to make her reach o. After that it was my turn so we switch to 69 and get some bbbj and dt. She then spread my legs and started rimming me which felt pretty good so I let her continue dato. When she was done she took my dick and placed them inbetween her tits for a really nice titty fuck. Then on came the cover and she rode me cg and switched to a few more positions with edge of the bed mish, and doggy. Chelsea has a really cute face so I almost felt reluctant to pound away, almost. I dont usually blow my load in the bag so after the pounding and a few english words she moaned, off came the cover for bbbj. She knew how much pressure to suck me off right and I blew my entire load into her mouth while she was still sucking. We finished off with another shower and some more dfk and touching. She helped me get dressed and I tipped her nicely, which made her happy and gave me one last kiss. The two girls including piper put on my shoes and I left happy. Overall, I would come back for more.
positive Convenient incall location in mid-town. Standard two call system. Greeted at door by mamasan with Piper at her shoulders in heels and tight dress. She led me to her room to get better acquainted... Piper is an energetic little sex bomb who went out of her way to please. DFK in doorway as a greeting. She took off my shoes and offered me something to drink (water, wine, whisky were the choices) which I thought extremely courteous and welcoming. We went up to a bedroom and continued kissing. She has lovely soft tits and moaned with pleasure when I grabbed them and sucked on them. Off to the shower where we washed taking me in her both for lovely BBBJ- lots of tongue, good pressure/technique... Back to the room where she playfully throws me on the bed and smilingly says I want to be in charge. Ok I said. She went into a drawer and pulled out plastic handcuffs. After putting them on she worked my cock for 10minutes, rimming deeply as well. Wanting to fuck her, I pulled off the handcuffs and told her to wrap me up. Various positions- mish, side, doggy, piledriver. She was extremely tight and couldn't take all of me. Had a hard time getting her to spread open completely but I will always choose tight young pussy over alternative any day. CIM for finish. Superb service. With a bubbly positive personality. Go see her and treat her well. Worth multiple visits...
positive Easy set up--2 call. Gia is a real treat. Pictures are her, but do not do her justice. Tall leggy cute blonde that love to have fun. Will repeat. Gia is the classic Nordic blend Wisconsin girl with a body for sin and a playful attitude to match. As I started out giving her a back rub, I looked down across the length of her shapely body and saw the mold for barbie. May providers claim "Barbie" in their adds, she is! Anatomically correct of course. Something about a ex stripper provider, the just seem a bit naughtier. Once she got comfortable after a quick LE check it was playtime. Gia is a former dancer- which is no surprise looking at her lean leggy build. She has the art mastered of every move exuding her sensuality from the arch of her back to the move of her body across the playing field. Easy to laugh as well. With the length of her legs, it was easy for her to straddle over me and perform wonderful oral with her ass raised up and moving in a hypnotic rhythm. Swithced to her fav DS for a while, but I needed those long legs over my shoulders--not problem. She seemed to really get into it. Collapsed to her arms and she held me a while and playfully darted my hair. Left me in a wonderful tail spin. Will repeat soon.
negative I am always on the look out for sexy hot young blondes, especially European blondes with sexy accents, so when I saw Helena Rozac's ad on Citysource, I knew I had to try to set up a date. Helena is new to the scene and did not have a review when I first noticed her. And while her ad photos were stunning, they were not verified. But every once in awhile, I let my loins get the better of my brain's common sense and engaged in a risky venture. Why not? You can always walk away should the ad be too misleading. I fully understand why some respectable providers, especially those that are novices, students or who have day jobs might want to use models in their photos to represent them. They want their hobby lives to remain separate, just like clients want to be incognito. It's a mutual partnership. But if the real person is not reasonably represented by the model, I have no problem in walking away from the meeting, after leaving a token of appreciation for their effort. It's a risk that the ladies take when using a model in their ads to represent them. With that in mind, I sent an email request off to Helena. She responded quickly and we set the date. Communication is all by email until the day of the date. Her incall is in an upscale apartment complex in West Hollywood with easy covered parking. In fact I had been there a month ago when I had a date with another sexy model type from Europe that I have also reviewed. A few days before the date I noticed that Helena received her first review. She was given an outstanding evaluation by a seasoed hobbyist so that helped me be less anxious about Helena. Anyway, on the day of the date I drove up to her apartment and parked. She texted me the door and elevator codes and when I was on her floor, she texted me her room number. I walked down the maze of corridors and finally reached her room. I knocked and the door slowly opened. I don't know about you, but I find the ritual of the incall instructions, codes, texting and secrecy amusing...like a scene out of an espionage movie .... intrigue...Jason Bourne! Sometimes it's almost comical...I once was in the wrong apartment complex ...and rang the wrong apartment and when the door opened... I was greeted by an old man. I walked away from that one without leaving a token. Any, the door opened and I walked in. Standing behind the door (also part of the amusing hobby ritual) was Helena. Well I knew immediately that I was not going to walk away. My member was correct this time and he was very happy, excited, and standing at attention. While she may not be the girl in the picture ( I never know for sure and if they are cute, I really don't care), Helena, as described by her first reviewer, is DDG. She is very young, has light blonde hair, really nice fit and slender body, very fair smooth silky skin, and a gorgeous face. She was dressed in a tight short black dress revealing ample natural breasts, nice rounded derriere and long slender legs. She is probably 5' 6" to 5'7" and weighs 115, just perfect for me. I prefer thin to slender woman. Her face is very pretty and her warm smile made me feel welcomed. We hugged, lightly kissed, and chatted to get to know each other. I excused myself to freshen up with a shower. I returned in my briefs to find her standing waiting for me. We started out with DFK. She is a very good kisser and she was generous with her kisses throughout our session. My hands were roaming all over her splendid youthful body. Helena is new to the trade and has other activities that keep her busy. Thus she needs to be discrete with her appearance in her ads. She may not be long in the hobby so you may want to take advantage of the opportunity to be with a young gorgeous Euro Blonde with a natural killer body. Just be nice and courteous to this young lady who is starting off in the hobby. Be a gentleman and treat her well, so that others can benefit from her happiness in the hobby. We stood there kissing for a long time. My hands were roaming down her firm rounded derriere and massaging her cheeks. I lifted her dress and rubbed her through her thin panties as she moaned deeply into my ear. I turned her around so that I could kiss the nape of her neck and whisper into her ears. My hands moved up to caress her full natural breasts that were begging to be released from their lacy bonds. They filled my palms and felt wonderful and responsive. I continued to make love to her with my hands and mouth, kissing her back and moving down to her booty where I kept kissing her and licking her smooth skin. I eventually made it to her honey pot and probed it with my tongue through her now wet panties. I stood up and we moved towards her bed where she then removed her clothes and lay down, giving me a seductive look to join her. We continued to DFK and feel each other, her hand on my hard cock. I made my way down her body kissing her silky soft skin. I stayed at her beautifully shaped natural full C cups and erect nipples for awhile, enjoying their texture and responsiveness, especially her left breast. Finally I reached her lower lips, her golden landing strip guiding me to her wet pleasure zone. DATY was memorable and she really got into it, writhing and moaning to my probing flickering tongue. She climaxed twice and my hands confirming her double release by the hot moisture that collected on the small of her back and the intense grinding on my mouth. She tasted and felt so good. I let her recover than we resumed our DFK. I really enjoyed kissing her and looking on to her pretty youthful face. She really is pretty. Helena then made her way down my body kissing my skin along the way. When I felt her lips on my throbbing penis, I almost came. She really knows how to blow and her oral skills are superb. I let her continue to devour my throbbing member for a few minutes and than asked her to ride me in CG. Helena put a cover on and slowly lowered herself on me. She is very tight. I was surprised by her skill and technique in this position. Definitely in the top 5 with CG in my hobby experience, probably helped by being able to see her beautiful face enjoying the ride, seeing and holding her beautiful breasts, and feeling her light blonde hair fall over my face as she leaned forward to DFK me. She came but continued riding me with vigor. Her movements and the visual of her splendid body hovering over me brought me very close to the edge, so I had her switch to DG. I loved looking at her perfect derriere and enjoyed her approval of this position. We then rolled over to MISH where I could once again look into her blue eyes and DFK her. Our mutual thrusts, DFK, and staring at her beautiful face pushed me over the edge and I came hard. She kept me in her, milking me for a few minutes. When we separated, I went to shower to rinse off the sweat. When I returned, Helena was resting on the bed. She looked so beautiful... a young sexy slender European blonde with perfect breasts and silky skin. What a sight! I lay down beside her to chat about our lives. She is a student, part time model, and exploring the hobby as a way to help her do the things she wants to do in life. After a short recovery, Helena began to stroke me and we started to DFK. I had her sit over my me with her facing the wall. I started to DATY and she responded with deep moaning and grinding. I loved watching her pretty face from below respond to the pleasure of my tongue. After satisfying her again, I wanted her in CG, my favorite position with Helena. She rode me to completion. It was a perfect date with a hot young blonde. I showered and she bid me farewell with some DFK. As stated, she is a novice, a diamond in the rough, who will over time learn the finer points of being a courtesan. But I can tell you that her skills are at the top of the trade and her beauty makes up for her being a novice. She has a GND personality - well at least an European GND personality. She is just refreshing to be with and I really enjoyed my time with her. I will repeat.
positive Attractive Russian petite spinner. Looks a bit like a young Courtney Cox. As always, this agency came through, never disappoints. I'd repeat if she returns. The pics are relatively accurate. She's a thin beauty. Has a Russian accent but decent English, we had no problems communicating. She quickly broke the ice with an offer to shower with me. This is something I usually experience with the AMPs but not typical for this agency. Playing around in the shower was nice, a little LFK and touching got me really in the mood not that I already wasn't. She helped me towel off and I returned the favor, then we laid together and chit chatted for a second before we started some more LFK and body kissing which slowly led to a very pleasant and long lasting BJ. I think she sensed I was going to blow but somehow I maintained. From that we quickly went into cowgirl and somehow ended up in missionary. There she wrapped her legs around me. Something about those legs... we stayed in missionary for a while, went fast, went slow but stayed in missionary the whole while and eventually... a good ending. After cleaning up,I still had a good 20 minutes on the clock. She told me to relax and started to give me a nice gentle message. Eventually the message turned into a second BJ but this time it was a good bye BJ as I had to start exiting. Took a quick shower, LFK'd and left. Overall a nice experience with a really attractive Russian spinner.
positive I was free for a couple of hours during the middle of the day and hopped on TER to see recently reviewed providers in Maine. Was looking for something new. I saw Mary's ad and thought she looked cute and decided to give her a call. We talked for a bit and kept the conversation clean, and I inquired about her advertised rates.. So, we set the time and I followed her directions pretty easy. Second call got me to the door. Slight smell of smoke once inside. After the introductions and check I left payment on counter and disrobed. After laying down I asked about the end and if she was okay with my expectations. She was happy to oblige. All in all- decent experience that didn't break the bank and gave me a taste of what she has to offer. Will repeat for the full menu next time. VIP Read on. After we both were naked and me on the table I asked about body to body and a hj finish. She was okay with that but asked for a fifteen tip on top of the 100 for the rub. I was okay with that. She rubbed me for a solid half hour. The first twenty spent rubbing my back. She's definitely not a pro, but she's got some okay technique. The best part was feeling her rub along my back with her rack. She had me turn over and offered a great view as she teased me and got my blood pumping. At about the half hour mark she licked me a few times and started stroking. She kept it up for maybe ten minutes before I popped. She laughed and helped me clean. We talked a bit more before I left and I promised to come back for the full menu soon. I think she'd be decent and probably above average for the area. Who knows?
positive Setting up with VIP is typically easy. The provider I booked cancelled last minute. Sadie had just gotten pictures taken by agency and was available. I took a complete chance. Got hotel, arrived and got room number. Made it inside the room and was met by an attractive women with medium skin and a perm. Exchanged some pleasantries and acknowledged that she was new. Ensured she was ready. She said that the photo shoot got her horny. Had a nice time, but will not likely repeat given other NCVIP ladies. We started with some caressing and light kissing. She was already down to bra and thong. Kissing got a bit more involved and I removed her bra revealing some nice natural breasts that were good sized for her frame. After some titty play, she removed her thong to reveal a bare kitty with lips a bit protruding and moist. However, she was grasping at my pants. I finished disrobing while she continued to tease my penis. She then said that she was going to use a condom which was a bit unusual and disappointing for an NCVIP model. Nonetheless, suited up for a pleasant, but not mind nor head blowing CBJ. After some time, she wanted to ride and jumped on. She was energetic yet still controlled. After a few minutes, I lost my juice in the cover. We both cleaned up a bit and I thought about heading out given Sadie was new. However, she asked if I was up for more and I decided to give it another try. I asked about an uncovered BJ and she said she didn't like guys cumming in her mouth. I agreed not to fire, and she provided a very nice and pleasing BBBJ, but without really going all out. After her orgasm the first round, she preferred sex to receiving oral. We went thru mosh and spooning before going K-9. When she came again, I was overwhelmed and lost another in the cover. We cleaned up, hugged and said goodbye. I know she will be able to please many others, but I likely won't repeat and wait for my faves.
positive After using this agency several times, it has become a consistent stop for me along with two others. Anyways, simple texting system and was recommended that I try Joy based on a previous experience. Show up...and greeted at the door by a gem of what I'd call 'pretty girl next door' that you grow up hoping and praying you get to talk to. Non VIPs, I'd do it. In I went and up to her room. Wonderful, coy girl who is BUBBLING. We exchange pleasantries and donation and off to the shower. Typical scrub and clean and preview of BBBJ - with a lot of DFK while we waited (someone was leaving when I was in the bathroom). Back to her room and instantly going at it. DFK DFK DFK, hands all over, and then she pushes me down and goes to down for a great BBBJ. On with the cover and we go at it doggy, missionary, reverse cow girl, back to missionary until I pop. We lay down and relax...and she gets me going literally minutes later. BBBJ was awesome and Asian cowgirl until I popped once again. About 15 minutes left and with about 5 to go, she starts giving me a HJ and playing with her clit. I was in awe, and next thing I know she's asking me to jerk-off while she is playing with her clit. As I'm about to explode, she starts blowing me while I CIM and it was HOT. Great experience.
positive This girl's really nice, she knows how to perform and get you to enjoy yourself. I didn't feel rushed, she seems to respect the time you paid for. She was able to follow my request really well, which is great because I was looking for her to do specific things, and she really delivered! Once I stepped in the door, she greeted me with a warm hug. She led me inside into her bedroom and spoke real sexy-like to me. She asked me what I wanted to do with her, what I wanted her to do. So I told her I wanted her to slowly take off her lingerie (she really has nice lingerie by the way!) and get on her knees for me. She knew exactly what to do, and I could feel that she respected my request without hesitation. She was using both hands and her mouth to slowly and carefully suck my dick. I like that she wasn't trying to get me to nut quickly. She changed up the speed and then I motioned for her to stop and get on the bed. Again, she led me with a smile and showed her nice ass to me. I took the invitation and slowly put my cock inside her, and went at it for a while. I really like the noises she makes, it lets you know that you're both enjoying it. We then switched it up to cowgirl and she was superb: I mean, I could see how she was actually into it! I told her to slow it down a bit before I asked her to lean up against the head of the bed, so I could give a facial like in the end of the pornos. She gladly accepted, and she smiled and opened her mouth for me. I jerked myself until she took my load. After that, since I still had some time left, I asked to explore her pussy with my fingers in the shower while she cleans up. I stayed with her in the shower and felt her up before washing up, getting dressed and leaving. She was also smiling and polite when saying goodbye. All in all, Kiera's a really good listener and listens to what you want. Definitely a 9/10 experience.
positive I read Rene's other review and I disagree on a few poinrts. First of all she is not "very fat". She is heavy but well proportioned and not what I would consider a BBW. I also find her very attractive - in fact beautiful. As with any provider YMMV but I connected with Rene and we had a very steamy time. If you are a good kisser you will be rewarded. Rene loves sex! We started with a heavy kissing session with tongue. I spent some time sucking her very nice breasts but had to go down on her pussy. She talks dirty but not slutty which I like. It took a while but I made her cum real hard. I did not mind the wait as I love to eat pussy. After that we had a long session of mish and side saddle. After a while she got on top and boy did she ride me. Then back to mish. At one point she went down on me BBBJ but I enjoyed everything else much more. I must have worn her out but she kept going. Being a senior I don't cum quick but it just makes the session better. Rene is very nice and wants to please but as always YMMV. Treat her right and it will seem like you are making love to your girlfriend. I will see her again and again.
positive Had the fortune of meeting Sarah on a whim after another woman cancelled. My lucky night, this young woman is a peach, total GND, professional, sweet, honest. I hope to repeat. Met Sarah for outcall at my hotel, contacted and she was there within an hour, honest and pleasant on the phone, not all shady and attitude like so many. She arrived at my door wearing a tight black skirt and nice tight top, no bra, she seemed freshly showered and smelled so nice. An interesting LE check, and she went to the head to freshen up. She came out and we kissed LFK which developed into DFK although she warned she never does that. Great kisser. I explored her young body with my hands, she's not skinny, but not flabby either, just a nice thick, firm young body, and awesome firm natural breasts. She has supple soft ivory skin, and beautiful straight blonde hair. We laid on the bed and she told me she loved sucking dick, ok that works! CBJ was top quality, and then I wanted to DATY, except she doesn't allow this, total bummer because her kitty looks so sweet all shaven, she does however like gentle touching and FIV and got really hot with that. We fucked in mish for a while with her legs up and I lost it there with her moaning and her young firm breasts bouncing while I drilled her tight, wet hotness. This woman is a total GND hottie because she is genuine, has an intense sex drive, is really chill and relaxed, and obviously likes what she's doing. She's a sweetheart, be good to her and she will show you a hot time. I can't wait to repeat.
positive Used agency before with great services provided by very hot Russian girls. Intrigued as Mila's pics looked best from other girls seen. Had a couple of positive reviews and this made decision very easy. Text for apt date and time and was confirmed within 15 mins. Texted when arrived, provided room number and off to the races. As previous reviews have stated, Mila does not speak much English, but more than makes up for it with her great service. Definite repeat. Knocked on door, opened, she was hiding behind. Entered and greeted by stunning blond with a magnificent body and face. She had a huge smile on her face, hugged, light kiss and talked for a little. Started making out like teenagers while standing in front of bed and were both naked within 5 mins. She laid back on bed, LFK to DFK and worked my way down for work on her great enhanced tits. Mila is very sensitive all over...tits, stomach and while performing DATY. Great session of DATY with her squirming and moaning. She had me stop after O and more DFK...gave me a "thank you" and than she went for BBBJ...great skills and her motor she kept on going. Sensed ready to pop and she proceeded to don cover with her mouth and mounted me. Great session of CG with her leaning in for DFK and leaning back to expose her great rack. She flipped around for RCG and than wanted in her in MISH. Tall legs in air and wrapped around me while I pounded away...finished first cup and we both cleaned up. Laid down on bed and chatted for a little more...her background, city and than she went for the cover again. This is where the language barrier took a turn. She went to put on the cover and I said not yet...think she thought I said nyet. Started kissing again and went for 69, asked for cover and she said, though you said no...we both started laughing when I finally convinced her I stated not yet. Anyway, on went cover and wow, went to town. MISH on end of bed until completion. Mila is great, like the energizer bunny...no restrictions with this girl, just a great GFE session.
positive Asian Sensation is becoming my favorite provider company. I was looking to hook up with Cinderella but Piper and Joy were available. Did a quick look on the website (the photos are real) and chose Piper. Good choice she texted back... she was write. Read on... Two call/text set up. Texted when I got to the location and buzzed in. Was met by Piper - very cute. The girl in the photos. Very English was slight, but that's not detriment. She's very loving and friendly. She helped me undress and started rubbing up against me and some LFK and DFK. Got lead to the shower for some cleaning where she soaped, rinsed, and a quick BBBJ. I got all excited. Back to the room she started with my standing and her squating for more BBBJ. She's quick good. I couldn't stand anymore and sat and the BBBJ continued. Some biting which was nice. I got her into 69 and tasted her while she tasted me. It was really nice and she was getting really into it. I said, "I have to fuck you now". She popped the cover and went into CG. The nice CG where she squats on the johnson and not on the knees. Points there. Got her into Mish and pumped away. I slowed down because I wanted to make it last. She moaned and moaned and moaned. Signaled for the CIM and I moved up to her mouth and started pumping in her mouth. Great explosion and a great roar from me. After a few minutes and cuddling (she doesn't waste that much time), round 2 started. More BBBJ to get me aroused again. She mentioned that she likes sucking but I needed to be inside her again. Got her into doggie and pumped away. She got into position lying on her stomach with me on her back and she did this thing where she crossed her legs making her even tighter. It felt awesome. I got her into mish again then CIM again. I think I roared louder than I ever had before. It was really fun. Thank you and I'll be back.
positive Something about her ads always intrigued me, the way she promoted herself. No reviews so I decided to TOFTT. Seemed friendly over text so I gave it a shot. I was looking for something very specific, but, although a bit on the pricey side, she delivered. She's a late 30-something milf, kinda chill and reserved at first. She's a mix, half black, half white (I thought she was latina at first). Came off as a bit cold at first, but as the minutes went by and I got comfortable, there was something sultry about her, enticing. Basically: I had a feeling this chick was going to suck my dick insanely well. And she did. That's all I was looking for--oral; can't vouch for the sex or anything. Aunt Flo was in town so she even kept her shorts on. She does have nice tits, capped by beautiful dark areolas, but honestly, I was there for one thing. You need to pay extra for the BBBJ but I have to say it's worth it. This chick doesn't blow you--she makes love to your cock with her mouth. I don't know what she does with her tongue, but she gets this amazing swirling/suction combo going that honestly feels better than any pussy I've ever been inside. Keeps good eye contact and takes direction well as long as you're respectful. (Pro-tip for the bigger guys out there: she comes off as a bit of a size queen--complimented my cock a few times. Told me: "I like having a bigger canvas to paint my masterpiece on." Is that not the hottest thing to hear as some chick is sucking your huge dong? She's made several other comments via text message since I last saw her. So if you're hung and like having it worshipped a bit, she's your girl). She coaxed the first load out of me by working over my tip and underside of my shaft--felt so fucking good. The second load she earned with a good old fashioned stroke and suck combo. And here's the only downside--she's a cum dodger. Doesn't want it anywhere near her mouth or face. The last few seconds before I blew the first time were simply incredible and I would've loved to finish properly into her amazing mouth. But...no. I don't begrudge her that but if that's a deal breaker for you, now you know. Last thing: she's super chill, intelligent and friendly. She's not some 105 pound stripper with fake tits or some high end call girl or some meth-head looking to fuck guys to support a habit. She's a real woman, divorced and probably has kids, scratching out a life for herself, by utilizing a talent that few women have and all men crave: the ability to give world class head. Treat her well; she deserves it.
positive That's B.A.D. and Amber and one of their great girls. Do I need to say anymore? I would totally recommend, although I personally didn't connect with Allie. But she tried so much that I would say that many other folks will find her amazing (and I did as well, its just matter of personal preference). Non-VIPs, go and see her! So, to explain why I didn't connect with Allie - I probably was too tired that day and I expected a little bit different face than I saw upon the start of the date. Next time I would make sure to double-check photos and be fresh. To the session - it was amazing, Allie caters to your every need, and her key skill - rimming. Even though the session is standard routine (DFK -> undress -> more DFK -> mouthwash & shower -> onto bed with massage and BBBJ -> sex in various ways), Allie always introduces rimming whenever she can, and she is really good at it. I mean, I've got such quality rimming only once before - with Sasha (which was from the same BAD agency, btw). Anyway, you have DFK, BBBJ, 69, CIM, Rimming, DATY, doggy and cowgirl. And did I say rimming? There are might be more on the menu, I just didn't inquire. And she does a very pleasant massage, which was quite amazing and helped me to rejuvenate myself after a long day. We also talked a lot via help of her translator-app about herself and myself. In general, I very much recommend her, because she tries very hard to make you happy. It just didn't click for me, that's all; but looking at other reviews, I can assure that Allie is indeed amazing.
positive I recommended to Jenn The Body by a friend. She opened the door at her mid to upscale hotel in Anaheim. She looks better in person than her pics. She invited me in and immediately she made me feel comfortable. She was wearing a sexy outfit with high heels. I took of my clothes laid down on the bed and she joined me. Immediately I started DFK with her. Passionate, better than a girlfriend. I caressed her body and she responded. She likes to get spanked (lightly) and really got a kick . I explored her and she me. She was wet. She gave me an awesome almost deep throat BBBJ. I think she is working on it, and even during the session it was great. We slipped on a condom and we tried a multitude of positions. She was comfortable with all positions. She moaned and moaned. We ended up doggie style. Oh, doggie style, I forgot to mention her ass. Beautiful is the only words I can use to describe it. Lovely soft skin. She is a nice classy girl. One tattoo. Completely drug fee. Overall really nice. I can't wait to repeat.
positive Angela speaks English pretty well, but she has a female booker for us to get us situated easier into a large, gated complex. Once the door opened, a smiling Angela appears behind the door.... She bows and asks for your shoes to be removed. She is a sexy gal, probably really is 43 years old as she states in her ad and carries it well. She is slim and fit with great big fluttering eyelashes that flirt with you and she has a sweet smile that is cute even if the teeth are not perfect. I have seen Angela twice now and will be back, mainly because she really seems to enjoy it! Both times I have opted for the one hour one-sixty sessions to take my time and it's been great. She offered me a shower and readied me for it, then dried me off very professionally afterwards. The first time I was unsure of what to expect and she lay me down on the floor mattress next to her bed. She asked if I wanted a hard or medium massage, and I replied soft. It was as if that word was her cue and the next thing I know her hand is gently in my ass, separating my legs slightly so that she can insert her tongue! This girl can rim and wants nothing more than to stick that tongue up your ass and get you going in a big, big way! Wow; I was pleasantly surprised and rock hard, so I asked her to lay down. She flipped off the top of her dress to reveal very large, well done but hard breasts and pulled up her skirt to reveal nothing underneath. This is a typical AMP style and while I didn't ask, I would guess that was her training ground for this upgrade. After a tonguenchic exploration that proved the nipples were expertly done during the major enhancement to allow them to perk to attention at the slightest flick of the tongue, I moved down south to a very clean and tasty pussy of perfection. The second my tongue hit clit, she responded with passion-filled hunger and never stopped. We went into a session of intense oral lovemaking and it was a blur. She loves DATY and loves DATO and will guide your head to her spots to have tremendous O's of exciting pleasure. She is really fun. We did some slow and cautious P2P and DFKed, then back to oral and then she sucked my rock hard dick with a pretty good BBBJ, then wanted to fuck and pulled the condom out from nowhere and slid it on. Easy entry due to extreme slippery conditions of juiciness, but her pussy is very tight and clamps on your and then she raises her arms to push herself off the wall behind her head and into you as hard and fast as possible, like you're no longer there and she is just having a blast with your dick and she will fuck you hard until she comes and then let you keep pumping away as long as you want! Great time, both times. She is a find and though the booker has told me to check out her new 28 year old girl, I may just have to check in with this one who has the experience and loves it as much as we do, because it makes it that much more enjoyable!
positive This is my go to place in Manhattan now. It is in a good mid-town location and they provide a good atmosphere. I have visited this place a couple of times before. No one there that I met can speak English much but the speak enough to get the job done. I went on a weekend and had the place almost to myself. The Mamasan that time was a young girl who looked like a provider herself with punk rock dyed hair - hell I rather have been with her but she asked me who I wanted and I said whoever was available and she picked Piper. After the obligatory shower where she washed me good and gave me a preview BJ we went to the room and she went to town on my cock and balls. Sucked them real good. I asked for doggie and just rammed home and came in bag fast. A real nice pussy. In fact as I was fucking her she said in heavy accented English "Fook my Chineee pushie" which I found adorable. After I came she went down on my cock and sucked my post cum cock and she enjoyed making me shake. As she was sucking me she asked me to smack her ass hard - she loved it she said. After I collapsed I asked for a massage and she gave a pretty good one. We cuddled girlfriend style and she played with my dick and got him hard again and sucked him again without prompting. I asked for condom and again fucked her doggie this time slapping ass hard and she came at the same time I did. She got to cups out of me. I thought I was done but she went down on me again and sucked my cock as I writhed under her - she pinned me down 69 style and made me cum in her mouth. They have a bucket where they spit out the cum, etc. 3 orgasms in one hour session. I will repeat. This place provides a good Asian GFE session. I enjoy the Asians undressing me, showering me, fucking me, and then showering me again and dressing me up and sending me on my way.
positive At home watching TV, had been watching Leya ads for some time. From her pictures she appeared to be an older Hispanic woman, but her pictures do her no justice! She is gorgeous! She was very apprehensive upon us meeting which probably showed up in her performance. But, overall, she was an awesome person, sweet, beautiful, and accommodating. I'm planning on seeing her again, I can't wait. In continuation from above; we were texting back and forth about seeing each other. She seemed apprehensive through text and she kind of made me nervous because she was posting ads from two different telephone numbers. But what drove me to her was her squirt video and how good her pussy looked wet. She stopped texting me at one point, so I give her the benediction and begin looking for other providers, until I said "fuck it" and started watching porn. Nonetheless, she texted me back assuring me that she was good (probably with another date) and that I could start heading over. Well, I told her I could be on my way and she tried to just give me the general vicinity and I told her I'm new to the area as well so if she could simply GPS me the address, I can navigate there. She eventually agreed and I was at her door within 15 mins. The location was really sketchy and is known for police stings so now I was really nervous about being seen. Even if the provider isn't setting you up, if a cop sees you leaving this hotel, they'll probably pull you over and harass you. Nonetheless, I texted her that I had arrived and she gave me the room number which I coincidently parked two doors down from. Well I think that scared her because I knocked on the door quick. She waited about an entire minute to open it, but when she did, I was grateful. She's so gorgeous and reminds me of a Hispanic girl that used to work at my local mall that gave me her number but we never got to hook up. She's the type of girl for me that causes me to get an erection just being in her presence. Again, she was even more nervous now that I was in her room so she kept asking for me to tell her if I'm a cop. I assured her no by hugging her and kissing her neck. But she's not that familiar with the business so she didn't realize that cops can't touch you unless they're arresting you. They can't hug, kiss, or touch you in an inappropriate place. Anyway, I started removing my clothes and she was still kind of scared. It was until I got naked that she relaxed. I had to put baby fat for her body but it doesn't apply. She's a taller slightly athletic thicker young lady with amazing legs and a big ass, not too big, just right. She grabbed a condom and some lube and bend over me so sexy, I was like, WHOA! Another good thing is that she loves to be fingered because she can be brought to orgasm that way if you play with her clit and g-spot. As she was giving me a good CBJ I was trying to bring her to orgasm. She was on the verge of cumming, but her CBJ was so good I had to stop her because I didn't want to cum. She seems like she'll suck you off until you cum or tell her to stop. Again, she loves hand stimulation so she was really into it at this point. Well I turned her around in K9 and let me tell you, she has some good pussy that all I can say. She gets really wet and I believe this was after another service. I love girls with naturally wet pussies. She kept leaning down like she wanted me to go into lazy K9 but I wanted her upright. I eventually switched her over into mish and she threw her legs back and let me throw them back. Because of her nervousness, she was trying to be quiet, but when I had her legs back getting her g-spot, she eeked out, "I'm cumming"! Small victory for me as not too long later I came ferociously. I mean I came so hard, she had to keep shushing me. We both laughed at the intensity of my nut and then I rolled over and she offered me a towel to clean up. It didn't seem like she's seen many guys here and she also seems very new to the game. I hope no one ruins her because she's a gem for the price. We talked about better locations and we texted back and forth afterwards. All in all, the service was good, it definitely seems as if it will be better on the next visit. I look forward to it.
positive I've been to see Amanda Thorn twice and I'll go to see here again. She looks great and aims to please. Both of my visits with Amanda were similar and both were great. She is on the quiet side and she is easy going, pretty much letting me take the lead and do as I pleased. Initial chit chat Amanda telling me she grew up in a small town and now lived just outside Chicago. She does indeed have that mid-westerner's approach things... relaxed rather than uptight, being herself rather than putting on false airs. Amanda was wearing a skin tight knitted dress that showed off her curvaceous body. She sat on the edge of the bed as I undressed. She then stood and we kissed for a minute before I pulled the dress up over her head. We kissed some more as I removed her bra. Her kisses were a bit reserved with not much open mouth, but over the course of our time together her mouth opened more and out tongues collided. She knelt down on the floor and started a nice BBBJ. She didn't mind my hands on her head to control the action. After I was hard I put on a condom and asked her to lay on the bed. We went at it in a vigorous mish position and then with her legs on my shoulders. Then I asked her to kneel by the edge of the bed for nice doggy. Amanda was happy to obliged as I guided her from position to position. I wanted a little breather so I asked her to just lay next to me on the bed while we caught our breath. I asked her if she liked porn and she said yes so I brought some up on my cell phone and we watched some XXX. I asked her to lay on her back with her head hanging over the bed and I stood on the floor while she took me deep in that position. She could speak pretty well with my cock in her mouth and I told her I was about to blow in her throat and asked if it was OK, she said yes, so I did. She held it in to completely drain me adn then I helped her up so she could go to the bathroom. She returned to the bed and we lay next to each other , talked and rested for a few minutes and I noticed that my time was up although she didn't say anything. I think Amanda will be even more enjoyable as I get to know her better and I plan to see her again soon. little hesitant to open and tongue no fingers slip in a little tightening
positive After seeing her for the first time I was shocked! Beautiful does not sum it up.I was in DC Imagine my delight to learn she will be there as well! It will be new year's day I'll never forget! If you can't read anymore, then just know that Leonie is all that everyone says she is and then some. She'll blow your mind as to what's possible in the hobby. I was in complete shock that this get together could even be set up. I got out of my original plans for the day and felt like a kid on the last day of school. That last school bell rand right when Leonie opened the door to my suite. She was wearing EXACTLY what I requested: black stockings, heels, a matching gorgeous bra and underwear set with garters. Even though I was practically paralyzed, I somehow stumbled into the room when she pulled me in by the collar. My dazed and confused mind jumped from that doorway DFK kissing, to pants off, her on her knees and the best BBBJ that I could remember. She's is awesome at it because she never uses her hands! The site and feel of her after all this time was too much for me and she knew it! She kept pushing me until I popped in her mouth. She then did this special move of hers where she lightly drags her fingernails on my ball sack while I'm still shuddering. Heaven in a bottle, labeled the Leonie Touch. Everything is on the table with her, and we even did it doggie style on the table. DATY with Leonie is great because her clit stands out perfectly when I get her aroused. Between her orgasms and mine the afternoon was a blur. The living room was home to the initial play and talk, and then the bedroom to all the other positions and afternoon delights. I could hammer out more of the details, but do yourself a favor and just see her while you have the chance. She told me she'll be in Miami again and it's like the city has won the lottery. That's how I feel having her back, at the least. Leonie, this is for you! If you read this, know that you're the creme de la creme and it's darker when you're not here! Great provider, definitely recommended!!!
positive Had the opportunity to meet the cute coed next door Scarlet Love. Very pleasant experience and would recommend. VIP read on... Getting approved from this little hotty was easy as she was traveling with an ATF of mine. A few texts and an hour later I arrived at her location. I waited a bit too long for the room number text, but I just chalked it up to her being new. Once I was inside the hotel her room was very close to the front desk. Very uncomfortable. Mainly because she didn't answer the door right away. In any event, now I am in the room and set my eyes on this hot little number. Great hair, makeup and matching bra and panties with a rope sweater on. Very pretty girl. Built like a gymnast. Short compact and spinneresque. I start peeling off my clothes while she is watching me sitting on the bed. She is a bit shy so I mention how I have seen her friend a bunch of times. That helps loosen things up a bit. We start off with some DFK while I start undressing her few remaining items. Soon I find my self licking away on a nice shaved box while she is at the edge of the bed and I am on my knees on the floor. She is keeping her legs together just enough so I feel like she doesnt want me to continue. Not a lot of vocal feedback either so I let her lay on her side and I stand up and shove my cock into her waiting mouth. I can tell I am going to have to iniatiate the events. I am ready to let go of shot 1 and she takes it like a champ BBBJCIMNQNS. We roll over and lay on the bed for a bit and start some very small talk. I am not really getting anywhere so I suggest we start up again for round 2. BBBJ again till I am fully erect then we went thru some positions CFS. Mish into CG. I finished the second shot in K9. I recommend her and will see her again, but only if none of my other favorites are available. She delivered as promised, but I like a woman who knows what she likes and I just didn't get that with Scarlett. I am guessing she will get better with some seasoning.
positive I saw the pics and liked what I saw. I made the appointment and behind the closed door was a beautiful asian lady. I was excited at what was to come. Vips read on... She takes me by hand to the back where we hug and LFK soon turns to DFK. As we are doing this, we simultaneously slip off our clothes one by one and soon enough we are in our birthday suits. We go to the mouthwash/shower routine. A nice shower with washing in all the right areas with some nice body slide and ending with a preview BBBJ. We get back to the room with its nicely placed mirrors. I lie back and she proceeds with BBBJ. She has nice technique with good suction. She proceeds to slowly work her way up kissing my body along the way and then we are back to DFK. I was very warmed up and thus flipped her and started with DATY at her beautifully shaven haven. She tasted great and was very responsive and somewhat vocal to my attempts at DATY. I then worked my way up her body and soon enough we were at DFK again. I asked for the cover and then we proceeded with missionary where her nice thin legs wrapped around my body. She felt great but wanted to change to doggie. For some reason, this position felt unbelievably great. I thought I was going to lose it so I slowed down and we went to cowgirl. A very nice view one more time but I wanted to get back to walking the dog. I don't know what it was but this position once again felt so good. I soon let the volcano erupt and we both collapsed onto the bed. Some small chit chat and then back to the shower with a nice wash up. A nice hug and DFK to end the session and I was on my way. A solid session. She's leaving soon. Don't miss out
positive I had seen someone who recommended Kelly and so I spent an hour with her. She is very pretty but not into the session at all and she seems to have issues with her booker. Not worth repeating. I received an email from a girl I had seen recently recommending Kelly and attaching some pictures. As I found her very attractive, I booked a session that was just ok. Please note that Kelly is very pretty but also note that she is not smiling in any of her pictures. That is because her teeth are in need of significant dental work. Also, her english is not good- unless she complaining about her booker. Upon arrival, i gave her the donation which counted in front of me, and then jumped in the shower. I came out to find Kelly lying on her bed with a sexy set of lingerie. Starting kissing, no tongue and certainly not gfe. Thought I could warm her up with some DATY but she does not let you use finger penetration and only kinda likes to be eaten out. Asked her to blow me which she did in pedestrian fashion. No passion and certainly no deep throat. Having been with these type of very professional, bored, commercial Russians before, I knew that this was just going to Be an OK session. Why are these super hot Russians so business like and mechanical? They would do better by showing (or faking) interest and passion. Fucked her mish, fucked her doggie and then asked her to take off the cover to finish me with her mouth. She did but no CIM or CIF. Chatted for about five minutes , put my clothes on and left. Based on the other reviews, my experience may be an outlier but I still cannot recommend to my fellow hobbyists.
positive Made an appointment with the BAD agency, surprisingly they sent me to a new location. Went to the stop and opened the door... Will repeat. Alli's body is fantastic for an asian chick, Her face looks like she may have some work done, she have this big ol lips that she put to use with Fantastic results. She mostly follow the same scripts as the others here has detailed. She takes of your clothes, a quick bbj, takes you to the bathroom for a shower, a quick bbj, quick Rimming, dries you up with a towel, quick bj. Finally laying on the bed she will lick/suck you from head to toe. Open your ass cheek and eat you out. Similar on the flip, but this time she lifts up your legs in the air and eat you out. Her BBJ is fantastic, Rimming is top notch, sex was good. Finished by way of BBJCIM swallowed. Post deed shower and OMW. She's not a stunner but her service stunned me.
positive After a fairly thorough screening, I was all set to see Katty. Confirmed the appointment on the morning of, and made my way over to an upscale condo development. I was a few minutes early, and Katty was ready right on time. My initial impression was one of mild disappointment. This really isn't Katty's fault, but more the fault of an over-exuberant use of photoshop on her online pics. Katty has an average body, not thin as the photos would suggest. The photoshopping definitely make Katty look thinner and curvier at the same time. She was still attractive though, so I never thought about backing out. She led me to the bedroom, and then we undressed. She offered me the customary mouthwash, and we entered the shower. She thoroughly got all of my naughty bits clean as a whistle, and I was a little disappointed that I didn't get some oral tight then and there. I dried myself off, and we went back to the bedroom. Once there, I sat on the edge of the bed and pulled her close. I focused my attention on her breasts at first, which were 100% natural. I kissed and licked a little bit, and then moved my hands around to her tush. My first impression was, "Wow, she is really clenching her cheeks!" But then I realized that I was probably handling my first instance of butt implants! In each hand was a very firm "pouch" of some sort, which was a little distracting. I went with it, continuing to alternately kiss her lips and breasts. I eventually pulled her on top of me, and Katty slowly made her way down to my nipples, and then my cock and balls. She started with a gentle tongue bath of the boys, and then put my cock in her mouth. She didn't go very deep though, so it wasn't long before I opted for the cover. She mounted me CG, where she seemed to get into it a little, as I was trying to get as deep as possible. I then suggested she spin around to go RCG. I enjoyed the sight of my cock working in and out, and then I grabbed her butt (and those implants!) to a satisfying finish. She cleaned me off, and then cuddled with me. Katty's English skills are rudimentary to say the least, and when I determined that deep conversation was out, I suggested she give me a massage. I'm pretty sure she understood my request, but it appears as though she wasn't in the mood to do it. So we continued to lay there for awhile, mostly in silence. Even though I knew a second pop would be difficult in light of how things were going, with about 20 minutes left, Katty made an attempt to revive the little man. We tried for about 10 minutes, but at that point, I just wasn't enthused enough to get over the hump. We showered once again, I got dressed, and I was on my way. I wouldn't repeat, but maybe you'll have a better experience.
positive I have had several other encounters with this agency. All very good. Called in the morning and asked for Kelly. She was available in less than an hour. Showed up at the apartment building. Texted that I was there and after a few minutes got the code and apartment number. Went up and knocked. This gorgeous young girl opened the door and let me in. Tough girl who knows what she wants. Very attractive and accommodating. She is definitely a must see. It is a 2 bedroom apartment that usually has a girl in each bedroom doing what they do best. She took me to her room, asked for the donation and I complied. Off came the clothes. Took a quick shower and got on the bed. She started giving me a very good BBBJ. Then I had to taste her so we moved into 69 and worked on each other for about 10 minutes. I usually don't have an orgasm this way so she put the cover on the little big guy and we started in the CG followed by MISH. She has beautiful eyes. I was staring at her eyes while I was pounding into her and feeling her entire body and often going for a DFK which she responded with full desire and passion and seemed to be enjoying me as much as I was enjoying her. Time for K9 and we quickly switched position where I couldn't resist and had my first explosion. She took off the cover and cleaned me up. We laid down in each other's arms for a short while and had some casual conversations. Her eyes were so mesmerizing that I started to feel Mr. Meat rising again. So I asked her to help out and she complied with another round of BBBJ. After a while we put the cover on again and tried several different positions. I must have been tired or thinking too much because my erection did not last so she took off the cover and continued with a hand job. That didn't work either so I took the matter into my own hands. I asked her to start fingering herself while I gave the little now little guy a lesson how not to fall asleep in the presence of such beauty. It worked and I had my second while working on myself and fingering her at the same time she was moaning and working on herself. Overall, a very memorable hour. Took another quick shower and left.
positive Call the agency found out amy was available , no need to verify because i have seen other girls from this company. very professional agency and always have great experience with them. amy was available and she is definately a gfe and worth a see go see her , you wont be disappointed . just keep in mind you will have to go through the screening process. vip read on ok so i texted and got the response that amy was available and made the same day appointment fewer hours later. So got to the apartment and the door opened up without knock and there she was in little pink dress amy standing and we exchange hugs and lfk and she asked me to take the showes off and i followed her to the room. once i got there i grabbed her and starting kissing her and dfk and man she know how to suck a tongue , she really enjoyed it. we started making out and a little while later i told her i dont want to take a shower because i just took one and we can just start and get to the business. i started kissing her again and took her clothes off and then mine and kept making out and ask her to lay on bed and went daty on her and kept going from boobs to pussy and man she was loving it. then i ask her to give me bj when was bbbj offcourse, by the way i took the gfe plus session, which was worth it in this session, she started giving me a sensual bbbj and she was so sexy and sensual i was touching her everywhere and putting my hand on her hair and she was looking so sexy and made my cock disappear and man i was ready to pop , which is not really easy for me to pop on bj, but she knew what she is doing. i ask her for the cover and she rode me and i fucked her good at that position and then ask her for missionary where things go really hot and passionate and she was really enjoying it there i exploded and man i was still hard so i kept going , but after a while i stop . she clean me up and i went to use the restroom . when i came back she ask if i want the massage i said yes. amy is really good with the massage , lets just say she is a pro at it. lol . any how i got my massage with the oil , i wanted to try the second pop , so i asked her if we can go again and she started giving me bbbj again and sucking my ball . i got really hard and ask for a condom and told her to go doggy which i wanted to try. she has a cute little tiny butt . i pound her really good at that position she was screaming with pleasure and there it was my second pop. i really enjoy my session with her. she ask for a shower and we cleaned up after and i got on my way with another kiss. would i see her again hell ya!
positive Kelly is a nice, accommodating and extremely beautiful all natural Ukraninan young lady. She works out of a nice Place in a building I have never been to. Screening was easy with only a few hours notice. Overall she is sexy with perfect natural breast that were unreal to believe they that they are real, but they are. She performs nicely and is willing to please. I enjoyed my time with her very much. I would recommend but will not repeat because there is much talent to try out before I retire. She does has a booker so be aware that all emails and texts are not with her. She was a bit cold upon entering her room. She asked for donation then said get undressed. Not the GFE start I am accustomed to from the ladies I see. Pretty much just got straight into business with no affection or emotion. Not a good start. I kissed her fantastic breasts for a few then whet down on her. Absolutely awesome love canal she has. It was it this point that she started to get into it. She seemed to enjoy this and her demeanor improved considerably during my DATY session. I was enjoying my time going down on her but I wanted to try out her oral skills. I got on my knees and put my junk in her face. She did an ok job blowing me but not fantastic. I asked for cover and asked her mount cowgirl. I love watching these young beautiful ladies with natural bouncing breast ride my cock. She did nice work for a while also getting in some Asian cowgirl which is also one my favs. She bounced up and down Asian style for a it while assisted her. Almost blew load but didn't want to go so fast. Then moved to mish while I stood over edge of bed. Throughly enjoying the feeling of her tight pussy and the view of this sexy young lady taking my cock in her oussy was awesome. Couldn't hold out anymore so I pulled out and unloaded on her belly. We chatted for a while then asked if I wanted to fuck again. Of course but Jr wasn't yet up to it. I am often a pimped within the hour unfortunately. So we talked for a while then she gave anothe BJ with HJ until my time was up Took shower then left. Had nice time and she is HOT with a smoking hot body. She just needs to warm up to you first I think. Enjoy.
positive Piper is smoking hot. One of Shirley's best finds. Location is great, discreet but central. Always offer a drink on arrival. Couldn't recommend more highly. I arrived, was met by Shirley who, truthfully is my ATF. Cool, very smart and great at her job. Can't get enough of her. With a stable of amazing talent, she's the only girl there I want to see. But when I saw the pictures of Piper on their website I had to meet her. I'll say it again, Piper is smoking hot. She's got a great smile, a sense of humor and is irrepressible sexually. My visit with her was such a whirlwind, it's hard to remember all the acronyms. Started off with whiskey and some DFKing. Piper was wearing this awesome silk slip thingy that we removed right away to reveal a pair of breasts. . . hard to find words to describe how amazing her breasts are. Quite large, amazing nipples. She's something man. Anyway we went to the shower, got VERY clean. I love getting very clean before sex and these ladies don't fuck around. They scrub you down. Once we got clean there was some vertical nuru action that was very stimulating especially because of those incredible breasts. Nearly lost it in the shower but managed to hold on. We returned to the bedroom, drank a little more and then made out for a good long while. We each took turns down south. She seemed to like what I did. I know i liked what she was doing. Piper brought me to the brink and back multiple times in multiple different positions until finally I donned a coat. She offered herself up from behind and I gladly took her that way. Great ass, those amazing breasts swinging back and forth. Small waist. I had a huge orgasm. Had to lay down and collect myself for a few moments afterwards. Then we hung out a little, tried to communicate (her English isn't so good, wasn't at all an obstacle) and cuddled. I wanted a shower before leaving so we headed back to the bathroom where she scrubbed me down again. I'm typically one and done but she could have gotten me rolling again in there. Alas there was no time. Piper is the bomb. Treat her with care and respect. She's a nice girl.
negative I called the number, they texted me the address with the rates. Not the girl in the pic. Please stay home. will not repeat When i called, another lady picked up told me the rates. She then texted me the address. I get there nice safe location. I get inside, the girl just stands there, didn't look too into it. I laid the donation on the table and got ready on the bed. She took care of the donation and starts to get undressed. She starts me off with a lackluster cbj. We then changed position into missionary position. I pounded her for a few minutes, and changed into doggie style. I pounded her until i climaxed and finished in the bag, she cleaned up, will not repeat.
positive Hot girl. Ass to DIE for. Smart. Cute. Would see over and over. Melissa is the epitome of the good girl/bad girly dichotomy. Let me explain. I booked a dinner date. This is always my preference as I can talk to the woman I'm meeting, get to know her a little bit, it feels much less like a transaction. Melissa was very polite without being prissy. She held her own in conversation while at the same time seeming very interested in what I had to say. She is well mannered and polite as I said--this girl definitely knows what fork to use. This is the "good girl" I was talking about. She's educated and smart without seeming snobby. Now for the bad girl. Back at my hotel, we wasted no time getting close. She has great eye contact and is not shy. What can I say about her body, she's unbelievable. Her legs are long and sinewy, her ass is tight and it fits right in your palm. She obviously exercises. She's toned but not unfeminine, her skin is amazingly soft. I'm a little shy and she was so comfortable that quickly I became relaxed. She's a great kisser, and when I started kissing her neck she began grinding into me and I couldn't wait anymore. I wanted to be inside her right away. I probably rushed the whole thing but hey. She slowly undressed for me and I could her gorgeous body in full view. She offered to go down on me but I wanted to fuck her. I layed back and she mounted me. Her pussy was so wet it's almost like I could feel it through the rubber. Her hips are so hot I had to make her get off me and lay herdown cause I knew I was gonna blow. I wanted to taste what I just felt. She's flexible and I spread her wide open. She was relaxed as I sucked her pussy, and her asshole was so cute and right there, I sucked that too. I couldn't wait anymore. I got on top of her and damn!, her pussy is tight. Fucked her vigorously until she made me cum so hard I screamed. It was heaven until it was over (too soon for my taste but there's always next time). I had a great time with Melissa and I'm counting the minutes until our next meeting.
positive Came across the the agency website and the girls looked too good to be true. Read a few of the reviews and decided to give them a shot, they did not disappoint. RS2K member so verification was quick and easy, after that scheduled an appointment a couple days in advance. Given the location a day in advance and then on the day of the appointment received an email confirming the time and location, from there it was the standard two-call/text check-in. Super easy. As for Mila, VIP's read-on, non-VIP's I would highly recommend. Got the room, gave a soft knock on the door and it swung open, walked inside and turned around to see Mila behind the door. Incredibly sexy in black lingerie, tall, thin and tan, she smiled at me, gave me a big hug and proceeded to LFK. She has an amazing body and I was eager to get started so I excused myself for a quick freshen up in the shower and returned to find Mila laying on the bed. We resumed the LFK into DFK as I lost my towel and she lost what little she had on. I slowly moved down her body, sucking on her incredible breasts until I was ready to move into DATY. Got her juices flowing, she wasn't receptive to FIV but that didn't bother me. Got her to O and then it was my turn. She proceeded to BBBJ with great technique, got me close and I called for the cover. On it went, she climbed on top and rode away until I popped in the cover. Time for a little clean up and then stood her in front of the mirror and admired her body while standing behind her and kissing all over. Back to the bed, and down for DATY round 2, got her primed and asked her to do the same for me. Another BBBJ brought me back to attention, on went the cover and CG into K9. Incredible view as I worked away on her from behind, in the end it was just too good and popped away in the cover inside her. Just enough time left for clean up, small talk and a hug and kiss goodbye. Mila aims to please, is incredibly sexy and made me a happy man. Would repeat for sure if she comes back to town.
negative I have been here several times. I have seen almost all of the ladies here. This visit was my opportunity to see two of my favorites here, Cody & Charlee. VIPs read on... I had called & knew Cody & Charlee would be working together this day. I really wanted to see them together. So, I sent Cody a text, and told her I was coming in and that I wanted them both together. Cody was very excited to hear this. Now, I've seen both of these wonderful ladies one on one with them several times. I show up, they both come to the front desk together. They smile & welcome me. Charlee opens the door to take me back to the room, she closes the door & we have a threesome dfk right there in the hallway. We somehow make it to the room. The standard system is thrown out the window..they already have covers in the room. We are all kissing each other & with hands roaming..clothes are coming off, flesh is being exposed, nice huge boobs seemed to be everywhere! Cody and I are kissing & my mouth is going from her mouth to her boobs, and back N forth. Charlee already has my pants around my ankles, and has my cock balls deep in her mouth. I'm fingering Codys wet, warm pussy. The session is a blur of daty on both girls from me & each other. Lots of boob sucking & fucking. A few covers, every position we can think of with me fucking both of them... Round one ended me deep in Cody while in K9, while the girls are in a 69 with Charlee on bottom..nothing like fucking Cody & looking down and seeing Charlee licking my balls!! We rested, well, I did, the girls kept kissing & licking each other & me.. Round 2 was more of the same, with me doing Charlee in mish. Until I was ready to blow..I pulled out, took off the cover, and Cody got off of Charlees face..and like a porn shoot..they put their heads together, stuck out their tongues & let me shoot on their faces and tounges..then they kissed & shared my man mayo with each other. I fell onto them. I will see these two together over & over!!
positive Contacted her assistant Amy via email, after a brief exchange we set up a date for couple nights later. Arrived at a nice apartment complex and was invited in via email. Greeted at the door by a gorgeous girl wearing sexy black dress and heels. Great time was had by all. Will repeat, VIP read on She opened the door wearing a tight, short, black dress and some sexy heels. She gave me a hug and a kiss hello and then led be to the back bedroom. (I have been to the apartment before to visit one of her roommates). Once the bedroom door was closed, it was like magic... She asked what kind of music I liked and I told her whatever she wanted. She put on some nice Latin music and then pushed me against the wall and started kissing me. I let my hands start wandering and came upon a great pair of breasts and nice firm ass. After a few minutes a making out she dropped the straps on her dress and I got the message. We made our way to the bed shedding clothes as we got closer. I laid done on the bed with her and we started caressing one another. She then started a BBBJ, which was amazing. I was getting close so I stopped her and then put her on her back and started DATY. Went at it for about 10 mins and she O'd at least once. She then pulled me up on the bed and began grinding the shit outa me in CG. Alternated between MISH, DOGGY, and Standing MISH before finishing on her tits. We then took a shower together, touching and kissing the whole time. Dried off and then she gave me a great massage to cap off the evening. Had an amazing time and will most definitely repeat.
positive I saw Angel on Eros and after checking her out, on TER, she had one good review, I figured what the hell. At this point, I'm looking for an ATF to see on a regular basis. Her review looked liked she would be the perfect fit. Set it up and met her at a nice incall. Met by a very pretty girl with gray eyes, nice. For the non-VIP'ers it was not what I was hoping for. She was just nervous and not really on point. Overall, I not the best performance. I might consider repeating...YMMV. Arrived and met her at the door, very nice looking Brazilian girl. Walked in, no kiss, she turned away when I tried. I'm hoping this will get better. Nice incall location, with almost a home like feel. I thought we would be making out in a true GFE fashion, after seeing the location. Maybe she is a little nervous? Placed the donation and headed to the shower with hopes up. I was already fully erect after seeing her in G-String panties. Nice body, gray eyes, and blonde hair. Tried to make some small talk, to loosen things up. Oh no, she doesn't speak English too well. So, just plain quiet as I showered, hmmmm. I came out hoping I could get some sparks flying. Down to the bed, no kissing still allowed, so moved to her breasts. She seemed to enjoy and I continued to move her toward DATY. She seemed to enjoy, even speaking Portuguese as she was coming. She then moved on me with a BBBJ, I could tell while she was trying, she just wasn't really into it. Nevertheless, after a few minutes, I was started starting to get into her. She then quit and asked to put on the cover, I'm Horney, so I agreed. She mounted me on top, started and then once again, there is this nervous disconnect. I don't know if it was the language barrier or just the fact she just wasn't really into it. Anyway, we are hitting bumps again. I take her to MISH and really start loving on her. She seemed to spark up and I think finally, but it is not to be. After a short time, I can tell she is still searching to find her center. We move to doggie, legs closed, no sparks. She did cum during the MISH session again and seems to improve when she was having fun. Finally popped to a ok handjob, but she was never really into me, YMMV. I think nervous, inexperience and a bit of language barrier might have swamped this session. More then likely, I won't repeat, but I'm still on the fence about it. Such a nice girl, I just don't know.
positive I had a conference on early Oct. since I had some prior experience of K-girls in DC area and was told that the K-girls in CA is much better. I did some homework and found Crystal who are relatively new by his agency ads. It was easy to verify through the booker and an appointment was made before I got on the plane. Things are not smooth as expected, the plane was delayed from the start, I have to text the booker to change the plan and postponed the date to next day. Anyway, when the day comes, I was so excited! I got a friend with me together in the conference, since the agency has three girls, my friend picked Irene. we went together and the process is smooth and when we get to the apt in San Mateo area, we were given a code to key in at the main gate. after we are in , it is not difficult to find the apt. When the door opens, Two beautiful girls are waiting in the living room, I followed Crystal and my friend with Irene to their own bedrooom, The fun begins..... for VIPs please read on. and to others, I just say this: she is so hot and sexy that I can see her everyday if I lived close...5 stars! When we get into the room, Crystal quickly gave me a big hug and a preview DFK. she is a mid size young lady from South Korea,about 5'2" and with a very sexy figure and Her face is beautiful (I can say she is the most beautiful Asian girls I have seen including the one I dated before). She helped me undress and we proceed to the bathroom for a shower and thorough cleaning. During this process, I have time to exam her nice smooth skin and caress her beautiful nice young breasts. she clean me well and a preview BBBJ is in the menu. I was instantly hard on! In the bedroom, she become a tiger! started with long deep FK...and I love her moist lips and her tongue is playing magic twists with mine, it is so erotic! then she kneed down in front of the bed and starting giving me a long nice BBBJ..it feels so good in her moist warm mouth, I almost lost there.but I was able to hold off. I enjoyed sucking her nice boobs which is natural and soft. her clean shaved pretty pussy smell delicious and I spend almost 10 minutes down there including some 69 position. Then she used her mouth to skillfully put the cover on, we started with missionary then CG then reverse CG and finally we finished in doggy style. we are so exhausted that almost fell asleep. but time is up, she led me into the bathroom again to clean me up. Crystal is a gem, a true beauty. she can understands some English, and speaks fluent Chinese,and Korean (what a surprise!) It was my opinion that she is a must see for your K-girl lovers! five stars from me...
positive Sent Kari a text asking for a quick session. Ask for her rate and did a little negotiating and settled on a rate we both liked. Met her at a nice apartment complex. She is the girl in her ad. Very friendly and I had a nice time. Non VIPs I would repeat. Only had a short stay planned so we got right to business. She is the girl in her pics and she is attractive and very sweet. She had me get comfortable and she did as well. She has a nice body and she started with a bbbj that got me nice and hard. She grabbed a cover and applied. Asked me how I wanted her so I had her lay down so I could get a little taste of her pussy. She was clean and was a nice tasting pussy. She got very wet and I was ready to fuck. We started with mish and man was she wet. You could here the juices flowing. She was really enjoying my cock. I hit it pretty hard and she was encouraging me. Switched to cg and it was a nice view of her tits. Switched then to k9 and she raised her ass high in the air to where I had to stand up a little to insert. That was interesting and man did she feel tight!! I couldn't hold out long and blew in the cover. She helped me clean up and I got dressed and away I went. She never once looked at the donation and I was not rushed. Good time and plan to repeat.
positive Even among the awesome display of new Chinese GFE talent in NYC, Joy is fantastic. Young, super pretty, spinner body, sweet, friendly and totally good to go. Super experience. Recommend without reservation. One of my best experiences in recent years. She's a star and I hope she stays I went without having decided who to see but knew instantly that Joy was the right call. early 20s, petite, pretty face, nice smile and lively, sparkly eyes. Delightful. We went to the room and she basically jumped on me and started DFK. Nice. Wegot undressed an went to the shower where she cleaned me off and did bit of preview BBBJ. Good work with the tongue and smiling the whole time, although sheonly really sucks the head and doesn't take it deep at all. Back to the room, more DFK and then I lay her down and go for her tits and then DATY. She was super responsive and into it and either came or did a rgreat job acting. This went on maybe 15 mins, so a really good session, then back to BBBJ (more intense this time) an I had to fuck her. Joy was totally down to fuck, taking me deep in mish while DFK ing hard. She had such a tight body and perky, firm natural Bs (a large B) that I wanted to get a better view, so we went for dogy in front of a mirror. Seeing her ass in front of me, her beatifual face in the mirror an reaching around to grab herlovely tits was like heaven. Best sex I've had in a whil, and she made like she totally wanted it. Love it. Before I popped Ipulled out and took off h hat for a BBBJ finish, which Joy delivered in fine style, with her tongue going wild on my dick while I popped and Joy not stopping until I was completly done. Just about killed me. Cleaned up, a bit more chat (OK english BTW) ad off I went. Will repeat. Super experience
positive This was one unbelievable night of can't even make this up lol I met LEONIE trough a friend of mine. I thought his girlfriend He said she is a super clean girl to be with .and she is the best girl for the agency He didn't had to say more I was ready to explore Yes he was right she is a very friendly talkative ...and the sexiest I ever been with She showed up next day on a date promptly in a nice summer dress ...nothing else just a dress ... no panty no bra ... she had very pretty skin and she smelled great. I smelled her and got hard. She took off her dress ...I was looking at her body and I almost came .. she took a quick shower ...she is a clean freak ...I loved it...she sat on the bed and played with herself for me. She got wet. Really wet..... I walked up to her and put her hands on my rock hard cock. ..she put her lips on it and slowly slide it in her mouth ... she flicked her tongue on the sensitive part underneath the head pf my cock, it drove me wild. She loves to suck ...ohhh yeah she does....deep throat ...I came all over her face and tits ... She cleaned up and cleaned me off too... . ..I played with her pussy she wouldn't let me inside But she ask me if I can make her come with my mouth ... She tasted so good my cock was hard again in minutes....she came pretty quick and started to run when I kept going. I held her place and she took it and came again... she begged me to fuck her.....I layed on the bed and made her ride it......she fucked me like she was desperate for it. ...I came like a champ and she came all over me... We were sweaty and sticky. She cleaned us up and gave me sweet kisses after. I want to fill up her calendar for the rest of the year lol she gonna see a lots of me I highly recommend this girl
positive New girl Piper at my favorite incall. These girls are super sexy and horny and fun. Vicky suggested I try Piper...thank god i did. she looks exactly like her photos, but you can't tell how awesome her tits are. she is dressed in a slinky neglige (sp) that barely holds in her tits. no panties. upstairs, she starts undressing me. i start rubbing her amazing tits and run a finger inside her already wet pussy hole. hot. pants down, pre shower, my cock is in her mouth. this is one horny girl. mouthwash. shower. cleaned me well. got us 2 Bud Lights! we attack each other. fingers mouths tongues everywhere. i sat on her face and she ate my ass. it was awesome. not quite deep throat, but what a soft warm wet mouth. she loved sucking my balls too. i pounded her hard. her eyes roll back into her head. mish. doggy. scissors. i loved it. think she did too. i pull out, rip off condom and shoot a monster into her mouth. she keeps sucking and sucking, and then spits into the trash near her bed. dirty but i liked it. we relax for a bit, drink some beer, then she demands #2. no more fucking. but she sucks me. then gets on the floor, spreads her legs and finger fucks herself w/ 2 fingers. awesome to watch her masturbate. finished in her mouth, while i finger banged her. wow.
positive Amy is an attractive young K-spinner who understands well what is expected of her. Her personality is not scintillating but her performance was fine. Pretty much par for the course for a good K-agency. Amy is 24, pretty and very thin with A-cups and big eraser tips. Said she has been in the U.S. for two weeks. I dont know if she did this kind of work in her home country but I suspect not. She greeted me warmly and we made out with abandon, she is a good kisser. I declined the shower because I had just taken one. Proceeded to give her massage, she seemed appreciative. DATO was sweet but she declined FITO, allowed FIV with condom. Gave her DATY, she asked for soft and slow so I complied. After about ten minutes of patient work she seemed to come. Not sure if it was real or faked. Slipped on the condom and did missionary and doggie, she seemed to enjoy it. I dont like to finish in the bag so I received BBBJCIM with PM. She did not seem to enjoy CIM, went to rinse her mouth out right away. Showered, she washed me thoroughly, a nice touch. As we wrapped up the session I reflected that although Amy was fairly accommodating she hadnt asked me anything about myself. The lack of personal connection was a little disappointing. She said she does this work because she wants to make a lot of money. If you are looking for some good sex and not a lot of conversation Amy is fine.
positive Non VIPs, if you're the first girl is not Sundae, don't accept it. There were three providers available, but the oldest one started in the room. I'm not really cool with that (at all), but overall it was a good experience. VIPs read on... So, like I said above I walked into the room. At first I didn't see anybody, but it was a really nice room at a high-end hotel in Chicago. Then I saw a woman wrapped up on the bed in a bathrobe. She looked to be about 35 to 40. When I mentioned that she wasn't the girl on the picture, she began to try to guilt me into excepting her, which kind of pissed me off. She asked me if the other girl was really that much prettier than her, if she was ugly, if she really looked old, etc. when she saw I wasn't going to take her bullshit, she told me there were two other providers and had them come upstairs. That's when I'm at Sunday and chose to be with her for my time. We waited awkwardly for the other two to leave the room, but when they left it was well worth the wait! If you are a boob man, this is the one girl for you. Gravity won't be kind to her in a few years, so take advantage of it now! Her nipples are pierced, and she loves having them played with. It was fun to feel them harden up between my teeth! She's not a good kisser, but gives a good blowjob. I had her put her her pussy in my face and we did 69, and it was some of the best I've done. She was deep throating my cock while rotating your hips back-and-forth against my face! It kind of made me forget that I had been pissed off 10 minutes before. After we got done with 69 she crawled forward and push my cock into her pussy reverse cowgirl. She rides decent , but not amazing. Her ass is a lot of fun to watch! She's got a good one, and she likes having a slapped...and I like smacking it. She's actually not all that experienced, so her positions aren't expert, but she tries hard :-) she likes doggy style, and she has the perfect ass and pussy for it: just enough cushion but not too much. She's got enough so that you can get a nice big handful, or just slam it and watch her ass shudder as you pound her pussy. All in all, I would give her an A for effort, and a B- for performance.
positive Want to see somebody else but she not worked that day so decide to go whit the place where i had a good experience a week early, called for last minute appt. and Piper was available for a short notice, recommended for non vip's The famous Vicky welcome me to the place and introduce herself and Piper, who is a pretty girl whit a nice set of naturals D's, slim body whit just the right curves on it and attitude to please, after this i move on to the room upstairs whit Piper, the room is bigger than the other one i been downstairs, to start the fun. We start to making out and move our clothes out of the way, Piper go down to give little me some kisses and licking before we move to the shower, where she cleaned me and applied the typical body slide and BBBJ trademark. In the room we started to making out again while i was squeezing her butt checks and later move to play and caresing her D's for a few mins by later ask her to move in front of the big mirror and ask her to start whit the BBBJ while i enjoyed the view, i tried to go deep while there but she can't take it and almost choke in the first attempt, after a while of the BBBJ and before i went to finish there i ask her to laid down and return the favor whit some DATY, at first she seems that fake a little but after a few mins. she started to squeeze her tits and even when i follow her to squeeze them, she encourage me to did it really hard until she finished and after that, while i was still stimulating her clit i moved around and put little me in her mouth for more BBBJ but i didn't want to finish without been inside her so i ask her for the cover and we went mish until i finish, i stayed inside for a min. and pull it out for the cleaning and after she took the hat off and cleaned me she went to BBBJ trying to bring back to life the little guy but i didn't have it on me, its been a long time since the last time i did 2 in a hr. So far all my experiences whit this agency had been good and would be back to check the other ladies.
positive Kelly is an easygoing and down-to-the-earth kind of girl you'd like to hang out at a party. Made a phone call to her number and unlike previous reviewers, she picked it up herself. Her voice was so soft and gentle with an exotic foreign accent which only spiced things up. On top of that is her beauty. She is currently on a one month visit to the States, living in a very nice and spacious apartment. I had a great time with her. She greeted me wearing only lingerie, which aroused me immediately. She led me to the bedroom of a upscale flat. There're not so much stuff in the room except a large clean bed of course but the place is pretty neat. I can tell she is well prepared for my visit. By that I mean she wore nice make-up and perfume and her bed is well made, which is not always the case in this business. Perhaps the only downside is her English. She told me it's my choice of BB or not, but if it's BB I need to take a shower. It's a bit out of blue but my instinct says who wouldn't want to score with such a stunningly gorgeous woman without any restrictions. But only later on I found out that it was not the case. After a quick shower, I came out of the bathroom and found out she was already lying on the bed naked. She turned on the music and we got to the business. We started by DFK with my fingers roaming around her natural, perky breasts. Then I went south on her and had a phenomenal DATY session, succeeded by 69. Her kitty is pink, tight, bald, and as sweet as desert. Frankly it's the best love canal I've ever seen. As she watered up, we went for mish and los. I loved the feeling of lifting her slender legs up in the air. I finished with doggy. Another thing I greatly appreciate is that she didn't frown upon any of my demands. To recap, it's definitely an amazing sex with GFE. Recommend wholeheartedly.
negative Total rip off. Ran off with the money within 5 minutes of arrival. Rachel said she was being driven over by her sister and that her sister would wait in the car. Her "sister" called her shortly after Rachel had entered my room and I had given her the money. She said she had to run out to the car to get her purse and, like an idiot I didn't hold the money until she returned. She drove away with the money. I know I am an idiot for getting suckered but want other guys to know she is a thief.
positive Juliana is great fun to be with. A smile to light you up and energy galore. She's very cute with great natural C's. Having booked only a half-hour, we got to business very quickly. After some light stand-up kissing and some stoking to get me very hard, Juliana positioned herself on knees on the bed and undressed to reveal a health chest in bra- - and the bra came off quickly as well. She bent over to start an enthusiastic BBBJ and given the position was not entirely comfortable we quickly moved to me lying down and her going at it in a more conducive manner. I think we were both eager to move on to the next course so she reached to the night table for a condom (me enjoying her breasts in my face as she reached over me) and dressed me in it. Now started the ride - she mounted me first CG then switched to RCG - banging me hard for a long time in both positions. Boy, she's got energy! After a while I asked to switch to doggie which we did for a bit but I was on the verge and wanted to be able to see her breasts (and play with them and suckle them!) so switched to missionary for the release. After she did her cowgirl ridding boy was she sweaty! She worked very hard and that was exciting! Great time and she's fun and a pleasure to be with. She does have braces by the way, whatever that means to you.
positive I had been seeing Jewel's ads for awhile when visiting the beaches and decided to give her a try. Okay for the rate. I had a short gap in my VIP account when I saw Jewel and did not realize she was CBJ only. I'm more of a BBBJ type guy, but that was my fault for not getting VIP renewed before seeing her. Overall though I can't complain though, Jewel is a bit on the heavy side but overall has a really cute body that is not really all that "flabby", her profile is set for "flabby" likely because her first reviewer felt "heavy" made her sound too fat. If so, I would tend to agree with that assessment. When I got to Jewel's hotel room and entered she was wearing a sexy outfit with heels. We talked briefly and then I took a quick shower and then the fun started. I hopped on the bed and Jewel started a good CBJ. When I started getting close to popping I had her stop for a bit because I didn't want to pop too soon. Next I moved on down for some DATY which she seemed in the mood for and seemed to get a reasonable O out of. Next it was CG for a bit but the cover was not going to work for me that day. So finished off with another CBJ. As far as CBJs go it was a good one. But one reason I'm more of a BBBJ type guy is that a lot of the time I can't pop with a cover on. For the rate I can really complain. For one Jewel is really cute, I just wish her menu was more complete. If it was more complete I might be a repeat customer. Another thing that really impressed me is that she insist that she not be left alone with your stuff. As a matter of policy I try not to leave my stuff unattended when taking a shower anyhow unless I know a provider REALLY well. In the case of Jewel, she does not even want to going around a corner briefly and leaving your stuff where she is. Jewel is concerned that if a guy misplaces something she might get blamed for taking it. (This apparently happened to her once which is why now she insist you stay with your stuff.) Personally I really appreciate that policy. I have had providers intentionally separate me from my stuff when I shower or something and unless I know the provider well, that makes me very nervous. I end up rushing the shower and keeping the shower door open so try and maintain at least an intermittent view of what the provider is doing and where my stuff is. I have never had a provider steal from me, but have read enough stories where it has happened. So I really appreciate that policy of Jewel's.
positive I had a limited window of time to frolic as I had to catch a noon plane, so I went through the TER profiles to find a good match for my circumstance and tastes. I saw Taylor York's profile and site, and felt she was the the lady for the job. Her site photos were various and exciting with a variety of outfits that piqued my interests. Making arrangements with her was easy through her site. Through a couple of emails we set a time and duration. I was very excited to meet Taylor. Particularly as I loved a few of her photos in which she was wearing a vynal or patent leather outfit in one pic, and in another very seductive photo of the side of her back in what appeared to be a black formal dress -with her top down revealing a georgeous profile of her beautiful breast, while posing with a lit cigarette in a long cigarette holder! In all of the photos her face is well obscured. For me the photos were a huge turn on! So finally, after what felt like forever, the day arrived and I was bouncing off the walls to hang-out with the beautiful Ms. York! We met at the hotel bar. She was wearing a cute and tempered sexy black romper with a light sweater jacket with flats. It was the morning and understandably she didn't want to draw attention to herself wearing the outfits I casually requested. She also carried a larger handbag to carry her goodies (!) and a glass of champagne/mimosa. Taylor greeted me with a warm hug and a happy smile. Upon meeting her, I recalled her mentioning she was from New Jersey. Taylor is definitely a upscale "Jersey Girl!" As it turned out, she is from the Atlantic City area. She was very sweet and very conversational, and later I learned somewhat new to the provider experience (7mo). As we went up to the room she shared her adventurous experience a couple days before, with a big puppy who in his puppy zeal nipped her face, cutting and slightly fattened her lip. I wasn't very concerned by this. Taylor wears plenty of makeup which helped conceal her experience with the exuberant pup. We arrived to the room and talked for a while as I ordered and dined on some light room service. Taylor had more campaign and continued to share about her girlfriends, Jersey, etc. At some point I asked her if she'd like to change. She mentioned she brought heels and I think a teddy. Once I realized she didn't bring the outfits I anticipated, my balloon lost a bit of air. I was looking forward seeing the woman in the hot photos. Taylor went to the bathroom to change and returned wearing nothing but panties and sexy slightly scuffed heels. Taylor does not have a hard body. She has a very fit and shapely feminine body. It is a wonderful body! She jumped on the bed and took off her panties. It was then I got hard for her. I went to kiss her and she turned away, sharing her neck. I guess she is really old school about kissing. That or she was concerned about her busted lip. We started out Missionary, then she lay flat on her stomach. It was hot! But as in my emails to Taylor, I wanted to travel to Greece. This was the goal of my lust. I wanted to be in her ass while she smoked a cigarette. This is why I went out of my way to change hotels from the Aria to the Encore, to get a smoking room. As I began playing with her georgeous and inviting asshole, she said she doesn't do anal. "Que?" But her profile said "yes" to anal? And yes to kissing on the lips -and tongue action. I guess you can't always rely on what you read. :( I realized quickly then that in our multiple emails, in which I clearly stated twice I liked specific outfits, I wanted to go to Greece and I wanted her to smoke a little during our session, she never really confirmed or agreed on any of my requests. Despite the great disappointments, I was still boinking a woman with a sexy body and a very inviting and welcoming pussy. Good is good. So I tried a bunch of positions (behind, on top, from the side, etc.) with her, and I found my orgasm, pounding her hard in missionary. Taylor is very new to this unique form of service and business. She has a good heart, a great body and I wish her well in the hospitality business.
positive Another agency that seems to be a spinoff, or partnered with, asiansensation88. I emailed my TER handle and cell number as verification and immediately received a text response asking when I wanted to come in. I wasn't ready, just wanted to get pre-screened! Very easy setup via text the following day. On the morning of my session I texted asking who was available although I wanted Orange if she were. I was told that she was available as well as Tiffany who is at asiansensation so it seems that they share talent. The building entrance is really ugly and the one flight of stairs is almost scary. The interior is very nice, however. I would absolutely repeat with this super-cute, smiley sweetheart that just puts everything into the session. A must see. A very young mamasan met me at he door and took me to the room introducing me to Orange. She is exactly like her pictures and smiles all the time when she isn't LFKing or DFKing which is also ALL THE TIME. I apologized for being an old man and she assured me how much she liked old men. I also told her that my fav was DATY and that made her smile even more. With that invitation I finished undressing her quickly and started DATY right then kissing her all over her very sweet, tiny body. I knew that she'd be fresh as I was the first appointment. What a sweet, perfect, tiny pussy. If the session would have gone no further I'd have been happy. After a while we went to the shower which was next door. the standup shower was waht we have grown to expect with the BBBJ which was delightful although not my favorite. All the time we were laughing and talking as her English is quire passable. She is such a joyful young girl, and young girl is the effect that she has on you....a playful little girl with a very dirty side. Wow! Back in the room we continued with a lot of making out, hands all over the place, mouths everywhere and back for lots more DATY. Orange was very able to direct me to where she wanted my tongue and my fingers to be and I was happy to follow instructions. Most of the session was taken up with DATY and rubbing her pussy....love just thinking about it. When I was ready I told her so and I placed her in a position that I love that I've never used with a provider but seemed perfect with her. I can only describe it as a scissor, she on her back and her right leg over mine and my left over both of hers. This allowed lots of playing with her tits (A, not B as described) and very cute nipples, DFKing and caressing. I'm a one shot guy and that's how i finished. We went to the shower for a rinse and then with 15 minutes remaining she gave me a better than average upper body massage with her tiny,strong hands. Orange is a very sweet, happy, talented little girl and a must see. Treat her gently, she said that she liked older men because they are gentle lovers and dislikes the clients that treat her roughly. I can't imagine how anyone would treat her other than gently. Thanks Orange!
positive Had seen Sundae's ad and gave her a call, she answered and we set up an incall date at her location in the Western Suburbs. She is a really pretty mixed Latina, with a hot sexy body, she is very friendly and we started ................. Chatting and getting to know each other for this 30 minute date, I stripped and jumped in the shower and came out to join Sundae as she was laying on the bed, We did a little LFK, as she was stroking my cock to harness, I was feeling her breasts and and massaging her pussy on the outside, and she was getting wet, she put a condom on my cock and gave me a CBJ, for about 5 minutes, then we fucked in Mish, CG and Doggie and then lazy doggie until I came in the cover. Grabbed another shower and look forward to seeing her again in the future when she is back in town.
positive A friend who met Juliana recommended her to me and even though she had only one review at the time I trusted his judgment. He was right. Juliana is a very sweet, sexy, fun Latina spinner. I definitely recommend. One reviewer mentioned she was a little shy at first but I did not feel that. She was very responsive and easy to set up a date with. She opened her hotel room looking very sexy, wearing only a bra and panty sex. She greeted my warmly, and after I took a quick shower, we started kissing and feeling each other on the bed. She took off her bra revealing a set of wonderful natural breasts which I couldn't help but play with, kiss, and suck. She felt my erection and said "aren't you going to take off your towel" and as soon as I did she started an awesome BBBJ. At this point I think I'd been there about 5 minutes. Shy? I think not. I asked her to swing around to 69 so we pleasured each other, and what a pleasure it was. I asked her to lie down so I could concentrate on DATY which she really enjoyed as I found out she is very orgasmic. She wanted to continue her BBBJ and she did. It felt really great but I was ready for a cover. She put it on and climbed on for an awesome wild CG ride where I lost cup one. We laid down together as she gave me a brief massage as we talked about our lives, likes, dislikes etc. She is very sociable and fun to get to know. Soon she was feeling me and getting me aroused with another BBBJ. Our second round consisted of doggy, then Mish and then back to ending in doggy. What a great time! I took another shower before leaving and when I came out she was still naked. We hugged and kissed goodbye. As I went to the door she climbed up onto the bed and started jumping up and down, her beautiful tits bouncing as she threw me a kiss as I exited. I wish I was recording in slow motion with my phone. I think that image will stay with me for a long time. Thanks Juli for an awesome time.
positive Saw some new reviews, checked out her ads and made the call. The confusion for me was TER has her listed as being in Tampa but her ads have her listed in Ft. Myers but the for real is she lives in Naples. Go figure. Pretty face and great smile. Very accommodating to my needs. Overall a good time for a great value. Called to see when she would be available and spent the next 20 minutes on the phone talking about the hobby. She was at ease about me and I enjoyed the introduction conversation. My main concern was how far the drive would be from me to her which worked out to be just under an hour. A tad far to make her a regular. She lead me right to her door in her complex since all the buildings looked alike. First impression was that she was a little curvier and older than her pictures but still cute and what the Hell I was there! She has a dog so if that is an issue with you, move on. We poured some wine and sat on the couch with the dog to get to know each other. Moving to the bedroom we continued drinking our wine and got undressed. She is very proportionate for her size and has awesome tits, board-line huge. She met my kisses with a closed mouth which was a bummer. She said she got a bad cold from some guy who was sick and stopped open mouthed kissing. Laying back she started on her knees sucking my cock. OK at first but she started to get into it and I was getting nail hard. She said she wanted to sit on my face so she got up grabbed the top of the headboard and lowered her pussy to my mouth. I was a little anxious in this position since I wasn't in control and at times had to move to the side to gasp for air. This had to end so I slide from underneath her and spun her around so I could dine with her on her back. That brought a head clamping O from her. She yelled for me to fuck her so I suite up and dove in MISH. Working up some steam I asked for K9 and she started to rub her clit. we both had a great O together which was a first for me. She was very attentive with condom removal and clean up with a warm towel, nice touch. She got dressed so I guess we were done. I was hoping for seconds since we had time left but I didn't push it. synopsis - she is chatty, cute, good oral skills and a tight pussy at a bargain price.
positive Booker I know made recommendation and off I went, great recommendation, happy I took it, and I had a great time. Mari is very sexy thin tallish and in shape. She was fun and playful. I will repeat. Usual routine, and behind the door was a very sexy girl, met with a DFK, and led into the room, with more kissing and hands roaming. She was wearing a little scrappy stringy dress with no panties and her nipples were poking through so there was some playing and touching and she seemed to be really into that. Clothes came off and into the shower with preview BBBJ. After shower back into the room and the fun really began. Full on BBBJ with me sitting on the end of the bed, watching her ass in the mirror behind her. Then returned the favor DATY, very wet and ready, so she pops on top of me and goes for some pretty intense P2P, I'm in heaven and ready to go, so on comes the cover, and some brief MISH, but I flip her over for doggie, and go at that. After I come she goes to clean off but when she comes back I'm ready to go again, and ask for a BBBJ, and CIM. Times almost up so quick shower and off. Pretty girl,and enough to English, and she's kind of funny with her chat.
positive I have dealt with RT girls once before when I saw Isabella Cox and that was phenomenal. So I decided to set up an appointment with Yumi Leon as her pictures were amazing. The pictures are definitely real and she is gorgeous. The appointment though left more to be desired. The set up for the appointment was very simple as I had already been screened by RT in the past. I had had such a great time with Isabella Cox in my previous appointment, I was hoping to have something of a similar date this time around. I saw that Yumi was going to be in the Philly/KOP area and her pics were phenomenal. So I bit the bullet and set up an appointment even though at the time there were no review. She is definitely the girl in the picture and boy is she sexy as hell. You can't see her face in the pics, but she is drop dead beautiful. Easily one of the sexiest girls I've been with. Unfortunately, that's where the best part ends. When I came into her room, she was on her phone trying to figure something out and gave me a quick peck on the cheek while she went back to her phone. She does not speak English so there was a communication barrier even with my limited knowledge of the language. She easily spent the first 10-15 minutes of our appointment messing around with her phone. So I took charge, and started caressing her body and she pushed her body up against mine. I thought this was finally going somewhere. We undressed each other and I started kissing her body. She let out a few little moans. Overall though she felt distant. As I moved up to kiss her, she did not allow any DFK. Just light pecks on the lips which was a bummer. Next I got her on the bed and kissed her all over and asked that she start with a BJ. Before starting the BJ, she inspected my dick closely and wiped me down with wipes. I had just taken a shower before coming to the appointment so I know I was clean. I guess she was being super-cautious. She finally got up out of bed, went over to grab a condom and brought it back. I tried to explain that I wanted a BBBJ and she kept shaking her head saying no. She finally put the condom on, and started to give me a very light CBJ which I was not that into. So I pulled her up and started to finger her, which she seemed to enjoy. She was getting wet, so I decided to just take her in missionary. I pulled her legs up on my shoulders and went at it. She was very quiet and didn't seem into it at all. Eventually I was able to spill a cup. She brought over some wipes to clean me up which was nice. But then just got on the bed and under the cover. I went to clean up in the bathroom and came back and she was still under the cover and on her phone. It did not seem like a 2nd cup was going to happen. Honestly with her lackluster attitude, I don't think I would have been able to get hard for a 2nd cup. I quickly changed and gave her a hug and kiss and was on my way. It was a very disappointing date, especially given how phenomenally gorgeous she is. It definitely was not a GFE session, but she is one of the sexiest providers I have seen. If that's what you want, go see her. But for me, I would not repeat.
positive Used this agency before and the girls are generally very good. Yumi was the newest lady and while she had no reviews - took a chance. Really good time had - the only item was that she did not speak English which was a challenge but the overall session was very good. Yumi was the newsest addition to Redtease. Her pictures while blurred looked very interesting so I took a chance - very glad I did. Called agency and got an appt setup a few days prior to her arrival. The day of the appt, I got a text as to where to go for the incall. Text the agency when I arrived and got the room number. Went I went into the room, I saw the exact girl in the photos and she looked even better in person. Her body was perfect. She came over and gave me a hug and at that point she had leverage her phone as a translator - no issue as we talked and the translator worked without any issue. She was dressed similar to her photos in a cut off shirt and panties with high heels. We started with some lfk and that progressed further to dfk as the session went on. I then stopped and ask to freshen up. When I came out - she was waiting for me on the bed - I stripped her down to her birthday suit and was amazed how perfect her body was and how pretty she was. Very tone all over, her tits were man-made but a little hard but the size actually matched her body well. I started rubbing her pussy from behind as I admired her from her backside. She started to moan and appeared to enjoy - as I kept slowly rubbing, massaging that area - I started to lick her clit and she started to moan louder - we soon started a 69 session - She does a great BBBJ - continue to eat her out. I stuck a finger in her and she started to moan and it sounded like encouragement in Spanish - so I continued and picked up the pace. She started to match the pace on the BBBJ. Eventually, we stopped to migrate into a cow girl position and she started riding me (of course with a condom)- this went on a few minutes in a very spirited fashion. THen we moved into MISH and she seem to enjoy that position as I moved the pace from slow to fast as I fucked her - she was started to cum as she started to groan louder and louder - Soon we found ourselves in doggie and I think this is her favorite position - pumped her from behind hard and she started to moan - she then started moving back and forth on my cock and playing with her pussy which was another turn on- so she again appear to cum but at this point - I was getting close. Continue to fuck her from behind and blew my load into the condom. She cleaned me up and I took a shower - said our good byes and I was on my way happy.
positive Laylani a tattooed light skinned petite spinner has been on my to do list since I started seeing her ads. She is easy to talk to and clean. She make the effort so that you will have a good time. It is late morning and I was on day two of a weekend Viagra bender. Laylani's ad photos of her in stockings and garters spoke to my best friend stiff. I chew down some prescription blue steel. I call her and she answers. She wants to know if I am Uncle LEO. After my denial, I ask about 1/2 hour consultation. Laylani quotes me a very high hh rate. I respond, I am sorry dear but I just can't afford that much. She asks me how much can I afford. I tell her 120. Laylani says that would be fine and she will text me the address. I get the text and I know where I am going as I had been here before. I get the text and I know where it is because I have been to her Jessup notel before. About 15 minutes later Laylani calls back while I am on the road and asks me how long it will be before I arrive. I tell her about 10 to 15 minutes. She tells me to park around the back and asks about what kind of car I am driving. I arrive and call her from the back of the parking lot. She tells to come on in. I ask her which room. She tells me to look up and I see her waving to me next to a room door. I lock the phone and in I go. I go into the room. Laylani latches the door behind me. She gives me a hug and little kiss on the lips. Something I don't normally do but I did not pull away. I ask if I can look in the bathroom. There is no one there. I come back to Laylani and she is wearing tight camouflage pants and a pull over top. I can see that she is indeed the lady from her photos. While stiff wanted to see the stockings and Garters I love naked ladies. I ask her if I can stoke her private area. She lifts her top up and I stroke her slit area and her girls. She strokes stiff and the boys. I ask her where I can place my clothes. Laylani responds, the bed by the door. I pull out the covers which I bought for use with Layona yesterday but forgot to take them to the room. I place them on the bed near her. I like to bring covers the first time I see a new lady. I place the consultation on the cabinet where the TV stands playing NASCAR. I tell her that I don't need to kiss, I like everything covered and nothing is going to happen that we both are not comfortable with. I start to disrobing and so does Laylani. Laylani has milky white skin which she has adorned with numerous tattoos. She has a little piercing above and to the left of her mouth. Stiff is a sucker for a spinner with her red tinged medium length brown hair. Laylani is a bit over 5 feet and her rather fine bees are topped with light brown nipples. I go over to Laylani and stroke her enticing body. I ask Laylani to turn around to check out her back and artwork. I ask her to come with me over to the mirror. Laylani is beautiful to stand next to. Off to the play bed we go. Laylani brings a cover. She does a nice job with her CBJ. After a while she stops and get on top of me. I ask her to go back to the CBJ as stiff was enjoying himself. Some more CBJ. After a while Laylani gets back on top and applies a little lube to herself. She starts to ride CG. Laylani asks if I prefer back and forth or up and down. I tell her it is all good. This goes on until Laylani wears herself out. We switch, Laylani offers doggy as that what she prefers. But Stiff and I choose CMISH because we like looking at our ladies faces while doing the deed. I push her legs back and Laylani guides me in. She is tight and warm. Stiff and I bang away. After a while I bust a hard nutt out. Laylani gets me a couple of baby wipes and we both clean up. She take the cover and flushes it away. We talk about meeting again as I get dressed. I pee, get a hug, and I am happily on my way. I like Laylani and I plan to see her again.
positive Emailed Crystal and she responded with a typical screening process. Once I was cleared, set our time for a few days later at a near by hotel. It was one of the best times I've had in the hobby and I plan to keep repeating. I consider myself lucky as she made it sound like I was her last client she accepted. She is real low volume as she has a career. We exchanged a few Pg-13 type emails as our date drew near. She is a great communicator and that adds to the "get to know each other" process prior to our first date. Once at her door she let me in and behind the door was this petite, sexy as hell lady with a nice cocktail dress on and stiletto heels on. Great start. Immediately started talking as I laid down the donation and headed to the bathroom quick. Came back and sat on the edge of the bed to continue talking. Which led to lfk, dfk and heavy petting. I stood up in front of her to continue this and started undressing her. Got her to her sexy, matching, bra, panties and stockings. Super sexy. Laid her down on the bed to explore her body and eventually sliding off her panties to expose a lovely, fresh, little pussy. Working her clit with my tongue and eventually starting to finger her as well, she really started getting into it. What a lovely view as I was kneeling on the floor and her pussy was just in a perfect position to watch as she laid on the bed. She started to cream on my fingers as I dove back in to lap it up and work her clit more. She was getting really worked up and I sensed something was about to happened so I backed up a little, as I was still dressed, while still finger banging she just exploded everywhere. Wow I haven't seen that amount since Portia Eden. Let Crystal recover a moment as I took my clothes off and asked for some head. She covered me up and did a fantastic job as I watched her as I sat on the edge of the bed. Asked Crystal to come sit on my cock and with no hesitation she obliged. She looked up and noticed we were sitting right in front of a mirror. She commented on how kinky that was and how hot we looked while she was riding my cock. I whole heartedly agreed. Soon enough she bounced off my cock to squirt all over the place. Amazing!!! I had Crystal turn around to ride me facing so we could kiss and suck on her lovely titties. The feeling was amazing and I blew a nice load. Cleaned up a bit and spooned with her in bed and chatted to find out more of her story. Pretty interesting and she's friends with a lovely gal I've seen before. She has plans for her future and her client list is full so count yourself lucky if you get a chance to see Crystal. Spoke to her about her her squirting and it was quite an interesting story. While spooning I started to finger her again and told her I wanted to watch her squirt all over me. She was kind of laying on my legs and mid section. Sure enough not much longer she was cumming and squirting straight up into the air as her hips were slightly raised up. While this was going on she had a free hand around my cock the whole time with some like strokes during the squirt fest and I was ready to go again. On with another cover and told her I wanted her to ride me a soak me. Sure enough on with the water works. So nice with the sound, scent and just spectacular view. I asked Crystal about her favorite position and with a sexy grin she said definitely doggy style. We did this standing while she supported her self on the edge of the bed and after a bit she was cuming again and so did I. Simply an amazing time with an amazing lady!!!
positive ALERT ALERT! There is a sheet soaker on the loose in the DMV & Im so ecstatic I saw her on back-to back nights. Get on the phone, call her ASAP & DO TREAT HER WELL!!! 1st Visit: Where should I start? HmmmI know, her Marketing Campaign. Im not sure how many of yall have seen her video? I can assure those of you who have, its the God & heavens truth. This beautiful young lady squirts like theres no FUCKIN tomorrow! Im still in shock! She did an out to my crib & arrived looking PHENOMENAL. We chopped it up for quite a while & then it was SHOWTIME! She took off her clothes & lil man was like, HEL-LOOO, DOLLY! Very nice lace matching bra & thong set covering her marvelous assets. Laid her down & DATY was what I sought. Now DATY, if performed properly, produces the 1st show of shows, fellas. She is highly responsive & very vocal. I locked in on her clit, inserted a few fingers & worked dat pussy til she was gushing all over me & soaking the bed. JACKPOT!!! Is there anyone in the audience who wouldnt thoroughly love something such as that occurring? I would certainly hope there isnt! My dick was brick fuckin hard & putting her BJ skills to the test was the furthest thing from my mind. Why? Cause lil man wanted to get up in dat pussy. DE-FUCKIN LIGHTFUL!!! I put her in MISH, started sucking her titties, squeezing her ass & the moans of pleasure just got louder & louder with each stroke. We switched to K9 & the show got even better. I told her, play w/dat pussy! Which she did &, KABOOM, more squirting ensued shortly thereafter! Now theres the 2nd show of shows. Does it get any fuckin better? Now it was my turn to play with her clit. So I started talking dirty in her ear, continued to savor the flavor of her wet, gushy pussy & eventually tapped out. 2nd Visit: This time I did put her dick sucking kills to the test & she gave a SUPERB CBJ. (BBBJ is on the menu for an extra $.) Next visit Im definitely getting it. We were in 69 & it was divine. She mounted up as any good cowgirl should & started bouncing on my dick like a pogo stick. Gotta love the enthusiasm! Switched to MISH & the pussy is sloppy wet. Then switched to K9 & enjoyed squeezing her plump ass til I tapped out. AMAZING SESSION! Gentlemen, she has a REMARKABLE PRODUCT that certainly warrants nothing but HIGH REMARKS!
negative I'm a sucker for out of town area codes. Usually I get good results and didn't put much effort into checking this one out as her response was so instant. Met at hotel and it was late and easy to find and I got in over my head. As others have said, this didn't go as planned. Pics are old, and some clearly not her as she has so many ads up. Stay away! Got to the hotel in the room and I have been doing this for too long that I am not down for bullshit at all. She had clearly been out with someone and partaking in something fun which allowed her to be more open. Price was not what we agreed on which is always red flags so she opened up about excuses and it's more than she said which I got a bit upset. She is pretty, but many people become pretty when it's late and your hard. I left after 10 minutes and without some money. upsellling and playing with pricing is not enjoyable. Will not call back. NO SEX OR ANYTHING FUN HAPPENED, technically not a ripoff as I got a short quick back rub before upsell occurred. I left initial amount and it was clear she wasn't going to do more without giving up more cash. Other reviews share similarity in problems.
positive Have seen many of the girls from this agency and saw a new girl available so I arranged a set up with Leonie. Set up was easy and I made my way to her incall location. Leonie introduced herself and asked that I wash up. Even though I had just did took a quick shower and then joined her on the bed. While she isn't a spinner I found her to be very attractive. Immediately went to dfk and groping each other. She's a good kisser and soon her bra and panties were off. Continued with the makeout session and then she went down for a pretty good bbbj. Pulled her up and then covered up. Went to mish and just stayed there the entire time. She was into it and we were moving at a good rhythm. After a while I pulled out and then just jerked off on her. Not sure if cim is available. She went and helped me clean up. We chatted a bit and she speaks decent English. She seemed pretty cool and would see her again.
positive Met Yumi at her upscale incall location. Typical two txt system; my arrival txt, and at the appointed time txt with Rm # told not to knock door was cracked open. Walked in a beautiful princess was sitting on the bed in all white bra thong and silk robe. She walked over and gave me a hug and very sexy soft kiss. I placed the donation on the table and excused my self to freshen up. When I returned with some Latin music was playing softly and she was dirty dancing. Ill continue in VIP section. I will repeat and oh by the way she speaks very little to no English at all. As she was dancing, I pushed up on her and she reciprocated. I worked my way around her ample ass and grinded some more. We did this for a while and I was ready for the next stage I layer down on the bed and she got some whips and basically did clean and inspection. I that was a little weird but what the hey. She is beautiful and was handling my Johnson when the inspection was over she gave me a nice slow sexy BBJ; it got slurp for a while until I stopped it and had her take off bra and thong. She was clean shaving and I feasted at the Y for quite a while. She moaned softly and rolled her hips as she go into it more and more. Then it was time for the main event, which was awesome. It was mish, CG, and finish doggie. Each position the intensity cranked up higher. The mish was a slow insertion and very sensual with some light kissing while staring into each others eyes; while I pushed ever deeper into her. CG was great she moaned and I got to squeeze the big beautiful breast, she seemed to like that cause I wanted to change and she made me stay there a bit longer. Finished doggie which was great too; to see her narrow waist and big juicy booty was so sexy I had to really pound that ass until I could hear the meat slapping. Awww that was sooo good. All in all shes beautiful and Ill have to spend more time with her the next time, seeing that I only had time for one pop. Im sure she would have been down for another round.
positive A couple of girls work out of a gated apartment complex. It can be a pain getting inside since you need to wait for a resident to open up the gates. Communication is sporadic as a couple of girls share the same number. The pictures in the ads while enticing are not the girls since they come from different internet models. However, overall the service is as expected except for the upsell. See vip. Stefany (profile is spelled Stefani) is an attractive slender girl. Not model material but still attractive. Once you arrive, she ushers you into a room and asks if you want to take a shower. I had just taken one and so I passed for later. She asks for the money upfront then leaves you to get undressed. It's a very bare room with a massage table. She comes back topless, which I ask her about since the ad says "nude". She wants 45 more for nude. Don't like the upsell, but paid it since I was already there. Her massage skills were average but she was all about pleasing the customer but in a non-skilled way. She does do some body to body but I wouldn't call it nuru. Her nipples were nice and she always had this "are you enjoying yourself?" look. Her english wasn't great as she was an Eastern European transplant. But communication was easy enough. Her body is nice, and face was average/above average. When it came to the handjob, she knew what she was doing. Added some baby oil and used both hands. Didn't allow much, if any, touching of her pussy which is too bad since it defeats the purpose of the extra upsell. Glad I tried out the girl as I had seen her ads for some time and wanted to find out how she was. Overall experience was good, but you can get better quality for the same price.
positive Surfed CV and found Darby's ad. Nice pics, called booker n made appointment. Headed to the famous mid wilshire building. Parked n got door code n room number. Door opens , and a pretty vixen with a nice body opens the door. Will repeat Dfk at the door and we headed to the bedroom, mouth wash and shower, in the shower she gives u a taste of her bbbj, she likes to suck hard n go deep. Has a really smooth and pleasurable technic. Head to the bed and she's sucking my balls n shaft and I almost cum. She puts the condom on and starts riding me. Her pussy is super tight I almost cum as she is riding me. I switch to mish and doggy, she's moaning uncontrollably as I smash her pussy. She can take it really hard and deep. I have lots of time since I booked for 2 hours . She takes my condom off and starts bbbj again and I cum in her mouth. We chat a bit and start round two pop. Put on condom and I do mish and cum in the condom. The experience was so sexy and enjoyable I'll be back for more. She is a sexy , pretty, and finely built gal who will rock your world. Will repeat.
positive Standard process for setting up a time to meet Yumi and being new she didn't have many reviews but this woman is definitely high on my list and will definitely be looking to see her again when she is in the area. Her English is somewhat limited but that didn't spoil the fun. Would definitely recommend. Met Yumi at a nearby hotel and was immediately impressed with her looks and her attitude. She greeted me at the door with a LFK and asked me to get comfortable. After a little conversation . . . her English is limited, the started to help me undress while rubbing her body together with mine which really started to build up the excitement. We quickly moved to the bed where she started a great BBBJ with good hand action and eye contact. She quickly put on the cover and we were off to the races in multiple positions. The woman has a fit body ready for action and knows how to use it. After being satisfied once she was ready to go again in no time and so was I. She is one of my ATF and will be looking forward to her coming back to the area for another visit.
positive Bibi is a fun, hot time! Very cute and playful. Usual routine with an agency - followed the instructions and Bibi opened the door for me without having to knock. Bibi is VERY cute and young; eager to please as well. After getting undressed, Bibi led me to the shower. Lots of kissing and body-to-body action in the shower and then BBBJ. I had been saving myself for such an occasion and urged Bibi to keep going until I released into her mouth. We cleaned up some more and then went to the bedroom. Bibi likes to cuddle and kiss and offers a very girlfriend-like experience. It didn't take long for me to get hard again, so I gave Bibi oral for some time and then transitioned into 69. Bibi got on top and on came the rubber after some quick P2P. CG for some time and she really seemed to be enjoying it. We then went to RCG and she leaned back far enough to where I could hold her legs up as I pumped away - a very satisfying orgasm was the result. Bibi cleaned me up and we cuddled some more and talked. I was hard again and it seemed to crack her up, but there was no time to act on it. We got dressed; kissed; and Bibi bade me farewell. Bibi is recommended if you are looking for a very cute GFE that is a great time in the bedroom. She is very easy to connect with and a solid performer.
positive This young, new member to Cinderella's house is simply amazing. She is insatiable, she is adventurous, she loves her 'job' no matter who she is playing with; and she is playing to win for you and herself. Chelsea will drain you and leave you feeling like you are floating. One of the best provider experiences I've had this year. Simply freakin' wonderful. Call now!!! She is slim with chewy nipple-topped bolt-on that she wants to gag you with. Her tongue is all over you and down your throat daring you to reciprocate. If you dare to, she sucks your tongue into her mouth and works hers into your mouth. She is boiling with "Fuck me to Oblivion" energy. Actually reminded me of a younger version of the famous asian Gina on the westside only 2 blocks from Discreet Pleasures playroom. Her DFK is devouring. Her breasts and nipples are irreversible ignition buttons to your flaming loins. Her pussy was so happy and ready that her juices were running into her ass and dripping on the bed. DATY whirls into savage 69, then she pinned you down by sitting on your face and pouring her juices into your mouth and face demanding you to drink her cum while she fucks your tongue. (Chelsea on my night was very natural. Not thick and wiry, but soft and pillowy) After she O'd 2 or 3 times, she whirled back down to your staff and sucked like a vacuum cleaner on your horn while you felt your balls slowly rising in their bag. She could sense I was about to pop by my surrender head shaking, so she grabbed a raincoat, quickly rolled it down my horn and literally pounced onto my stick. She was so soaking wet, we glided completely balls deep together with no effort but full snugness. Chelsea is tight and lustily delirious while riding you and takes all your length with each bounce or thrust. She just uses your engorgement to satisfy herself knowing her pleasure with ignite yours. Her frenetic orgasm while connected to you is impossible to calmly absorb and thus, generates your eruption deep inside her, which is what she wants. Her orgasm aura envelopes yours and the 2 of you bond while your organ is delightfully twitching your last drops of spunk deep inside her (inside the condom). She releases you and gets some wipes to clean your sword while DFKing your tongue again to rejuvenate you. I was completely spent so I just licked up her tongue like a fresh lollipop. After the typical post sex shower, Chelsea led me to the door with DFK tugs on my tongue down the steps, through the waiting room, toward the door. I remember the door closing behind me and her smile and a few pubes stuck in my mouth. A very memorable time from this rapidly growing House of Bliss.
positive I have used the agency several time before and so far haven't been disappointed. Standard 2-text system to get me to her suite in Tysons. She opened the door in a nice pink nightgown and greeted me with the standard kiss to put me at ease. I put my donation on the table and we chat for a few minutes while I warmed up. She has had a fascinating life, so I highly recommend everyone to spend your downtime chatting with her about where she has traveled. Non-VIP's, I would recommend visiting her if she is in the area. There really isn't much to tell, she is of the high quality provider that you normally expect from AME. We both got undressed and I laid down on the bed. She got at the bottom of the bed and started a slow-sensual bbbj. I have gotten better bj's from some of the other girls at AME, but it was in no way a disappointment. She worked in the normal mixture of using her mouth and hands. She put on a cover and then we worked our way through cowgirl, then missionary, then doggy. She is pleasantly tight so it wasn't long until I was ready to pop. I let her know I was getting close so I could pull out and cum in her mouth. We went into the bathroom to clean up, then we chatted as I waited for round two. Round two was a repeat, bbbj followed by sex, but I just came in the rubber the second time. We chatted for a little while longer and then I left. So you can't go wrong if you are looking for a petite blonde.
positive I saw her add and pictures and was very impressed. I called to schedule an appointment for the next few days. A few days later, I arrived at her apartment near the Beverly Hills area and when she let me in, I was very pleased with what I saw. I will probably see her again. I arrived at her apartment a little bit later than I should have because I don't have a car now, and she gave me a location that was a little over a mile away since she doesn't give the address until shortly before the appointment time, so I got there about 30 to 40 minutes later than I should have. I finally got up to her apartment, and she looks very nice. She is definitely the woman in the pictures, maybe a little better. I put the donation on the table, and we both got on the bed. Her boobs are amazing, and I sucked on them for several minutes and she let me kiss her also. She was going to give me a blowjob with a condom, but I was too afraid since I am paranoid about STDs, although next time I will not have a problem if I wear a condom. So I sucked her boobs a little more (I really love big boobs in combination with a hot woman, that is what turns me on the most). She told me my time was running out, so I cummed on her boobs. She did rush me out a little, probably because she had an appointment very shortly after me. I would say that if you are going to see her, preferably be on time or make sure she doesn't have another appointment shortly after to avoid feeling rushed.
positive Another lady that acts like she is on earth only for your pleasure. She is smiley and friendly from the moment you enter her bedroom to the minute she unlocks you from her last kiss. Another lady that wants to smother you with her own lust and leave you smiling and floating. Get over there this week. Orange greets me in her playroom with porn running on the TV and a DFK that sucked my tongue down her throat. I met her challenge with my own tongue duel while she groped at my clothes to get me naked as quickly as possible. She skipped with me into the bathroom for our shower where the obligatory anal exam was done with the concluding BBBJ preview. Back in our room, we re-engaged in reckless DFK that led to her pushing my head between legs demanding I 'kiss her pussy'. Well I did through 3 O's for Orange that delivered the sweetest pussy nectar I had that day. Than a simple coupling in mish and pounding to oblivion had me depositing my babies in the bag behind her belly button. We were both satisfied and panting so we cuddled and watched the porn that was playing on the tv. Once we caught our breaths, Orange gave me a special cunnilingus lesson for her special treatment when i return next week. Which I will...
positive Yoko is a beautiful Asian woman. Her office is private, quiet and clean. Easy parking under building on the weekends I've been there . Excellent dominatrix. The photos in her ads are hers. I asked for some of following, some she did without my asking. What she did without my asking was even more of a turn on. Yoko told me to strip. After stripping to my underwear I went to her restroom to rinse with mouthwash. I closed the restroom door behind me. She opened it a few seconds later and told me to take off my underwear and sit naked in the shower stall. I wasn't sure what was going on but gladly obeyed. She walked in with her high heels and lifted her leather mini-skirt and positioned her perfect shaved pussy over my body and gave me my first golden shower. I savored a few drops because her pussy looked so good. She had me wash off in the shower. I returned to the room where she expertly pegged me with her finger and a vibrating toy. She then tied me up, partially sat on my face and rubbed me to climax as I tongued her sweet little butthole.
negative Bobbi welcomed me to her room with a negligee on and I entered. She greeted me with a kiss, after which we sat on the bed and conversed for a while, getting to know each other. Bobbi looks like her pictures and does not disappoint with her attitude. VIPs read on.... We started the hour with a massage. Bobbi got out oils and got naked along with me. She then proceeded to give me a nude massage where she rubbed my back and applied oils. She rubbed her bare breasts on my back and massaged my ass and thighs. I then requested a blowjob which she provided. She did a BBBJ and asked me with what level of vigor did I want it. I said "Whatever is fine with you," and she proceeded to blow me. The BBBJ was excellent, I almost came in her mouth twice, I then told her I wanted to fuck. She asked what position I'd like, I said cowgirl was fine. We had sex in cowgirl pretty much the whole time which was wonderful. She rode me and appeared to be really into the sex. We finished up, said our goodbyes and I left the hotel. Awesome time was had with her, highly recommended.
positive Just saw Sophie. It is the girl in the pics and yes, those boobs are awesome. Would repeat. VIPs read on... Just like the other reviewer, I was very curious about those awesome boobs in her ads. All communication with Sophie was through text. She texts you a map of where she is located. Sophie is a sweet, 24 year old Russian girl with the cutest accent. She welcomed me into her place, take the shoes off at the door, and into her room. She is the girl in the ad and is prettier in person. I prefer my massages on a massage table, but after seeing her, I don't mind the little bed she has set up for her body rubs. Sophie massages you in a cute bra and thong while you're on your belly. She asked me what type of massage I wanted and I asked her for a firm massage and use elbows where necessary. She does an above average massage, not quite pro, but very sensual and I really enjoyed it. She massages the entire body top to bottom. Sophie played some mellow massage music and the massage rhythm matched the music. Slow and sensual. On the flip, the bra comes off and you see the most beautiful boobs. Just perfect, full, and soft. Sophie has an awesome body. Flat tummy, nice hip to waist ratio, nice thighs and legs. Beautiful ass. Perfect to me, but everyone has different tastes. Skin was soft... Mutual touch is allowed as long as it is respectful. She gives great eye contact and is overall great to look at. She sped up the pace at the right time, moaned when she needed to, and I exploded all over her beautiful boobs. She milked it all out of me. Washes her hands and comes back to clean me up, just being soft and thorough. Literally appearing to take the greatest care in cleaning a post orgasmic penis. I shower and off to the house a little over my hour appointment time. I had a good time and would totally repeat.
positive Supposedly I booked a different girl on that day but the agency made a mistake so I ended up seeing Pure on that day. However, this mistake turned out to be a fantastic surprise. Pure offered me an unforgettable GFE and I definitely would like to see her again, VIPs read on. Once I entered the door I was puzzled for a moment since Pure looked different from her pictures. However, she totally looked like an Asian barbie to me so i decided to continue my appointment with her. We hugged each other and then she led me to her room. I told her I already took a shower so we skipped the shower part. We both got undressed then the fun began. I lay down on bed, and Pure started to kiss and touch my chest. It was very sensual so I got hard immediately. She did not rush to give me the BBBJ, instead, she kept kissing and touching my legs and chest, which felt fantastic! By that time I was rock hard so she started to give me a BBBJ. Her techniques were above average and she kept looking at me for the whole time, which was a big bonus. After a while I told her to move into the main event, she immediately put a raincoat on my cock. We started with CG, it felt great to feel her pussy while exploring her front. She kept riding me until she got tired and she asked me if we could switched to DOGGY. Why not? Her ass looked amazing from behind. After pounding her for several minutes I asked her to lie down so I could fuck her with Missionary position. I started very slowly, she looked at me and begged me to let her come, so I started to pound her faster and faster until I could feel the contraction of her V. She begged me not to stop so I kept pounding until I exploded in her sweet little pussy. We kissed for a while after I came. Afterwards, Pure gave me a good back massage and talked about what's going on with her life. This girl really treated me like her boyfriend. Before departure, she wanted me to promise her that I would see her again. And of course I will!
positive I arranged my visit with Rene two days in advance via texts. Rene was quick to respond and very accommodating. I set up an early morning meeting. On the day of the visit Rene was ready when I arrived. She texted me the room number when I arrived and when she opened the door she was dressed in a open robe with a nightgown makeup on. She was ready for me with no excuses of sleeping too late. She performed very well and a repeat visit is in my future. We started by kissing as the door closed. Introductions were done and we started feeling each other as we continued to kiss. We worked our way towards the bed as we disrobed. We continued to kiss on the bed. I worked my way down her body enjoying her full breasts and nipples for a few moments. I eventually ended at her pussy, where I used my tongue and finger to make her cum, which only took a few minutes. I laid on my back while she sucked my cock while putting the condom on and continued for a few minutes, using her skills to get me rock hard. At that point we traded positions and moved to missionary, inserting my cock in her pussy and I slowly fucked her. She was very attentive and I increased my speed until I reached my climax, enjoying every second as my cock spewed. We lay in bed for a few more minutes and then she told me I could use the bathroom to clean up, where the towels were and what to do with them when I was done. After that was done we continued to talk as we got dressed and then kissed before I left.
positive Always like the spinner type and she offers Nuru massage which I'm looking for the provider that performs like they do if the videos. Two call system takes you to a studio set up in a decent area. Arrived to meet the girl in the pics and was happy to see she is as cute as advertised. Got settled in for this experience which was good but not great, these providers need to take lessons on a true nuru experience because this should be as erotic as they come. We both got naked as she applied a jell type solution all over my back then came the slip and slide. I just love the feel of her pussy as she glide over my butt and back. Totally turned on as I was HBO hard it actually her during this time. Had her stop so I could make an adjustment so we could continue. Tuff problem :). Couldn't wait for the flip so I could get some hand action on this girl so when we did Lilly was sliding up and down on my cock wondering if it would slide right inside her. Almost. Handswere all over her but no fiv but on the outside as I tried to get her squishy. Nice perky breast which I sucked on when she was sliding. She finished me off with a hand job and I got cleaned up. This session laste maybe 45 minutes and wasn't bad at all be really looking for a provider that offer this service without any limitations. Good luck out there !!!
positive With a voice resembling Barbara Streisand the phone call got my attention as a gal that would be a lot of fun. Standard two-call system to her location. She met me outside her door in everyday comfortable clothes and walked me in, showed me around and introduced me to her dog. VIPs read on. Basic members, she's lots of fun. She quickly got down to a set of semi-sheer bra and panties. I kissed her, expecting DFK in the light of other reviews, but she was tight-lipped. Oh well. Very chatty. Extremely chatty. I got comfortable and she quickly dropped her undies. Got in her big bed. She quickly wend down for vigorous BBBJ. Lots more teeth action than usual, but still very stimulating. I reversed by giving DATY, which she loved and hit a big O in just about 5 minutes' time. She needed time to recover so we cuddled and talked a while, then more BBBJ. Then she begged for the bonanza. She suited me up, and then she climbed on top for CG, but then suggested mish for the deeper penetration. We flipped. And she went crazy passionate. Lots of loud grunts and moans and dirty talk -- fun to join in with that, although I did wonder how far our voices were carrying. She had another intense O. I was holding back to extend teh session. But she seemed disappointed that I didn't cum with her. So she withdrew, figured that the condom was the problem, so she had me roll over on m back, lubed her hands, and delivered an intense HJ to completion. Lots of chatting before, during and after the session. She has fascinating stories to tell. All in all, a great time with an enthusiastic partner. I'll repeat.
positive Shares a phone with another provider which lead to some confusion. Once that was straightened out- she was excellent. Non Members- she is a legit provider and is absolutely beautiful. A very sweet girl. First the confusion- the person she shares a phone with was texting me as Trisha. I traveled a total of 1.5 hours (work to home to outcall location) and when I got there there was no response to calls or texts. I had some shopping to do next door so I texted that I would be leaving a very negative review because of the amount of time wasted. Finally got a response that Trisha was on her way after at least 30-40 minutes of no response at all. Once I got in the room, the other provider left and the fun began. I didn't ask about rules and she never asked for donation which I love. I undressed her slowly, enjoying her beautiful body and perfect breasts. I get off on touch and she responded very well to my every touch. I moved forward once I was extremly hard and she began giving me a BBBJ. She later told me that she normally didn't do uncovered BJs, but did since I had such a rough start to our session. I brought a toy with me and I was massaging her clit while she was blowing me. We moved through several positions, doggy, her on top (which I loved because of her breasts- did I mention she has beautiful breasts), and I finished in missionary. She was giving it a little dirty talk while I was on top and it was a nice touch. I had her lay there for a bit after I finished just so I could admire the view. There isn't a mark on beautiful body and is an amazing view! The only thing about the session that kept it from being amazing is that she doesn't like to kiss. She will kiss you closed mouth but you can tell she doesn't enjoy it at all (the kissing portion). I asked her about it after the session and she said that is the part she struggles with most. I may repeat... but I would repeat often if it wasn't for the kissing thing.
positive Typical two call set up. Sounded great on the phone... even playful with hints of fun. She must have been in a very good mood. Arrived. Called and she gave me her room. Went and up and knocked. She was behind the door in a skink tight sexy dress with obviously nothing under. A nice hug and deep kiss as she checked on the boys. Didn't even indicate at a donation as she closed the door and dragging me by the pants. Non-VIP YMMV but she provided everything in great GFE style. VIP read on She was playing with my balls through my pants and she got me to the bed and then proceeded with the deepest french kiss I have ever had. Her tongue was a hot probe that would stop. My cock was at attention instantly. She let me come up for air and I hastily got out of my clothes. She kept telling me she was so horny. As I got my pants off and undid my shoes she walked up to me and pulled up her dress so her pussy was in my face. She was already wet and begged to be licked. She then sat spread legged on the bed enjoying my mouth slurping at her wetness. She pushed my face down hard when my tongue slid in and thrust at me. I was in heaven. She couldn't stand it anymore and then her fingers rubbed her clit until she starting squirting. Honey on my tongue. I just kept lapping it up and my dick was now ready to explode so I slid it in to her wetness. The grip was so tight and it wasn't long before I was going to explode... I pulled out because I wanted to have her tongue finish me off while I tasted he some more. She mounted my face and sucked me to a mind blowing explosion.
positive contacted the agency for first time and got an approval couple of hours after i contacted them and made an appointment for two hours. got to the place and fallowed instructions and when i got to the apartment i was greeted by a beautiful Asian doll. gave me a nice DFK and took me to the bedroom. non vip if she comes back to DC you must see her. VIPS here is why After a nice DFK with plenty of tongue alli took me to the bedroom and took my cloth off a piece at a time shen then gave me a short preview of her bbbj and lead me to the bathroom with my cock in her hand. after the water was warm she asked me to join her and gave me another nice DFK. The highlight of the shower was a nice session of rimming that i really loved. after we finished got out of shower and gave another DFK with a lot of tongue action and another BBBJ and asked me to go back to the bedroom. she had me to lay down on my stomach and started licking and kissing every inch of my body until she got to the mid section where she spread my ass check and gave a mind blowing rimming. sheh then asked me to turn around and started again licking and sucking every inch of my body and got my hard cock and put it in her mouth for another nice BBBJ with atention to the boys. after a while i told her that it was her turn so i returned the favor the same way she did DATY AND DATO. after a while i nitice that she could not take that anymore and said "honey please sex now " so she covered me and got on top so we did CG for a while until i was losing it so i told her that i was cumming so she ripped the condom and took everything in her mouth. unfortunately she did not swallowed and said sorry me no hungry right now so not a big deal. she then told me that i can come as many times as i like which i really liked. gave a short massage and i was back in her mouth again until i got hard and covered me again and we did multiple positions MISH CG RCG until i lost it in the bag. after that another massage fallowed by another BBBJ and i was ready for round 3 and we did multiple positions for longer time including same positions mentioned before and lazy dog and standing doggy where i was losing it and i finished in her mouth again. after that gave another massage and we showered again and i was on my way home a happy men. Thanks Alli i hope that you come back to DC soon
positive Well, you guys know that I have a weak spot for russian girls, Kelly was the cherry in top of the cake of a nice week and to see her made it very special. I will try to repeat before she goes. Very special girl! Nice place, well kept with very upscale tools for what I was there for. Someone complained about Kelly's english, I found her accent such a turn on my cock went from limp to hard in about 3 seconds, maybe the lingerie she was wearing, maybe the sexy way she ask about a BBBBJ, I don't know, but the results were an instant erection, a pleasant very exciting experience i her mouth and the taste of one of the best looking pussy I had the pleasure to eat! Very responsive to the day and her moans and ukrainian words while she was coming got me so excited that I couldn't hold for long, so I mimed the condom (prezervatyv) and she smiled and as soon as the cock was covered she impaled herself with the whole thing in that gorgeous pussy of her and start riding and seemingly enjoy the ride as much I was. It felt like the United Nations when she finally come and express herself in her native language while I did the same in english and in the spare of the moment in my native italian! Very short after sex conversation and her accent and that great body if hers did the trick and I was ready for Round DWA (two in Ukrainian). Kelly again impaled herself and as you know the second fuck is always better, because you already know the likes of your partner, so I let her riding me and at one point turned her around, put her on her four and slide my cock in her from behind while holding her up by her shoulder great teaspoon position that make her enjoy to the maximum my pounding. Holding her up squeezing her great boobs and gently squeezing her hard nipples, that when she collapsed on her orgasm covering her and fucking her hard on a very active lazy dog! We came at the same time and she kept moving her hips maximizing my pleasure! I searched the ukrainian dictionary and the word that I should I said to Kelly that I didn't know at the time is not available or confusing, but one thing I can say: Dyakuyu (Thank you) and Dobre (Good). Well DOBRE! DOBRE! DOBRE! You are a great girl and I hope to see you again: Na vse dobre (Good luck!)
positive It was my first time with Honey and I was very satisfied. Non-VIP book with confidence. VIP read on... I was in the Miami area and I decided to call Bill's agency. This agency is one of the best I've dealt with, very friendly and I am yet to be disapointed by one of the girls that work there. They are all great at what they do. Honey was available and after reading her reviews I decided to try her out. Setup is always easy when you know Bill. When I arrived, she was waiting for me in a very sexy outfit and DFKed me as soon as I entered. We chatted for a little bit and she asked me if I wanted to take a shower with her. After the shower I couldnt keep my hands off her, she is very very hot. She started with a BBBJ and I almost finished because she was so good. I asked her for cowgirl and she was more than happy to jump on me. She seemed to be enjoying it a lot. I finished doggy style and I was glad I decided to try her. Treat her right and you will have a blast!
positive First time using agency great experience and Julia was great as well such that saw multiple times would recommend true gfe. Called agency she texted screening request was pretty simple to schedule. Julia arrives at my hotel room enters a little chit chat we take off cloths proceed to bathroom of my suite use the mouth wash into the shower to clean up a little lfk and onto the bed. Starts with a little rimming and light licking flip over and a great bbbj with skill. Julia moves to a 69 position very fresh and nice lips. Next rollover and a little body to body slide then time for the cover. Start in cg with a lot of movement on her part a lttle lfk and dfk. Time to change to mish more dfk with a lot of passion true gfe to the point of cumming in cover. Chit chat some more Julia is very sweet then to shower get dressed and out the door.... overall great time.
positive You have to admit there is nothing like a Minnesota girl. Strong arms, smooth skin, fine true blonde hair. Piper has a friendly feminine face with gorgeous blue eyes as clear as a calm lake on a July day, perfect snow white teeth and an easy smile that will make you feel like you are honestly special. If you feel at home in Minnesota in any way, if you enjoy the love of a woman, you will love Piper. Piper is gorgeous. Lightly tanned blonde complexion. Nice location in Uptown. Easy parking. Piper is professional and comfortable in greeting, like you know her. Very reassuring and warm. Clean. We started with her on her back, me on top massaging her. She wrapped her legs around me as I stroked her sides, breasts, and with me leaning over, her neck. As I petted her kitty, she ground into my hand and said my name like she had practiced or it was on the tip of her tongue. Her tongue was kinda my focus. I told her to lick her lips. she did as she stroked my oiled cock over her stomach. She did as she came grinding against my hand. She said something like we're all stronger with team work as she looked me in the eye and pulled me in for a kiss with that tongue. That's all I needed to blow in her hand. Overall powerful experience.
negative Taylor is extremely fucking beautiful. I haven't hobbied in a while and the girls I used to see all retired, so I asked a couple of friends who are also TER users who's good recently and they suggested Taylor. I was thrown off a bit because of her most recent review, but that looked to be more of a breakdown in communication for them than anything else. Taylor and I had a wonderful time together. Top-tier chemistry. Will repeat with her friend that she works with in Vegas. I was staying over the weekend for Halloween, so of course I wanted to be 100% sure that I would get the hot hookup experience. I was very, very satisfied. My job hasn't really lent itself to having an active social life, so this is what I need to do to get back in the saddle. She came in and was looking very, very sexy. The classic "blonde in red" appeal is what she had. She was very used to being the hottest girl in the room and drank in every bit of attention I was giving her. I practically jumped out of my clothes and she did the same. We started making out like teenagers and she was good at it. I think that being a good kisser is very, very underrated in this hobby. Not valued enough. She jumped up and wrapped her legs around me. She was very into it and so was I. She has lots of genuine passion for this job. I smelled her hair. Like strawberries. We made our way to the bed and she started bare back sucking my cock like there was no tomorrow. I then returned the favor with some DATY on that perfect, sweet, pink pussy of hers. I put on a condom and started having the pound session of a lifetime. Just really fucking great. She knows how to angle her body and get the most out of you. The way she wraps her long, smooth legs around you is completely sublime. Plus, she is pretty athletic and fit, and fit sex is always best. Trust me, I know this as a physician. I came in her mouth and she swallowed every last drop with a fucking WINK. Extremely sexy. Like I said, I'm going to see her next time with her friend that she's got in town. They're both really, really beautiful.
positive I read one review on paige and really had to talk myself into it. but I was looking for someone younger and she fit the bill. she had one sreview that was okay but she supposedly has a hidden talent that I'm hooked on and had to see it. she is a nice girl attractive but she could be a little more open and she'd be great. read on and you'll see what I mean. maybe a repeat if she ever loosens up..... I knew exactly what I was in for so I couldn't complain about the cbj. but it was good. started off with a little chit chat then got the business done and started to dis robe. she has a nice body young and toned. nice perky tits and a great pussy. I noticed in the profile that yes was check for squirting and I'm addicted to that which is why I didn't care about the cbj. very light kissing but at least it was something. no tongue. played with her pussy and she started to get wet. went to her tits and played and sucked on them for sometime. she likes that. then as I started down for some daty she balked a bit and I pretty much begged her and explained I was here for the squirting. she told me she didn't always squirt. but since I was there for that she'd let me daty but she usually doesn't on the first date. so down I went for lunch. she tasted great but no squirt. so I put my efforts on her clit and sucked away until she said he it comes so I moved down to her pussy put in my tongue and wham drenched me. that alone was worth the donation. we relaxed for a little and she put the hat on and gave a damn good cbj. of course not as good as bbbj but it was good. I had negotiated a 45 min session so I wanted to get into that nice pussy since I was hard and could deflate at anytime. she was soaked so slipping in was easy. we started in mish to cg and then doggy. while in doggy I reached around and started in on her clit again. shortly there after I heard those beautiful words, here it comes again. she drenched my dick and balls. it was great. so great I slipped out and started to deflate a little. I explained my condition and she took of the hat gave a very brief bbbj I mean like 20 secs but it was nice of her to try and help me out and it did. I told her she could use her hand to finish. she started a nice hj as I sucked on her tits. she leaned down and gave me a few short kisses still no tongue but nice. I was close and she asked if I wanted to blow on her tits. oh yeah. I slid up and started titty fucking her till I blew. rolled over and she cleaned me up nicely. we lay there just chatting and I happened to look over and seen her clock and we were over. I said better get going and she said just a few more moments. so we talked some more and she grabbed my dick. I said we were over but she said I was so nice to her and she liked that and wanted me to come back which I might. I told her she didn't have to do anymore that I was happy with the service. I did mention that she probably would get more repeats if she was more gfe like bbbj, and kissing with tongue, and daty. she said with some one that has seen her a few times and became a regular she probaly would with the right person. I asked if I might be the right person and she gave me a sexy smile. ok I'll be back...........
positive I will say that she has one of the hottest bodies I've ever seen. If you want to spend some time with an incredible body, this is your girl. However, the service was not great. It felt like she was rushing from the very beginning. I won't repeat. VIP's read on. As always, I set up the appointment the day before with her assistant Amy, and I arrived a little early, but I sat in the parking lot for only 10 minutest before I went in. She greeted me at the door in an amazing lingerie dress. Amazing body and very pretty. I speak Spanish, so our conversation was fine. I told her I needed to shower after being at work all day, so we kissed a little and I left the donation on the nightstand and went to the shower. Cleaned up and came back in wearing nothing but my towel. We kissed a little, she was definitely not into the kissing. Tongues were involved, but she was not really interested. This was really disappointing since kissing really does it for me, especially in a one hour session. She pulled away from the kissing and took off her top and laid down on the bed. I pulled off her panties and spent some time DATY, but she put her hand on her clit and started bouncing up and down I didn't really even know what was going on, but it was impossible to enjoy. I started to move back up and kissed those incredible breasts, and I tell you, they are incredible. I tried to kiss her some more, but again she pulled away. She put me on my back and grabbed a condom and started with a BBBJ after asking if I wanted it with or without the condom. It was nice to watch her going up and down, but again, she quickly moved on to putting on the cover and getting on CG. View was incredible...flat stomach, perfect breasts and completely shaved. However, I like kissing during CG and she was just not having it. At this time, I'm thinking I have multiple pops since I was there for an hour, and it never occurred to me to ask, so i pulled her in to MISH and finished quickly. We chatted for a minute after she cleaned me up and when I was ready to go for #2, she said, only 1 round. I had been there about 20 minutes, and didn't even try to get a refund on the extra time, so I just left. She's only here until December, so if you want a quick 30 minutes with an amazing body, go and enjoy the view...it's truly incredible.
positive Arranged for one hour incall via text. She had traffic trouble and asked to postpone to a few hours later. I agreed. Got to her hotel and texted for the room number. Got it and went up. Wow, she is smokingly hot. Beautiful body. Very cute face. Will definitely repeat. Got a hug and kiss inside the door. She excused herself to the bathroom for a minute. I set the donation down and got undressed and lay on the bed. She came out and immediately stripped down to nothing but thigh high socks. Beautiful! Had her stand in front of me so I could suck her nipples and fondle her ass. Her skin is unbelievably soft. Eventually, she pushed me onto the bed and gave me a nice BBBJ. Let her go at it for a while. She took direction very well. Asked if she would take my cum in her mouth and she smiled and moaned yes. When I was ready, I had her get on her knees with me leaning against the bed. Let loose a LOT of cum onto her tongue. She gagged a bit and spit into her hand. She got up a little too fast, because she was surprised at the amount of cum. She ran to the bathroom to spit, then came back and apologized. She got on her knees and gave me some nice post-cum head, which was great. But I'd rather have it all at once without the break! We chatted for a while. She's cute and quirky. She said she doesn't care if she cums, she wants sex at least five times a day! I stroked her skin for a while, which is fabulous. Eventually we worked our way to some nice DFK. Then back to BBBJ. Then I told her I wanted to fuck. She grabbed an FC! Heaven! It took a minute to get it in properly and lubed up. More BBBJ to get me ready, then she jumped on top. Really nice CG. Her pussy is TIGHT. I nibbled her breasts and squeezed her ass. She said she came twice and I half believe her. Flipped her over for mish with me standing at the side of the bed. Pounded that little pussy hard and deep. She said she came again. The way her pussy squeezed me, I 75% believe her. I finally busted in the bag. More chatting then I had to go. I think she might have been up for round 3 if I didn't have to take off. Might try it next time!
positive I was planning for a quiet evening until I clicked on my TDL. Well, Kelly's photos look like a real model and too enticing. I was assured by Crystal that she's a real deal when I got her email a while back. Sent a quick text to Crystal to set up date with Kelly on a short notice. The date confirmed. Went back and read a few reviews (yeah, I was lazy doing the research before booking) and it didn't sound too hot. Had a super visit with Stasy from Crystal, I rolled the dice as she hasn't let me down before. Well, I made to her place in WLA with a decent parking, and it was a great sign to see sparkles blue eyes Ukrainian greeted me at the door. It's a fact that her photos are 100% real and accurate. Skip the rest of the story if you don't think the photos are a model quality! Well, all i can say is that I gotta haul ass in the next few days to clear my calendar to see her again as she's going back home after the end of first week of November. Once inside I gave Kelly a light hug and a peck on a cheek. Removed my shoes in a living room and headed to the BR. Knowing she's young, may have a cold reception, according to the reviews, I dropped the envelop on the bed before she asked and headed to the shower solo before she even requested, even though I had taken it less than 45 minutes ago. Came out the shower and she waited for me at the bed showing off those beautiful naked body and long toned legs of hers. From her smile and facial expression, I can sense a warm attitude about starting to emerging. I began slowly by feeling her body, licked away those natural honey breasts, stroking her back, ran my hands on those bubbly asses and soft kisses on her velvet skin. The girl sure has one silky smooth body. Picked up some steams and tasted her soft lips and more with tongue (yes, real DFK). Spent a good amount of time on the foreplay. Her radiated body heat felt real good. Signaled her to go south and she did a wet bbbj and DT with lot of loving tender. Switched to 69 (yes, she does understand sixty nine) and tasted her fresh shaven kitty. Time to suit up and admittedly impressed at how Kelly inserted the cover with her mouth. A sleek move. Her delicious lips were too delicious to pass up so I stayed at mish and worked on it at various speeds. Her panting, moaning, legs wrapping, tight squeezing, the look of her face about to get an OD, I released all the juice with a great gratification. As other reviews had mentioned, a slight gap on her teeth did not bother me one bit. Obviously. lol A few light conversation while cooling down, she made my night by asking if I want to smoke out on the patio. A glass of wine, let out a trail of smokes with a beautiful model on my arms, can life get any better?! Given the rate, a clutter-free logistic, her willingness to please during our time, Kelly is a fine date and I will repeat before she goes back. Highly anticipate the girl is capable of giving a memorable session once she's in her comfort zone.
positive Leonie is that girl who gad it all. My nights never gonna be the same without her.it happened a few hours ago She was in time in our date.Everything was like it was written for us...we gad a great time from the first second...she looked amazing in her in her preatty black baby doll dress...i couldn't resisted to touch her sexy body..she has a good humor too. .she massaged my back ...turned me over but instead of her hands she was using her mouth on my dick...she is the best ...she made me came like a fountain I did returned the favor for the massage and for the bj as well...sheis a supdateer clean girl...i licked her out of her panties ...shaved and dripping wet pussy lips...tasted yummiest ever..she had a hyge orgasm.. We just got into it ...i put her on her knees and hands ...fucked her from behind...she felt soooo good ..she is that hot wet chick whom i always wanted to fuck. when i came i thought I'll pass out I definetly want to see her again
positive Contacted the booker to set up an appointment. Responsive booker and had the appointment set up soon thereafter. Went to a West LA location and there I was greeted by a gorgeous girl. Weni is very easy on the eye. Very attractive and looked like her photos in her ad. Once we got into the bedroom, we shared many kisses while she undressed me and led me to the bathroom for the usual agenda. Blue toast followed by a shower. Very thorough cleaning. After we dried off, we went back to the bed and she gave me a very pleasant BBBJ. It seemed like she loved every second of it and I almost came right there. I had to stop her and ask her to put the hat on because I wanted to fuck her hard before I blew my load. I flipped her on all fours and entered her in K9. I pumped slowly at first, but eventually picked up to a rapid pace as I was about to blow. I came to my climax and came in the rubber while still fucking her from behind. It was a pretty sad performance by me as I came pretty quickly and wasn't able to get up for a second round, but that's also a testament to how great Weni was. Definitely worth the trip.
negative This is the one and only Ariana Marie, a pure goddess. The name explains it all ... She came right on time wearing a black tank top and black shorts. When I opened the door I became flustered from actually seeing one of my favorite pornstars, which she is now my favorite. We sat on the bed as we talked and I got to learn a lot of things about her. Then came the best part. She slowly took off her top and showed a sex black bra. Then slowly took off her shorts which revealed cute black panties. My mouth dropped open seeing her absolutely perfect body to go along with her absolutely beautiful face. She is the total package. She took off the bra where I pulled her towards me and sucked on her wonderful nipples. My clothes were off from before except my boxers where she started playing with me, I got rock hard fast. She took off my boxers and teased me before finally giving me a BBBJ. If you've seen her videos it's even better in person. A lot of spit and looking at you with those beautiful eyes. Finally I placed her on the bed and took off those panties. I started giving her DATY and she started squirming, just like her movies. Finally I went in, multiple different positions until I finally couldn't take it anymore. She got on her knees and I unloaded all over her chest, stomach, and legs. We then proceeded to take a shower together as we talked and I got to clean and enjoy that goddess body. When the time was over, I was so sad. She is an absolute gem. Thanks for the special memories, I'll be seeing her again guarantee. She told me that next year she may be doing anal and I should come back and see her ... of course I am.
positive This was a very last minute decision ... coming out of work, had an urge, and found her online and she responded immediately. Being that I had made this decision at the very last minute, I had to find a bank quickly. Preslee helped every step of the way. She gave me her hotel information, and where the closest ATM was. Once I arrived the hotel, she sent me her room number, and I was on my way up the elevator. I knocked on the door, and I was "finally" surprised by wonderful looks and a happy and pleasant smile greeting me! I had asked on my way in if I could shower to get the day's work funk off of me, and she obliged ... so off to the shower I went. After getting cleaned up, I walked out into the room with my towel wrapped around me. There she was in a cute bra and panty outfit, laying on her stomach, head at the end of the bed, at eye level with my member. She pulled the towel off, and began bringing my boy to life. Enjoying every minute, I removed her bra and started rubbing her ass, as she continued massaging my cock with her soft lips and tongue. After a few minutes of this, I removed her panties, when we started to 69 ... she LOVED this ... or so it seemed. If she didn't, the whole hour was definitely worth an oscar, because she claimed that she reached the big O several times, and I believed her. She then put the wrapper on, and went CG on me for quite a while ... then asked me to get on top of her in mish. After quite a while, she asked to go K9, and I happily obliged until I started cramping. Still hard as a flag pole, she took the wrapper off and started BBBJ all over again. I told her to swing her pussy back up to my face, and that's how we finished ... I unloaded in her mouth, and she didn't miss taking every drop. It was definitely a marathon for me ... as she said I was a tough cookie to crack ... but was worth every minute/dollar! We had a very nice chat about our weekend as I cleaned up. I will definitely look forward to meeting her again!
positive Another great BDJ experience. Great service by Kim setting things up. Amber is a very nice girl with a great body and good attitude. Highly recommended. Amber greeted me with a nice kiss and hug. A brief conversation showed me that she had a good personality and was trying to connect with me. After taking care of business she joined me on the bed and gave me an LFK. Then she got naked and I saw how good her body was. Not a hard body by any means but still gorgeous. She kissed down my body and gave me a BBBJ. Afterward the condom came on and she rode me cowgirl. Then we did some mish and doggie until I came. Then we talked while she gave me a massage. Her massage skills are ok (not great but not bad). After that we lay in bed talking a bit while I ran my hands all over her body until I was ready to go again. A little cowgirl and mish and I was done again. Then a quick shower, a little conversation followed by a nice goodbye LFK. Definitely worth the trip.
positive I found Linas website a month before my Vegas trip and I really liked her. She is a classy lady evident from her website content and I decided I must see her. We communicated very well and set up our date a long time in advance. What attracted me to her was that she is a full disclosure girl and what you see and read is what you get. No surprises. She looks very identical to her website pics. Pre appointment communication was superb especially leading up to the day, very professional and you have different options to select from. She is very discrete and respectful of the need for such. On the day of the appointment she was punctual and actually had to wait a bit for me to be ready. I had requested very specific things, all of which were provided as she paid attention to the details. She is a low volume provider as she does have other things going on, but lends to her attention to detail. We met for a quick drink in a quite spot at the hotel bar and really hit it off with interesting and flirty convo. She showed up wearing a mini dress with lingerie underneath as I requested. We talked about all different things. She knows how to work up a man with just the right touches. It wasnt long before I needed to elevate the level of arousal and we headed up to my room. The only time the word girl can be used to describe Lina is when talking about her past days as a Las Vegas Showgirl. Lina is a mature woman and as such knows how to treat a man like a woman. She is a very passionate, sensual lady that goes to great lengths to ensure that you get everything you want and more. She loves what she does and is not shy. Although a sensual GFE, MILF next door kind woman, her talents come from a strong and animalistic sexual energy that is at the core of her personality. Yet, she can set the pace, or let you take control. She is unmistakably a courtesan, not PSE or spinner (but not far from). Treat her good guys, she will ensure your satisfaction When we reached the room we started DFK as we closed the door behind us. I kiss her neck and take in her natural body smell, which is great. Our hands are all over each other. She excuses herself to the bathroom where I had her donation in plain sight and I take off my shirt and pants. She reappears, still in her dress as I requested as I like to undress my girls myself. Her long legs wrapped in sexy black lingerie leggings are wrapped around me, and her hips are rotating against mine. She caresses my head and back as we lock lips like long time lovers. She reaches for my cock and starts to massage it. I continue to suck her now hard nipples alternating between them while reaching for her pussy and start to rub it through her panties. This gorgeous blonde MILF in lingerie panties and leggings is standing before me ready to please me in every way I want, that is anticipation that gives a man a testosterone rush. She really has a nice pussy, very symmetrical and looks waxed, not shaved. I put my face to it taking a deep inhale to smell its freshness. It was very clean. I start to masturbate her but the panties are in the way. Took them off and resumed rubbing. I wanted her wet so I straddled her in reverse 69 and started to DATY eventually introducing FIV, her moans intensified from low and soft to high volume. She started a very wet BBBJ. She was very wet after a about 2 minutes of this and her moans turned up very loud, then to screams. As my fingers were sliding in and out of her coated in her juices I was sucking and pulling on her clit, Soon I felt my fingers being squeezed, while her hips started bucking, thighs quivering, stopped the BBBJ, but held on tightly to my cock and then she squirted in my mouth. Consider this your warning, she is a screamer. She was the most tasty that I ever had. I licked up all her cum and slowed down my DATY and FIV. Back up to her face for DFK as her head was arched back enjoying her O. Started DFK and she stole all her flavors that were in my mouth, while I continued to rub her clit. I positioned my knee against her pussy and started on her nipples. She was rotating her hips so her clit would rub on my knee, keeping the stimulation and giving me a small wet spot on my knee. I wanted more of that squirt so I went back down and continued DATY and FIV till my second reward came. She doesnt do CIM and I felt the release building slowly, so I told her to ease up on the BBBJ. Kissed her neck and lips. She wanted to BBBJ more. She got on all fours at the edge of the bed and devoured my cock. DT and looking at me. Those gorgeous eyes looking up at me, deep and passionately, legs in leggings spread, tits bouncing gently while her tongue flicked over my cock is just devine. She worked hard and fast then slowly on it. I usually wont cum from this, but she told me how much she enjoys it, so I let her have her fun for a few minutes equally enjoying it, while reaching between her legs and rubbing her pussy and caressing her breasts. I would occasionally massage her shoulders and head while she was doing the BBBJ before holding on to her head and face fucking her, driving in hard down her throat. I still want more of her cum, so I motion her on her back and get between her legs and start DATY. While lifting her long legs to put on my shoulders I realize how far back they go to her chest, I push them towards her chest and they just spread in that sexy diamond shape before her feet separate. The poise of her long legs covered in that black lingerie leggings extended daintly to the ceiling, one hand cupping her breast with erect pink nipples, the other spreading apart her bald pink pussy lips exposing the entrance and pushing her clit forward, eyes filled with pure carnal lust fixed on me, blonde hair spread across the sheets, was inspiring, breathtaking, photographic and rivalled that of any pornstar pic. She asks me for my cock first like a lady with proper manners, I refuse her and then she starts to beg for it. I only answer her with a DFK and instruct her to masturbate for me. While she works her clit, I pay attention to her nipples and soon its only a matter of time before the moaning starts again. Without missing my cue I resume DATY and FIV, round 3. Persistence pays of, with the right technique and she is screaming again, she pulls a pillow over her face with one hand and screams into it while pushing against the headboard, causing me to miss her squirt, a smaller one this time which lands on the sheets. She resumes a BBBJ and sometime during this I decide I want to do something I have never done, take a bath with my girl. I pull out of her mouth and kiss her (that may be a no-no for some of you). I tell her that I am going to give her a bath. Knowing that I have not yet cum and being focused on a mans need she insists that she must make me cum. She wants this badly as she gets off on it, so I agree to cum for her in the shower. I run the tub with hot water. We make out and caress while her gives me a HJ in the bathroom. I get in with her and start to pour water over her body. She positions herself such that her back is supported and her pussy is spread open. She starts to rub it while I pour water over her. Another BBBJ starts and she uses the warm water on me, while sucking. She alternates between HJ and BBBJ. I feel the release getting close and being respectful to her no CIM rule I pull out and start a HJ. I ask where she wants it and she is open to anywhere except hair and eyes. She pushes up her breasts offering them to me and looks on at my cock with delight coxing me on to give it to her. Fucking sexy as hell when I see those animal eyes fixated on me delivering her eagerly anticipated payload, I delay it a bit for her tensions to build and them do a grand finish on her breasts. She plays with it a bit while we DFK in the tub, before washing off. We get dressed and hang out for a few before she kisses me good bye. One of the best hours of my life
positive Steve is great to work with. Set something up for a few days out and got the location information on the morning of. Once at the hotel I texted and got the room number. Went up and was greeted by a mature woman who takes great care of herself. A hot afternoon with a hot woman... She greeted me with a hug and a few kisses. I took care of business and jumped into the shower. Upon my return we started making out and touching. She started to disrobe us a piece at the time. Once we were completely un-clothed we crawled onto the bed. We continued making out until it was time for a display of oral skill. She was first and showed great talent. It was then my turn and I spent a while, which seemed to go over well with her. Time for the main event so I suited up. We started in mish and she gives as good as she gets. Then we moved through doggie, lazy dog, scissored and then switching back and forth from oral to mish. We eventually finished up with some oral and mutual stimulation. A great time with a great provider...
positive Walked into a dim candle lit room and was attacked by a sex starved stunning woman! Superb body and the best looking ass I've ever seen. Kissed my brains out until she said........ I want to suck your cock now! Not yet I said, I had her get on her knees so I could see that perfect ass and I just couldn't help myself, I buried my tongue in her ass and took turns between there and her sweet pussy. Finally she pushed me back into a recliner and sucked my balls into her mouth, hard! After an excellent bls, she gave me a lovely no hands bbbj. She had me get on my hands and knees and sucked and licked my balls from the back. All of a sudden she buried her tongue in my ass. I've never done that and it was hot. I had a hard time not cumming! I suggested she lay on her back and she was happy to. I lowered my balls to her hungry mouth and she devoured them again. This girl loves sex and holds nothing back. Finally she says fuck my mouth and I did. Started slow and then pushed harder and could feel my cock pop into her throat. Delicious! I stood up and Angelina jumped off the bed and dropped to her knees and buried my cock all the way to the bottom and stayed there! I told her to stop, I just have to fuck you! She asked me to be careful as she is very tight and hard to enter. She was right! She laid on her back and I entered her slowly while standing, had to go very slow until the head popped in. I grabbed her legs and lifted her ass off the bed and buried the bone into her snug love box. After some nice long shagging, I rolled her up for some mind boggling doggie! I wish the back door was on the menu as hers is perfection. Had to finish mish as I wanted some more of her dfk. If you visit Angelina, eat your Wheaties!
positive I like mcc picture so i make contact. I texted her to see if she was available and she was. We kept communicating via text to set something up which we did. It was at a complex in wla Upon arrival, we briefly communicated on the phone to give me code. Upon arrival, I knocked on her door and WOW, she looked amazing tall not too thin with big natura rack We begin with some small talk. then next to the bed. she starts by telling me to take off my clothes. i was being a little caution so i was taking my time. then i heard she starts talking off her clothes also. next go on the cap and she starts giving me a bj. she has quite a way with her tongue. i was almost pop in her mouth but dont want to stop there so i ask her to stop and start with a cw, then doggy, she has quite a nice ass. after a while we went back to cw. and she ride me till i pop. after we get clean up, she tell me to lay down and give me a massage. Her massage was quite good and she really try to please. After a bit she turn me over and i feel a wet lip engulf my jonhson. Then go on another cap and more fun. Over all she really try to please and make u feel pleasure
positive I saw her ad up and decided to give her a call. Answered on the first try and was very nice over the phone. Typical 2 call to get to her place. Let her know when I was there and she had her "girl" open the side door for me. This "girl" is Erin and they do doubles together. She brings me to the room and the place is clean and I see Holly standing in front of a mirror. She is in great shape and is very attractive MILF type. I will repeat. We exchange greetings and she gives me a nice hug and a kiss. She leads me to the bed and I lay the donation on the nightstand and we chat some more and start kissing and rubbing on each other. She is wearing this sexy lingerie piece and high heels. We begin to DFK and I start rubbing up on her breasts and grabbing her ass. We get undressed and she lays me down on the bed and begins a great BBJ with great technique. She DTs and does some BLS as she sucks down my member. After a while of this she suits me up and starts to ride me. She starts slow and increases speed and intensity in no time. It is amazing, I am doing all that I can to hold on for dear life. I try to slow down and switch positions but I was past the point of no return and I fill the cover. We laugh it off and I tell her that I wasn't prepared for her. She gets a warm cloth and cleans me up and we chat until my time is up. She is a great woman and I plan on seeing her & her friend Erin soon. She is also very fetish friendly and was asking me of my interests and if I am open to things.
positive after viewing Amanda new review.. and seeing her pics I made contact with her. She is pleasant over the phone with a sweet voice. I booked an appt which was very simply few text and a call. had me at her location. her Pics are accurate. she has a very nice body, legs, breast, cute face. overrall you will not be disappointed in her physical and her personality is welcoming. non-vips i recommend and will repeat Vips read on... ok guys, Amanda is new to the scene and still a lil wet behind the ears.. I get into her location and she welcomes me in with a nice tight hug.. she was wearing some sweat pans and t-shirt. but you could still her that she has ass in the sweats. so I was happy to see. I then excuse myself to the bathroom to wash my hands, come back out to take care of the biz side(which she didn't touch) and she was already in her bra and panties. (very nice site) and the fun began.. I remove my shoes and shirts. while playing with her nipples and rubbing on her clit(very phat clit) and could feel her wetness. as I did that she unbutton my pants reach down inside and pulls out my stiffness ..drop to her knees and began a very nice BBBJ ( didnt have to ask for it) while doing that I remove her bra, as she finished removing my pants. the BBBJ was very nice lasted 5-10min nice sucking action. altho not a very wet bbbj for those who like it that way. but next we moved to the bed as I lay her flat on her stomach legs together and you could see her coke bottle shape. nice and curvy. I cover up and lay on top. started with some lazy dog, then moved to doggie, and then i flipped her to finish off in some mish.. she was very into the action, pulling me close and her moans were a turn on.. stayed in mish until I popped in the wrapper.. afterward.. we both get cleaned up, had a lil convo got another tight hug and i was on my way. overall had a nice time with a nice young lady. I would repeat as I have nothing to complain about with her. dont mess up this girl fellas .
positive I had a vacation planned to LV and wanted to sample thehobbyshop material based on a review of their website and TER reviews. Screening was very easy and through a series of text messages I arranged for an outcall to my LV Strip hotel. Boy, am I glad I chose her. She arrived on time wearing a black lightweight coat and looked beautiful. Once inside my room, she removed her coat to reveal a skin tight, short black dress that accentuated her wonderful breasts.. She excused herself to the bath room to freshen up and returned in a sexy bra and panties. I could not wait to sample this Asian treat. First, let me say that Alli is strikingly beautiful with a killer body. Her bolt ons are decent-----not the softest but not rock hard either. Her face is gorgeous. We moved to the bed where we cuddled and talked before we moved to the main activities. Some LFK while she stroked the general to attention. I was rubbing her pussy to get her in the mood (no FIV allowed). After a few minutes of this she moved south to orally sample the general. Her oral skills were outstanding. She made me cum in a matter of minutes, keeping my unit in her mouth till the last drop was released. She excused herself to the bathroom to spit and rinse. Once back, we resumed cuddling and LFK. I came very fast because of her gorgeous looks and killer body. I went down on her and tasted her magnificent pussy. She was well manicured, with only some tastefull light hair above those lucious lips. The meal lasted about 20 minutes and I enjoyed every minute. Although she did not O, she let out some nice moans and and grasped my hand quite often. O knew I was hitting the right spots! After my meal was done, she called the general to attention for his second roll call. He was quite responsive so she suited him up and mounted me cg style. She worked the unit very well, but the condom was slipping so I directed her to orally reprimand the general. She spent the next 15 minutes giving me a superb, extra wet blow job. She had her mind on tasting more of my cream, but the general had other ideas-----my fault not hers. I highly recommend this agency. The only drawback is her english is not the best so carrying on a conversation was not that easy. However, her understanding of the universal language of sex was beyond good. Spent a full hour and this Korean cutie was fabulous.
positive Its' been a while since I had seen any of Pam's girls. This one had nice reviews and figured it was time for a return. As always, she knew who I was as soon as I called, and a date was set up right away. Typical texting of address and directions for the building led me to her door. She opened and was hot. An amazing body I knew I'd get to enjoy.... The usual hug and light peck at the door. I slapped her ass and loved how it felt. We exchanged a little banter and headed to the room. Gave her the donation and started getting undressed. She put the money away and followed suit. We headed to the bathroom and I kept kissing her lovely ass while she got the shower ready. We got in, she cleaned me well, front and back. A few kisses and gropes mixed in. Mouthwash chug as usual. Dried and headed off to bed. I pushed her down into the bed and dove in between her legs for some DATY. She quivered and moaned while I licked away. I held her hands down and then she really got going. After she O'ed I gave her some rest and she went down on me. Nice licking and sucking, but I wanted her and she knew it. She covered me up and hopped on for a great CG ride. Soon evolved to ACG and I nutted just holding her tits and gazing at her seductive facial expressions. She cleaned me up and commented on the size of the load. She asked if I could go for another and I told her I would. Some massage led to some playful touches that got me going. I laid her down and licked her all over that got me even harder. Felling me against her we covered up and more CG led to mish led to doggy. WOW. Her ass is amazing to smack into during doggy. So soft! Oh my. I blasted another nut and left a very happy guy. She dressed me and I still couldn't keep my hands off her ass. I will be back again.....and may do the threesome with Paris this time...
positive Kayla is a highly educated, sweet, attractive curvy young lady. She brings a sense of romance and class into her sessions that are a breath of fresh air. From her manner of speech to the upscale incall, to the no rush attitude, to the sensual performance, she was a very enjoyable date. VIP's read on. Kayla was very approachable and conversational in her pre-date phone call. As she is a lady pursuing an advanced degree, she was a pleasure to get to know on the phone, and has a nice sarcastic wit about her. Her incall was in Fort Lauderdale near the beach, an upscale boutique hotel. It was immaculately clean, nicely appointed and very discreet. Upon my arrival, she had candles burning, and the lights dimmed low to set the mood. She offered me some chilled Patron which we slowly sipped and got to know each other better. Kissing softly, we slowly undressed each other. As her lingerie fell, I discovered a very nice curvy figure, with large firm suckable breasts, and a tight two handed behind. She softly laid me down, kissed me and worked her mouth down my body. Kissing and licking gently until her moist sensual lips enveloped me in a slow erotic BBBJ. Her technique is very good, changing paces, licking, sucking, and going as deep as she could, her pretty brown eyes fixed upon mine the entire time, gauging my reactions. She seemed to really enjoyed giving head, as she stayed there a very long time. Eventually, after a nice aggressive burst of hard head sucking, she released him and cooing softly asked, "my turn?" She laid back, and after some soft sensual DFK, I worked those large sensitive breasts into a frenzy (I'm a breast man). Moving my way down to DATY, I was very pleased to find her very wet and waiting for additional stimulation. Licking and flicking to my heart's desire, she grabbed my head and gently guided my head to her own release. Donning the cover, I slowly slid in for MISH, wet and surprisingly tight, her inner walls convulsing and squeezing me as I slid in and out. We got a bit aggressive, as she egged me on to go faster and deeper. Pushing me off and turning herself over, she offered herself for DS and lazy DS where we went at it for a while with reckless abandon. As I grew close, I wanted to finish in MISH. I slid back in, slow deep strokes, her hips meeting mine with every thrust, more DFK, until I was finally drained inside her. We lay in each other's arms, kissing and cuddling for a while, no rush out the door, just enjoying the after glow of our encounter.
positive Requested to get on her approved list and she text back about an hour later asking for a reference which got back to her quickly. So within about 3 hours of reaching out we had scheduled a time for the next morning! She text me about 45 minutes before saying hello which was nice and then sent me to an address about 5 minutes away from her actual location. Once I got to the location I was past the time we were going to meet but that was OK. She greeted me at the door... She is very sweet, relaxed and cool. I immediately like her. I just liked her personality and felt that she was easy to get a long with. After a few minutes of talk I went to the restroom and when I returned she was in her underwear and I was stunned at how great her body is. I mean, it is a perfect spinner body and her breasts are truly a work of art. Physically her body was truly just perfect for me and I consider myself to be fairly picky. I am kicking myself for not seeing her sooner! After about 10 minutes of talk I started to kiss her body which turned in to DATY which was amazing. This turned in to BBBJ which she even said is a YMMV but definitely only with the HR session. Eventually we did all the normal positions and she was really into it. She is very good at what she does, but a bit reserved. Possibly because it was the morning. Our session ended about 15 minutes early but it was because the clock in the room was fast so not her fault. I will say that when we started in cowgirl, it just felt snug and right. Once with did missionary she was full thrusting with me and once we got to doggie we were a symbiotic unit! She does love what she is there for! I really really enjoyed my time with her and will repeat for sure! A true gem.
positive I liked the look of Lyn's pics, reviews seemed good, so I contacted her and was screened and she contacted me to set up the appt. She is efficient, pleasant and, easy to work with once screened. I arrived at the incall location and she opened the door and I figured visiting her was a good decision..... , She invited me in, had a robe on, is the girl in the pics. She is Asian, speaks with no accent and is intelligent and well spoken. Very enjoyable to be around. She welcomed me and I excused myself to get a quick shower. Donation left on table per her instructions. I came out in a towel and she was in a nice bra and panty set, we sat on the bed and she asked me a few questions about myself, my likes and dislikes, then we began to kiss. She is an excellent kisser, not stingy with the tongue and our hands began to roam and all the remaining remnants of clothing were gone. I then laid her down and made my way to her breasts and some DATY then returned for more of her lovely mouth. She then proceeded to return the favor with an excellent BBBJ. She is really focused on making you happy, which is great. Soon we covered me up and she rode in CG, then I asked to be on top and we kissed while in mish and I arrived for cup #1. She then gave me an excellent back massage and we talked about a number of things but soon she rolled me over and quickly went to HJ and more BBBJ. She then covered me up and really vigorously rode me and pulled me back on top where I enjoyed thoroughly the sights, sounds and sensations of more mish and an eventual final rally to cup # 2. Really sweet and pretty girl who is all about your pleasure. Hard to beat that
positive Pure was on my radar after seeing her reviews and photos. Been here a few times, they never disappoint. After setting up later in the afternoon. Arived at the location and the door magically opened and behold a beautiful Asian with an incredible ass and a gorgeous face she's a total sweetheart, I had a nice GFE time. May repeat... Pure greeted me with a warm hug and a sensual LFK. Right away I could tell she's a sweetheart. Some girls at these agencies are all about the sex and a borderline porn star time which is great most of the time. Sometimes its nice to tone it down and spend some quality time with a beautiful sweetheart that is more like a girlfriend and seems genuinely happy to be with you. After her nice greet she took my hand and led us to the bedroom. More LFK to DFK and holding each other like a couple, so hot. We both got comfortable and headed to the shower where she cleaned me up. No preview BJ in the shower we got out and she dried me head to toe then took my member in her warm mouth for a nice preview BBBJ. I lay on the bed and waited for her to dry off. As she joined me we made out some more, I played with her perfect youthful Bs and suckled away, such a nice change from the hard manmade versions. Did I mention she has a nice ass? Although I thought I wasn't an ass man and like petite hard bodies, Pure has one of the best asses on an Asian girl. Her pictures are spot on, not one of those chunky/fat asses that I dislike but just right and grabable. She moved down for a nice BBBJ with eye contact, such a pretty young face. She looked so good sucking my cock with her ass in the air. She applied the hat and climbed on for CG grinding deep. She asked for k9 and turned around face down glorious ass up, what a sight. I think I'm becoming an ass man. I plunged in to her warm pussy and pounded away. She got in to it the went down for lazy doggy, which I rarely do but it was nice feeling her under me and she had a nice "O" that made me feel like a stud. She rolled over and and pulled me close and I plunged again while DFKing. Pounded some more and she asked to put her legs on my shoulders, so cute, I pounded some more for another "O" and I busted soon after. She cleaned us up and rolled me over for a nice massage, I don't usually care for them and just want to keep going for more rounds but she felt so good taking care of me. She rolled me over and said this time cum in my mouth? She lubed me up for a nice hand and ball job told me to let her know when cumming and she dove on to my cock and took it all in. She got up smiling and spit, cleaned up and came back to cuddle. We finally showered and said goodbye. Pure is a sweetheart look her up if you want a true GFE experience with a pretty Thai girl.
positive When I got there, the girl is not the same as in the ad picture. Nevertheless, she's young and hot and nothing for me to complain. I was offered a shower and a towel. Once I came out of the shower, she's already naked. The kiss she offered was very light. She had very nice tits and her nipples got harden as I touched them. Sucked her nipples a bit while touching her pussy on the outside. She wanted to touch me more than being touched. I lied down on the bed as she worked on my body starting licking and sucking on my nipples. The bbbj was very nice and wet, but no eye contact. She alternated speed and went for the balls occasionally. We started an ACG, then reversed ACG before we turned to mission, and finished k9. Was offered immediately another shower, and I was out of the door. Overall this is a place I'd visit again.
positive second time with this service, first time at this westside location. I called in to the MMS (who is young) and she told me who was available at the time i wanted to go. She said Orange is available but not at the eastside location I went to before when i saw Chelsea. MMS texted me the address right away..... when i got near at the time of the appointment... she texted me the apartment number. It's a regular Hell's kitchen non doorman apartment building.. but once in the door, it's quite nice. MMS greeted me at the door... and introduced me to Orange who greeted me with a LFK... which went into a short DFK.... Non VIP.. i would repeat.. VIP read on. Orange took my hand and led me to her room.... and started undressing me as she DFK'ed me.... she hung up my clothes nicely as the clothes came off.... and when it came to my pants.. she got on her knees... and kissed my semi turgid cock through my boxer briefs... then slipped that off together with my jeans i had on....... she gave a small lick on the cockhead... then got up... slipped off her clothes, handed me a towel to wrap around myself and led me by my hand to the shower. She washed me up real good in the shower... both front and back... then as she was drying me up... gets on her knees and gives me a fantastic BBBJ..... we towel up and head back to her room...... I ask for her to lie down.. and immediately go into DATY with some FIV added in... she comes sweet nectar onto my ips and chin ... and after two shuddering O's by her... she goes.."my turn".... i now lay back. and she proceeds to slowly kiss and rub her nipples all over my body... ending in a full bore sloppy BBBJ with DT... after a few minutes of that.. she turns her body so that she can continue the BBBJ with DT while we 69... she sucks so well.. that i almost pop right there.. so i ask for us to get to the main action...she slips on a cover... and rides me first CG.. switching to ACG..... her pussy milking my cock as she rides it hard... we then switch to K9.... i ask her to keep her knees together so that i can fuck that tight pussy hard with my legs on the outside.. she keeps telling me to fuck her harder and cum deep inside her... i flip her over to fuck her mish.. and with her legs on my shoulders... i cum deep inside her (inside the bag).... she goes out to get a oshibori to wipe me down.. and a really ice cold bottle of water to cool me down..... my cock won't go down though.... as we chit chat about what different body parts are in cantonese, mandarin and in Japanese.... we are both laughing hard at how to say " big cock fuck small pussy" in the different languages..... she notes that i'm still hard even after i came already.... and asks if i want more BBBJ... she starts to give me an even stronger and aggressive BBBJ... i would have to say it's one of the best BBBJ i've ever had.... I usually don't cum from a BBBJ (or CBJ lol )... but she rapidly got me almost over the top.. i pull out of her mouth.. and with her hand under mine.. we rub my cock vigorously to get me over the top.. and as i erupt.. she gobbles my cock to take my load in her mouth... she discreetly spits it out into the trash can next to the bed..... swishes her mouth with some of the water from my water bottle she gave me earlier...... this is the very first time i've ever had two cups in a AMP..... probably the first 2 cup i 've ever had in an hour time period.... we have just a little time .. so she takes me back to the bathroom to wash the sweat off me... then dresses me up... as i come out.... Elsa is in her bedroom across the hall... she's even smaller than Orange is..... Elsa comes over and gives me a nice DFK greeting.. i tell her that i brought some sweets for the two of them (and MMS) as a present... Elsa DFK's her thank you... then Orange DFK's me again at the door... i leave and go out to dinner to replenish my strength... as my knees are slightly buckling from the two massive orgasms Orange induced out of me
positive Saw the pics and thought they looked great. Saw the reviews that said the pics were real. Was a little horny and checked it out. When I saw her in person I was surprised how hot she was. Of course there are filters in the pics and stuff but in person she looked spectacular, like a Korean cosmetics model or singer. I didn't care how she would perform at that point there's no way a man can't have fun with her I could do all the work if I had to. Already repeated. She was friendly when first meeting. LFK at the door and then went to the bedroom to undress. Took a mutual shower got cleaned up forgot if there was a preview bj but anyways then back to the bedroom for some more action. LFK again and played with her boobs then bbbj. BBBJ felt great got pretty hard and then she put the cover on. Banged her doggy was a great view wanted to fuck more in that position but didn't want to cum too fast either so flipped her around for missionary. face is so pretty was in danger of cuming after just a few seconds so did a couple of pumps while grabbing her boobs and sucking on them a little. Then banged her sideways and only managed a couple of seconds more of pumping and blew in the bag. Great time repeated already and planning to go one more time before she leaves, which is pretty soon.
positive Leya was easy to get a hold of by text. We talked through text, set the appt and she even text me prior to our appt to confirm. I called her when I was on my way and the sound of her voice was so calming and sexy. I arrived on time and she was ready. Gave me the room number and up I went. I hadnt seen the reviews on TER yet so I thought I was TOFTT. She opened the door wearing a lace purple baby doll outfit and gave me a nice hug. The room was dim, but when we got close to the TV and the light shined on her  damn, this woman is beautiful. We started some small talk and laughing about how warm it is here in November. VIPs read on, but when I left there I got a lottery ticket as this was obviously my lucky day  Look, let me start this off by saying dont fuck this one up. Leya is a sweetheart of a woman and gives some new life to the hobby so please treat her well. Ok, anyway, I drop the donation down and excuse myself to the bathroom. When I come out its still there and were still talking. She talks about her other profession and in general seems very educated. I cant keep my eyes off her and Im ready to get things started. I take my clothes off and lay on the bed. I upgraded to bbbj and Leya positions herself on the bed and starts some light kissing from my head down south. Her skin is smooth, she smells nice and is a sight to see. Make no mistake though shes an animal. She takes my dick in her mouth and Im steadily growing in her mouth as she gives one of the better bbbjs Ive ever had. Shes a listener so whatever speed, amount of wetness, hands/no hands you like shes going to provide you or at least thats what I received. She was moaning as she was sucking my dick and moving her body from side to side. I gave her a few light smacks on the ass and worked my hands under her baby doll dress and her pussy is soaking wet. Im all the more excited as she bucks against my fingers and I give her some digital stimulation she shows appreciation for. I cant believe her pussy is just this wet and I tap her inner thigh so she can get into a 69 position. I put my tongue on that clit, spank that ass and she starts moaning louder with the obvious muffle of dick in her mouth. Shes spitting on my dick and grinding her pussy into my face and lifts up and unloads a bucket of water on me. I literally felt I was in the tub drowning. Shes breathing hard. Im breathing hard really trying to catch my breath and shes says I want this dick. Her pussy tastes sooooo good. She reaches for the wrapper, puts it on me and I say I want you to ride. Sure. She gets on and the pussy is so wet and snug it doesnt even feel like theres a barrier between us. Once she adjusts on the dick she grabs her own ass and grinds into me. I take queue, grab her ass and drop her on the dick. She says damn already and tells me Im about to come again. What. I look down and she squirts all over my pelvis. She takes a small break, then lifts up Asian cowgirl and all I see is the wetness from her pussy to my pelvis. Im so excited and she cant drop down on my dick like this and she says the dick is in her stomach. I turn her around and get into standing k-9. Greek is on the menu for an upcharge, but she admits she hasnt really done it and her 3rd option looks way too tight for me to even consider it, but shes at least willing to do it. Anyway, the view from the back is great as she has a nice soft ass with just the right jiggle. I would call her body type athletic with a very small amount of baby fat in the ass department. Nonetheless, she lets me stroke slow, long, deep, fast, whatever from the back all the while shes moaning and then says shes coming again. What. Yes. I thumb her ass and we keep going and we come together with her pushing me out of the pussy with another wet squirt. She says that was good. Im breathing hard like yea. She stays in doggy while I spank her ass a bit. I was about to go cleanup but she says we still got time. Uh, if you say so. I rub on her pussy some more and digitally insert two fingers and DATY and DATO from the back until time was up. I clean up, we talk some more, a nice long kiss and Im out the door. She text me later that night and by the time this posts Ill be wet with her again. Happy Hunting.
negative Found Missy online. Liked her pictures, thought I would give her a try. In short, I wish I hadn't. Don't waste your time or money. Missy showed up at my hotel and proceeded to talk like a seasoned pro. That was a bit of a turnoff from the start. Plus, she is much heavier than her photos show. She was very mechanical, describing what she would do, which was not much on "our first date". This was news to me. She kept asking for more money too. Basically, I paid her for an hour and expected full service. What I got was about 15 minutes with a lot of talking about her kid and her life, begging for tips and a topless handjob. After I popped, she put her top back on and started to leave, which was fine because at that point I just wanted her to leave. Total waste of time and money. Don't bother.
positive Melissa greeted me very warmly opening the door, beckoning me in and give me a sweet kiss. We chatted for a while and she offered me water. She took me by the hand and lead me to the bed where... she turned and kissed me with great intensity. She is a good kisser. Soon my hand was in her shirt and hers in my pants and soon both garments were on the floor. We were off to the races. And races it was. After a lovely BBBJ Melissa mounted me and moved on me nonstop for 20 minutes. I didn't have to do anything which was fine with me while she seemed to enjoy yourself wonderfully. She was smiling, relaxed, laughing and into it . Eventually she asked for mish and I obliged. After a bit we moved to another BBBJ and I exploded with a little help from myself. She said I could CIM but when the time arrived she preferred to watch. Very nice gal intelligent, warm, friendly, enthusiastic and fun to have sex. She is very fit by the way and has lovely long legs.
positive Preslee is amazing. I called her on the phone and we discussed setting up the appointment, she texted me the address afterwards and I texted her back when I got there. There was a bit of a mixup on the time of my arrival, but in the end I was really glad I waited a bit to be able to see her. Trust me guys, you will love seeing this provider! Preslee met me at the door of her hotel room. I was not sure what to expect, but I knew things were going to go well when she immediately grabbed my and gave me an intense french kiss at the door. She's a great kisser. So we made out for a bit and I left the donation on her dresser while she did a quick freshen up in the bathroom (she had just woken from a nap). I asked her if I could use the bathroom (too much coffee that day!) and she didn't mind. When I came out she was in her bra and panties on the bed and told me to get comfortable. I stripped down to my underwear and she stood up and we started making out again... she slowly pulled down my undies and pushed me back onto the bed. she was now on top of me and we were making out. With the flick of her bra clip, I had her bra off and she slowly slid her panties off. She started kissing my neck and chest and slowly worked her way down. Before I knew it she had her lips locked on to the tip of my penis and she begin moving in and out of her mouth. Guys - she's a pro at blow jobs, she got it nice and wet and used her hands and mouth to quickly get my semi-hard cock rock hard. After she sucked me for a while, we did some 69, she is very well maintained down stairs and tasted amazing! After a little of 69, she slipped a hat on and rode me cowgirl style, her pussy was so wet and she really liked my large cock, she came at least two times while riding me. After a while, I got on top and we did missionary style, she then lifted her legs in the air and I was able to penetrate her really good, I couldn't hold back anymore and blew my load in the condom. Normally, I'm just a one shot guy. After I came, we cuddled for a bit then I got cleaned up and started to get dressed. As I was standing up, I saw her lying on the bed naked and very relaxed, I got the sudden urge to taste her again before I left. So I asked her if I could kiss her pussy and she said yes, I started eating her out again and it was very good, she came again and then took my clothes off. She proceeded to give me the most incredible blow job I've ever had, I came in her mouth and she went to the bathroom to get a wash cloth to clean me up. We conversed a bit more but then I had to get going. She is totally worth the time and if you are lucky enough to get an appointment with her, take it and don't think twice! I can't wait to see her again.
positive Katty's beautiful photos caught my attention and, despite limited reviews, decided to take the plunge. Although her photos are definitely photoshopped, they are close enough that I believe it is the same girl. She has a cute round butt for a K-girl and looks great swaying her hips a little as she walks in front of you. I asked her what she does in Korea and she told me she is a university student, and my brain immediately seized on a hot co-ed fantasy which played out wonderfully during the session. Great agency to work with and familiar OC location. Highly recommend a date with Katty, who is only slated to be here another few weeks. When Katty opened the door, I was immediately struck by her fresh GND looks. She is a little bit shy at first, but her warm eyes and sweet smile had me from the get-go. She welcomed me with a LFK and took my hand and led me to the bedroom. This is where I noticed that, although she is thin, she has a rounder ass than most K-girls. Once in the bedroom, LFK turned to DFK, and she quickly helped me out of my clothes, which she draped over a chair. We went to the shower as I tried to engage her in a little conversation. The smiling blank stare you sometimes get tells me her English is limited, but she made a good effort to be playful and understand me. She has a very soft touch and encouraged me to wash her while she washed me. She seemed particularly interested in my growing member and spent a significant amount of time caressing it. Once we were rinsed we exited the shower and dried each other off. She dropped to her knees next to the mirror and went to town on a preview BBBJ. The sight of this young co-ed taking me into her mouth was almost too much to endure. I averted my eyes from the scene in the mirror so I wouldn't pop too soon. Into the bedroom where we DFK'd some more. As my hands roamed her body she pressed her natural boobs against me, reached down and put my manhood between her legs for a little standing P2P. Because she was shorter than me, the angle had the effect of rubbing her clit, to which she responded with deeper DFK as she got really wet. I needed a break because this was just too much this early in the session. I moved her over the to bed and laid her down with her ass near the edge. I started a soft and sensual DATY. She was a little tense at first, but soon realized I knew what I was doing, relaxed completely and laid her legs on my shoulders. As she got more into it, she moved her legs wider to give me better access. She O'd fairly quickly. I moved to the outer labia while she recovered, then asked her if she was okay. She lifted her head, smiled and said, "more", so I increased the intensity until she got her second O. She squirmed away because she was too sensitive and I laid down beside her while she recovered. After a few minutes she started a great BBBJ, with BLS, lots of tongue action and some good attempts at DT. She tried to get all the way down in DT, but gagged a little a few times, so I told her she didn't need to go so far. Some guys think gagging is sexy, but for me, it conjures up images of pre-barfing, so I would rather avoid it so as not to spoil the moment. I couldn't take it anymore, so I asked for the cover, rolled on top of her and went in mish. She was still very wet so no lube necessary. I was enjoying the tightness as fantasies of doing the hot co-ed in her dorm room danced through my head. it was so warm and tight, I popped in the bag way too soon. She cleaned me up, and began the BBBJ again. There is no way I thought at my age I was going to get a second cup during a one hour session. I usually need at least 90 min. But it felt so good, who was I to stop her? Once the flag pole was at full height, she put another cover on and climbed on CG. She had a great angle and stroked the full length of my rod for about 10 minutes until I blew again. I couldn't believe it! This girl had a great feel to her V and I just couldn't seem to get enough, nor did I have much control. She made it all happen on her own initiative, and I was the happy and satisfied beneficiary. Of course we had used our time up bringing this middle-aged guy to two pops in an hour, so it was off to the shower, where she remained playful and attentive, stroking me to another woody and asking if I want to try again with 5 minutes left! I was completely spent, but was tempted to call the booker and ask for another hour, but with K-girls, that is rarely possible as their high volume usually means a tight schedule is already booked. Katty is a sweetheart GND that will make you think you have lucked into being with a hot Co-ed. That fact that she IS a university student in Korea makes it seem all the more real. She only came over for two months to pay for her last year of college, and just started the second month, so you only have mere weeks left to sample this little hottie before she goes back.
positive Hit my 3 team parlay so it was time to try more of the HS menu. There was new items on menu decided on Alli as those pics looked bangging!.....but idk those pics r either 15yrs old or diff person not as hot(face) as the pics but the same body from the pic. But even tho it was way worth it! cant wait till I hit another parlay to make my day. vips read on... As I stated the pics dont match was pretty dissapointed(im very picky and young) when the door open. But it was the exact type of body that I was in the mood for. She has a sorta athletic body with a nice ass w/meat on them cheeks Im all ASS MAN. I really would rate her looks like 5ish in the face 8 on body & 10 on service. yes guys 10! OMG i wasnt sure if at times I was being rapped. Im not a small guy 5'10" 185lbs and she at times felt like she was the 1 fucking me haha. Starts of in the shower where I got one of the best AMP shower ever! She clean me neck to toe. And yes toe she had me hold my feet up so she could wash it.....that was a 1st. Got the usually bbbj preview a long version very nice. Off to the bed where I got a tounge bath she had me squirming like a worm. and i found out why she cleaned my feet....she gave me a BBBFJ (F for Feet) wow that was the 1st time i ever experience that now i want my toes sucked all the time! after the toe she went in for my tunnel which I knew was cumming as it was cleaned out good in the shower. Im not to into it but she got like a magic tounge that made it good. After she was done my ass was so wet I had to towel it off haha. idk maybe she was hungry too. on the flip she gave me a great bbbj she is fucking great with that mounth of hers...I had to tell he put in on so I wanted to test out the juicy ass of hers and bot it looks yummy in DS and thats the only position i wanted to be in. She is not a pro I would call her master. She positioned herself DS in the perfect hight position for me to thrust. 2.5mins later shot all up in the cover and it was removed only for me to get fully sucked dry...................... round 2 went exactly the same from BBBJ>DS thou the end went to CIM. Oh I forgot to mention inbetween sessions she gave me a great massage. I will repeat
positive Noticed her ad one night not too long ago. On one night sent text to booker I already dealt with few times, booked an appointment. On my way to WLA. At the gate, booker sent me a code of the entrance and the room #. Buzzed in, at the door, door opens and she was behind the door. A tall tanned slim Asian gal in early to mid 20's greeted me with a smile. She was in white bikini top and matching bottom. I was greeted with alight kiss on the cheek. She took my hand walking to the bedroom. Got undressed, she hang my clothes, off to the mutual shower. She washed me neck down to toe, pre-bbj, dried off, back to the bed room. Before I laid face down on the bed, we dfk'ed for little bit. She kissed my back all over, including ear, neck, down to waist area, spread my butt cheek open for rim job, then the flip, we kissed for little with her stroking me softly, she went down for bbj, then after while she got on top of me facing the wall for p2p, she grabbed and ripped opened the cover underneath the towel laid down on the bed, place don me, rode me rcg. She is on the slim side with toned body and I enjoyed her small but round butt in view. Then she turned around for cg, ACG, then again we switched position to missionary. I pumped hard while dfking her and after while I unloaded in the bag. She cleaned me up with tissue paper, then she asked me if I wanted a massage. I accepted. Ten minutes of average massage, I flipped over, initiated FDK asking her to lay on the bed face up, played with her boobs, kissing and licking nipples, asked for cover, entered her for missionary again, with her legs up to her ear, after while switched to k9, pumped hard grabbing her waist, unloaded in the bag. She cleaned me up, we laid down on the bed for few minutes, off to another shower. Quick rinse off, dried off, clothes back on, out the door, on my way. May repeat, may not.
positive Since I travel up to her area somewhat frequently, I've had my eye on her ad. Tried to connect a few times in the past with no luck. Finally connected on a recent trip. And finally someone worth my time when I pass thru town. Had tried to get up with her on previous trips thru Harrisburg area with no luck. Saw a post before my last trip, made contact and to my surprise I got a response. Explained was going to be in town, would love to meet her, etc...and made plans to contact again when there. All went well, appt. was set and met her at her location. Attractive woman. Was very pleased. We spent a few minutes getting acquainted then off we went. I stripped and removed my clothes and laid down. She returned in a few minutes and got comfortable also. Massage part was ok but nothing special. When things turned more sensual it got much better. She allowed courteous roaming of her body. Used her tits very nicely. Finished me with a hj on her chest. We cleaned up and she proceeded to tell me she thought I was nice, likes regulars, likes me...I seem very nice and calm she says and if I'd promise that whenever I was planning a trip up to contact her for an appt. said absolutely I would and as I was leaving gave me something to think about when she says...more to come next time. I'll go back again when there.
positive Contacted by text, set up afternoon appt.; drove to location, parked across street from apt. complex in nice area; texted her that I was there, she texted back apt. #, went up. Gorgeous young lady, great body, lovely Russian accent. Went into bedroom, paid donation, got undressed, laid on a towel on a floor mattress, which was fine. She was in a thong and bra-top. Really nice tush. She asked if she could sit on my butt to massage my back; her legs and tush felt really nice on my side and butt. Good massage all the way down to my toes; I loved her intermittent fingernail-massaging on my back, legs, and butt. Asked me to turn over, then the fun began She took off her top and allowed me to touch all over her body as she began the hand-job process. She was nice and slow and so I lasted a lot longer than I thought I would. It was nice touching her legs, butt, stomach, breasts. Loved kissing and sucking on her very nice breasts. She continued to stroke me as I climaxed to make sure she got everything out. Wiped me up and started a shower for me. Great experience. She is strictly fbsm. Please be nice to her, shes a sweet heart.
negative Text to set up appointment with Ali, woman from pics met me at her driveway, would not repeat. Didnt see, or prior review wasnt out yet, or wouldn't have bothered. Ali had me go to a bedroom and get undressed and lie on the table. She came back in and started a decent massage. But as previous reviewer noted, she believes she is some kind of healer. She burned sage and told me how she has cured mens ed by rubbing the inside of their thighs. I wanted to laugh, but i was hoping for some kind of action. She continued her work, i flipped, and she just kept on massaging. Every once and awhile, she would almost rub her clothed crotch on my leg or foot or elbow, but nothing would happen. She wants to create a blind date massage service, and asked if she could call me when she found someone that i might like. The closest i got to any play was at the very end, when she rubbed four different kinds of feathers around my groin area. Kind of a weird woman, wont be repeating.
positive Been away from the hobby a couple years, thought I'd stick my toe back in the water. Easy to set up appointment, clean if small hotel room, standard 2 call navigation. The door opened and a very pretty girl with a great body asked me in. She was a little shy at first but loosened up quickly. Beautiful natural breasts that most women would kill for. Very friendly, no persona, easy to talk to and easier to have some fun with. Very good time, will repeat. Got the impression that Adison hasn't been doing this for a long time. She wanted to jump right into it, but we had an hour and I wanted to take things more slowly and enjoy the preliminaries. She thought that was a bit unusual, but liked the idea. I sat on the edge of the bed and had her stand between my knees with her bra and panties on. Some talk and caressing and I slipped her bra off, revealing a wonderful set of young and perky D-cups. Perfect and obviously natural, just right for Russian. A bit of adoration for the girls and I moved to her butt and slid her panties off. She put a foot up on the bed so I'd have better access, but I put her foot back down and told her that I'd set the pace. She was good with that and really relaxed and went with the flow. GFE Very friendly and willing girl, not as experienced in sexual variety as some, but eager to learn. Excellent BBBJ, she has a tongue stud and I told her how to use it to best advantage. Enjoys sex and lets you know it. Willing to work hard when she needs to (asian cowgirl can get tiring and deep throating takes effort to master). Has some rules (no anal, no CIM, no kissing on lips) that aren't unusual. We did some standard positions and then I taught her a few more that she really enjoyed. I think that she is used to pump, dump and run guys rather than someone who wants to take their time and relax, have fun and talk a bit during. She was a lot of fun and clearly enjoyed our time, as did I. Go see her, you'll have a great time. I'll repeat.
positive Read a few nice reviews about Orange and her co-workers and was very interested in checking her and her spot out. Went for the 30 minute since it was my first time with the agency. Arrived after a half day at the office at the location on time. Typical 2-call system. Got to the spot and the door opened very slowly with Orange coyly hiding behind. VIP's see below, but very nice time with a cute Asian gal, well worth it. While the pictures on the site are clearly her, I think that they are a tat old. She was not as waif-like as depicted but she is far from being a BBW. Also, while cute, she's not drop-dead gorgeous as I expected. There are a fair number of other places in Chinatown that offer gals with comparable looks and service for a 60 minutes session for LESS than the 30 minutes at this place and they are not as hard to find as they used to be for non-Asians in the past with a little smart research. But if you're a midtown guy who values convenience, sometimes the extra premium is worth the time saved in travel. In any case, she smiles and grabs my hand, brings me to the room, closes the door and says, "I'm Orange. What's your name?" And proceeds to stick her tongue deep in my mouth and explore my mouth with the skill of a dentist -- but without the pain, or "discomfort," as dentists like to say. She starts to disrobe me and herself, lustfully speaking about my body and grabbing me with passion. I'm not vain and naive enough to think that she saw me as nature's gift to womankind, and while YMMV should always be in one's mind, I can't fault her for her efforts no matter what she actually felt about me. She turns me a bit and starts some BBBJ-style teasing of my cock as she is removing my sneakers. It was a little absurd but she certainly signaled that a very hot time was coming. Off to the shower and she washes my e-zones and dries me off. More BBBJ teasing during both the shower and dry-off and then back to the bedroom. Asked me to lie down on the bed, and DFK'ed me some more and moved down kissing me and then stopped at junior to engulf my cock in her mouth and working some DT action, which is impressive because I'm 10" hard. Nice effort but a tat too toothy when she switched to rapid vacuum cleaner style sucking but all-in-all very nice. She then moved her crotch over my face to invite DATY -- all good and sweet as she continued to devour my cock. I could have cum at that time and she must have sensed this (or paying attention to the time) because she then demanded me to fuck her. Only did MISH and DFK for a bit before I knew that she wanted me to cum and so I switched to getting on my back for BBBJ to cum in her mouth or her face. She was working me with her hands and mouth but to expedite my pop, I had to take over the manual labor to make me cum and busted my seed on her tongue and lips. Just a quick licking post-cum and saying that I did a good job, but no post-cum suck. (This was likely due to time constraints). Quick cleanup, left the donation (I was a little surprised that this did not come up as a 1st time visitor), some more pleasantries and chit-chat (she did this throughout the session but knew when to shut up and use that mouth for kissing and sucking) and out the door I went. In sum, I will return for both her and to sample the other ladies at this place. I think that Orange is likely better for a full 60 minute session and will try hard to take her time to get you off. I got the sense that if she likes you, she'll gladly make you cum as much as you can within the hour. However, I was not wowed in any way. I think part of it was that her face reminded me of an old Chinese GF I had who was actually the LAMEST fuck you can imagine. But that's just me and I unequivocally recommend her.
positive Amazing. Amazing. Amazing. Something about Sarah's post just screamed genuine to me, so I decided to deviate away from my regular provider. Best decision ever. After a short and sweet phone call, Sarah came to my outcall and blew my mind... Repeating as I type actually. She looks just like her pictures, except her boobs; much more impressive in person. We chatted for a bit while I smoked, she is smart and just makes you feel comfortable. I pulled her in and quickly noticed her perky breasts making my blood rush. She's quite a dancer, both body and tongue. Even with the cover. My god. After a while of that, she let me slip inside and my only regret is not letting her ride me. I will repeat just to see her boobs bounce. But she has an A+ personality and is absolutely sexy. Wish I could rate her above a 7. Edit: Just saw Sarah again and she was just as I remembered, witty, charming and absolutely wild. We had a similar routine to the above except she rode me this time and her bouncing breasts just made me lose it. I should also mention that if you like thick women, you need to run to her immediately because she will blow you away.
positive First time at this agency - very easy light screening - She is a very young good girl - run to see her! Chelsea is a young small girl with big boobs - very limited English but she busted out her phone translator when needed :) We first started with LFK that turned into DFK - she undressed me and started a great BBBJ - she moved me onto the bed and the we were in a 69 position for great mutual oral until i popped in her mouth. She leaves for 1 minute then we lay down and chat a bit - she gets me going again with BBBJ and we then go into several positions for great sex - she is very vocal at this point and i unload in the condom. She cleans me up again and we hug and kiss some more. Overall a very fun time - she was so happy when i gave her a generous tip at the end. She jumped in my arms and wrapped her legs around my belly and hung on for like 5 mins, very sweet.
positive Vanessa if a French Canadian lovely lady. Barely hint of an accent, built like a brick house. Skilled, talented, friendly. You can tell from the photos she's a big girl, buxom with floats, a small belly, but hey I have one too! rock solid gal, probably goes to gym regularly. in between she gave a casual strong massage, strong hands. ran my shower, came out and as requested she was sporting stockings. no real kissing hence my non gfe comment but she'll service you well. straddles me while rubbing junior, lets the girls escape, get to play with her lovely inflatables, rolls off panties and then scoots down for an enhanced bbbj, she lubes him up with a flavored lube, sucks fantastically, she has a massage girls talent in using her hand in the corkscrew fashion. how I didn't blow is a minor miracle. try to get her to just suck with her mouth which she obliges briefly after request but keeps coming back with corkscrew, again between that, the lube, including the occasional saliva release I wonder how I lasted. finally ask if I can taste her so I don't blow. enthusiastic yes, she lubes herself with the flavored lube, tastes great but initially mildly distracting as I like to make my own lube if you will, she okay with dato, but not okay with fingers in V nor A. she moaned well and while she mildly kept her legs guarded she occasionally let me lift them to lick her arse, which was tasty. come up for air, grab the cover and head on home, she moans again, starts to stroke her clit, moaning more, and while I thought about flipping for doggy, it was comfortable and hot, felt her mild contractions so maybe she came and then she coaxed the boys home.. great about getting up to get a washcloth and dispose of juniors work product. comes back and provides a nice casual yet firm massage as Im laying there. good chat. then ask for second shot and she again enthusiastic says absolutely, more lube, more lips, a little tongue, good bls but not quite rimming though she wet finger teased Oscar, eventually I explode magnificently but she doesn't swallow or even CIM, hand strokes me to finish. still exquisite climax. runs another shower and im off. lovely skilled lass. worked well for me given the sponataneity and while pleasant and clearly I climaxed not once but twice without issue, I would have preferred no lube, less hands and more tongue, more dfk, hell I would even have settle for lfk. but aside from that an excellent experience just not over the top. so net net if you want to come more than once and aren't requiring GFE she's a winner for sure. enjoy!
positive I had made arrangements with a different girl but she canceled. I noticed Sarah's page on TER and decided to call. I am very glad I did. She is a true gem. I had made arrangements with a different girl but she canceled. I noticed Sarah's page on TER and decided to call. I am very glad I did. Sarah was great on the phone and was able to come to my place in Boston quickly even without any advanced notice for an hour outcall. As soon as she arrived I was happy she was there. She is very friendly and easy to talk to. She is very smart and intellectual. I gave her the donation and asked if she wanted a drink. She had Scotch and I poured myself some rum. We went upstairs and we got down to business. She started by taking off her top and I was very happy with her body. She is very youthful looking. Not as slim as her photos but believe me she is sexy, hot, etc. Her ass is a masterpiece, big, very youthful. She started by giving me head. She is quite good. Then we adjusted our position and she continued sucking as I fingered her. Then we fucked in doggy until I came. Then we sat and talked for a few minutes. Went and got more drinks. Then went back upstairs, talked and then she went back to sucking. When I was feeling real good we went back to doggy. Then missionary. Then bak to doggy. I fucked her really hard, really ramming her. She seemed to love it. She got really in to it. keep pushing back as I rammed her. Then I came again. I was in heaven. I gave her a nice tip and off she went. She is really awesome. Exactly what I was looking for. I would highly recommend.
positive Saw Leonie ad on TER board. She looked hot and sexy. Made contact with agency. Easy to work with. Had to make couple of changes but they were great to work with. Got to the room and knock at door and Leomie open the door, looking hot in her silk robe and popping out with ..... She gave alight kiss and said put your clothes there and take a shower. Time with Leonie was okay, I would not repeat - see vip area for details. Leonie is sexy looking and nice. SHe and I did some lfk and nothing more than that. She asked me to dine at the y, so down I went and I spent some kissing and sucking on those great breast - which are hot. Worked my to her pussy and began a nice time of daty, NO FIV. She said her turn and started a bbbj which last only couple of minutes, nothing positive to say here, then she gave me some kiss and gave me a hand-job until I pop. She was done and said I could take another shower. We said our good-byes. A nice body, English okay but not great. Based on her service I would not repeat. Never got to the main event.
positive Called Jay to see if I can arrange a meeting with his new girl Lucy in Plymouth Meeting for the next day. He said no problem, I got to the hotel the next day on time and I text Jay and told him I was at the hotel, was told to wait a couple of Minutes. I waited a couple of min then I recieved a text with room number and was told to come straight up. I knocked on door and she open door and stayed behind door until I came in. she was very pretty with short blonde hair. She was very pretty. she gave me a long dfk as soon as I walk in. I left donation on TV stand and went to bath room to freshen up. I would repeat, VIP please read on I came out of the bathroom and we started more dfk and lfk it was great, she is a very good kisser. She help me out of my clothes and she drop to her knee's and started a BBBJ. She stayed there for about 10 min and I almost blew but I stop her in time. I told her it was her turn and I layed her on the bed and I started a long DATY session she was clean and very fresh. i could have stayed there for hours.she started another bbbj and it was so good so I let her go and she swallow everything. She laid down next to me and I put 2 fingers in her vagina and got her off. She ask me if I could go again and I told her sometimes, She did her best but it was a no to the 2 cup.I will see her again, hope she comes back soon
positive Had a chance to see Leonie, even though I generally like petite girls with small chest. But am glad I did. She is sweet and very nice and very pretty. I would recommend and would repeat She is a full figured and big girl. Not fat, but big boned and full. She answered the door flat footed and no heels so I asked her if she had any and if she'd put them on. She did and had a nice pair of black stripy heels that she put on for me. It was nice and she kept them on for the duration, which was sexy and I really appreciated. quick shower and back outside. She was wearing a robe and as I kissed her I grabbed her ass and realized just how full and large it was. She was sexy and grabbed my penis before going to her knees and starting a nice BBBJ. She has full lips and knows how to use them. We went to the bed where she kept at it until I move her onto her back where I engaged in DATY. No 69 for us because of her height. But she spread her legs wide for me and I worshiped her clit. Which is on the large side. I tried FIV but she asked me not to do so. She understands more english than she speaks. But she knew enough to get by. I got her to cum, which was fun and when I told her I loved her pussy, she said my pussy loves you! lol. On with the condom and we start in missionary. Her legs up high. We then switched to doggie and then down for lazy dog. We didn't do many positions because she was much taller and larger than me. While in lazy dog she moved her pussy which mad me cum even faster. Had a good time and would repeat. She really is attractive and a pretty girl.
positive She is very skinny. Too skinny for me. Nice girl, english limited. Won't repeat My session was limited and quick. We didn't speak much. After a shower I came out and she was undressed. That's when I saw her ribs. Oh my she is thin. Way too thin. I wasn't really attracted to her. She did do a BBBJ with me unlike some others who report CBJ but I guess it doesn't matter that much. On with the condom and missionary to doggie and lazy dog to finish. Record time and I was out. She is nice enough but I just wasn't attracted. Probably the worst experience with this agency. But they have great girls and very professional to deal with. So still my favorite agency. Will try others they bring but maybe wait for some other reviews first.
positive Saw Kelly's pics and had to give her a try. Texted and scheduled for the next day. I was asked to confirm 2 hours before our appointment, so I did. I got an immediate response that we were on. I got the address and when I got there I texted again for entry code and apartment number. The location is a very nice part of West LA. Kelly looks like her pics, so you can see that she's very attractive. She's only in town for a short while, so I would give her a try before she's gone. Let me start by saying that she has potential to be better. When I got there, she was tired and out of it. I showered, and she started with a bbbj. I asked for a hat and we started in mish, then moved around a bit until I finished. Here are a few points that she can easily improve upon. First, she wasn't fully shaved down below. It looked like it had been a few days, which I didn't like. She also didn't smell fresh. A shower could have gone a long way. My third issue was when I was ready for round 2, she hesitated and we had over 30 minutes left. I had paid for an hour, so I was a bit upset to see her give me shit about. I think it had to do with her being really tired, but I think I should I get my money's worth. Once we got started with round 2, she did everything to make it good, so I appreciated that. I lost my erection during intercourse, so she took the condom off and blew me until I CIM. She spit out and I showered once again to get on my way. She's a nice girl, has a child, and is here from Ukraine just to work. I think she books as many clients as she can per day to maximize how much she makes while she's here and I can respect that. I think a shower and clean up between appointments can go a long way for her. I may repeat before she leaves, but not sure yet.
negative Alisa, one of the most beautiful girl I met during my visit to New York. She is really one whom I have been longing to meet for long time to give life to all my sexual fantasies. I can still remember each and every minute I spent with her, had never got such a wonderful moments in my life. That day I remember I badly wanted to get some nice company and more over I was so horny. So decided to browse through the list in TER for those who are in the Manhattan area. While browsing through the providers list I found Alisa's striking pictures. At a glance itself I decided this is the girl I want to be with for today!! I called her and she was so cool and genuine while talking and I got an appointment for three hours. When I reached her place I just had to give her a call and she buzzed me in few seconds. I felt like she was already in to me and waiting for me!! That was exciting. When she opened the door she was wearing elegant tight dress with stockings and high heels. (I had told her in our previous conversion that I need a striking sexy look and I was so impressed that she listened to me). As soon as she saw me she gave a warm hug and a wonderful kiss. I handed over envelope with the donation to her and kissed her neck. She then invited me to the bedroom where she had a nice bed with everything ready including champagne and strawberries, nice touch. She wanted me to open the champagne and after that she filled the glasses perfectly. We then sat on the bed and had some nice conversation while having the champagne. Alisa is a great listener, and one can talk about anything and she will join conversation in a lovely way. After that, I kept the glasses away and started kissing her!! She was really enjoying it. While having the deep kisses and some playing with tongue we started stripping each other slowly. That was one of the sexiest moments. She then laid down with her legs spread, but was wearing her thong. I slowly kissed over the thong and then moved it a bit to give her the most pleasure she can get. I started licking from outside the slowing moved in and started eating the best peaches. She was trembling and I could feel her excitement. Then I started licking her nipples and she started grabbing my balls and dick and giving a nice massage. I slowly helped her to lay down on the bed and we did 69. Her sweet pussy on my face was amazing. She started sucking my balls and the hard dick, teasing with her tongue. She knew how to do that and utilized my skin to the best. She then put the condom and I slowly moved back to the normal position over her and started fucking her right away. As I wanted her to get the best feel I was able to hold myself hard for minutes. Then I did cum and we both were in our extreme pleasurable moments. I hugged her and then laid down together for sometime. After that we enjoyed the champagne and talked about so many different things. I really enjoyed talking to her. She is a pleasant girl to talk about any topic. I got horny again just watching her smiling and being naked. She noticed that and began to touch herself all over making me even more horny. Then she surprised me with her little pink toy vibrate. She was playing with her clitoral with it and moaning. I couldn't just watch that anymore and i joined her. I kissed her and played with her with that toy myself while putting my fingers inside her. She came on my fingers, i could feel it! She then moved to a doggy position and we tried that with a condom. While trying the doggy, I played with her butt and also while fucking i fucked her ass with that little pink toy buzzer. Her pussy was very wet and tight so I couldn't hold it long and came so hard. After another round of champagne she then gave me an amazing massage. I felt so relaxed, happy and centered. I didn't notice how the time flew so fast. I really didn't want to leave her and she also said same. But it was over 3 hours and there was no way I could stay there more as I had to head back to my country the next day. I took a nice shower with her and then left the place. Now I'm back here and will be meeting her again soon!! It was so great that day and I believe the next one will be more exciting than last time
positive Vanessa Love is my second provider with BAC. She is a good one and I had a good time. Went to see her. As always, Constance is a delight to work with. When I knocked on the door, she opened but was not happy as I was knocking very lightly. Which was a turn off for me. She thought I might have been new in this and started dictating things. So, I had to inform her that she is not my first one and I met numerous providers before her. So, I went and take a shower and came back and told her straight up that I don't like mechanical session as I was having a vibe that she was more of a quantity person. So, we started with chatting with each other so she loosen up. She started with bbbj and then I started DATY. When she was very wet and about to come, she stopped me and said she only comes once. So asked me to start. I started with mish, then we went to doggy, rcg, cg and then mish again and I came. She applied lubes several times in the meantime. I had a good time with her but things could have been better. May be it was an off day or something. But, I am not likely to repeat yet I recommend you to see her for her stunning looks.
negative I was in town for SEMA and thought I'd try out the new girl. Jesus, this girl is the one for me in Vegas. She has a killer body and she is all natural. She is busty/petite and has natural blonde hair and blue eyes. She has perfectly soft skin and a soft voice. She's a "high society" girl to the core. She gets back to you really fast. She gets emails to her phone, so she responds like she's getting a text. She has a couple friends she works with in Vegas. I don't know if I can say which one because of site rules, but they are also extremely hot and well-reviewed. PM me and I can tell you, I guess. In case it's not very obvious, I will repeat very often. She's literally perfect. I was in town for SEMA, like I said, and wanted to experience a sexy blonde. I love me some blondes, for sure. I emailed her and like I said before, holy fuck she responds fast. She is really friendly in emails. She asks for a lot of information for verification, but books really fast once you give it to her. She is easy to communicate with. She arrived at my place wearing a white dress and tasteful heels. I asked her to be sexy, but understated and she delivered. We chatted briefly and she handled the donation in the bathroom discreetly, as desired. We started with LFK, DFK and our mouths did lots of exploration on each other's bodies. I sucked that delicious, bald pussy of hers until she starting quivering with orgasms. She clinched her legs around my face with every orgasm. She was really into it and sensual with it. She returned the favor with a very, VERY enthusiastic BBBJTCIMNQNS. She hungrily swallowed my cum. It hasn't been told enough how good she is at giving blowjobs. She's one of the two best I've ever had not only in the hobby, but the two best EVER. I needed a minute to recuperate so she gave me an out of this world massage with lots of oils and body sliding. She was really into making me get up again. She gave me another out of this world blowjob and I was up and at 'em in no time! She gave me a condom, I put it on, and I started plowing that perfect, tight little body of hers. She was so fucking into it. Hot little blonde that loves sex. YES! She was quivering and cumming again. She was wrapping her legs around me, so I could feel her muscles tense up with every climax. I finished in doggy style, cumming extremely hard at the end. So fucking sexy. So fucking accommodating. Beautiful, even. Can't get enough of this little angel.
positive I was looking at reviews ahead of my last trip to Vegas and found Lina who is a relatively new provider. I contacted her via email and provided verification information. She responded quickly and we were able to set a date. We kept in contact via email and she arrived at my room on time looking very sexy in a nice sundress. We sat on the couch and got to know each other a bit before the action started. She is a very intelligent woman who looks much younger than her true age and much better than the photos on her website. Eventually we began to kiss which quickly led to DFK as we moved to the bedroom. VIPs read on. All others, i definitely recommend Lina and will visit her again when I return. As we moved to the bedroom we began to kiss passionately as I began exploring under her sundress. I asked her to step out of her panties and spread her legs and I began to play with her pussy and clit. I eventually laid her on the bed and began to DATY which she seemed to enjoy. She then suggested I lay down so that she could return the favor with a very nice BBBJ. She had brought several different types of condoms and asked me to take my choice. After suiting up we moved to FS in a number of positions and I finished while she was vigorously riding me in CG. We laid in bed and talked for a while, than she offered a massage which was fantastic. She says she is not a trained masseuse but she could have fooled me. After a great massage she got me hard again and finished me off a second time with a great stripper slide. Lina is a very sexy, intelligent and passionate woman. I will most certainly repeat on my next trip!
positive There are just some ladies who you know you are going to click. That is how it was with Gizelle. She is a bit on the feisty side and you can just tell she is a hot blooded latina who is a strong and determined woman. I find those woman are often extremely passionate lovers as they bring high energy and intensity to what they do. Easy to set up once the time matches with her schedule. Met her in the morning and we were both fresh and ready, but I do think she was more ready than me..... The woman has a great collection of lingerie and I had asked for something sexy. She was wearing a shear body suit type outfit trimmed in leopard print and it showed off her amazing breasts very nicely. One look at her and I just knew I was in for a great time. She also had on heels and that hot image is now permanently etched into my brain....She greeted me with a really nice and intense kiss and I almost dropped the Starbuck's I had brought her. Set the cups down and we engaged in some pretty hot and heavy kissing and me cupping her breasts and grabbing her ass. The woman has a great body and I planned to explore every inch of it. It was very obvious that this woman is a pleaser, as from the first moment, all she wanted to do was make sure I was enjoying my time. As I am fondling and groping her, enjoying her soft and smooth skin, she is rubbing the front of my pants and trying to removing them so she could get full access to my cock. No wasted chit chat or spending extensive time getting to know each other (although I had emailed and texted her and we were already pretty comfortable with each other) I could tell she really was going to do me right. Decided to just let the coffees go cold and got naked and we really got down to business. I caressed and stroked her body and she is extremely sensitive to the touch...I could feel goose bumps all over and I could tell she was stimulated by my hands and fingers. But I moved down to those great all natural breasts and enjoyed the cleavage. Nice, sensitive nipples and I spent time licking and sucking them. But it was time to move further downward. I spent some nice time with daty....she seemed to enjoy my efforts but didn't get her to an O. But she was definitely intent on getting to my cock and I finally relented and just let her have her way with my manhood. She has excellent oral skills and she took very good care of the boys as well. Lots of ball licking and sucking and she really knows how to intensify the sensation with her tongue. As I had 60 minutes I slowed her down as we were moving too close to me getting my first pop....when I was rock hard, I asked her to ride me....wow...what can I say. She climbed aboard and rode me CG, squatting CG, reverse CG. The woman just kept me up and she was bucking and moving as my cock was enjoying her tightness and wetness. I am pretty sure this lasted at least 20 minutes and we were both drenched in sweat. She looked at me and complimented me on my staying power...lol. (definitely scored points with this old geezer when she told me I was like a much younger man). Glad I was able to keep it up and let her enjoy a nice ride. She said she needed a quick cool down and we cuddled a bit and chatted about life. But before long she initiated more contact and we moved to missionary and then to doggie before she climbed back on and rode me again CG. I had told her I had a bad knee...Gizelle was totally up to make it good and said we didn't need to do anything that might hurt my knee, so no positions where my knee could give way. I had really enjoyed her oral skills and decided I wanted her to finish me that way. Removed the glove and she took me deep over and over again, cupping my balls. She then gave me a hand job while sucking my balls into her mouth. She licking all around my balls and her tongue felt amazing. Back to bj and hj and I blew a nice load. She got up to get a warm cloth to clean me up (nice touch and I do find many of the ladies do NOT take care of the clean up with a warm cloth rather they use wipes or just a cold washcloth). We chatted some more, spent more time groping and fondling and I left with a nice smile on my face. I think she was disappointed I didn't get a second pop, but she had me rock hard and riding for such a long time and it was amazing fondling those breasts while she rocked and thrusted downward on my cock. I sure got my money's worth of stimulation. She is not a clock watcher and I was the one who keep checking the time. Gizelle is a total sweetheart and a lady who really seemed like she was there for MY pleasure. I will definitely repeat with this lady. She is not a immature 20 something...rather she is an experienced woman who really knows how to please a man. Great breasts that I think I could spend an entire hour enjoying...but definitely you want to enjoy the rest of her skills. I got the impression she would have done whatever it took to get me to the promised land....and there was no quit with this lady... A real pro who knows what she is doing and totally delivers. Thanks, Gizelle, you were great!!!
positive Great new find at the hobbyshop in vegas. Beautiful girl, great body, awesome sex. Arrived at a new location incall on west side. Nice area and very safe. Pulled in for a nooner and got the green light to the apartment. Greeted at the door by a very pretty Korean girl in a nice 2 piece thong with big tits and a great dfk. Into the bedroom and more dfk, off come the clothes more dfk, little bbj preview when taking off the shorts. Into the shower, great shower experience. Mutual soapy touching with FIV, bbj, rim (awesome rim), more dfk and out to dry. She helps dry and into the bedroom again. More dfk, then lay face down. She licked me head to toe (literally) with more rim then flip to bbj, balls, played with my ass but no penetration, spin to 69 then ready for sex. Mish was awesome and pussy was great, great actress and lots of sensual fucking with dfk. Flip to doggy and tapped that for a while she looked great like this. Then lazy doggy for a while. I then stand up and off comes the cover for her bbjtcws. AWESOME. Mouthwash, shower and a kiss goodbye. An awesome time and cant wait to repeat.
positive Been here before, Standard 2 call system. Shot Cinderella a text to set up appt with Piper. Entered the no doorman building, and knocked. Was greeted by Cinderella apt and she intros me to Piper. She was all smiles and leads me to bedroom. She is well worth it. Proceeded straight to the bedroom for the introductions and fun to begin. Piper has a very nice body, she is very sexy and willing to please. She gives me a nice strip tease and some hot DFK rolling around the bed. We then proceed to the bathroom to shower where I receive a nice preview of what's to come. She engulfs my cock after she cleans me up while in the shower. I didn't want to blow, so we headed back to the bedroom and dry up. Piper like many of the other girls at this spot knows how to please. We get back to the room and she continues to blow me, and gets me ready for the main course. She rides me while I admire her nice round tits. I couldn't hold it any longer and finish it doggy, blowing inside the bag. She cleans me and gets me ready for round 2. But due to my schedule I had to clean up and get ready for a meeting. Piper is definitely worth a revisit.
positive New to the Asian Sensation crew, she is a real catch. Very pretty and knows her stuff. I still love Vicky, but Piper is hot, hot hot. Non VIP's at this pirce point hard to beat. VIP's read on. Immediately upon being introduced to Piper, and after the donation was done, she was all over me. DFK, tongue, BBBJ and off with the clothes. Into the shower, soaped up, teased, rimming, turned around, BBBJ I am 8 inches and on the thick side. She took the head and used her hands, went deeper and about 5 inches down stopped, I gently but firmly put my hands around her head, holding her t that point and gently rocked my rock in place against the back of her throat, another inch in, she relaxed. Again, very gently I held her in placed asking if she was OK, she gave me the thumbs up. Again I gently slipped another inch down, and backed up to the top, we repeated, and this time at the 7 inch mark, she grabbed my ass, lurched me foreward and took my cock whole in her mouth. She also has this snake thing she does with her tongue taht drove me nuts. As she continued I couldn't take it , grabbed her for more DT.Then she licked the shaft, sucked my balls and continued worked the head as I blew a huge load in her mouth. Round one over on a TKO. We relaxed, she gavfe me a nice massage, and then flipped me over. More BBBJ, BLS,and rimming. Up I went again. She gsve me a one minute hand job/ BBBJ together that really got me hard. She straddled me no condom, and rubbed my shaft on her pussy lips. Then on went the condom, into CG, and ACG. I flipped her into doggy, she has a nice squeeze, and felt her beautiful tits and nipples while looking at that ass from behind. After a few minutes she clamped down. I was about to cum when I ripped the condom off, rubbed my lubed dick russian in her tits and shot a load, that she leaned into and took in her mouth while sucking the head gently for about 2 minutes. I was spent. Shower kiss, hit the street. Loved it.. I'll be back
positive Visiting from out of town and set up with the agency was very easy. I got the go ahead to set up an appointment and booked Pure, a gorgeous young Thai girl with a slender, smooth body and an absolutely amazing ass. The session was great and I have repeated. Visiting San Diego on the weekend and wanted to see how the scene on the West Coast compared to Texas. As someone with a particular taste for Asian girls I went browsing to see what the offering was. I came across The Library and browsed some of the girls. Shouldn't have been surprised that a few of the traveling ladies I have seen in Texas also provided in San Diego under different names. If that was the case I was definitely going to give them my business. Doesn't matter where the location is the girls always provided awesome service and I knew what I would get with them. So visiting from out of town on business but having some familiar company would be great in my book. Of the current girls available I noticed one particular girl, Pure, who I had seen before and I remember two of her best features, a beautiful face and an absolutely stunning ass. I used the contact form on the website to submit my information but did not get a reply. I saw from a previous review here on TER that email is their preferred method of communication so I shot them an e-mail and indeed got a reply back. I set up an appointment and was good to go. Once I got into town and a couple hours before my appointment I emailed again to confirm that I was there and would be coming in. The agency replied with the address and a phone number to text for instant communication and instructions on what to do when I got to the complex. Followed the instructions and when I got to the door the gorgeous petite Thai girl I remembered smiled and gave me a hug. She recognized me and guided me to the room. We made some small talk about how one another had been since I saw her. I booked a two hour session and was glad I did because after flying in on an early flight and not being able to check into the place I had booked I hadn't had a chance to relax. So I spent the first hour being pampered by a beautiful Thai girl. She was very thorough but at the same time sensual with the shower. She gave me a very relaxing massage and it was really nice and relaxing to just fondle and grope her body. Once I was relaxed and the mood was set I went to exploring further with my hands and mouth. She was very receptive and if it was the illusion of passion or not she was very responsive while I was eating her out. A shudder later she pushed me away and thanked me and told me to lie down so she could return the favor. Lots of tongue and eye contact, before she took me into her mouth and gave a very wet and very good BBBJ. I placed my hand on the back of her head but be warned she seemed a little resistant to any forceful "guidance." I requested the condom and she applied it and climbed on. I love the way this girl rides and grinds. You can definitely feel her working her muscles when you're inside, and her ass is just amazing to hold onto and a sight to behold with the mirrors in the room. We switched to doggy and as I remember it's just a visual spectacle. She's slim already but her hips and those cheeks just make her look even more petite. After pounding her in doggy she asked me to lay on top and just grind into her. She was getting really worked up and this point and wanted to come together and I worked my way to orgasm and slumped myself over her. I spent the rest of my time just touching her and sucking her breasts and fondling her ass. She's incredibly accommodating, super sweet, and totally GFE. Wasn't looking for a PSE and always prefer the girlfriend experience and Pure delivers in spades. I'll visit her again before I fly back home. Definitely.
positive After missing the opportunity to see Adrianna after reading her first review and learning that she left town, I saw she advertised that she returned and was accepting new appointments. I emailed her and scheduled a session to see her at her apartment in a western suburb. Non-VIP's, she has tremendous potential but priced a little high for the services offered. What drew me originally to Adrianna was her pictures. After arriving at her place I was satisfied with what I saw. She looks like a cute young college freshman. While she is short and tiny, I could tell she works out and is very toned. I got in her place and she invited me in sand asked me to have a seat on her sofa. I could tell that she was a little nervous and new at doing this. I immediately left the donation on the table and asked her if I could use her bathroom. I went to take a piss and when I returned she was sitting on the sofa with a smile on her face. I sat down next to her and we chatted for a few minutes. She let me know she is new to the hobby and so far is having a lot of fun. I complimented her toned body and began rubbing her leg. Within seconds she jumped on me and stuck her tongue down my throat. A little rushed but that was okay with me. I felt like a teenager making out with her I the couch while taking off her tight t-shirt and eventually her bra to expose her little tits. I started sucking on her tits and she stuck her hand down my pants and started feeling my hard cock. I took off my pants she asked if I wanted s BJ. I said please and she reached under the sofa pillow for a rubber. I asked if we could try without it and she said that everything is covered. I went along with it and let her put it on my cock and suck away. Her BJ skills were mediocre and I even tried giving her some instruction. She didn't use much tongue and used her lips to cover her teeth and not my shaft. Her eye contact was very good and I admired her beautiful big hazel eyes. I was ready to taste her cunt and asked if we could go to the bedroom. She held my hand and directed me to the bedroom. I crawled on the bed and she jumped on top of me and stuck her tongue down my throat. We made out on the bed and I unbuttoned her jeans and removed them to reveal a thong. When's he stood up I admired her round firm ass. I took off her thong and told her to relax laying down on the bed. I spread her legs open and inserted my tongue inside her lshaved little pussy. She moaned while I ate her out but felt like some of the noises were a bit fake. She tasted great and I even managed to tongue her asshole too. I was ready to fuck and asked if she is on birth control. She said yes but everything is covered. I pulled a couple Benjamin's out if my pocket and told her I just had a clean STD test and asked for bareback. The answer was still no. My condom from my BJ was still on my dick and I put my hard cock inside her pussy. She felt amazing. As i pumped away with her on her back she kind of just layed there and watched me. I asked if she wanted to get on top and she said sure. She got on top and sat on my dick and l loved feeling her nice round ass with my hands. Her legs were very toned too and I loved having her bounce up and down on me. I asked her for doggy and she got in all four. I admired her great little body and spread her butt cheeks apart to find her peach. Once inside I knew I wasn't going to last more than 4-5 minutes at most. I paced myself and admired my rock hard cock bobbing in and out if her pussy lips. During this she kept looking back at me with a big smile and making noises. Such a turn that I had to look away or I was going to bust my load. I pumped away and admired her anus. At one point I think it even winked at me. Maybe next time I will plug that. My balls were at their limits and I told her I was ready to cum. I asked her to lay completely flat on her stomach and I continued fucking her and grinding against her ass. Within a few seconds, I had a massive explosion and filled up the jacket with hot cum. I climbed off of Adrianna and thanked her for the fun. Adrianna is a hot young provider who is a piece of clay that has all the potential to become a top provider. She has the looks, makes the effort and wants to please but right now needs to be a sponge and learn what it takes to be high price service provider. She is new and hopefully experience will help.
positive Saw Chelsea on the web site, was intrigued. 2 call system and was able to set up an appt within the hour. Everything is super easy. Got to the set up, nice lay out and private. Fun time, VIPs read on... Got in and was greeted by mamasan and Chelsea came out and took me by the had and walked me back to our room. She is banging, with a sexy gate and confidence that I find arousing. We did some hugging and lfk and took care of donation. She told me to get comfortable and then scrammed for a few minutes and eventually came back and took us to the shower. She washed me down dn got me nice and hard. My knees buckled as she storied all of the soap off and then gave me a nice lick and suck, got some ass play too. We got me dried off and back to the room. She had me lay down and gave me a decent nude massage and used her tits on my ass. One thing led to another and I was getting a great rim job. This went on for a good while, I was in heaven. Flipped over for bbbj and all sorts of rimming. Finished me off with a hj/bbbj. She got a towel and cleaned me off. Gave me a decent massage and it was sexy time again. We ended up diking, I ate both of her holes, she ate mine. 69 was awesome. Banged her lazy dog and couldn't hold back. Pulled out and shot all over her nice back. Cleaned up, relaxed with some water then hit the shower and was out of there within 50 minutes. Great time.
positive I drove to her apartment in Koreatown and parked on the street. I got there early and waited outside, because I didn't want to be too early. She texted me a few minutes before our appointment time and I said that I was there. She buzzed me in the building. I walked in. Her room is close to the entrance and away from the other units, so she has a good view of who is coming and who else might be nearby. She opens the door, and I walk inside. She wore a sexy pink bikini. Very nice! Sora is beautiful. I had a good time with her. I think she shares an apartment with another girl. After I went into her room, I heard sounds from someone else. She took off her pink bikini and I took off my clothes. We both used mouthwash and then went inside the shower. Her place is dark but nice. She washed my penis and it felt really good. She also washed my front and back. I also washed her back. We both toweled off and went on her bed. She gave me a nice blowjob without a condom. It felt great. She also licked my balls and it tickled. That also felt really really good. She lied down and I sucked her beautiful nipples and then licked her beautifully trimmed pussy for a long time. That was a lot of fun. She didn't let me put my finger inside her, because she said it hurt. Then we had sex missionary-style. I came pretty fast, because she was so hot. We got up and she put the condom and flushed it down the toilet. Afterwards we showered again. She gave me a massage and we talked. She put her head on my arm as we lay in bed. She is Korean, and I don't think she speaks English well. Fortunately, I'm Korean so we were able to better communicate. She is a very sweet girl and I would like to visit her again soon.
positive Mary's ad had intrigued me and I reached out to her with my reference's. I was very impressed with her prompt communication skills. She shares her phone once you are verified and the date day is near. On the date day, I followed her instructions per email and found this great place but she was running late. She had communicated to me that she was stuck in traffic but it wasn't an issue at all as it was a beautiful day outside so I didn't mind at all. Soon the time arrived and she came down to the hotel lobby to meet me so that we could go back to the room. I was very happy and surprised to see beautiful young girl and wasn't disappointed at all. I followed her to the room and was very impressed with the room. I left the donation on the table and we started to acquaint ourself. I just felt she is new to the hobby as she stripped down to her bra and underwear and in the meantime I went to take a shower. As soon I came out I sat next to her on the bed and tried to initiate the conversation. Me being shy guy and I seeked for the permission to kiss her and we had a nice LFK which lead to little bit of DFK. Then she told me about me certain restrictions which I was kind of bumped on but I figured out that she was new to the hobby and probably getting used to it. We made out for a while and soon her bra was out and guys she has a beautiful pair of breast and I worshipped them. To which she got pretty excited about it and durnig this we were switching back between LFK and DFK which was nice. Soon I started rubbing her sweet kitty which she really enjoyed and they lead to FIV and me eating her out. I enjoyed seeing her being turned on and that lead to me wearing a hat which lead to great missionary with DFK and breast worship. I began with missionary in a slow pace and then went on with little more pace, I enjoyed seeing her enjoy the moment as well. Then we had a really good conversation and she is a smart girl. I left as I knew one of her friend needed the place in next few minutes. I will repeat again and hopefully she will feel more comfortable as we have already met and probably enjoy our time with more intimate activities.
positive I saw Bella's ad on Cl and a few other places. I decided to call her...she was available and about an hour later I was at her place. 2 call system to let her know I was there. Bella has huge boobs...she looks like one of those mom's you see at school that you just want to bang. Once inside she leads me to her room upstairs. I take a quick shower so I am refreshed. I come up and she gets undressed and her boobs are great. She tells me to lay down and give me a nice massage. During the massage she rubs my ass and the boys. On the flip side she starts to rub megs and then give me a HJ. I tell her to stop after a few minutes and ask her if I can return the favor. She says yes so I rub her legs and start to kiss her a little bit...suck some nipple and work my way down to her pussy. Her pussy is so clean...I start to eat her out and you can tell she is enjoying it...she reaches her first O...I then pull away for a minute and then start up again...she then comes again. I do this one more time and now she is so wet and horny. She says it my turn. I get back on my back and she starts to suck my cock...I tell her I want to fuck her and she agrees. She climbs on top of me and starts to ride me...we do this for a while and then we get into mesh. We are now kissing each other while we are doing it and then I explode. We both get up and clean up. I thought I was getting a massage, but it turned into full service. not sure if I was special to her or if YMMV.
negative I was in contact with London of FWB and had already been pre approved from seeing other providers through them. So scheduling was quick and easy. Bobbi showed at my door dressed perfectly the way I asked her to. I requested the outfit of the gym attire. A sports bra and booty shorts. She is getting ready for a competition and looks absolutely amazing! I became hard instantly at the sight of her rare beauty. She greeted me right away with VIPs, read on.... A dfk as we held each other for a great bonding experience. She also brought lingerie. I had her model both looks for me. I really admire her dedication to her competition training and nutrition. And her body is to die for with a beautifully chiseled face and piercing blue eyes. Once she began modeling the lingerie, my cock was instantly hard. She was dancing slowly for me showing off her beautiful ASSetts. She then moved down the a very deep throat bbbj. I almost shot my first load in her mouth. She brings toys and we played with them for a while. I can tell she is really into what she does. And I was a very happy man. We then went mish, rcg, omg what a site to see! And I have found a woman's va j j to be super tight with all of that muscle. She rocked me silly! I then had her flip over to do doggy where I busted very hard. She is full of dirty talk and moans that alone get me going. She got me a warm towel and cleaned me up. Then excused herself to freshen up. We had some awesome conversation. I have found this woman to be on point in every aspect I mentioned. She is very informative. I have been Into bodybuilding myself so e related a lot and I even learned some great things from her. She and I bonded and she shared some greats things with me while caressing me. She the. Moved her hand down to my balls and got up to do a bbbj. I was hard again and wanted into that tight little ass of hers. I am very much an ass man who cannot resist tight bodies. It did not take me long to blow as we both did at the same time. I will definitely be seeing more of Bobbi often and if you have not seen her yet, I strongly advise you hop on it. She is very well worth it. She is new to the industry. I was a little skeptical seeing her with one ten ten review. Yet I asked her Asst, London about her and London had great things to say, plus the few reviews here. She's worth the time and money gents....
positive I've seen this beautiful cup of tea a few times. She is completely fetish friendly as easy to set-up. Prefers text. Quick response. She does play out of a hotel, but is willing to do out-calls and even public situations (VIP Read-on) for the right client. Treat her right and she will do the same. Sierra is a dirty lil freak. So, I have a huge fetish with public facials. I sent her a text and we exchanged ideas. We came up with meeting over at Easton Mall. We met in the bathrooms outside of Brio and Banana Republic. They are individual uni-sex stalls. She sent a text telling me which stall to enter. I knocked and she opened the door for me. Once inside I laid down the donation. She dropped to the tile floor and got to work like a true freak. I pumped my cock and dumped a hot load all over her pretty face. She posed and let is drip down her face to chest and belly. Even let me take a few pictures. I let her clean me up then she even opened the door for me with a face full of cum. Wishing me well. Oh! And yes there was a line waiting for the bathroom. The guy waiting just gave me a smirk as it hit him what just happened. I asked if she did groups. She said yes, so next time I am going to arrange a bukkake session for her.
positive Saw lucy was local to philly area and she appeared appealing based on her previous review. Setup was easy with Jay. She wasn't exactly as expected but not a bad time. I arrived at the hotel and was given the room info. I got to the room and was met by a tall, 20 yr old with short bleached blonde hair. She had on a outfit I requested Looks were ok teeth were an issue which is kind of a big deal for me. In addition her body was soft and not real athletic, on the thin side but just no real firmness to her physique. Anyhow she seemed nice enough so its time to get to it. Laid down the donation and started with LFKing/dfking and mutual groping. She went down for a nice BBBJ and I reciprocated with daty and she was wet and enthusiastic. Moved to mish and she asked me which cover I wanted, don't care just slip one on. the whole process if not done smoothly starts to take its toll on mr happy. Got the cover on and pounded her in mish. Popped quickly in the cover, she was tight and engaging. I had to clean up after myself and discard the cover, kind of a bummer. The girl has a good attitude(young), she seemed into the session but had rookie mistakes with putting on the cover and cleaning up. No 2nd pop for me because I just wasn't that turned on. We had some nice small talk she tried to inspire me for pop #2 but not in the cards. Again nice girl and im sure she will improve the little things with more time but physically just wasn't really my thing.
positive Mia Picked up right away and was easy to talk with. Her pictures are real. Nice girl with a nice shape. I would repeat Mia answered and set up was a standard 2 call with no problems. She is 1/2 white and 1/2 black, but you would never guess by looking at her. She is not a spinner, but not too chunky either. I found her body to be a nice hour glass shape which I loved. Walked into her at her room, dropped the donation, hit the bathroom, came out, disrobed and laid on the bed. She asked if using oil was ok. Her message was very average, but the conversation was above average from my point of view. 30 minutes into a message I wanted my hands on her body which she was happy to do. She let me put some oil on her nice rear end and I enjoyed that for a while. 45 minutes into it I was asked to flip, she applied a cover to my unit and shortly after I exploded into the cover. I fully expected her to have and work at it for awhile (and warned it might be this way) since covered BJ's don't really do it for me, but to my surprise I was done much faster than thought. She told me her full service rate is $300 and I don't know what is and is not included in her version of FS. I might try it sometime, but think there are a few better girls available for that price point. It might try it out sometime, time will tell. I would see here again.
positive called for the appt with no problem. met her at a nice hotel, she is the girl in the pics. she is a thick girl not fat but very thick pretty face and great breasts. good time and a no rush session she opened the door and gave me a nice hug and lfk to start. i made my way for a quick shower then came out to her already in bed she made her way to me and went for some nice dfk took my towel off and went right down to her knees for a decent bbbj. then to the bed where she continued on all fours. she has real nice breasts and nice curves on all fours. i told her i wanted to cim and she told me she had no problem with that nice hand action and eye contact along with me playing with those huge breasts i popped early. she went to clean up came back cuddled up to me with her hands roaming all over my body. some more dfk and her stroking me till i was hard again. more bbbj then on went the cover. she climbed on top rode me well as we switched to doggie where she had a huge O then to mish where she said she wanted to cum again and did, that got me turned on and i finished in lazy doggie. she never rushed me out. had some good conversation then i left. can't wait to see more from this agency
positive Got a chance to stop with my fav agency. They always have top notch Euro girls. The new Leonie is in a class of her own. I had some spare time before departing on a flight, scheduled appt hours before. Arrived at BWI location, nice hotel. Knocked and opened a curvy Euro barbie. She was in a nice sexy outfit, everything tight, & right!! Who needs a Kardashian, when you got a Slavaki...named Leonie. This girl is very busty, thick, and firm. She asked me to shower. I came back fresh to a sexy beauty waiting on the bed, music playing. No time for small talk, straight to the point, DFK. More energetic touching & grabbing her which thighs. She got my attention quick BBBJ, and quickly to 69. She is a trooper, good suction & rhythm. I had her jump on top first, CG. She can more her junk. Lasted a while just enjoying her ride. Blasted #1 in her. Small breather & right back at her. This time Doggy. She liked this position most. I hit long and hard. She even thru back thrusts making it clap real nice. I like this girl, closest experience to a BBW pornstar. But she isn't heavy at all, just bubbly. Automatic repeat
negative Bobbi Banx is, in one word, spectacular. Her physique is athletic and very feminine, and it is really an awesome sight to behold. She looks just like her pictures -- no bait and switch here -- in fact, I'd even say she looks better in person. If you enjoy a fun, energetic, confident, and athletic woman, then I highly encourage you to pay Bobbi Banx a visit. Bobbi greeted me at the door of her upscale incall location. She was wearing comfortable clothes initially - tight shorts and a t-shirt that accentuated her exquisite physique. She asked me what I would like her to change into. I requested bra, panties, and high heels. She changed in no time, and we moved into the bedroom. Seeing those incredible thighs and calves in a set of heels was amazing. I started by kissing her body all over as she stood, and I ran my fingers across the contours of her body. I removed her bra and she touched her lips to mine. This woman can kiss. I removed her panties and heels and she laid on the bed. I enjoyed massaging her entire body for a bit, and she reciprocated with a great massage. Then we got down to business. I started with DATY to get her wet and then we went three rounds: missionary, then doggie, then missionary. I am normally a "missionary man," but for me doggie was the best because I could see her entire body. I loved watching her athletic physique move rhythmically as I thrust into her and then seeing her body quiver when she climaxed. In between we would simply kiss, chat, and enjoy running our hands gently across run another. At all times Bobbi made me feel comfortable and at ease - she really has a great way about herself. She has my highest recommendation, and I will definitely pay her a visit again.
positive Used this service before. Go to the location and text for the info and got to the door. Nice looking girl behind the door. Took a shower and the fun began. She is very nice and I will repeat. Hope she stays awhile. Took a shower and the fun began. She started with some DFK as i removed the little clothes she had on. She gave me a preview of the great BBBJ to come. I took control and laid her down on the bed to inspect and lick her breasts and then moved to some DATY. She did a lot of up and down movement to get the most out of it. She then flipped around to work on me with a slow BBBJ. On went the cover and we went to CG, RCG, MISH with legs in the air and I finished in dog. Cleaned up with another shower and chatted a little. She is very nice and I will repeat. Hope she stays awhile.
positive I saw Angelina Nicole's ad and I was intrigued. I love women with athletic / fitness bodies, and after reading her amazing reviews, I had to give her a call. Screening was very painless, and a few hours later, I was knocking on Angelina's door in a nice midtown hotel. When it opened, I entered the room to find a smoking hot, hard-bodied, sex machine, ready for fun. Will definitely repeat! Angelina greeted me with a nice DFK and lots of groping. Before I could even put down the donation, she had her tounge down my throat and commented how much she loves kissing. We broke apart, and I left the dontation on the night stand and excused myself for a quick shower. I undressed in front of her, and she commented how much she wanted my cock when I got out of the bathroom. When I re-entered the room, she had the music set and lights dimmed, and was ready for action. We started with a heavy make out session, with lots of teasting. I had her pressed up against the wall as I explored her body with my tounge. Before long, she threw me on the bed, spit on my cock, and started an amazing deep-throad, PSE blow job. Lots of spit, gagging, and awesomeness. I flipped her over into mish, put on the cover, and we started fucking. She flipped me over into cow girl, and that was an AMAZING sight. We finished round one in doggy, and I exploded into the condom. Round two began about 5 minutes later with more mish. Then she pushed me off and commented how much she needed my dick in her mouth and gave me a great CBJ. We then moved into doggy again, and the site of that rock hard body backing up into my cock made me explode once more. Overall, I had such a blast with her, and on top of the really great sex, she was super fun to talk to. Will definitively repeat!
positive Sarah was an absolute treat! Easy to schedule with and arrived on time! Anytime I am in Boston and looking I know where to go! As mentioned Sarah was amazing! She was punctual, communicated well and was amazing! A quick LE check at the beginning and then we were off to the races! We relaxed on the couch for a bit to get to know each other, she mentioned she can orgasm from nipples only and I accepted the challenge! We moved to the bedroom, ripped off some clothes and got to work on those nipples! It was true! The neighbors knew it and so did I. No FS on this round, we had plenty of fun with CBJ and some wandering fingers! She is a great one, treat her well!
positive Read the basic reviews one here, was visiting for a couple days and wanted to have some fun. Should have skipped the massage parlor I went to first night and just went here twice. It was a case where she made it seem like she wanted me there. Location is decent, discrete entrance, she was shy when opening the door but was worth visiting So I showed up a couple minutes late they forgot to text me the address and I had NO idea where I was going until about 10 minutes before. Orange opened the door and went straight for a DFK and led me to the room. She continued to undress me and herself. I was a full mast now, and she proceeded to go into a BBJ and ball play. 99% of the time I don't want anyone touching my balls, but she managed to not make me uncomfortable and it was actually pleasant. She then led me to the shower, and we made out and bathed together probably 5 to 8 minutes. She was very enthusiastic about washing my dick, balls, and asshole. Meanwhile continuing to go forward with the kissing the entire time. After drying me off and leading me back into the room she told me to lie down on my stomach and she rubbed very lightly my back and ass, At this point I have to admit I was slightly bored, but then she started a rimmjob. (a first for me) I was slightly surprised and uncertain as she started but soon got comfortable. After a few minutes I chose to pull her under me and proceeded to see if I could get her warmed up, so I started playing with her pussy while kissing her neck breasts etc I never saw her put lube in, and she did make a pretty big deal of cleaning her pussy in front of me in the shower almost as much as she cleaned my goods. After a few minutes I chose to DATY, and she was very appreciative, and responsive even willing to give direction (a fucking rarity in my experience) when I hit the right spots and speed. After a few more minutes and an orgasm (or faked very well) she pulled me up and then proceeded to go for a BBJ again. We then moved to 69, where she was very enthusiastic towards sucking me off, and getting her pussy ate. Next we moved to CG, with some slow patient fucking, her pussy was quite wet and tight making for a fantastic fuck. She then asked me to get on top so I choose to go for laying down doggy style. Sadly I popped way to soon and was a bit upset at myself, but after resting a moment or two I choose to just keep going and she didn't tell me to stop so I proceeded to fuck her for about 15 minutes in this position, when she started tightening up and pushing hard against me I knew she was enjoying it. She had a second (faked maybe) orgasm, and made me change the condom (good move on her part I wish I had just asked her to do it when I popped but if I pull out I loose wood, if I keep going I can keep going for a while) She then wanted some Mish, so I agreed, and proceeded to go for a while longer she seemed to be really enjoying it (I know could be faking but if so I'm really ok with it because you know) and grabbed my ass trying to get me to drive further in so I attempted to oblige and went as hard and deep as I possibly can. She wound up pushing me out and couldn't seem to take anymore. I still hadn't had a second pop and she offered a BBJCIM but then looked at the clock (first time I was reminded it was a service) and realized there wasn't any time left, and offered a shower or hot towel. I choose the shower because I would have showered the moment I got to my hotel room anyway. She told me how to "say my name in Chinese". And led me back to the room and dressed me, gave a final deep kiss and sent me on my way. I did see Elsa while walking out and she was quite good looking also. I have to be completely honest, this was the best experience I've had with a provider a true GFE, and didn't feel rushed or unwanted. Usually my experience is you nut you go, but she didn't make me feel that way. No I didn't get the second nut off but I had a great time, and didn't leave feeling disappointed at all. If I'm ever in NYC again and they are still open I'm going back.
negative Hey, so this is my first review - I was looking for Melissa but it appears she was out of town so i found Alisa who shares the space with her. Good Job by me, she was fantastic and provided the exact session that I requested. VIP read on So as stated above, I booked a 1hr session with her. I entered and she greeted me with a smile and a kiss. I went to use the bathroom so as to not waste any time (wasnt an issue as we chatted after the fact). She started by dropping to her knees and pulling out my already erect cock, and I tell you, she made love to my cock. Kissing it, licking it, spitting on it as i requested (i was looking for more of a PSE session) which she def provided. I went down on her a bit which she clearly enjoyed, we then switched to a 69 which caused me to Pop after a few moments. She was that good, I believe she swallowed and took it all in, but to be honest i was in heaven so didnt notice. After a few minutes of chatting and her going to get me some fruit (strawberry's, apples etc). As i enjoyed the delicacies she started going down on me again. As i am a gentleman i returned the favor but this time i let her know i was ready for the main event. After a few minutes she hopped on and rode me in cowgirl on the couch. I let me finger wander and put it in her ass which caused some audible moans (aka she loved it). I flipped her over and went to down on her doggystle as she was taking dirty and cursing. I busted out what russian i knew and we were both having a great time. I told her i was close again and she dropped to her knees and she let me bust all over her mouth, lips etc. Was def a hot scene. It was a great time and i will certianly be back for more fun:)
positive Been checking out this agency for a while and finally decided to give it a go. Man was I glad I did !! Vanessa was everything I could have asked for, sexy and down to earth. Did everything you'd want to feel comfortable. When I got to the room she was there in sexy lingerie. Same girl in the pics. Total smoke show. We started with some casual conversation. I had come straight from work so I asked to take a shower and she was glad I did. She and I'm sure the rest of the BAC girls are greatful for those with good hygiene and manners. When I got out of the shower she laid me down for a nice seau massage. That really got my blood boiling. She rubbed her bare chest up and down my back I swear I could gone off right there haha. After that she turned me over for a bbbj that was out of this world. From the second she started I knew I didn't have a chance of making past that so I just let her keep going till I popped. She was a bit surprised that I didn't stop her but I dare any of you to even try lol. After that we laid down and discussed our backgrounds for a bit. All while she caressed my chest with her soft fingers. She really made me forget I was paying for the experience. Finally she went back down for more bbbj. I let her get me back up (didn't take much with her skills). I then took her from behind. She let me play a little rough which is what I really like. Some hair pulling and whispering in her ear as I pounded harder with each thrust. She seems to thoroughly enjoy herself. Switched back and forth from mish to bbbj for a while before I fucked her tits for the final pop. We both laughed at the energy I had to put in to get that second pop out (I'm not as young I used to be haha). I showered again and was on my way. Never did I feel rushed or uncomfortable. It was really the best experience I've ever had. Though the price is more than I'm used to ($350 for the hour) I am definitely going to dial back on my AMP visits and use BAC more. You get what you pay for guys !!! Strongly suggest this agency and especially Vanessa Love to all of you. I'll submit more as I use them more. Good luck guys !!
positive Beautiful young Russian girl with wonderful natural breasts for a very good massage, what more do you want? Greeted with a warm smile and a short dress, let to the massage area where we shed our inhibitions. Shower available, nice warm towels, started with a great back massage and some light teasing. She stratled me and worked my back teasing and playing with me as she workred on my sore spots. I was so comfortable and her hands were wonderful. She asked me to turn over and then the top comes off to let loose those beautiful natural breasts. Shy is a bit shy at first but gets to work on your front and works her way done. As she warms up so does the sesssion. She does allow mutual but just on the breasts. She has a great finish, her rhythm is good and she pulls you close, with you almost between her d's at the finish. I would repeat in a heartbeat. Treat her well she is very new to this and we want her around! ;)
positive Called and asked for an appoint, got it with no problems or checks. Typical 2 call system. Opened the door just as I got there, fair warning she hides right behind the door so be very gentle if you need to open it wider to get in. She welcomes you with a smile, foreplay, and everything in between. Shoes off and to the bedroom. In the bedroom I drop off the gift with a little extra on her dresser and turn around to take off my clothes. I turn around and she taking off all her clothes, not that she had much on :) We start making out and fondling each other followed by her sliding down and taking me in her mouth, and yes bareback. After a little bit we head over for a shower where she cleans both of us and rims me a little, was fun but was mostly business for this point (note, like every other asian she doesn't like it if you mess up her hair). Headed back to the bedroom for a quick body on body massage, bit quick on the face up side but then she started sucking again so who's going to complain. After a bit she swings her ass around to my face and 69 it is. This is when I figured out that either I'm super hot, she's super horny, or she makes sure to be "ready" for you, I'm gonna say all three :) She likes it when you play with the slit but don't put anything in. Now at some point she put a condom on me, i think it was towards the end of the 69 but I honestly can't say for certain when, as I was enjoying myself. After a while felt longer but was probably about 5 mins she moves up and pops me in the kitty. She goes for a little in reverse cowgirl then flips around and again for a little, not really my cup of tea and I'm guessing she noticed as she slides off and asks me if I want to switch. She guides me in and holds on (I'm assuming to make sure I don't just start ramming it in), after a minute or two of shallow thrusts she takes her hands away and gives me one of the better views I've seen. She grabs the back of here knees and pull them way up while I swear she spreads like she gonna do the splits, at this point you gotta take a moment and enjoy the view and grab some of those tits, which I did. Afterwards, I ask if she's ok and she says yes, well I took that as an ok to speed up and within a little bit of time I was jack hammering that went on for awhile before I was done but not before she cummed twice. I can't tell you how good it feels when she starts cumming and drops all the posing and pretense. Just try to imagine first her feet start curling, then she can't spread her legs anymore as she squeezes your side like she riding some stallion. All the cooing stops and she's just hissing and grunting, eyes closed. Now when this girl cums, you really feel it; she squeezes you tight and her pussy gives these long strokes inside that are just to die for. We head over to the shower after everything to clean up again, she chides me for starting to clean myself up, telling me "I do" hahahaha. She walks me up front and we make out some more and I'm off on my way with a skip in my step.
positive I've used the Hush Girls agency in the past, so it was easy to book an appointment to see Antonella. She was at an easy-to-reach hotel in the Boston suburbs. Called at the appointment time, received her room number, and went up. She answered the door wearing a tight knee-length dress with her tits threatening to pop out. She looked absolutely amazing. Non-VIP's, she's worth every penny. VIP's read on I came in, dropped the donation on the table and we chatted for a bit. Smart girl, easy conversation before she mentioned that I was wearing too many clothes. I undressed while she did the same. Once she was standing before me naked I thought I had died and gone to heaven. LFK led to DFK which quickly led to her providing a passionate BBBJ for pop number one in her mouth. She got a towel to help me clean up and then gave me a nice massage. She tried a HJ, but I needed a little more rest before I could pop again. I gave her a massage which ended with DATY. She seemed a little reluctant to DATY initially, but she quickly got very wet and loud. After a quick cleanup, I had to fuck her tits where I quickly popped again. A quick shower and I was on my way... Our session had gone over by a few minutes, but she didn't seem to mind. I can't wait to see her again.
positive I saw Vanessa's photos and immediately felt I should book an apt with her. The set up was easy, being member, Constance is super nice and awesome. We spoke and she told me it was going to be a great time. Booked the apt and off I went to a local LI hotel upscale chain. I texted when I arrived and was given the room number. Off I went and when I knocked on the door a killer knockout answered the door. I walked in and we immediately began LFK to DFK. Before we went any further, I excused myself to shower and freshen up for her. When I returned in a towel, Vanessa was lying on the bed waiting for me. We got comfortable on the bed and she began an amazing BBBJ until I couldn't take it anymore. She covered me up and rode me cowgirl, from there we went to Mish and I wanted to take her stockings off but she told me to bend her over the bed and take her from behind. I could not decline. I bent her over and went in, holy crap it was amazing. I grabbed her breasts and lifted her up against me while I continued behind her. She moaned, we kissed and I ended up finishing my first load, pushing her down onto the bed. She cleaned me up and we hung out naked on the bed, talking about cool phone apps and her trip to NY. She began to start on me again, great BBBJ to cover and more cowgirl, reverse, and finally in mish. Vanessa is in great shape, wonderful breast and skinny waist. I played with her breasts and we kissed LFK, DFK until I unloaded the second one in the cover. She cleaned me up and we hung out naked on the bed till time was up. Vanessa is truly a person that is here to please and make sure you have a good time. Will repeat.
positive Stacey responded to a text I sent her the week before and I schedule some time with her. 3 call system to get to room and she answers in her panties. I got comfortable and we got to work. I would repeat. Stacey started me off with a nice and long BBBJ. She knows what she is doing and really gets into it. Next she slid on a lid and laid on her back for missionary. I had to go slow at first and couldn't enter her all the way. She would pull me inside of her deeper as we went on and once I was all the way in she was enjoying herself as much as I was. Stacey wrapped one leg around me and would grind with me as I thrust inside her. This was really hot. I wanted to get a handful of her ass so I asked for K9. I again started slow and worked my up, and Stacey responded very well to this. She would push backwards on me and really get me deep inside her. Once I got her juices going I was going to pound town on her with two handfuls of ass. It was great to see her head down grabbing the sheets. I couldn't hold it anymore and blew in the bag. Wow! was all I could say afterwards. Now here comes the downside... Stacey had quite the odor that wasn't fresh at all. I would love to see her again, but I don't know if I could deal with that smell again.
positive I tried to see Lyn twice before I was successful. She screened me through P411 the first time I reached out to her, so it was very easy when I finally got to see her. I got to her incall and a very pretty young woman in a dress greeted me. She had a plate of snacks ready, so we sat down and talked while we ate. I asked to freshen up, and she led me to the shower. When I got out, she had lost the dress and was waiting on the bed in her bra and panties. I got on the bed, and she attacked me. We kissed while she rubbed my cock. She switched to stroking me. She straddled me and started grinding on me in her panties. By the time she started blowing me, I thought I was ready to cum. She found a way to prevent that and kept me on the edge. she stopped and asked if my dick wanted some pussy. I was having trouble concentrating, but i got it together enough to say yes. She covered me before starting cg. She rode me hard. We switched to mish, where it was my turn to go pretty hard. This is where we finished. She got a washcloth and cleaned me up. The clean up was pretty damn good, too. I was still aroused, and she started another bbbj. We followed that with more mish with lots of kissing. We talked some more, as she slowly stroked me. She started fingering herself, while she continued the stroking. It was awesome. I went daty. She was really responsive. She asked me to move into 69. When I couldn't take it anymore, we got another hat and she started rcg, where she really went to town. I don't know how I was able to hold on to switch to k9. We closed with a round of cg followed by a round of mish. Lyn was fantastic. She seemed to enjoy the meeting as much as me, although I don't think that's possible.
positive I was hesitant about the photo but when I read the previous reviews. I decided that I had to try and she is well worth it alli greeted me at the door wearing a two piece black outfit. very sexy. we hugged, caressed, and DFK right away. she escorted me to the bedroom guiding me in with my hands on those breasts. we undressed eachother while DFK the whole way. I got a soft BBBJ here. those breasts look so real but felt like implants. we did the mouthwash ritual. the shower ritual was very nice and thorough especially in the anal area. alli washed the feet too which was different. I got an even nicer BBBJ in the shower. she dried me off and gave another better BBBJ here. off to bed we go. on my stomach she did the tongue and breast massage. got a rimming too. she did the sucking of the toes which was interesting. I flipped over. more tongue and breast massage. very very nice BBBJ here. from this point a lot of DFK. she automatically started with 69. nice. cover was put on and she started CG. switched to missionary which was crazy. the doggie was great . switched back to missionary which got me exhausted. I finally was ready to explode and she did CIM. another shower. got dressed. and I left very satisfied.
negative Total SCAM. Fake pictures. She took the money and then hide inside the second room(the hotel suite has another room inside).When I asked her to come out, she threaten to call police and 911. This girl will rob you. Stay away from her! She also use other names such as Alex, Summer, etc I set up the appointment by phone. After I got the hotel, she text me the room number. I knock on the door, she open it. So I enter the room and put down the donation. She took the donation and said she would be ready in minutes then she went into another room inside the room and she just hide there. When I ask her to come out, she began to threaten me and said she was calling the police and 911. And she said I was on the camera and she would give all the text message to police. So I had to leave ASAP.
positive Saw her ad on escortcafe.com and she was running a special. Still pricey but I went for it and so glad I did. It was my birthday and wanted to treat myself to a top notch provider. This girl is gorgeous and her body is amazing. She is pricey but well worth the price as she is one great provider. I contacted Kellie via text and she got back to me fairly fast. She wanted references which I provided and then there was silence for nearly one hour. I actually contacted another provider and as soon as I got off the phone Kellie responded. I felt bad that I had to cancel the other appointment but Kellie was my first choice. Wow, what a experience, worth every penny!! Kellie is drop dead gorgeous and has a fantastic body! We started with a quick DFK and then drank a couple of glasses of wine. Once we moved to the bedroom I couldn't contain myself. She had on a sexy outfit and I bragged her ass and kissed it, then I grabbed her tits and caressed her. She wanted to freshen up so I let her shower and she came back wrapped in a towel. We DFK And I sucked her boobs. She was ready to go down on me but I said, me first as I had to lick her pussy!! That lasted 20 minutes and she orgasmed a few times. She then gave me a covered by while I licked her pussy and Ana's. I blew faster than I wanted but this girl will do that to you. We caressed, kissed and talked for a bit and then it was time to part ways. I look toward to seeing her again soon and I highly recommend to all who can afford! Amazing experience.
positive Saw Lola's ad and contacted Kelly. after a few email exchanges, we were all good to go. after taking care of screening process, she booked an appointment with Lola. Non-VIPS, I would highly repeat. VIPS, read on... after I arrived at the location, I called Kelly. she then buzzed me in. after Lola opened the door, I was so happy that I decided to see her. after the door closed, she gave me a nice DFK. I immediately new that our session is going to be great! after taking care of the formalities, we chatted for a few minutes. when I could not take it any more, I started to give DFKs to her. she started the intense DFK as well. we then started to undress each other. after we both got undressed, she was still giving heavy DFKs. I then wanted to go on her freshly clean pussy. I did dady for about a few minutes. she then returned the favor to me by giving me a great blow job. when I was so hard, I requested to put the cover on and make love to her. I started mish. it was going great! making love in mish position at the same time, heavy DFKs. boy I felt like I was in haven. I didn't even know when I came because after coming, I was still making love for about a few minutes. suddenly, I realized that I have come. she was so wet. it felt like I was making love to a buttery pussy. :) after that, I cleaned myself up. I went and washed my private part. she did the same as well. after chatting for about 10 minutes, we started our second session. she started to give me the blow job again. I was hard in no time. I then returned the favor. as soon as she started to get wet, I put the cover on and wend mish again. after a minute, we switched to doggy. I think she came about 3-4 times. I was having so much fun. after about 20-25 minutes, I loaded in the bag. over all, she is a really nice and friendly girl. she is a non-smoker which was even better for me. I don't like the smell of the smoke. that's why neither do I smoke nor drink. anyway, go see her while she is in the business. you will not regret.
positive i saw her posting and made my appointment before any reviews were posted...she is a sweet south american girl with a great attitude that provides a great service...vip read on her english is great so there is no communication gap...my only negative note is that she wears braces...i'm surprised that no other reviewer has pointed this out...her body is special...the photos do not lie...curvy, busty and very fit...tasty pussy and is willing and able to please...her boobs appeared to large for her frame and you would expect a level of sag but i must confess to my surprise that gravity hasnt fucked with her real and spectacular boobs...with the braces, i refrained from dfk but she is extremely passionate...her bald pussy is clean and she reacts in kind to sensual stimulation...she also likes to be on top...she mounted me following a grade A bbbj....i was late so i lost 1/2 of my time to traffic but she wasn't rushing me at all...she showed her athleticism and sexual appetite with the cg ride that she gave me....after completion she was up for another round but sadly time and my libido prevented me from any attempt at further pleasure....she is a fantastic girl and i will definitely see her again
positive I had been curious of the K-girl ads I had seen and after some research, I decided to take the plunge with Miranda. Got verification completed (quick and easy if you follow directions) and wound up at a very nice place with a gorgeous demure woman in a two piece suit and heels. Took off my shoes and got a quick hug and a teaser kiss before we made our way to the bedroom. The door closed and she turned around with a smoldering look in her eyes and I knew I made the right choice. Verification is through a booker and normal for the Kgirls but the reply was fast to text and calls if you have the required info. Directions to the incall where clear and easy to get to and park. After the door closed, Miranda moved in for a dfk battle with my tounge as we made out like horny teenagers. I felt like I was in a tongue duel and it was winner take all. She spun me around in front of a well positioned mirror (one of many) and proceeded to yank down my pants and show me her other oral tounge talents. I was in a daze as she proceeded with a great preview bbbj before helping me undress and getting us to the shower. Great action all around with lots of eye contact and i kept looking down and then at the mirror for a voyeuristic view. very nice. The mutual mouthwash and hand wash let to a great soap up in the shower. A first for me and a truly great experience. A wet and soapy massage by a naked hardbody in the shower, a nice p2p massage while pressed against the shower wall that had me about to lose it along with more bbbj. My head was spinning as she was like the energizer sex bunny, moving me around and doing all sorts of wonderful things to me. We rinsed off and headed back to the bedroom. More teenage like make out and touching before more bbbj, DATY and then some 69 and mutual masturbation for good measure. It was intense and she was wrapped around me as she got off, moaning and saying all kinds on nasty things. Good lord! Covered up and ran through a litany of positions, some I had only seen on the internet before collapsing in an exhausted, satisfied heap on the bed. The mirrors by the bed once again providing some memorable views. We just relaxed for a while as I basked in the afterglow and my brain rebooted. She was ready to go again but I was shot so we took another shower and after move dfk and bbbj I somehow managed to get my pants back on and finally stumble out the door to the real world with a lightness to my step and a new outlook on the day. Miranda had the most erotic energy of any woman I have ever experienced and an attitude to match. If you like hotties with awesome skills and a "I am here to please you" attitude, don't delay.
negative I found Taylor by doing a little research on TER. Really liked her website (don't worry about the blurred photos boys, she is drop dead gorgeous!) and was very impressed by her reviews. I made contact a week before my trip to Vegas through email and she replied within a few short hours, and she vetted my references quickly. On the day of, we arranged to meet in an upscale lounge in my hotel. I got there a little early to have a drink, and exactly on time, I saw Taylor walk in, wearing a tight fitting short gray dress, showing every gorgeous curve. An absolutely beautiful woman! The lounge wasn't too busy, but I'm certain every set of male eyes were following her every move. We enjoyed a pre-fun drink and some small talk, she is very easy to talk to. Then it was time to head upstairs. For non-vips, I will definetely repeat on my return to Vegas. Once upstairs to my suite, I opened a bottle of champagne to celebrate. We sat in the suites' living room area, laughing and talking about back east, where we are both from. I felt very at ease with her, and all I could think of was that in just a few short moments I would be with this beauty in my bed. She excused herself to the bathroom and I got undressed. The doors to the bathroom are translucent, and with the bright lights of the bathroom, I could see her perfect silhouette...removing her dress...brushing her hair. Very erotic....add the sound of her heels on the tile floor....super hot. When she slid the door open, I was greeted by an absolute vision. I'm pretty sure I uttered an "oh my good god" under my breath and my first thought was she is so hot, I hope I don't pop too damned fast! She moved to the bed and we proceeded to start with some sensual kissing and caressing. Her breasts are gorgeous, soft and responsive to touch. She knew she was really turning me on as I was stiffening to her slightest touch. Taylor then began to give me one of the best bbbj that I have ever had. I swear it was like she was reading my mind to what I liked. The perfect combination of lips and hands, attention to the boys, and steading increasing pace and pressure. I love finishing that way, but I knew I wanted to experience more of Taylor. I asked her to lay back, and started to lick her pussy. It is definitely one of my favorite things. I could sense her getting wetter by the minute, and I was thrilled when she had a nice little "o". We moved to some nice cowgirl, and the sight of her, sliding up and down on my cock, all the while maintain eye contact was quickly pushing me to the edge. I whispered to her, I wanted to finish in her lips. She removed the cover and began hungrily devouring my cock. The sensation of her long soft blonde hair against my thigh as she kissed, licked and sucked my cock was heaven on earth. She quickly pushed me over the edge, and took every drop in her mouth without changing pace. It was an amazing, toe curling experience. I cant wait for my next trip to Vegas as she will definitely be on my list to see again. Treat her right boys, and she will rock your world.
positive was in orlando on business wanted a nice massage saw this gorgeous woman called and set a time ,she opened door what a beauty and sweetheart went to her incall outside orlando she greeted me with open arms and big kiss on cheek,she is gorgeous with a great body got naked after laying donation down she started on my back with great touch massage constant teasing reaching underneath to play with the boys by the time i turned i was rock hard she continued with a great massage she started a bbbj that was out of this planet and i was seeing stars she let me lick that pristine pussy of hers and then finished me off with a great soft hand job till i blew like a volcano i will be back special to orlando for her
positive Have used the service many times, always great girls and service. Decided on Honey since she comes and goes and gets high marks. Easy location, knocked on the door, she let me in. Def recommend, lots of fun, young and a little shy. Saw Honey based on her reviews. Very cute girl. She just got a nose ring, some may be turned off, doesn't bother me. Chatted a bit to get comfortable. I kind of like a girl to kind of just attack me and get things started, but she's younger, seemed a bit hesitant and wanting to chat a bit before, get comfortable. Took a shower, met her on the bed, she stripped and leaned back. Started LFK, kissing her breasts, very nice and youthful. She is very ticklish so had to limit my exploring and worked my way down to DATY, where she is very sensitive. Had to go real light and take it very easy. Eventually moved up, laid back and she excelled at a BBBJ where I CIM way too quickly. Ran to bathroom to spit, then came back to the bed. She didn't initiate more cuddling so asked for a massage which she was pretty good at. Went back down on her and got her juices flowing, but time ran out. Would have preferred a little more aggressiveness from her but her looks and youth made up for that. I think repeating builds more comfort and initiative so I will probably see her again.
positive Really needed some head ache relived so I started looking and came across Janae. Gave her a call and setup an appointment. VIP read on.... Got to the hotel Janae was staying at gave her a text letting her know I had arrived she texted me the room number quickly. She opened the door in a very sexy outfit which didn't stay on to long. I had told her I only wanted a BJ so we got to business. I sat on the couch and she got on her knees and started bobbing her head up on down my cock. Very sloppy BJ and almost no hands used, She also payed good attention to my balls. Once I couldnt hold my load anymore I asked her what she wanted her response was "I want you to blow in my mouth Im hungry". Couldn't hold back after that so I shoved my cock all the way down her throat and shot a huge load load right down her throat. She didn't even hesitate after she had made sure she drained my balls she took my cock other mouth. Was only visiting Atlanta for short time can't wait till she is back again!
positive Reached out to Leya based upon previous reviews. Three text and I was at her hotel. The low point for me was walking passed the prying eyes of the lady at the front desk. Got to the room and knocked on the door. Was opened by an attractive woman with a wonderful smile. Placed the donation on the table and the fun began. Like a previous reviewer stated, this is a sweet lady. Don't fuck this up. Will repeat every chance I get. Leya is so sweet. Once in the door to the mid level hotel I place the donation on the table and then began to get comfortable. I could tell that Leya was a little nervous having never met me before but we had a nice conversation about nothing special to ease the tension. Once I had shed my clothes, I laid across the bed and Leya began to stoke me to get me going. Her sweet smelling prize was only inches from my face and she allowed me to have a taste. I went to work like a baby on a nipple and before I knew it, she attempted to drown me in her freely flowing honey. The more I licked the more the juices flowed. The bed was soaked, my beard was soaked and my chest was drenched. She must have cum at least three times. All the while, she is giving me a decent BBBJ. We soon switch to K-9 and then I had a little more DATY. Following my second round of DATY we went back to K-9 and I finished with a powerful eruption. Working on setting up another appointment right now. I think that I have finally found a regular friend.
positive It was late on a weekend afternoon and I needed a little relief. Looking for something different than the regular providers and came across Sammi's ad and review. Another reviewer indicated that Sammi was CMT and that sold the deal for me. I called the number and she was available to meet an hour later. Typical two call..... general directions and than exact location and room number. No problems at all, in fact, she even came down to let me in. Her photo's are close to the actual girl, but not exact. Still, super sexy, a great attitude, and well worth the visit. Non-VIP's, I will repeat, VIP's..... read on. So I get into Sammi's room and we did a quick LE check. Not a big deal and she handled it with class. We talked about options, prices, and the menu, basically two options: a) a massage and a pop or b) two pops, no massage. Her sexy attitude got the best of me and I went for two pops. I got stripped down and much like the other review, Sammi had me sit on the end of the bed and she did a super sexy nude dance. If I was in a strip club, I'd ask for a few more songs. Combination of facing away grinding her ass in me and facing me thrusting those nice breasts in my face and encouraging me to play with them with my mouth and hands. Very nice! My little buddy was reacting and she was all over it with her hands. She got up on the edge of the bed and laid on her stomach and had me stand at the foot of the bed while she applied the cover and started sucking. Good mouth action, good sounds, and very pleasurable. While she was sucking I was able to reach over her back and play with her ass. Her hips were grinding on the mattress and she seemed to be enjoying it. I knew I had two shots, but didn't want to pop there so I pulled her off. She made a disappointed comment, but asked which way first, I asked her favorite position and she responded by turning around for K9. She kept me standing and mounting her on the bed. This felt good and I had good leverage for the thrust, but I'm tall and if felt like I was screwing while on my tip-toes, so I pushed her forward and got onto the bed with her. Sammi isn't a spinner, but I'm an ass-man and she has a nice butt. Great view of every stroke and she was enjoying it. Moans that got louder and thrusting back with more force. I have to say, that 'reverse thrust' is one of my favorite things and she knows how to do it. Soon the urge came and I buried my unit one more time and filled the cover. Both of us worn out.... for the moment. I got up and flushed the cover and cleaned up a bit than we returned to the bed for round two. She cuddled up next to me and we talked about random things for a few minutes and than she mentioned that I was starting to come to life again. Sure enough, my little buddy was starting to rise. She used her hand until it was semi-erect, got a cover on and used her mouth to get me fully standing at attention. She was more excited for round two than I was and not because she was in a rush. I flipped her on her back and took her mish. It was a combination of leaning down low while using my mouth on her breasts and neck and leaning back to see me going in and out. Once again, her breathing got heavy and her hips were moving with me. I leaned in again and she wrapped her legs around my back and dictated our frantic pace and the pressure. Very sexy. Eventually she was overcome and had a big O. Personally, I was having fun and staying hard, but also knew I wasn't going to pop again. I had already filled one cover, she had cum once or twice, and I was done. Again, she was disappointed in her comment, but also appreciative. Once again I cleaned up and got dressed. Sammi stayed nude and kept grabbing my crotch and commenting that 'he still seems like he is ready to go'. I've never had a provider push for another romp in the hay, but as I said, I had popped and satisfied. I would repeat. Sammi isn't a spinner, but she has a sexy body and knows how to use it. More importantly, she has a great attitude and likes to get busy. I would definitely repeat.
positive Just went for a short first visit and was very impressed! Super friendly and great time! Will repeat. Wanted a quick session and she agreed to a blow job for $60 for 15 minutes. She was amazing!!! No condom and deep throat. Took it all the way down and sucked the shit out of it! She even licked and sucked my balls which is rare but was great!!! I definitely need to go back and experience more. She did pull out her awesome huge breasts but I came so quick from her awesome blow job I could barely play or suck them but she is open to all of that. So much fun!!! Will repeat.
positive Pure is a fresh, curvy, natural-bodied Thai girl who loves sex. Just go see her already! I saw the photos, and although they are real, the actual girl is prettier and sexier. She said she's a student who flew in for a few weeks to make some extra money, and just by the time I had, I believe her. She greeted me at the door with a big kiss and a hug. Her face is really pretty, with a totally natural body, small breasts and a nice round butt. We kissed some more in the room, then off to the showers. After a nice wash, I lay on my stomach and she got me going by rubbing those cute real tits all over. After turning over, she gave me a great bbj. She took her time, and I enjoyed it as long as I could, but finally told her it was my turn, and she was happy to switch. After just a few minutes, she was really starting to make some noise. I was really surprised and at first thought she was faking, but the juices flowed and she had a huge orgasm. And she wasn't done. We tried 69, and she came again. She put on a condom and we switched to cg and then mish, and she came a third time. It was too much, her tight little pussy was squeezing my cock until I couldn't hold back. We spent the rest of the time before the second shower talking. I laughed when she told me her roommate was always mad at her for screaming during sex, and I can believe it. She said she was one of those girls who could come many times during a day. She finished by giving me a really nice massage and more kisses. It was just an incredible GFE.
positive This girl is a home run. Used this agency before so setup was easy. Had plenty of choices, but went with one that was convenient to my schedule. Actually scheduled with another named provider -- but afterwards, I looked back at the website and realized that the provider I had was Julia, not the one I had actually supposedly scheduled with. The switcheroo turned out to be a blessing because, as the other reviewers experienced, Julia is an ideal Asian provider. Made my way over to familiar incall, parked, given entry code and room number. VIPS, read on. Non-VIPs, would highly recommend and may likely repeat. Go see her. Youre in for a good time. You wont be disappointed. The door opened and there she stood in skimpy top and bottom. What I would describe as your typical attractive Korean girl (the pictures for her on the website are very accurate). Immediate DFK (this girl likes to DFK -- occurred all throughout the session). Walked to bedroom, put envelope on dresser (which she did count and take outside, but was polite about it). Came back and more DFK. Undressing and off to bathroom for the mouthwash/shower ritual. Not only did this girl give preview BBBJ, but when she turned me around, she also gave me rim job in the shower. First time thats happened. Dry off and back to bed. Did the usual tongue bath massage and led to more thorough rim job. After a time, turned over and she did the BBBJ and BLS. She repositioned herself on top of me for some P2P, then gradually moved up so I could worship her breasts (enhanced, but nicely done so that not so obvious), and then she presented me with her lovely pussy for some DATY, which she seemed to enjoy although no huge O. She moved back down for more BBBJ and then applied the cover. She got on top of me CG -- we took it very slow and passionate -- if anything because I wanted to make it last since I figured this was going to be a one and done situation. I then flipped her over missionary and it felt so good (knees by the ears kind of position) that I had to stop a couple of times so that I wouldnt cum too fast. It finally built up and she seemed to O (or good acting) so I let it go myself. She cleaned me up and then gave me real massage. We engaged in some limited chit chat (like most K girls, her English is limited, but I found her understanding to be a little better than normal). There was no second round, but at this stage in my life, Im no longer expecting it. We showered again, she did the geisha girl assistance with dressing me, walked me to the door and away I went.
positive First time with the provider. Sadly the person i wanted to meet with wasn't available, but orange was perfect substitution. She was sweet and very giving. Really eager to accommodate my needs. Definitely will repeat. Read on for more. After the shower together we went back into the room. She started off by messaging me and certain areas and then just started to suck my dick. That did catch me by surprise, but personally i enjoyed it. After a while I started to play with her pussy which apparently really turned her on. To the point she just grabbed my head and put it between her legs. After that she was ready. We did quite a few positions ranging from mish to doggy. Orange has a decent body, but she definitely has the ability to compensate based on treatment. She never rushed me and even let me finish where ever i wanted she made that extremely clear that she wanted my cum all over her.
positive 3 call service. Parking is easy. Follow directions and be discreet. She looks like her pictures. Beautiful face. Her body is a bit soft, but she's got nice curves with B-C cup man mades. I understand why she's a local favorite. Highly recommended. She opens the door, and I like what I see. Beautiful face, nice curves, soft B-C cup man mades. MFK at the door, we move onto the bedroom. She gets my pants and underwear around my ankles, and I get BBBJ with a good view in the mirrors. 5" deep, slurpy, good suction, BLS, suction on the sides. I last a few minutes before we agree on 2 pops. BBBJTCIM. Then it's her turn. I have her lay down to start DATY. She's responsive. I get her nice and wet before I cover up for Mish. MFK as I slowly enter her. She's using her kegals, and it feels like heaven. MFK, good eye contact, we're picking up pace. We flip to ACG, and she's giving me a good show. Her tits as swaying back and forth as I watch the point of entry. She grinds against me and I feel the deepest parts of her box, keeping me on the edge. I finish with a BBBJTCIM since her skills are so good. Her English is limited. We use the translator app and have a nice chat. She's funny and playful.
positive All of my faves were booked so I contacted a familiar booker to see if they had any recommendations. They recommended Vivian so I decided to give her a try. The ad says Midwilshire but I was directed to a familiar building in WLA. Typical two call system. She opened the door wearing some very nice lingerie that was just the right amount of revealing. She is pretty new here so her English isn't very good but she is learning and can communicate on a basic level. She led me back to her room. We did the normal blue toast and got undressed for the shower. Pretty typical shower routine. She has a very playful personality and likes to tickle and laugh. Pretty decent preview BBBJ in the shower. Nothing exceptional but pretty good. Out of the shower, dried off, and she led me to bed. She laid me down and gave me a nice cat bath. She has decent BBBJ skills and this got me pretty going. I told her I was ready so on went the hat and she mounted me for some CG. She has a very nice body and I enjoyed watching her ride me. After a while, I flipped her over for missionary. She seemed to enjoy it and told me she came. I followed soon after that. We spent the rest of the time talking and laying in bed until I showered and left. Very nice girl.
positive My first time with this organization and it was pretty easy set-up. They were friendly and accommodating. Upon entrance, the atmosphere as a whole was more casual than other places I've seen. After meeting Piper and getting acquainted with her, she even offered a beer. Long story short, it was one of the best times I've ever had. She was very pretty with an amazing body and she was very skilled. Upon entering, Piper started off with some DFK right after the Mama-san (I assume) let me in. We walked to the room where we undressed with much more DFK. She teased me a lot before finally taking off my underwear, which hasn't really happened before and it was pretty damn hot. We then went to the bathroom, which was pretty typical shower routine. I do have to say that she had an absolutely amazing body. She has very nice, large natural breasts that were just stellar. Quite easily the best I've felt on a provider. Even if she gave crappy service, her looks alone would be worth it. Luckily, she's also fantastic. We started at the edge of the bed with more DFK. I grabbed her and turned her over for some DATY, which was great. She initially started moaning quite loudly, and it was pretty obvious that it wasn't genuine, but as time wore on, she eventually started to actually get really into it (or got significantly better at faking it haha). During this period, she would do some dirty talk. Her English isn't the best, but it's obvious that she has learned some of the important phrases. Even though it isn't perfect, it's still pretty hot, actually. After a little bit, I laid down on my back and we 69'd for a bit. It's been said before, but she does a great BBBJ. The way her tongue coiled felt amazing. The cover went on and she went into CG. While she was pretty good in general and had nice hip motions, the way her fantastic breasts looked while on top was just amazing. After a little bit, we went into missionary. After some more going, I came inside her and she accompanied it with more DFK. After she took the cover off and cleaned up a bit, she went down to suck it a bit more while it was still sensitive and it was the best ending I've had yet. I have to say, Piper is every bit worth seeing. She's leaving soon, and I definitely plan to see her at least one more time before she leaves!
positive Wow, been following Devin's posts for awhile and waiting for reviews. Two popped up and what the hell I made an appointment and you should too! But for God's sake treat her nice! Kind of freaked out due to lower end motel and two people showed up as I did but Devin was really cool about it. We were out in the sticks so didn't think anything was going on but a little paranoid. Screw it, I was there and up I went. Glad I did! Lady in the pictures and I was so happy to see she was real we just hugged and talked for a bit. We decided to get a bit more comfortable and out came her fine boobs! Licking, sucking and fondeling to my hearts desire. Slipped off bottoms and had a nice visit. Nice, clean and shaved. She moaned and spread her legs wider encouraging me to tongue F her. Devin grabbed my hair smashed herself against me mouth as she shuddered to a huge O. You can really tell she had a good time. She returned the favor with equal passion taking me whole in her mouth and licking and sucking my balls. She told me to get on all fours and she sucked on my balls and the head of my cock while rubbing my anus. Good night. On with the hat and a I pounded away in mish until l exploded into the cover. Which didn't take long based on the events before! Devin is an incredibly nice Lady and deserves to be treated as such. See her if you have a chance!
positive Had seen Noa on the web, thought like most Asian providers could not be true. Read the reviews , decided to give her a try. Hope I am able to have a second date. Fun girl, highly recommend. Petite spinner , Asian, young, sexy . What more would you imagine in a sex kitten? No is all that and more. Standard call system, prefers text. Got the room number , door ajar. Walk in to find a small hot Asian beauty in a bathrobe only. Quick intro and handled the donation. Got nude and soon as possible and jumped on the bed. We kissed and frolicked like two teenagers. Threw her down for a very sweet DATY, very nice and she was very receptive. Then she took over and returned the favor. Wow. On of the top 3 BBBJ I have ever had. Stopped her before I blew a load. She asked male or female? I do like the female but that is so much to get into place, so we went traditional. Cow Girl to Mish with dreams of K9. Unfortunately she was so damn tight and hot that I barely held off for mish. It was a toe curling back arching cun splattering orgasm. We had time for another but I knew it wouldn't happen so we chatted a bit. Lovely lady to talk with about life. She then climbed on my back and rubbed my shoulders. The feeling of her hot tight pussy on my lower back almost made me try for two , but I got up and we took a shower. She cleaned me ever so nicely and dried me off. Dressed and out the door, looking forward to going back for more.
positive after trolling the reviews I contacted Heather through the website and booked her simple set up. We met up the next day and I was wow'd by her body. perky tits, long athletic legs, beautiful smile. She didn't waste any time undressing. We started kissing a little and moved to the chair by the bed. I had to taste her, so I placed her on her back and she wrapped those long legs around my head and smothered my face with her big wet pussy. She went crazy and grinded her ass into my tongue. We switched to 69 and she alternated between sucking and blowing on my dick, a feeling I just can't describe. I needed to stick my cock into her and feel her pussy, so she jumped on my cock and fucked me with so much energy. Within minutes, I exploded into the condom and she took the condom off and licked the cum from my dick until it was damn near dry. She even gave me a light back massage before leaving. heather was very lovely - I can see myself booking her again.
positive I met Leonie through a friend of mine who said in his words "I'm using the best agency in the northeast " Its getting a kind of cold here in Edison NJ and i needed something or i should say somebody hot. And i wasn't disappointed she looked as hot as on the pictures . She showed up promptly at my place . Nice firm butt if you look at it you just want it to fuck it . Not to mention her boobs like a round mountains ... The next thing i remember she has my dick in her mouth...lol I can trully compare her to my old vacuum cleaner the only difference is her mouth was wet....i came so hard and so much i could swear i could've fill up a cookie jar .....she loves to strip i told her i want an extra hour because i wanted her to strip for me She is good doing it. I enjoyed every second ....slowly every little piece of her clothes came of ...and i was ready for round two ...i kissed her everywhere i totally forgot im paying for this ...i felt her body getting in to it ..her pussy is sweet and juicy super clean....i licked her out of her mind ...when she came her body just shaked for like a minute ....i never seen anything like this ...I'm just thinking about it i feel like to beat my meat ....she said she likes doggy and i was in her soaked hot pussy in no time....she felt so good ...loved to see her enjoying herself ...playing with her clit ....i fucked her like i never gonna fuck again ...she came with me at the same time. That was just the best fuck i had in a very long time i want to do it again ...just to make sure i wasnt dreaming I definitely owe my friend to hooked me up with her I recomend her she gonna feel like a real girlfriend and i would do it all over again :)
positive This is my first review so bear with me. This was my first time so getting screened was a little tough but I got through. Standard routine (from what Ive heard). The apartment is upscale and in a nice area of Costa Mesa. She actually looks way better than in her pictures. She is on time. Service was excellent and much enjoyed. I learned she would be traveling around after this so I count myself super lucky I was able to catch her while she was in OC. If anyone sees her pop up in any other cities I would def jump at the chance to spend some time with her. For being my first experience, she definitely set the bar really high. So when the door opens, I see this AMAZING petite Korean girl standing behind the door. She is wearing a really classy lace bra and thong and really high heels. Her body is slender with curves in all the right places. I am definitely into slim, petite women so I was beyond happy. She hugs me and gives me a small kiss and we walk through the dimly lit apartment and she seats me at the edge of the bed. I like that she took a few minutes to talk to me first and get to know me. She was probably feeling me out as well. Regardless, her attitude was warm, sweet and welcoming. We LFK for a bit as we touched each other lightly and she stood me up and we undressed each other. She took me by the hand and walked me to the shower. I'll admit to being pretty nervous so I just stood there and watched as she washed me thoroughly. Its amazing to see a beautiful woman tending to your needs. Afterwards, she dried me off and a blue toast and she led me to the bedroom. I sat at the bed and she straddled my thigh as we DFK and explored each others bodies. I was already really hard as we were making out and touching and she was grinding against my thigh. She seems to thoroughly enjoy it as i lightly play and squeeze her nipples. Her breasts are amazing and soft. They seem real but I feel like their just really well done as they defy gravity a little haha. After a few minutes she lay me down on the bed and began to kiss and lick my body starting from my neck down to my ankles and up to my thighs. She teased me incredibly as she cat licked my balls and made her way up to my big guy. I'm already about to loose it as shes kneeling down between my legs. She wraps her small hands around me and keeps her mouth over the tip and moans while slightly breathing over me. This drives me insane and she finally goes for it. Her lips are wrapped around me and its an amazing BBBJ. She takes her time and builds up speed as her hands are caressing my thighs and chest. I watch the entire time from my pov and the mirror next to the bed. After 5-10 minutes I tell her to turn around for 69 as I need to concentrate on something else or I would def blow. I cat lick her thighs and make it my way to her kitty. Shes shaved clean and smooth and her kitty is small and tight. Shes moaning as shes going down on me and I debate if I wanna blow in her mouth and see if I have time for round 2. I decide that I want her on top of me. She seems hesitant in stopping the BJ as she is really into it but I cant wait anymore. She applies the hat with her mouth flawlessly and if I hadnt been watching I would have sworn she was riding me BB. I pull her in for some DFK while shes slowly grinding against me. The noises she makes as we go faster are almost enough to end me right there. Since I know I'm getting close and I have no chance of lasting too much longer, I lie her down on her back for mish as I want to see and feel everything. i spread her legs wide, reach for her hands and come close for a little more DFK AND LFK, which she really loved. I think she liked that I was gentle the whole time. I told her I was getting close and she told me she wanted me to come as she tightened herself up. I get on my knees still in mish and throw her legs over my shoulders and let myself go deep and hard. The whole time I was too nervous to be too aggressive but I just couldnt hold back. She starts moaning louder and louder and as she claws the bed sheets and arches her back in ecstasy I explode inside of her. She cleans me up and since theres still about 10 minutes left she cuddles up next to me. This is really appreciated as I'm used to being rushed out at massage places. She notices me rubbing my neck (I had kinked it the day before) and she tells me to turn over and she gets on top of me still naked and gives me a great neck, head and arm massage. We talk about her impending travel plans and how shes really excited for it and her experience in OC. After we both go in the shower one more time for clean up. She dries me off, gets me dressed and walks me out. She gives me one last hug and kiss and tells me to visit again before she leaves. great experience and our time even went a little over an hour and there was no rushing.
positive Setup up appointment via text. She does not take phone calls at this time. Luna responded quickly to my texts, and scheduled an appointment at an incall at a clean, safe motel. This lady goes the extra mile to put a smile on your face, and I'm certain that VIPs would enjoy her as much as I did!!!!!!! WOW!!!!!! I'm from California, but I've been visiting Colorado on business trips for the past few months. If I lived in Colorado, I would definitely try to visit Luna on a weekly basis. I just returned to my motel after my most recent session with Luna, and as always, she gave me 5-STAR SERVICE!!!! Luna greeted me as I entered her motel room wearing a short gown. She knows what I like because as I was getting undressed, she quickly got on her bed, laid on her back, spread her legs wide open, and invited me to dive into her delicious muff. I love DATY, and I couldn't wait to get my tongue on her pussy lips. She requested that I insert a finger inside her, and I obliged. Then she asked me to insert 2 fingers, then 3 fingers, then 4 fingers. Eventually, my entire hand was inside her (almost to my wrist). She gave me instructions on how to reach for her G-spot with my fingers. I continuously licked her clit while rubbing the G-spot. Her pussy was squeezing my hand like a vice grip!!!! She was cumming and on the verge of squirting. OMG!!!! I have done fisting only one other time in my life, and that was over 10 years ago. In my opinion, this would automatically give Luna a 10 rating, but I don't think that TER would allow it. NOTE: I have small hands, so fisting may be YMMV. Her pussy was so wet and moist after the fisting. I quickly put on a condom, and fucked her doggystyle. Even though I spent several minutes fisting her, Luna's pussy was still tight on my small dick. I could tell that she was cumming because her vagina would constantly squeeze my pecker. As I approached my time limit, I was totally exhausted and I gave up. My brain wanted to keep going, but my body didn't have the energy. Luna wore me out!!!! I need to spend time in the gym so that I can be prepared for Luna during our next meeting. I gave Luna a 10 rating. I did not request a bbbj during this meeting because I was too excited, and I wanted to fuck her, but she did give an awesome during our first meeting. Also, during our first meeting, she did offer greek for an additional fee, but I declined. Once again, greek might be YMMV since I have a small package. I believe that Luna meets the requirements for a 10-rating.
positive Katty seems to be a popular provider in OC. I enjoyed our session but I was expecting more from her looks. She looks better in her photos. She's not ugly but she has somewhat of a flat butt which I don't like. But her face is pretty but a little older than expected. Looks around 32. But she's Asian so it's not like you can really tell accurately. Service was good but will not repeat. My first impression of Katty was a pretty face but was not impressed with body. She has great natural breasts but did not like the butt. I gave it a whirl. We undressed and the the blue toast and off to the shower. She washed me thoroughly but no preview. We talked a bit to get more comfortable. We went back to the bed and I layed on my stomach. Nice tease with tongue and some rimming. It was nice but not the best I've had. Then we went to the flip. She teased some more and then some BBBJ. Her technique is good and really enjoyed it. Does great in that department. We the did cowgirl Asian cowgirl, mish, sideways, doggy. I the. Asked if I can finish in her mouth. She agreed. She gave me a great BBBJ until completion until I was completely done. Good session but will not repeat since there are better girls in OC.
positive Miranda's ad appeared on a local board and the photos of a hot Asian woman with a rockin' body got my attention. I texted the screening info requested, and we set a meeting for a few hours later. She welcomed me into her apartment, and as soon as my shoes were off, she pulled my pants down! With my pants around my ankles, Miranda dropped to her knees and began sucking my cock; deep, wet, and wild. Once I was hard as a rock, she invited me to the bath where she we soaped each other up and made out against the tile wall, all lips and hands. After drying me off, we returned to her bedroom for more DFK and BBBJ. She had a script in her head, and I submitted to her lead. She had me lay on my back for BLS, then had me roll over for DATO. Her flashing tongue drove me wild! She turned for 69, and as she swallowed my cock, she had her first O. Miranda has an incredible body. Stunning breasts, and a shapely, and firm (you can feel the muscles), ass. I interrupted the script and asked her for doggy in the mirror (there are several.) She covered me up and got on all fours. She stuck her bodacious derriere in the air and I entered the gates of heaven. Watching us in the mirror, squeezing her lovely, round, firm cheeks, we rocked it out for maybe five minutes until we both reached the promised land--Oh, sweet Jesus ! Miranda is a high energy, intelligent, and sweet young lady. We chatted about Seattle, San Francisco, yoga, and tennis. She's thoroughly engaged--and engaging. I highly recommend her--she won't disappoint!
positive I saw her ad and saw that she had reviews, some ok some not. Price was really good so I decided to give her a try. Typical two call system, she was staying at a budget hotel as she was traveling. Read the details, she may be worth it depending on what you're looking for. First of all, some previous reviews say that her pics were not accurate and that she was heavier than expected. Well for me, her pics were spot on accurate. When she invited me in I even noticed that the pics in the ad were taken in that very hotel room, and she was even wearing the same sexy outfit. Yes she is a larger than average woman, but the pics clearly show that, and I actually prefer a woman with curves everywhere so I was immediately excited. Fucking a woman like her is so much more comfortable than fucking a skinny girl. After letting me in we hugged and I felt her up. Her body is wonderful, soft smooth and cushiony. She is also very pretty. I undressed and she took off her sexy outfit, she asked me to lay on the bed and asked if I wanted a back massage, and boy did I ever. She is pretty good at it. After relieving my back tension, she moved on to relieving then tension in my balls, as almost my entire cock was swallowed up in her mouth. She gave a great CBJ while lightly playing with my balls. When I felt the climax starting to build I stopped her and asked her to ride me, she said she didn't like that position and offered mish or doggie. I rolled over on top of her and and pounded her tight little pussy, our stomaches making a satisfying *plop* noise as they smacked together with each thrust. Continued that until I had a very powerful explosion inside her. At that point I tried to kiss her but she didn't want to. After I recovered and got off of her she offered wipes to help me clean up. I really like to cuddle after sex so I asked her but again she said no it's just not her thing. So we sat on the bed and talked for a while before I got on my way. Bottom line, if you are looking for GFE she is not your girl. But if you want a sex romp with a sexy lady, with a pleasant personality, who can really take a hard fucking, for an unbeatable price, she is your girl. I may see her again if I feel the urge next time she's in town.
positive Used Jay's before, so set up was easy. Texted from the hotel and got a room number. Hidden by the door was a young spinner in a towel. I never repeat, but for her I'd consider! VIP read on. A little awkward at first as she's young. She's over 18, but complained about booking the hotel since she's under 21. Offered for me to take a shower, which I did. When I came out, she was lying on the bed in her towel. She came over to me and gave me a DFK and immediately the tension was broken. We kept kissing and heavy petting and made our way over to the bed as the towel slipped off. She then started grinding on me driving me crazy. I reached a hand around to grope her and she asked if I need any lube. I said yes and she jumped off me and started an incredible bbbj. She then used her own spit on herself and let me slip a finger inside. After 5 minutes of this I was ready to pop, but didn't want to miss the main attraction. Slipped on the rubber and started off cowgirl. I knew I wouldn't last long and wanted to finish mish, so I flipped her over and finished quickly. After round 1, we chatted for about 10 minutes. Very easy to talk to her, and seems like a nice girl. After about 10 minutes, she jumped back on me and gave me a big DFK. She worked her way down to another BBBJ. Let her stay there a little longer for round 2 as I thought I would last. Slipped on the rubber and was proven wrong. Started out with cowgirl again for a few minutes, then flipped her into K9. Finished quickly again as she's so tight. I don't generally repeat, but I would for her. highly recommend.
positive Ok I have been looking at Natalie for some time now. But I never decided to pull the trigger. So glad a review before me made me reconsider. She is a bit shy initially. However, that will fade quickly. To keep things short, this girl does just about anything and everything you ask her to do! I will let your imagination run wild on this one. I was in some special kind of mood. Not only did I want to release some frustrations, I wanted to do it all under my lovely DSLR camera. Needless to say, there are seriously slim pickings to those who would oblige to my special request. After many hang-ups, I was literally considering scrapping the bottom of the bowl for a simple yes. Funny how inversely proportional the available providers are, the more custome your desire becomes. But then I came across this gem once again. I have been looking at Natalie for some time, do to her online webcam shows and old post on craigslist. But I never felt "Lucky" enough to risk the chance. Well yesterday night I was feeling lucky. THE ARRANGEMENT ATTEMPT 1 Obtaining Natalie's number was a bit cumbersome. She had two numbers and would advertise both of them just as frequently. So I texted both numbers saying "Hello, do you allow sessions to be could be recorded?" about 1 hour later her 423 phone replied back "Yes, how long?". I was elated. but not out the woods yet. Knowing that if I was to throw a time, I would get back some ridiculous price back in return. Remember my formula about the provider availability to custom desire? Well there is one exception to this rule. Every now and again you will get a hotty that will agree... for like 500 dollars, when her regular session is 300. No thank you. So to play it safe I said 30 minutes. She replied back 150!!!! Done and Done! Except it wasn't yet done. THE ARRIVAL ATTEMPT 1 As a young professional, I invested in property best suited to further my assets... an apartment complex. So when Natalie showed up she gave me a rang to let me know that she arrived. I replied back and headed down the parking deck. But, just like that I see one of the police officers headed up the deck as well. I wasn't worried because I knew that we had a few that lived here. But it spooked Natalie enough to leave. We been having some issues with people breaking in. So an Officer approached Natalie and asked who she was waiting on. Welp so much for that one. THE ARRANGEMENT ATTEMPT 2 After several attempts to try to contact her, I was lucky enough to have her come through and reply back. We then set the appointment for today :) THE ARRIVAL ATTEMPT 2 Just like any other. Oh and an apology about last night THE SESSION: Natalie is absolutely amazing she honestly doesn't care where or how you want her. She started me off with a BBBJ and I was in heaven. Remember now, I am filming this the entire time. She was giving the camera so much attention it was such a turn on. Her eyes were locked in on both my lens and the camera perfectly. I nearly wanted to put the camera down and just enjoy the moment. We then switch up and placed on the hat. She got on top of me and again performance was in high gear. Her moans and the way she contorted her hips made her a sight of beauty. We tried missionary and then doggy where I ended. The session was great, but I wasn't too into it because of me juggling a bulky camera. Again no fault of her own. She is so chilled. We talked shortly after and thats when I found out her willingness for just about anything and everything (2 girl/ Spouse/ anal) She was actually mentioning much more but my dumb ass had to cut her off with a "WOW!" lol. ALL AND ALL Will definitely repeat.
positive I have seen Farrah multiple time and each time it gets better! She is easy to set up a meeting with via email. She will travel around town accommodate you as well. She is a young pretty sweetheart so be good to her. I will repeat again... At first, we would communicate via email and after she is comfortable, she will text you to set it up and give you the room number. Each time she met me at the door in pretty lingerie with a hug and a kiss. She will sit and talk to get to know you for a minute and then it is on! She takes direction very well and is up for anything! She does a terrific BBBJ that seems to last for a half hour. She has so much energy and strong neck muscles! Then we went through several positions, one the couch, on the bed, , all of my choosing and she (at least seemed) like she loved every minute of it. I know I did. At last the time was almost up and she pulled off the hat and allowed me to finish in her beautiful warm, soft mouth! She is worth a visit fellas!
positive A tall, beautiful brunette, wearing a tight fitting dress and CFM heels, greeted me at the door. What a way to start our initial date. The assistant of one of my ATFs had recommended I see Amanda on her first trip to Boston. I am glad I listened to this recommendation. Non-VIPs, if you like young, gorgeous, tall brunettes, what are you waiting for?? VIPs read on Amanda was quite a sight when she opened the door: tall brunette with gorgeous eyes, a tight fitting dress, shapely legs and CFM heels. Amanda and I started with a good conversation and a little LFK, which led to a short session of DFK. Amanda put on some music and we danced together to help break the ice and allow Amanda to relax. I excused myself to shower and cleanup and when I came out, we continued the DFK. I finally got her dress off which was followed by more DFK, then removed her bra and more DFK, gave her nipples some attention which she seemed to enjoy based on the light moans of pleasure. Then we lay down on the bed and I continued to explore her gorgeous body. Finally made my way to her pussy, which was perfectly shaved and began a delicious session of DATY. Amanda was definitely enjoying herself, but I was having more fun as I had my mouth attached to her pussy. I could sense Amanda was definitely going to come and finally O #1. Amanda was very sensitive so I gave her a chance to rest before starting another extended DATY session, with the same result. I then let Amanda rest a short while and then I put the cover on and we started in MISH so I could enjoy gazing into that beautiful face. We were both having a good time, legs on my shoulders and I could tell I was not going to last longand we both had an enjoyable ending. Amanda cleaned me up, we continued our earlier conversation, had another shower and I was on my way. Amanda is new to the business, was very willing to take direction and follow my lead. I cant wait to see her again and I am looking forward to our next date.
positive Got a tip from a fellow monger about Nara, so I decided to make an appointment right away. I was new to this org, so had to provide references first. After being approved, I was given an address for an newly built apartment complex in Milpitas. Was told to park near the leasing office, which happened to be in close proximity to the gate code panel and also to her apartment. I was greeted by a sexy and sultry looking Kgirl. Behind the door, I was greeted by Nara who matched perfected with her pictures. The pictures depict her to be sexy and sultry which she certainly is. Upon getting to know her and talking to her though, I picked up on genuine innocence from her that was refreshingly cute. She's got a cute, upbeat and bubbly personality that I hope remains with her in this business. She says her plan is to stay here for 2 years. After the obligatory shower, we lay down on the bed together and make out like teenagers. She directs my hand to her pussy lips and instructs me on how she likes it. I alternate between sucking her tits and locking lips with her mouth. Her moans grow louder as her pussy is getting more and more wet. I take a sniff and a taste to confirm its her natural juices and not lube inserted beforehand. I want more, so I instruct her to get into position for 69. Then she climbs on top for CG and rides away until she gets tired. What follows is Mish, Spoon, Mish, and the finale ending in DS. I enjoyed my time with Nara even though she's not the typical PSE I usually prefer. However, her cute and innocent GFE was a refreshing nice change. I will be repeating whenever I want a slow and sensual GFE.
positive This review is long overdue - but I was introduced to this new Brazilian bombshell Angel by one of my ATF's (another well know Brazilian -- wink wink ) and believe me she didn't steer me wrong -- Angle was Muy calinte -- (very hot) lady -- and I was thoroughly pleased with her looks, her sexiness, smile, and well everything! -- I arrived at a very safe and secure well appointed apartment and was greeted by the lovely Angel and she was dressed in a nice two piece lingerie outfit-- and she had this golden bronze tan that was hot.and she greeted me with a big smile and nice hug and wet kiss -- she was smoking hot! The only thing to be aware of is she doesn't speak real good English but believe me we had no problem communicating in the universal language of hot steamy sex.she was more than willing to accommodate -- and to fine out how hot it was read on . Angle has one killer hot sexy body and we started kissing and groping right here in the entry wayshe is a good kisser and knows hoe to turn man on -- I was squeezing her tonight round brazilian butt -- ( is it just me or do all Brazilian women have joust the nest asses you have ever seen -- damn -- ) ok back top the party -- we kissed and kissed and she ran her hand down and felt my now fullyy engorged magic wand bulging through my pants and she putrid -- "he's nice eh?" well yes he is -- lol -- she squeezed him some more and purred "I like heem" :) -- well -- wait ti you see him I thought -- lol - She grabbed my hand asked if I wanted a drink -- and offered me a beer -- and let me to the bedroom -- Angel ran the shower for me as I undressed and I got to watch her sexy body parade around in that sexy bikini -- damn i was so ready to devour her -- but first the shower -- After a good rinse I emerged draped in just my towel and she was laying across the bed -- she walked over to me kissed me deeply -- undid my towel wrap and my wand sprung out like an olympic diving board -- BOINGGGGGGshe giggled and then slid right down my body -- almost slithering down as she pressed her body against june until she reached her knees and took my cock deep in her wet warm mouth -- OMG that was awesome - my knees buckled as she took me nice and slow in and out of her mouth while making eye contact with me and sucking me so nice -- damn damn damn.. I just stood there and held on to the bed post as she went to work -- Angel loves to suck cock and it shows in her technique and passion for it -- after a good while of me face pumping her mouth I pulled her up and laid her back on the bed and went to work sucking on her responsive nipples and working my way down her sweet tasting body to there love tunnel and spread her pussy lips and went to work pin her lips, and clit-- angel was squirming and in no time she was letting her juices flow speaking Portuguese and english as she encouraged me to keep going -- she had multiple O's nd then she grabbed me and said "Put heeem in" - -well all righty now -- we suited me up and I started in face to face slow deep grinding while kissing her and we were really looking into each others eyes and enjoying the moment -- we both picked up the pace and were in a nice rhythm-- and she grinded out another nice O then stood up pulled her across the bed to me and went into standing MISH (my favorite) and started deep pumping and pounding her goodshe was thrusting back against my pumping and we were making the pap-pap-pap-pap-pap- sound that is so sweet to hear.I then had her climb on top and ride me so I clue watch her pretty face and squeeze her titties and grab her ass that was an awesome ride-- after a good sweat producing ride it was her turn to rest as I flipped her over for some spirited doggy where I got to grab her ass and pump her deep -- the sight of her nice round brazilian ass and her moans and her alternating speaking Portuguese and English telling me to fuck her good -- was all I could take and I started pumping her furiously until I felt my balls tighten and I pulled put ripped off the condom and shot loads and loads of cum juice all over her ass and up her back -- damn damn damn -- We both had to just stand there sand catch out respective breaths -- wow Angel got a arm cloth to clean m cup and I also helps clean my juices off of her - we then cuddled and drank our beers and found way to communicate -- it was cute -- her broken English an amy horrible Spanish -- but we got it done -- i started kissing her again and she was playing why my cock and balls and I had her lick my sensitive nipples and i got rock hard a gain -- she started sucking the wand to full mast and i wanted her back on top to ride me and she did with passion and speed it was something to jus hold on and let her grind until she said she was cumming again and I wanted to cum with her and we fucked each other furiously until we both exploded together - wow that was so hot!! andy so is this Brazilian firecracker -- Angel is fun, sexy, beautiful -- and a really nice lady -- I highly recommend seeing her -- she was a true 5 ends up experience -- and a special thanks to my ATF for recommending her to me -- wink wink-- I owe you one -- smile
positive I saw an ad and a few reviews for Lori aka Knottykneads, what really interested me was the fact she offers a nuru experience as I have never tried that before. We had a little trouble getting a meeting coordinated but we finally got that worked out and met up for incall at her nice hotel suite. When she answered the door, she had some sexy lingerie on and looked just like her pictures on her website. She had a very nice suite, felt like being in a small apartment and she had the lights dim with candlelight. We had some light conversation and she led me into the bedroom where she had the bed prepped for nuru session. VIPs read on below.... She instructed me to get undressed(she had hangers for me to hang my clothes up to not get them wrinkled, nice touch). I got on the king size bed face down first while she finished getting the nuru gel heated up we were chatting about her getting settled in St. Louis and how she really likes it here. She strips out of the lingerie and climbs on top of me and starts to pour the hot nuru gel all over herself and me, it was very hot, but felt great. The other nice thing was I was facing a wall that was fully mirrored so I could watch her do her thing even though I was face down. She starting sliding all over my backside with her very toned slim physique, perfect for this type of session. She really got me very relaxed while I was face down, after about 15 minutes I asked if she could work on the front side. She warned not to be in a hurry(I think assuming that if she rubbed the front side of me I would pop quickly). I mentioned that I would be alright and we could always just start over if I did, she confirmed MSOG was ok. I flip, she starts a wonderful body slide up and down my body and was mixing in her hands as well and I got very erect. She started to reach for cover, but I asked for a full stripper slide first which she happily obliged which felt great with the nuru gel doing its magic. I asked her if she would turn around for a view of her backside which turned into some nice 69 action. Then it was time for cover, where she performed a nice CG which went on for quite some time, eventually took cover off and finished with oral/hand finish. She provided nice warm wash cloth to clean up, we chatted for a few minutes and it was game on again, Lori is like an energizer bunny, she believes on giving you your $$ worth. She started sliding all over my body again and went through some of the same things again and talked about other things we will try next time and yes, there will be a next time. After I called it quits, she had a shower ready with everything you need to get you ready to go home. Once I was cleaned and dressed we chatted for awhile about all sorts of things we have in common. She is low volume and definitely is not a clock watcher. I had wanted to check the nuru thing off my list but I may be hooked on it, at least the way Lori does it, I will be back for a return visit.
positive So here's my review on Noa. I almost don't want to review because I don't want to share. She is awesome. NonVIPs she's a must see...treat her well. So I go into the mid range hotel and have seen a couple providers from this agency before. I believe I get a text from the "appointment guy" that was supposed to go to the provider...but whatever. The door is ajar, I walk in and a beautiful mixed white/Asian lady is waiting on me in bed. I rub my eyes again to make sure I'm seeing straight and yup, she's a cutie. The room is warm, but tiny women get cold easy..and she is tiny. The only thing that can make this hour better is if she DFK's and our LFKs do transition to that, so I'm harder than a rock in no time. DFK down my body until she pulls him out, she the BBBJ is awesome, great eye contact and those bedroom eyes, I tell you. To CG before I blow, where I last oh..I dunno 3 mins? She knows how to ride and gets her body in the best position for the deepest penetration. She's awesome guys. Have already repeated twice.
positive Piper is beautiful, I had an amazing time with her. I forgot that it was a service, she really made my stressful month a lot better. Felt like I was with my lover. Non-VIP's I would recommend. I arrived at the incall location and I was buzzed inside the building, no doorman. Mama-san was incredible friendly and so were the other providers. They offered me some water and I took my shoes off and then I met Piper who was in lovely lingerie. I went to the room and she undressed me but before we did that, we had a DFK session for a good few minutes. Reminded me a lot of my girlfriend too. Afterwards, she asked me if I wanted to shower so I was excited about that. We head to the shower and she gives me a preview BBBJ while I am feasting on her tits. I felt that I had very good chemistry with this girl. Lots of fun inside the shower. We towel off and head back to the room and she pushes me down on the bed and starts licking junior. She is beautiful so I get hard pretty fast and I let her do her work. Afterwards I decided to turn her over for some nice 69 action and I start eating her out. She tasted amazing and I could not get enough of it. She was really into it and told me that I was very good at licking. I tell her to lay on the bed so I could pleasure her more. She was very king and allowed me to put a finger inside her and she wrapped her legs around my head. She came a few times too, which made me feel very confident in my skills. We're both very horny at this point and I turn to the condoms and tell her to put it on me. I start going on her in MISH. Gentleman, let her feel comfortable and give her a pillow for cushion, it helps her and it helps you for insertion. She appreciated my gesture and I was pounding away and DFKing with her while kissing her breasts. Afterwards I tell her that I want to go from behind K9 and I pound her pretty hard so pleasurable screams were heard. After a few minutes of that I wanted her to ride me and we do CG, which is always fun. I am a huge boob guy so I loved every minute of it, we make out and I tell her that I want to CIM. She obliges and I CIM with her. We laugh and she said that it was very fun and she cleans herself and junior up. We march to the shower and she tells me that she hopes to see me again. She also told me that she likes teaming up with another girl there, Orange and that I should do doubles next time. Thanks Piper, your outstanding service has made me seriously consider that. I am gonna have to save up and hopefully, I'll see you again one day! But I digress, gentleman. Piper is a great provider and you should feel priviledged that she's around for this price point, treat her well and build chemistry with her. She provides true GFE. Piper is around 5'6" and she is a beautiful Chinese girl. It was easy to communicate with her by using body language since we all know what we're there for.
positive Payton is a nice looking older woman, very eager to start the session. Easy to get in touch with I find a phone call is faster but she answers texts also. Overall good time and I have and will repeat. Okay so Payton's incall in Johnston seems a little sketchy at first and is not the most luxurious place or relaxing but he personality and eagerness definitely makes it worth the trip, never mind her incredible oral skills, holy shit this woman can suck a dick I just about lost it down her throat a few times and she loves it deep in her throat. After that I out the bag on and took the plunge and I'm glad I did her pussy was so right and wet I felt like I was in heaven I fucked her from behind for a bit slapping her phat ass and pounding her hard before flipping her on her back and pounding it in mish, was just about to cum and she told me to cum on her face and I gladly obliged. Over all super fun time and I will be back.
positive Have seen her in the past in Foster City. Easy to setup appointment day before to be sure I got desired time which is first appointment of the day. Texted at 9 to confirm on day to confirm got address. Then text when I got there. Immediately received a text with gate code and room number went up and had to knock on door then opened i stepped in to a familiar young day stepper out from behind door. Icky recondized. My ad threw her arms around y neck and kissed me. Then helped me out of my shoes and lead e to the bedroom where she continued kissing me whilehelping me undress after I was naked we worked on getting her clothes off while I explored her body. She then worked her way down to bbbj. After a few minutes I picked her up and carried her to the bed and lauded her down while dfking then worked my way down to her tasty box for day for five minutes with five till she came several times twitching and jerking till she squirted. Then worked my way up to dfk and start missionary before acgwhere I finisher. Cuddled then clean up followed by sensual massage which ended with her focusing on getting me hard again then more bbbj. Once I was hard again. She climdd on again in act followed by doggy and several other positions till I told her I would not be able to finish a second time. As I was to tired. She was disappointed but understood . then coed shower and held get dress but still triedto get me off with her mouth. Then helped me with my shoes and kiss at door before I remembered donation. And left.
positive I saw that Mcc was available so decided to try her, texted the booker no problem with making appt. got to the place knocked at door behind it a pretty asian woman Once inside she greeted me with kiss then to the bedroom and we started to undress while touching her nice ass she is not as skinny as other provider with a nice rack to play with the to the bed for some BBBJ for some time then turned her up for some DATY which she enjoyed the cover when on for some MISH and we where at this position for a long time until finally came and I just collapsed on top of her and we stood like that for like 4 minutes which was nice then she cleaned me up we cuddled for a little bit then time for round 2 some more BBBJ then some MISH then RCB and then K9 and she finish me off with a hand job then to the shower got dress kiss her good bye and went home. Overall a good experience will probably repeat thank you Mcc
positive Called her on a whim for an outcall, other reviews seemed positive. Called her up, she sounded sweet on the phone, was only looking for a quick half session. She showed up on time, cute girl as expected, had a great session with a down to earth young woman. She showed up on time, as expected, covered up with a long coat. She looks like she might've gained a couple pounds, as compared to her pictures, not large by any means, a bit curvier, but I'd much prefer that! We did the usual cop check and she asked to use the restroom to freshen up. She came out with just her sexy underwear and heels, definitely grabbed my attention quickly! She definitely likes to talk for a bit and get acclimated, but I think it adds to the passion, always better when everyone's more comfortable. She walked me over to the bed and pushed me down and we got to business! Her hand traveling up my leg to give junior a pat, she quickly got me undressed and gave the boys the attention they were looking for. She asked how I wanted to get started, so we went for the CBJ, got me all wrapped up and she got to work, pretty good for covered, not usually something I care for, but she made it work. After a few minutes, she told me she needs to ride it, who am I to deny! She climbed on top and lowered herself, taking every inch in one go, she felt wonderful, I grabbed her ass and pulled her down hard for each pump, it was great, she definitely works out, her ass was nice and tight, not like some others. We finished up with doggy, couldn't get enough of watching that ass bounce off of me, I wanted to finish on her sexy tits, which she obliged, I told her I was getting close, she whipped around and pulled the cover off and jerked me off all over those perky handfuls. Overall it was a good session, wouldn't hesitate to meet with her again, I'm sure it gets better when she gets more comfortable and familiar with you. Only downside was that her phone went off a number of times during the session, maybe her driver? I'd probably ask her to silence it next time, but minor issue.
positive Contacted Lyn through her website which is required for new friends. First contact she had a running injury so followed up a little later, screening was painless and easy and set the appointment. Arrived at her incall a little early and called her and she was ready then so went on up. She does not show her face in any of her ads or website but she is gorgeous. A hug and a kiss once the door closed, offered a bottle of water which I accepted as I knew I would need it seeing how sexy she was. Made our way to the bedroom, took care of the formalities, offered a shower which I accepted. She left the room for a few minutes then joined me in the shower where the fun immediately started.... I will definately be back to see her again and again...........Vip read on, all others i can say go and see her she is that much fun.... Lyn exudes a very cinfident sexiness that is hard to describe but I loved it. Once she joined me in the shower she helped to get me cleaned up and the forplay started there. When all the soap was rinsed off she sank to her knees and began a very sexy and sensual BBBJ after a little tease and some DFK she sugggested making our waay to the bed to continue which I galdly did as I couldnt wait to get my hands and tongue on her.Once on the bed more DFK and hands roaming. She continued with the BBBJ and said she loved to have her partner stand above her on her knees to cum, who was I to deny her request where she took me to completion, hot as hell to just watch her, she was in no hurry the whole time. After cup 1 we returned to the bed where I started exploring her body on my way down to return the favor. Very pretty pussy which tastes as good as it looks. She was very responvive and got extremely wet which only fueled my fire to please her as she had did to me. After some time, not sure how long as I could have spent the rest of the day drinking the sweetest tasting pussy I think I have ever had, she helped to bring things back up for round 2. Applied the cover and started in Mish which is my preference as I like to watch my partners facial expressions. After several variations of Mish I knew the second cup was gonna be hard to get out so she returned to BBBJ and then I asked to watch her masturbate which pushed me over the edge. Lyn is a very sweet and intelligent Lady. Treat her like a lady and you will definately be rewarded. I think I watched the time more than she did, she did not seem to be concerned with the time during my whole visit. A goodbye kiss on my way out and started planning a return trip before the door closed. She is a rare gem in Atlanta and would love to keep her to myself but that is not fair to her. I will probably see her before this review is approved. LOL
positive Overall, Farrah is a very nice girl who aims to please. Set-up takes some time since she prefers e-mail until she gets to know you. Overall, nice gfe and I recommend. Started off with contact via e-mail and received response semi-prompt (next day). Some e-mails back and forth and finally set up a date and time. We met at a nice all suites hotel near the Orlando airport. I was very pleased with the cleanliness and quality of the room. When she opened the door she was wearing lingerie. Her face is by far her best physical quality. She really is quite cute. Her body is also nice but not quite as nice as her website pictures would lead you to believe or as nice as some others have stated. Nonetheless, her body is still pretty nice. Once you cross into the room she is ready right away. She started to remove my belt and help me undress. After undressing I sat in the chair in the living room portion of the room and watched her undress. I had her kneel in front of me and then began an very nice bbbj. She goes pretty deep and takes direction well. I enjoyed this for a good 10 minutes plus before moving to the bed. She laid down on her back sideways on the bed and I explored her body a bit then tried some p 2 p which she does not care for. So I covered up and went at it mish for a short while. I did not want to finish that way. As I said her face is her best quality and I wanted to finish with a bbbj. I had her lay on her back with her head propped up on a pillow against the headboard and straddled her face and she continued with bbbj for several minutes. It was very nice to see those eyes staring up at me while she was performing an above average bbbj. When I got close she opened wide and I finished in her mouth and she played with it a little before going to clean up. I went to shower (clean shower and clean towel a big plus) got dressed and chatted for a few minutes before heading out. She did not rush me one bit. I will be repeating for sure.
positive Farrah what can I say about her is she is awesome. I have already seen her a couple of times. I first contacted her through email and she verified me and I was good to go. I went to her nice incall aND when. She open the door I was ready to play. Vip read on and o would repeat. We had a little small talk then once that was done. We started to kiss like we was lovers and once I was arouse. She started to open up my pant to pull out my penis. She then got on her needs and gave a very good bbbj and I was loving those Lips around my cock. Once she got done with doing that I lay her on the bed and start to go down on her. She tastes very good and I knew she was enjoying it because she took my head to go deeper in her. After that I laid down on the bed and she got the condom and started to cowgirl ride me. I was loving it and grabbing that fat ass of hers. I then bent her over and fucking her from behind. I came in the condom after that. We clean up and gave our kiss good bye. I really enjoyed myself.
positive I'd been looking at Ashley's ad for a few weeks and finally decided to give her a shot. I sent her a text message, she quickly replied. From there we made same day arrangements. Once I got to her location, she greeted me in. Her body looks just like her pics. She is a legit brickhouse! Non-vip she's worth seeing. Once I got to her location, she greeted me in. Like I said above, her body is just like the pictures. She has big natural tits and a nice thick ass. She has a roommate and a few yappy dogs, but they are all away from the action. She showed me into her massage room, I got undressed and she finished getting music for the occasion. She started giving me a decent massage, but I don't really care about that because that's not really what I was there for. After a few minutes, she started teasing the boys. She took off the rest of her clothes and started doing some body slides on me. Her tits are amazing, and it was very cool to feel those nipples on my back. On the flip, she massaged my legs and then moved up and provided a nice and sensual finish. Her hands are almost velvety. She allowed a lot of roaming of my hands. Her body is pretty amazing. Give this girl a try today!
positive Had been trying to catch Devin for a while. I was driving back to Atlanta from Chattanooga and saw on the net that Devin was in Cartersville. I phoned her up and she was familiar with me from all the times we had missed seeing each other in the past. She gave me the location and guided me in once I got to her exit. Devin is a real sweetheart. I would repeat she is just that nice of a person. Got to her room and she left the door ajar. She was sitting on the bed. We talked and she got up and gave me a hug and a light kiss on the lips that turned into a serious dfk standing grinding session. She is a fantastic kisser. She then droped to her knees unzipped my pants and took out a throbbing hard dick and went to work, kissing, and licking and tonguing and sucking and deep throating and then doing it all over again. Several times I almost lost my balance. She did this until I exploded in her mouth. She litterally left me light headed. She then stood up and helped me undress and I laid on the bed and watch her take off her panites and bra. We talked for a few as she rubbed all over my body and then gave me another blowjob and ball sucking and rimming until I was super hard again. I pleasured her with daty until she was very wet. We suited up and went at it in mish. I pounded her for a very long time and she responded. I could fell her love juices running down my leg and the sounds she made were so sexy. We were both drenched as I finally came and not sure how long but it was a long run. My time with her was way over an hour and she never once mentioned it. I showered and talked for a bit and left. Very nice woman!!!!
positive i contacted brandy due to the recommendation of another monger i routinely talk to... contact was established easily and a date and time were set up... she had a general idea of her upcoming incall location the week prior to our date and on the day of the date she texted me to confirm the date and provided the exact location... arrived on time and she was ready, so i went to her door, knocked and she opened the door without any delay... had a couple of shots of vodka with her and we got started to get undressed and moved toward the bed... vip's read on, non-vip's just let me say brandy is a good time... so the clothes came off and she went straight for my cock... she laid down on the bed and started to suck my cock and moved into a position so i could fuck her throat... she took me in, with good DT action... i moved over the top of her as she continued to DT my cock and started fingering her pussy... she was already wet and she told me to finger bang her at the same time... she started moaning and between breaths with my cock fucking her throat, she told me she wanted me in her pussy... we changed positions and we started in DG with me standing beside the bed as i fingered her pink starfish... this led to some pounding in MISH, then rolling over for some CG and then reverse CG... i was ready to pop and she wanted me to cum on her pussy, so i pulled out, took off the cover and blew my load all over her pussy and ass... after all, who was i to say no, lol... i had a good time with brandy and will most likely repeat, but she doesn't advertise often so you have to keep an eye out for her...
positive Daisi was really sweet and nice. I had a very good time with her. She looks more girl next door than her glamour shots, but shes cute. She is petite  very thin and maybe 50 or slightly more in height. She seemed smart and interesting, and we had some good conversation in addition to the action. Based on my experience, I would repeat, but Id like to meet others from the group first. I arrived a bit early, and they sent me up right away. Daisi looked more GND than glam, and she is really thin. She was wearing a dress, and she greeted me with a hug and kiss. We started kissing right away, and kept at it a while. I reached under her dress to grab her rear. I went off to the shower and asked her to stay dressed as she was. I returned to the spot I had left, in front of the desk mirror. We kissed some more, and I removed the dress. She had lingerie on under the dress. The points of her hip bones showed, to give an idea of her thinness. I like more meat, but she was not unattractive. As we kissed, I revolved her around to get some direct views and views in the mirror, and removed the bra and panties. She seemed to like me, and kept grabbing my shoulders and moaning. I picked her up and carried her to the bed, which she really liked. She was light, so it was an easy carry. I placed her on the bed, and almost immediately she reached for a condom. I worried that this meant CBJ. I asked if we could wait on the condom. She agreed and asked if I wanted to lick her. I said yes and told her to let me know what she liked and didnt. She said, I like lick pussy. I started kissing her, mouth, neck, ears, and she was enjoying. Down to her breasts, and then down to her pussy. She was enjoying, and I inserted a finger, which she liked. I rolled her back and inched toward DATO  asked her if she liked, and she said yes. So I licked and added some finger play. Then she told me to lie back, and she started working me. I was happy that she did bbj. She was doing a great job. I wanted to pull her off and move to some positions, but it felt so good that I didnt want to stop. I like to stand, especially in front of a mirror, but the mirror situation in the room was not good. And this was feeling great, and looking great, as I was watching her work on me as I was lying on the bed. I asked if I could CIM. She asked, You want to come in my mouth? I wasnt sure whether she was surprised or gearing up to say no. I said yes, that was what I was asking, and was it ok? I wasnt trying to push her to do something she wasnt comfortable with. She said, yes, ok. So she worked me, and I let loose. It felt great. I kept spasming like it would never end. She didnt lose a drop. Pulled off, and I was still spasming. She went to spit and then came back and cleaned me up. She was perky and asked me if I wanted a massage. She massaged me a while, and then I asked her if shed like a massage, to which she said yes. I was really planning to try some positions with her. The BBJ had been intense, and then after the relaxing massage I wasnt feeling it, so we never got to the sex. I asked her if she wanted to shower with me, but she declined, saying that she would straighten the room while I showered. I came out, and she was wearing the dress and looking at some museums that she wanted to visit the next day. We had a nice goodbye, and I was on my way. I had a very good time and even at the time thought that Id want to repeat so that we could do positions. If it worked out, Id be happy to repeat, but, realistically, I would rather meet some of the others from this group.
positive Had the pleasure of seeing her a few times now. Each time seems to get better and better. She has a unique way about her that will surprise you, impress you, and can't wait to see her again. She is quickly making a name for her self, and for good reason. I have seen farrah a few times now. Each time she has surprised, impressed, and driven me nuts all at the same time. She started as a utr and has quickly made a name for her self. She is excellent on communication and punctuality. Being on time and woman is a rare trait on its own. She is very pretty and keeps her self in great shape. She has some outfits that are incredible to see her in. Ever been at a concert and a girl walks by in an outfit that just forms to her body. The color matches her skin and hair and you can't even come close to what she looks like without the clothes? Thats her. First time outcall we had some wine for awhile to get to know each other, but it felt like I had known her awhile. Visits after that are fun to catch up with each other and exciting to hear what she has been up to. She now will get an incall from time to time to schedule appointments, but she still does outcall. She is never on her phone once the door closes. I like that. When she visits, she is 100% there for you and will enjoy her time with you as well. Once she starts kissing Her Dfk is amazing and passionate. From that point on, the hour will go by fast. She gives a bbj that is amazing when she looks up at you with those pse eyes. She takes direction well, but she changes things up on her own to a point you are just sitting back enjoying it. She does allow cim. Do it with her looking at you with those eyes, and you better hope your heart doesn't stop. The view and feeling are incredible. She likes doggie, but is up for what ever position you can think of. When your done, she will clean up and come snuggle up to you for some relax chit chat time. Don't be surprised if after a few minutes she starts waking up jr for round 2. She is not a clock watcher and does not rush. A great girl that will have you calling her again and again. I think I need to call her again myself.
positive I was visiting Orlando and decided to play a bit. I first emailed Farrah a few days before we met and after initial screening she gave me her number. The screening was rather painless and she gave me her hotel name in the morning of the day we met so I could see how much time it would take to get there. Once I was there I texted her and she sent me the room number. Read on... She opened the door and I was met by a gorgeous lady wearing matching bra & panties. She is a knockout! She is 24 and in really great shape. After talking for a bit I was a bit hot from the weather so I started to undress to cool off, Farrah was very willing to join me. We started with LFK and it turned into DFK and is she good! She sat me at the edge of the bed and started with a BBBJ and after a while asked what I wanted to try first. I suggested Greek and she happily agreed. Dang, tight is an understatement. We layed back and chatted some more with very relaxing and great conversation, she very sharp. After a bit she asked if I wanted a massage - of course I would. After a bit I turned and more DFK then more BBBJ which lead to doggy & more greek. I had to rest after the second round. The third go I just couldn't make it so we showered and I dressed and said my goodbyes. I can't wait to make it out to Orlando again so I can see her again.
positive Went and saw Devin late at night. Set it up through text and called her when I got there. It was a low-end motel in a decent part of town. She is the girl in the pics and is pretty damn cool. I recommend and I will definitely see her again. So I text her and set it up but she accidentally texted me something that was meant for someone else. This got me suspicious but, after a few more texts, I went through with it because of the previous reviews. When I got there, I said something about it and she acted like she didn't know what I was talking about. This makes me think that she doesn't set up her own appointments. Anyways, I get there and its a bit weird because of the texts but we talk (she's seems pretty cool), she whips out her giant tits, and we DFK for a bit. We then go to the bed for some more DFK, followed by some BBBJ. Her technique is good and she uses a lot of spit so I was a fan. She also licked and sucked my balls while I fingered her tight little pussy so I was definitely a fan. When I couldn't take it anymore, I had her put the cover on and ride me CG with more DFK. We did this for a bit then she asked my to fuck her doggy, so being the gentleman that I am, I obliged. She got super wet while I was back there and I heard a little queefing (which I love). Next we went to missionary for a while. I was having trouble finishing (not her fault, it happens now and then), so I had her use her hand while we made out. Still didn't work so I took over for her for a while while we made out some more. She claimed watching me really turned her on. Whether it really did or she was acting, who knows but fuck it. I had her lick and suck on my balls some while I continued polishing my pole until I was close then I finished in her mouth (she spit it out). She is a pretty cool chick and everything I asked for was answered with a yes. Had a fun time and will definitely repeat. Go see her.
positive Pure is a top notch and awesome provider. Very pretty with a great attitude. She is my All Time Favorite and best that I've EVER seen and I loved being with her. If you get a chance, go see her. HIGHLY recommended. There is a screening process to go through but once through that it was totally worth it. Texted me the directions to her condo in a nice area of North County When I got to the door it magically opened and behind the door was a very pretty Thai woman. She greeted me with a light kiss and hug and led me back to her room. We showed together and she did got me aroused right there. We dried off and she led me to the bed and I asked if I could give her a massage and she said yes. She was very responsive to my touch which got me even more turned on. Then it was her turn and she started in the front but soon got to my cock which she eagerly started sucking. Wow, can she suck. I almost lost it but held off. She has a great touch with her hands and her mouth. I turned her around to 69. She has a sweet tasting pussy and is really responsive to DATY. She came a couple of times and then we put on the jacket and went MISH for a while and then went doggy. I wanted CG but I couldn't hold it and lost it during doggy. She can really squeeze your cock with her pussy. Wow. Afterward she gave me a nice massage on my back which was very relaxing. We took another shower together where I got aroused again but my time was up so I had to settle down. I didn't press her for more time but I'm going to try and see her again this week. GO SEE HER!!!
positive No surprises here. Great agency. Went up to their apartment and was greeted by a cute Asian girl... Orange is pretty cute and the pictures are accurate. She brought me up to her room where she quickly disrobed and ushered me into the shower. Pretty standard for this place - BBBJ preview in the shower and we head back. In her room, she has me lie on my back and starts an extended BBBJ with extremely skilled DT. I end up kneeling above her and she says to fuck her face. I fuck her face porn style. I'm grabbing her hair and moving her head so fast her entire body is being jerked around. Unlike the reviewers before me, she seems to have gotten wise to the facial game and as I was going to cum on her face, she put it in her mouth for CIM instead. Oh well.... hard to complain about that. She had me lie down for a massage and extended rimming. She brought out a decently large dildo and asked if she could use it on me with a condom, which I declined. We go through the usuals - her on top, k9, mish, etc. It was good, but her real strength is BBBJ, which I have her do until cup 2 is served. Someone is using the shower so I end up getting a 10 minute massage over time while that happens, I shower, clean up, and go.
positive I have been very much attracted with the pics and felt very much closer. After multiple messages, finally we reached agreement on date and time and that was my best decision. I really felt what exotic message is all about and good and refreshing one can be without much our effort. She is repeat for me. VIP Read on.. She led me to room and started removing her clothes. I undressed and lay head down. She started from shoulder and down and I can feel her boobs hitting my head and it was wonderful. Ask permission to touch her and she agreed.. She was silk for sure and I felt it.. I could touch her all over but didnt try reaching the V.. Since it was first one I dont know if that is allowed. I could later play with her wonder boobs and lick it as much I want. She is a good kisser and does that all over. i really felt I should have gone for 1 hour. I requested to consider upgrading which she was not ready. Otherwise, she was best in what was promised and I felt really good and reached heaven once. Great time, good attitude, will go extra for making sure we are comfortable. Repeat for me..
positive Have always wanted to take part in the BAD experience. Came across the reviews for the lovely Alli, and well--the time had come. Contacted Amber for the verification process. Prompt--professional--and all done with great consideration and courtesy. After getting the green-light--I was soon setting up a rendezvous with Alli. As 'stuff' happens unexpectedly--we had a couple of glitches getting there--and together. However, Amber hung in there; got me to this sweet morsel, and--with considerable kindness and generosity--made it all worthwhile. Kudos to BAD; I will revisit--and soon.. Late night visit, and as mentioned--took some doing to get there.. Some back and forth with Amber (with some bad cell reception, to boot), and eventually-- I made it.. Such a relief--getting to the door, and finding the quiet, welcoming warmth of Alli.. Again--my first BAD visit--so we did have to get certain formalities out of the way.. It was clear that Alli was waiting and prepared.. The atmosphere nicely dimmed--and she looked fantastic.. Ushered to the bedroom--and the experience began.. Undressing me; allowing me to undress her (what little worn); the playful dance to the shower.. I stood relaxed--and let Alli do her thing--eyes and senses taking in a bit of magic.. I won't repeat so much of what has been written, but suffice it to say--that the service was excellent.. I especially enjoyed the oral exploration: rimming was a treat, and the BBBJ was outstanding.. On to multiple positions, and all a treat.. We finished in Mish; as I pulled out to share a load on her smooth flesh.. Not at the top of my game, and we had both endured a long-ish night, but Alli certainly came through, and so did Amber.. My first BAD experience was memorable--in more ways than one, and I do know--there will be more memories to come..
positive When I knew I would visit Orlando I started to investigate what kind of providers this area had to offer. By the time it was october I had a longlist with some preferrences for a few providers. But in October there was Farrah. One review is never enough to decide that she is worth to contact. But her 2nd review was also very promissing. And her website showed a very attractive young lady. Within no time she came on my shortlist and once arrived in Orlando, I was very pleased with her reaction on my mail. We send several text and e-mail messages to each other, also a provider-reference I just had met, and we made an appointment for 10pm, this very evening. She just left the building ...... what a great encounter. She is a must see, she really loves to please you, great services and a great kisser. Will I see her again? If i'm in Orlando be sure I will !!! She arrived on time. The knock on the door, me opening the door and there was Farrah. A beautifull young woman. Dressed in a short black dress. We introduced ourselfes, she asked about my long travel to this place but within a minute we kissed and never stopped.... We quickley undressed and she gave me a bbbj, she is good in it. After a while she came next to me and now it was my turn to feel her pussy, cuddle some more and I went down to lick her pussy. She enjoined my work and after she had her O, allthough I always doubt of this is the case, but it felt real, we again changed positions, some more bbbj and after the cover was placed we fucked in several postions. I love those positions, but I asked to climax with a bbbj. And so she did, she is very tight so I did not less long, and removed the cover. After a great bbbj I came in het mouth and did not see a drup of it. We relaxed a bit and then she asked for a 2nd round, but then we had to wait at least 2 hours, so I asked if she could give me a massage. She did, she even brought some oil with her, and this was also very nice. Go see this very attractive woman. And treat her well, she deserves it. Farrah if you read this. Thank you !
positive I spent an awesome time with a very hot lady in DC at Tyson corner yesterday. Ill never forget the few hours what were spent with her. I am very satisfied with the agency. Easy to make an appointment and the hotel are also nice and confortable. I am a loyal guest :) VIP READ ON. Leonie is the queen of my dreamsawww I got a shocked when she opened the door. She stood in a beautiful white lengerie and i could not speak, just stammered as a child..lol, but she was very friendly and made me relaxed just in a minute :D was extremely sexy and those boobs!!!! First she huged me and i got a very delicious and long DFK. She invited me to have a shower i asked her to join me and she said okey baby lets go to the bathroom and she smiled sweetly. I began to take her clothes offi could not take off my eyes from her tits. Those are so big and beautifuli really loved it. After a quick shower she started to kiss me on my neck i was shuddered... She let me down to the bed an started to suck my rock hard cock (BBBJ). She really knows how it is doneI asked to changed the position to 69. I was licking her pussy and (NO FINGERING). Her pussy is very shapely and fregnant i almost didnt want to stop. She was screaming and her body was shaking. She had a real orgasm my cock was almost exploded, but i still wanted to fuck her hard. We continued it in CGAs her body was waving on me it was like the Heaven. We kept to going in missioneri could deep into her. I really loved her thight and wet pussy. The time was getting over so I asked an extra hour she wanted it too:) As i saw in the other review her strip is awesome so it was my extra request from her to show me. I was tottally knocked out from her dancemy dick swollen with blood. I wanted to suck all over her boobsi buried my face in her boobsI wanted to fuck her againshe asked to do it in lazy doggy styleher ass was very shape and she enjoyed flailing her ass.I wanted to finish in her boobs (no CIM!). I really like her. She has a very nice personality, has a good English, so we could speak from Everything in the rest time. This was my best fuck ever. I will repat for sure. Highly recommend!!! :)
positive Saw Stacey's ads a few time so I decided to text and after a few attempts made contact, set up a time and proceeded to her incall. Usual 2 call system and was at her door. She greeted me in a robe with bra and panties underneath. We hugged, does not like to kiss, Sat and talked and relaxed and soon we were on our way. VIP's read on Once we were comfortable my clothes came off and she began a great BBBJ, I could have laid back on the bed and let her take me to the end but seeing that body made me hold back and I started to probe and got to the mons and started some DATY, She responded well to this stimulation and soon she covered me up and we were off to the races mish style. She has a nice butt so I turned her over and went K9--She was pushing back into me as I drove into her from behind. Pretty soon I could hold it no more and I blew in the bag. We collapsed on the bed and relaxed. There seemed to be plenty of time left so she went down on me to see if the pole would rise again. Her Amazing BBBJ got me going but this time I let her take me to near completion and jack me the rest of the way, draining me with her hand movements. All told --great time, great girl--treat her good.
positive I'm not a veteran to the scene but from what I understand it's your typical K-girl experience. Verification and scheduling was a breeze with the agency. Heard she was running late from the scheduler a few hours in advance which was a surprise to me (usually just make you wait in the car), Got to the building in a new apartment complex and headed up. Amy is a beautiful woman who is eager to please. She may have left town already though as I'm not quick in posting the review. Non VIP you should proceed with both Amy and the agency with confidence. VIP'ers read on... Entered the apartment slightly nervous as I am somewhat new to the hobby, but Amy set me at ease right from the start. She was hiding behind the door when it opened, and greeted me with a smile and a light kiss. Shoes off and we head to the bedroom. She was wearing a sexy teddy that I believe I would pick out for my GF if I had done the shopping. She undresses me, folds my clothes and we head towards the mouthwash and shower. While in the shower I get a good preview of the BBBJ after she washed me up real good. Fair amount of teasing during the wash. We exit the shower, we dried each other off and headed back to the bedroom. Once in the room we stood making out for a solid 10 minutes with FIV, sucking on those eraser nipples. Her English is limited but she knew enough to tell me what to do which is hot. She tosses me on the bed and goes back at the BBBJ. It was definitely a good one, and she knew what she was doing. Plenty of slop and DT. After a few mins it was her turn, so DATY until she couldn't handle it anymore. At this point the room was hot, so we both needed a breather. After a few relaxing deep breaths to cool off, she got up, turned on a fan and pointed it in our direction. She went right back at the BBBJ, she suited me up and we went from there. CG, then RCG, mish, then doggy. There's a mirror in the room so it was great to make eye contact while I was pounding her in doggy. Ripped the bag off and had her give me a HJ while making out until I was close to blowing. Got to that point, she bent over and I CIM and she got every last drop. Back to the shower, she helped me dress and I lead me to the door with a soft kiss. I would recommend Amy, though I think she has moved on as mentioned in the tease. Schedule with the agency with confidence.
positive This was my first time at this agency located in mid-town NYC. Nice 2 bedroom duplex in a non-doorman building. I'm not sure I saw Chelsea because previous reviews stated she was a D cup and this girl was a B at best. Overall a GREAT experience. I was greeted by Chelsea and the the Manager and they took off my shoes and asked if I wanted a drink of wine or water I opted for the water. Chelsea led me up a short flight of stairs to a nice sized bedroom and she took of her robe, she is cute, thin and small busted and I'm not convinced she the girl in the picture, We began to dfk although her technique needs improvement, she led me to a stand up shower where she washed me thoroughly, back to the room for more dfk and worked my way to her nipples which were sensitive, turned her around and started kissing her neck and back, she was breathing hard, sat her on the edge of the bed and lifted her legs and began a nice daty session she began to shiver and was literally hold onto my ears. I had her balance herself over my face and pushed my tongue as far inside her as possible, she really was into it and started gyrating. She smiled and went down on me for what I thought was going to be a bbj but NO she held my legs in the air and started the best rim job I ever had while probing me with her finger. The next event was a wet bbj while she focused her eyes on me but for what ever reason I couldn't come so on went the cover and entered her very tight pussy and for a little girl the Grunts and Groans were amazing and I quickly came. She left the romm and came back with a hot towel and the led me for another shower. I would repeat but would like to try another on of the girls
positive Contact and appointment set-up was fairly easy even with the reference check. Arrived a nice incall location and Miranda met me at the door wearing high heels and sexy outfit. Miranda looks pretty much like her pictures so no complaints there. Very friendly and I had a great time. Would recommend and repeat. After meeting meeting me at the door she gave me a quick peck before quickly ushering me into the play room. After we got to the room she gave me a hug and started a protracted DFK session as she undressed me. This was followed by a extended BBBJ session. Very enthusiastic French, with good eye contact, hand work and she positioned herself in the mirror for maximum visual effects. After finally getting undressed she took me to the showers where she washed me thoroughly and gave another extended BBBJ mixed with some body to body massage. We finally made it back to the bedroom where there was more BBBJ before she applied the cover with her mouth and we finished in missionary. We cleaned up and she gave me a pretty good massage before she asked if I could go again. This time the BBBJ was just long enough to get me going before she applied the cover and we started in missionary. Unfortunately we ran out of time before I could pop but I can't really complain. Another quick shower and I was on my way.
positive Been wanting to try Brandy based on her review. She's really a cool lady. Easy to set up the appointment after several tries. It was well worth the wait. My session was all a blur. It involved everything from dt bbbj, daty, fiv, fia, mish, cg, mutual rimming, and an unsuccessful attempt at anal but could not get it in. I was interested in her review because it was reported that she is a squirter. Got some nice squirts out of her with daty and fiv as she instructed me in exactly how to make her gush. Got it all over my face and it was so sweet. Love it when the lady tells me what to do and how to get her off. She is tall, slim, clean, friendly, horny, and I would love to see her again but it's a long drive for me to IE and traffic sucks. I will definitely repeat if I am out that way.
positive Called her and asked for an appointment but she never called so I had to keep bugging. When I finally got to her apartment, it was actually a mamasan that let me into her complex. For an older Asian lady, she was surprisingly attractive with a HOT body. Nonvips, she was worth a try even though the phone issue can prove to be annoying later down the road for frequent visitors. So after I was let in, this 35+ year old Asian lady let me into her apartment after being led there by mamasan. Her body was sexy for someone her age, which was great! Her apartment was disgusting but it was her room where we had business conducted. I only came over for a BBBJ, which I know is pretty expensive but I don't know where else to go for a cheap one. So she offered to run a shower for me, which I happily accepted, I wanted her to lick me everywhere. So after the shower, she told me to lay on her mattress on the ground and asked me how hard a massage I wanted. I said soft and she began to work on me, and it didn't last long until she started to kiss my entire body. She then took me into her mouth and kept going for 5 or so minutes until she started rimming me. I told her not to stop, but then she wanted to put the cover on. I told her no, and to instead go for DATY. She was clean down there so I went for DATO and got my face wet. She started to DT me the entire time we were in 69 and she was doing it so hard that she had to stop because she was getting tired. I told her to just sit on my face and take a breather, and soon she started going at it again. A few minutes later, she got tired again so I told her to lie down and let me FF her. I did this for about 5 minutes and soon did DTCIM, and she was choking up as I did this. She went into the bathroom and spit it out while I hopped into the shower. I asked for MSOG but she said it'll cost more. Didn't bring enough cash so I didn't get to go with it. I would definitely repeat, especially for the price.
positive Miranda is one hot mama. She goes the extra mile and is a consummate professional. Miranda has a great body, I would describe it as fitness model type, with gorgeous legs and rump. And this girl can kiss!! Miranda is a powerhouse! Once I got to the door, I was greeted with a nice hug and some DFK right off the bat. Things went from fast to high speed after that. I got three feet in the door and I was in the middle of a French preview in front of a full length mirror. Miranda on her knees, holding out her hands and saying Donation?. Almost lost it theretook care of business and then went for the shower, oh what fun we had! Slipping and sliding all over the place! Miranda rubbing her tits all over my back as she reaches around and strokes my cock was an amazing feeling. Miranda has a very nice pair of legs that melt into a beautiful ass, an absolute work of art. Into the bedroom and shes on her knees again with BBBJ, slowly moving into a 69. After that the cover comes on and several positions later I finish in doggy. There were plenty of well placed mirrors at this location and the view of Miranda on all fours while I was fucking her was incredible. After the clean up I try to regain my composure and Miranda starts grilling me about the local hobby scene. Miranda is very energetic and up-beat, very comfortable in her own skin. (Oh, and Miranda intersperses everything with lots of kisses, mostly DFK, you have been warned!)
positive Had a great time with this little gem... Place was easy to find, but parking was a little difficult... She met me out in the parking lot and took me up to her apartment. I had a hard time finding a place to park and had to park off site, and walk over to the complex... Because I was taking so long I had to call her, and she came down and met me in the parking lot... We hugged like old friends, then she took me up to the apartment that she shares with a couple other girls... She took me to her room, and told me to get comfortable... once on the table she returned and got undressed in front of the table so I could get a good look, then proceeded with the massage... Climbing on top of the table and starting with her soft hands she began to massage my back and shoulders, then rubbed perky tits on my back. Once I turned over, she did a little dance for me, showing off her body, before climbing on top to rub her body on mine... To finish, Stefani turned around to show me her beautiful ass, and worked my cock with her hands imitating using her mouth. Once I popped, she wiped me off, then lead me to the bathroom to shower...
negative This girl is a fucking hot Vegas blonde. She's really easy to reach. She responds to her emails like she's getting texted. She told me to fill out her form on her site to make it easier, so I did. She's really beautiful, all natural, and young. Service was outstanding. She got to my room wearing a shiny silver dress and matching heels. She's about 5'7", perfect height for a woman. Plus she's got natural blonde hair and blue eyes, which makes the experience so much more exhilarating for me. I like the Nordic types. We got straight to kissing/french kissing. She has very, very soft lips. Something that isn't really mentioned in the previous reviews. Also, she uses flavored chapstick. I wasn't complaining. She has the youthful energy of a teenager but the sophistication of someone much older than her. Her clothes came off and she revealed a very fit, thin, naturally beautiful body. She was very proud of the work she's done on it, letting me drink in the vision of beauty that was her nubile, young body. I couldn't wait to make good friends with it. I moved in and started sucking her tits. She responded with a giggle and running her fingers and hands through my hair. I picked her up by her backside and pinned her up against the wall. She was clearly excited by this. I couldn't keep this up for long, as I was not as athletic as I used to be, so I brought her over to the bed and we kept messing around. She and I went into the 69 position and we were still going at it. I loved her oral skills. I don't know, maybe it's just me, but blondes give the fucking best head ever. We kept going at it like this and eventually I had to put on a condom because I didn't want to pop yet. I was about to, though. She gives head like a porn actress. I entered her via missionary and started pumping her carefully and slowly. Once I was able to get over my initial excitedness, I pulled back a little and pushed forward a bit harder. She squealed in delight. Sh was into it, for sure. I kept going and going faster and faster. We switched positions and I let her have it as best I could, especially in doggy style. Great behind, that's for sure. Perfect for the grabbing! I came and collapsed on top of her. She gave me a very sexy, sensual massage after and then she blew me again to completion. Swallowed, too! I enjoyed it so much. I'll see her again, soon.
positive Called my usual Asian service and Pam said you have to try Paris. So I made an appointment for later that day. Arrived at the building and called for the door code and apartment number. The door opened as I neared the apartment and behind it stood a nice looking, tall Asian lady. We hugged and kissed and went to the bedroom where I laid down the donation. We both stripped and then off to the shower where she scrubbed me for a while. Dried off and headed for the bed. She gave a nice BBBJ as I played with her nice breasts and pussy. I then went in for DATY that was sweet smelling and very fresh. She was not real responsive so I asked for the cover and she mounted CG. We then went to K9 and then to MISH. I put her ankles on my shoulders and pounded her hard. She took it all as I came hard. She then got a wet towel to clean me up and then gave me a massage. All in all, a nice visit.
positive I was able to get screened and set up the appointment a couple days prior to my visit. I met Lyn at a hotel north OTP and she was wearing a short robe with matching bra and panties. Lyn is a sweet girl but was a little heavier than I anticipated. Took care of the donation and after a quick rinse we got together on the bed. I had a nice time but probably will not repeat as she does not offer a couple of items that I like. Lyn has a pretty face with nice titties so after she got naked I sucked those titties and went with 2 FIV along with some DATY. She got nice and wet and claimed that she had an O but not sure if that was the case. She reciprocated with a bbbj but did did not go DT. She tried but just couldn't take my cock down her throat. When I was hard I put on the condon but lost the erection so she went back to sucking my cock. She will suck your cock the whole time but with her hand at the base and not going DT I kind of lost the sensation. Since she couldn't go DT I tittied fucked her and came on her face. She does not do CIM so she immediately got up and went to the bathroom to clean up. After she came out we talked for awhile and she gave me a back rub. Lyn does not have a tight pussy IMO but she is a sweet girl that tries to please. I probably will not return as she does not offer DT or CIM plus I don't think there was any connection between us but if you like the services she offers then go for it.
positive She is a real sweetheart with great attitude and willing to please. Treat her well and you will not be disappointed. Better looking than the pictures. She arrived wearing a sexy workout outfit and I as amazed that she was much better looking than her pictures. She was friendly, relaxed and laughed a lot. The workout outfit didnt last long and she proudly displayed one of the most well toned and generally amazing bodies i have ever see. She has an incredible body- she said she spends three hours a day at the gym and it shows. She started out with great french kissing and then straddled me for some nuru fun. She laughed and made me feel at ease. The oral was great as she has this fun technique of wrapping her long hair around my balls as she was swallowing me. Then I licked and played with her pussy and she really seemed into it. I ended up on top of her and came was too fast but she was such a treat I was a bit too excited. Afterwords she hung around and we chatted for maybe another 45 minutes. She wants to please, is smart and has a knack for knowing what you like. You will enjoy the experience.
positive Great girl, delivered services as promised. She's super easy to set up with and is willing to set up the meeting through txt to make it simple. She's the girl in the pictures for sure. If your in the area go see this girl!! Texted to set up an a meeting, she responds very fast. She's super understanding too as I got stuck in traffic and made are I knew it was ok that I was gonna be a few minutes late. I arrived and she texted me her room number and I went up. She opened the door and it was a beautiful younger lady standing here in a sexy lingerie piece. She's a very sweet girl so make sure you guys are nice to her. Hand her the money and she counts it then we are off to the races. It's a little extra $ for the bbbi but it is worth it. I honestly would go see her again just for that. She sucked for a good 10 minutes while I fingered her and pressed on the back door. Finally I couldn't take it had to get inside her wetness. I can say I've never had some one so wet and so tight before. If you think you are there to get off she is there for the same thing!! Before I know it she's on top grinding into me as hard as she can telling me she loves my dick and that she wants me to keep going deep. I finally work a finger into her backdoor while she is on top and it send her over the edge and socks me and the bed lol. I finally popped and it was amazing. A little chat before I left and I was out the door. Great girl I would highly recommend
positive Text to set up appointment. Very friendly and quick response. Very beautiful and easy to talk to. Great time...will repeat Was running late but she was very understanding. Got to the door and she is stunning!! Get the donation out of the way and she takes off her tight dress and i quickly follow suit. I lay down for a massage and she gets on top if me naked and rubs my back. Very nice back rub and relaxing conversation. I flip over after a while and she starts playing with my boys. Spitting and stroking but he has stage fright. She puts her beautifully perfect ass in my face and I get hard instantly. On goes cover and she starts blowing me and showing off her skills. Very good at what she does :) we then 69 for a little while and then the show starts. She climbs on and rides me like a champ. We switch to doggy and then mish. I couldn't finish for some reason but she wanted to have an explosive orgasm and played with her pussy while I explored her body with my lips, tongue and hands. Had a nice conversation while getting dressed. Big hug and kiss on the cheek on my way out. Overall great girl and j will definitely be back when she returns :)
positive Had seen Cortney's ads and pics on some sites and when I saw she was visiting Pittsburgh knew I had to see her. Her pics are accurate and her face and eyes are sexy as hell! From the minute I entered the room it was all about getting undressed and playing whatever games came up! If you are nonVIP I would recommend her. She is not a spinner but she loves what she does and loves doing it to you! Had seen Cortney's pics for several weeks and was very interested in what I saw, but know that pics can be misleading. Her reviews also sounded like she could be a fun lady to play with. And that she definitely is! ;) Met in an average motel near Greentree (one very popular with hobbyists). She was just getting in so she had me delay my arrival for about 10 minutes. No biggie. When she opened the door I was glad to see she was every bit the sexy lady in her pics! Pretty face with a sexy, curvy figure in some sexy lingerie. She has wonderful, mischievous, dark eyes that really complement her face. Started right off with plenty of wet, passionate kissing (LFK, DFK) and feeling. We eventually got to the bed where we continued our mutual total body exams. Her BBBJ is top notch with lots great eye contact, stroking, spit and verbal encouragement. DATY/69 was also a real pleasure! Let me say right now, Cortney has some sweet, tasty, suckable lips (both sets) and she seemed to enjoy the attention! Covered up and she climbed on top for some great CFS, "ride'm cowgirl"!!! Thought she might be trying to break the bed! Then she finishes me off with an always enjoyable BBBJNQNS which she seemed to enjoy also! She is an Ohio girl so I am hoping she visits often. She was traveling with PrettLady this time and they do enjoy duos together. Cortney told me she just plain loves sex, in every way imaginable!! I can agree with that. Hurry back Cortney, I want another play date!
positive I was looking for something quick and she delivered. She advertises these absolutely rock bottom rates. When I called she directed me to an upscale location in Anaheim. She gave me the number and directed me upstairs. She has a smoking body, but her face is below average. VIP's read on... I was hesitating because of her face, but her body more than makes up for it. I set the donation aside and let her lead the session. It was only for a quick time so I knew I couldn't make any specific requests. She is toned and lean. She was whirling away on her cellphone the whole time. But, she got down to business, on her knees with a jimmy on and started sucking. It was somewhat mechanical but it turned me on. We were on the foot of the bed on the floor. Then without any prompting she got on her knees on the edge of the bed for some doggy to finish. I did not ask her to turn over for mission or CG because the view would turn me off. She made some artificial moans and clean up was done myself. It's assembly line, but that's her business. I would not repeat.
positive chelsea is very friendly and eager to please. her breasts are wonderful. i recommend seeing her. tried to book with anna, but there was some confusion about the address, so changed to cinderella at the other location and then ended up with chelsea. she greeted me at the door in a schoolgirl outfit and took my shoes off. not as immediately friendly as the other girls here. she led me to the back room, which isn't as good as the front room. i undressed and she led me to the shower where she washed me and herself off and gave a little BBBJ. her english was rough and i often had to ask her to repeat herself. she's young with a regular body, smooth skin, a few small tattoos, and very large, but still perky, breasts. her pussy was completely natural, which i don't care for. back to the room we started LFK. she asked me to lie down. she took some warm water in her mouth and then proceeded BBBJ. I felt up her wonderful natural breasts. she then put a condom on and started to ride me CG. we went through a variety positions. i told her i wanted CIM, she said that was my choice but that her pussy was hungry. her sex talk was a bit forced, but not too bad. i pulled the condom off and directed her onto her back. i started fucking her tits, which felt fantastic. she held her breasts together and moved them up and down. she held her tongue out. i told her i wanted to cum on her tongue, so moved my cock onto it and started shooting on her tongue, face, and chest. i wiped my cock off on her lips. after i finished, i thanked her, and she said, "thank YOU! lot of cum! too much energy! good to get it out!" with a huge smile. this was a great finish, i loved seeing her smile with my cum all over her mouth and face. i handed her a tissue and she cleaned up. she asked if i wanted to shower, but i declined. she went and i rested on the bed. she came back, helped me get dressed and then i left. bumped into elsa on the way out. she was very happy to see me, coming in for a kiss, which was nice. shoes on and out the door. i had a good time, but with all the good providers here, i'd probably go with someone else. but if i think about that awesome facial, it makes me want to see her again.
positive I have used this agency once before and had a great experience so I called to see who was available at their Midtown East location and was recommended to Piper. A Great experience with sensational girl The great thing about Asian women is they know how to cater to their man and for one hour I was the man! Piper greeted me with a hug and deep DFK, now that's an introduction. She took off my shoes and led me up-stairs where we began to DFK and I began sucking on her wonderful breasts, she undressed me and led me to a stand-up shower and was treated to hot soapy rub she pressing herself all over me she knelt down for a bbj while slowly rubbing my balls with soapy water, I almost lost it. back to the bedroom and I was hard like a rock and put her on the bed and buried my face in her beautiful shaven pussy. I don't know Korean but it sounded like she was really enjoying her self. I had her balance herself above my face and pushed my tongue inside her as far as it would go and she couldn't get enough. Now it was my turn, her specialty was rimming and she had me begging for more (what and experience)! Turned her over for 69 and then she positioned herself between my legs while locking her beautiful eyes on me for a sensational BBJ and came right in her mouth. she left the room and cane back with a bottle of water and a hot towel. We laid on the bed for awhile hugging and kissing but I was spent nothing left in me. Piper is lots of fun with a great attitude and goes the extra mile to please you. I will call her again and again.
positive These providers provide a great service usually, so treat them well. VIP's read on. I've visited several of the girls from asian sensation and discreet pleasures, they do offer a unique service with pretty hot ladies. I decided to try Chelsea this time. The session felt very rushed, she wanted to try and get me to cum right away it seemed. No TS, right to a nice an long BBBJ. She basically let me fuck her face for a bit, which I didn't complain about. Lot of spit, great suction. Me standing, her on her knees. Me fucking her face, what a sight. Finally asked for the hat, went in mish, pounded out for a bit, but the fake moans and stuff started to get me soft. So I turned her around for some doggy, checked the time, and kept pounding away until I lost in the bag. Overall not a bad session, just didn't connect.
positive Had met Lyn at meet and greet so knew she was friendly and hot. After screening set up afternoon date. Made it through security gate and arrived at her apartment. She greeted me with nice hug and LFK. I brought wine so she opened and filled 2 glasses. We talked and drank wine before moving on to one amazing play date. VIP read on for juicy details. Arrived at Lyn's apartment for afternoon date after clearing security gate. Lyn was as pretty as I remembered from a meet and greet. Lyn gave me big hug and LFK. I brought wine so we opened and poured 2 glasses. We talked a bit and kissed as we drank some Merlot. Lyn helped me disrobe and led me to nice bathroom for quick shower. She soon joined me and when I was rinsed off she gave very nice welcoming BBBJ. We dried off and headed to bedroom. I told her I wanted to get to know each other better through 69 with me on top. She gave great head and I enjoyed licking her fresh pussy. She had me really hot so I told her I was ready for my cock to enjoy her pussy in MISH. She sucked my cock into peak firmness and applied the cover. I really liked what I felt when my clock entered her pussy. Wet and really tight. Lyn moaned and talked dirty as I worked her pussy. I was about to lose it so told Lyn to change positions. Moved to CG and RCG. Then took break. I licked her nipples and rubbed her clit. She really like the attention. I dropped down for DATY. She was squirming and really enjoyed it. She asked if I wanted to CIM. I told her I would try, but really liked MISH for an ending. She gave great BBBJ and hand, but we finally went back to MISH where I soon had a great release. Lyn asked if I could pop again. I declined as one big "O" is enough for me. Lyn removed the cover and brought hot towel for quick clean up. We kissed and drank more wine. Lyn is a great kisser. My time was about up so we hit the shower. I dressed and after talking and kissing I left very happy. Definitely will return. Lyn is very pleasant and super hot. Very friendly with great sense of humor.
positive I reached out to Discrete Pleasures and set up an appointment in the late morning. I went to the designated location and I arrived at the door. Chelsea opened the door and she led me in. I was pleasantly surprised that the photos on the website were spot on. She brought me to the back bedroom and .... began to do some LFKing. She was very playful and liked to tease me. She helped me undressed and eventually brought me to the shower for a thorough cleaning. She then proceeded with some LFKing and then she went to lick my nipples for some arousal and then eventually the preview BBBJ. She then dried me off and brought me back to the room for some more LFKing and playful teasing. I then placed her down on the bed for some DATY and gave her a strong O. She had to push me away as I was relentless. She then lied me down for more LFKing and then nipple licking and finally some BBBJ. I was ready for the cover and she proceeded with CG and then missionary. She was very vocal and was encouraging to O into her. Eventually she gave me some HJ and BBBJ and I reciprocated with some DATO and then allowed some stripper slide to completion. We shared a beer and then a shower. We then said some goodbyes and I left.
positive I called Sophia and set up the session. Got to her place and was met by an older but attractive Latina. Into her massage room, off with my clothes and. Non-VIP - it was worth it. I found Sophia hard to understand but I got naked and on her table face down. She left and came back in the room. I peaked and could see she was nude as well. That was a good start. She made a half hearted attempt at back massage then went for my balls from behind and then started to stroke my shaft. My hand rubbed her ass and gently cupped her pussy. Then it was the flip. She lubed my dick and started the usual up and down. At this point I asked her to sit on my face and she was up for it. Her pussy tastes great and she allowed some gentle tonguing of her tasty asshole. I begged her to lube up my dick again and start the stroking motion. She gave a few oohs and has as I licked her clit. After about ten minutes of this my anticipated eruption took place. She kept stroking and I had to beg her again to slow down since it starts to hurt a little after my spurt. Sophia got a warm and damp wash cloth and wiped me clean. Then it was off to the shower and out of there at about the 50 minute mark. Worth it for the price. I just wish she spoke better English because sometimes the before and after chatter is almost as much fun as the spurt.
positive I have used this service several times. They are very professional, always on time, very discreet and very prompt with their response. I can't say anything negative about them as they have always treated me superb and have provided references timely when necessary. So I decided to see Claudia on a mild early fall Eve in the STL. Set up through email and text upon arrival. Given the okay to head on up. Always enjoy my walk to the room as my adrenaline and nerves are active with the anticipation of meeting these ladies. Light knock on the door and it opens with Claudia hiding behind it. Step in and take a nice look at this girl. She is tall, busty and blonde and welcomes me in with a pec and a hug. She is worth a visit boys. We sit down and talk briefly and she leans in and we start making out like a couple of high schoolers. She is rubbing me and I am feeling all over her. We tits are great an she mentioned she wants to make them bigger. Tall glass of water and we move to the bed as we are shedding clothes stepping to the bed while making out. She compliments me on my size and says she wants to play with it and feel it. I elect for the cover and she has no problem with it. I prefer cover for obvious reasons because I am single and dating so I don't mind a little bit of safety. Great CBJ (she will do bbbj) as I am feeling on those nice soft tits and lightly rubbing her hair as she is delivering a great CBJ. She came up and told me she wants to fuck, but I took my time and rubbed on her a bit more and lightly rubbing her pussy. The next 30 min were doggy, mish and cowgirl and I lost it in doggy. MSOG are definitely on the table, but I just went for the one as I had a couple of cocktails beforehand. She is not a clock watcher at all and we had a great convo after. Very intelligent Girl and love the accent. She likes to fuck boys so be ready for a great time in the sack. I recommend you meet at least once. Thanks Claudia!
positive I saw Farrah's ad and sent her a note to her email. She does require verification and afterwards will give you her number. Verification was very easy if you have very good references and it won't take much time to get back with this women. We set up the appointment. The morning of the appointment I texted her to get the location and I was on my way. When I got there she texted me the room number and up to her room I went. She is so sexy and pretty. She was dressed in a matching bra and panties high heels and looked amazing. NON VIPS...Go and see her, she is keeper , just run do not walk to see her :-) Once inside the room we started to make-out like teenagers and she started with LFK and turned to deep deep DFK which I always like. She is super sweet then she started to undress me. She gets on her knees and takes my rock hard cock in her mouth and makes love to my cock with her beautiful mouth. I can feel the warmth inside her mouth and boy is liking her a lot !!! . She is very young say around 24+ but her sexual intelligence quotient is off the charts. She is working my cock in and out of her mouth while playing with the boys. I say lets go to the bed...and its my turn to return the favor. She tastes so good and sweet , and I go down on her until she reaches her first O. She was moaning and little screaming which turns me on again. Continued the DATY till she reaches her second big O. She takes me back in her mouth and I tell her I want to fuck her. She grabs out a cover and puts on me then I get on top in mesh and start to slowly make love to her. She feels so tight and good. I couldn't able to lost long and pulled out the cover and explode into her stomach and tits.. ohhh its huge load after a long time. Then we cleaned up and rested in the bed just cuddling each other with lots of DFK. She likes conversation and can talk any topic with this young women. Prep for round 2, she started working again with my boy he is very responsive to this women , she got a beautiful ass which my boy want to enter I ask her for anal and she says yes...gets some lube out and we try to work it in.. It was super tight with lube the trip to greece was excellent, she like the way and enjoyed the most. Switched postitions and fucked her like 10 minutes and exploded in the cover. she cleans me up and we talk for a few minutes. Time is almost up and we say our goodbyes with great DFK. She is amazing...will see her again and again... Thanks Farrah for such a wonderful time.!
positive Sabrina is a beautiful Latina lady. Booking was efficient and easy, especially given I was working out on short notice. Though she has some physical evidence of her child(ren?), she keeps herself in great condition. He face is quite stunning and her legs are toned and shapely. She was very friendly and a nice person to be around, but the session felt rushed. If she got into it, she would likely be one to remember. The booking went well and smoothly. Amy was easy and a pleasure to deal with. I arrived at a modest Tysons apartment which could have been nice, but this was not. Things were minimal and mostly run down. I was met with a warm hug and wonderfully wet kiss at the door. We went back to the BR. Sabrina tried to chat a little, but her English is limited. Though I enjoy getting to know a nice lady, this was ok, as I was a bit surprised by how much prettier she is than her pictures. I wanted to spend some time just DKF and looking at her but, as indicated, she was intent on getting things going. What I thought was enthusiasm at first turned out to be a little too much of let's move this along. We disrobed and visually there is no disappointment. This is a very attractive woman who you would stare at on the street. Her legs are simply magnificent, her smile will captivate you, and her body and skin are silky. We moved to the bed, and I wanted to DFK to savor the moment, but she kept us moving. She laid down next to me and immediately went to BBBJ. While not a terrible thing, it disengaged us. I laid back and took in this gorgeous woman slurping and stroking. She either sensed my pleasure or just wanted to move, because I was as hard as ever. She quickly put on the cover, and for reasons I could not comprehend started some CBJ, which was almost a downer because I was ready. She lubed up a little and mounted quickly. Her hips are strong, as are her shoulders, and we quickly began rocking the bed. It was a wonderful sight, but she then jumped off and asked for doggie. I had hoped to flip her and see that beautiful face, but she kind of dug in. She clearly liked doggie (or just doesn't like seeing clients), because she sloped her back and in Spanish asked for more and deeper strokes. She certainly seemed to like it and may have had an O, because she shuddered and slumped at one point. I again tried to flip her over, but she arched her back and started thrusting back into me. That was an enticing and teasing gesture and I accommodated by lengthening my strokes. She got me into it and after a few minutes she tightened her pussy. That was wild, and I could not resist any more. She let me empty out with continued thrusts. I was contented, but again somewhat surprised when she then quickly moved to disengage. She did remove the cover and clean me up with a towel, but once we were done, while she sat and chatted, there was a definite feeling like "ok we're done, how long are you hanging around?" I asked if she had plans, and she said no, so it was a little disappointing. I might see her again and hope that familiarity helps the process. If she were more into DFK and being close it would have been great.
negative Set up was easy as I saw Lula with another provider who I've gotten to know. She contacted me by text ahead of time to break ice. She is a beautiful, energetic woman that I'm sure I will see again. Lula was right on time and texted instructions in to her place. Wow. Her pictures don't do her justice, beautiful face, body, and an incredible smile. Some conversation to get familiar with each other. Did I say wow? Time to go into the bedroom and get comfortable. The next 2 hours are pretty much a blur. Start out with some LFK and then DFK. This gal can definitely kiss. Soft lips, so nice you don't want to stop. Move down to her breasts, with very sensitive nipples that get very hard with attention. While junior is receiving some needed attention, Lula sits down on my face for some DATY. Responsive, wet, sweet tasting, and just plain fun to eat. After pop number one, some cuddling and kissing and getting warmed up for round 2. As we lay there, Lula starts fondling me, gets me going again, and I start getting one of the most intense, energetic blow jobs I've ever had. DT, spit, fast,slow, licking up and down my shaft, DT again. Time to suit up, and he climbs on RCG. What a view. Beautiful ass, tight pussy, and off to the races. I want to cum in her mouth, so she gets off, and goes at it with gusto. Most intense pop I've had in a long time. More cuddling, and try for #3. This old guy just didn't have it in me, but not for the lack of trying. Like I said, 2 hours went by way too fast, but I've already scheduled with Lula aga. I highly recommend this hot, beautiful woman.
positive I contacted Sapphire by text telling her i was visiting Reno. She replied and had me call her when i arrived and we set a date. Her place was easy to find and I arrived and called her for the room number. I arrived at her room and found a candlelight and romantic atmosphere. She made me feel very relaxed and comfortable and we both undressed and started a nice massage. After several minutes on my stomach she had me roll over and the intimate fun began. Non-VIP she is worth the visit. VIPs read on. Once my back she gave me a BBBJ but told me I was not to cum in her mouth. Once she had me stiff I asked if i could DATY. She agreed and i went down on a very sweet tasting pussy. I also began to rim her and she asked if I wanted to finger her ass while i was there. I used her pussy juice to lube her ass and fingered her ass. it was very tight and she asked If I wanted anal which I quickly agreed to and offered BB or condom and I chose the condom and she climbed on my cock and moved up and down until I shot my load. She is definitely worth the time and I will repeat.
positive Viki is a typical Kgirl, but came highly recommended by some buddies. She is very pretty, living up to her CV pics. She has very nice cheerful personality, and does present herself as a girl next door. Communication was a little bit difficult, because at times she seemed to misunderstand me. The trick with these girls is to mainly focus on the language of sex, and they are seemingly well tutored on the various aspects of the hobby. So as usual we went thru the 7-course routine, starting with a most enjoyable shower. Maybe some K-experts should suggest to one agency to rent a place with in-room jacuzzi. I'd be more than willing to pay extra for that fantasy. I saw her first in LA during summer, and definitely wanted to return. But before I got a chance, she disappeared. Fortunately I had chance to visit SF/SJ area and she kept same handle. First I have to admit my YMMV. I have special yen for petite spinner. That's why many K-girls are so appealing. A bonus for me is that she is all natural. Usually at the shower things always get very hot. I of course enjoyed her twins and cherries, all natural, which is very important to me. While she was washing me, she suddenly knelt down to minister a full blown BBBJ, causing almost an accident by me. But boy, that was heavenly. I could have exploded right there, but had to stop her. So we quickly dried and went to bedrm for the main course. As soon as we're in bed, I wanted a hot DFK session, while I do my usual digital exam. Her kitty was all bare and very lovely. While my finger was doing in and out, I heard a kind of slurppy sound matched by her light moans. That was so hot I could not wait any longer and requested the latex to prevent any premature leak. Once the latex was on, I as usual went to my favorite mish and CG. She was vivacious, with sexy sounds all that time. But thanx to the latex I held out for a long time, until at the end I said it might not be fair for her to have to work so hard. So we ended the session in 69. She was of course all set to give the full 9-course, including RCG, doggie and rimming. But, I'm a bit over-age for so many items, so content to save some for next time.
positive Dealt with this agency before, easy set up. Very accommodating. Usual two call service. Arrived on time and was given room number. Once in, regular hid behind the door, found a nice looking asian lady. Looking good in lingerie and welcoming me in with a big and a kiss on the lips. Non VIPs, she is definitely a must see, VIPs, read on... Like a geisha, Koa helped me to undress, and offered a shower, left on my own which is ok, and offered mouth wash, always good. Started with a nice heavy petting, kissing caressing, the anticipation... ripped my towel off, and pushed me to the bed, mounted me and I payed attention to he mounds, very responsive and awesome to the touch, she enjoyed as much as I did, then comes the best part... She started to go down my body, stopping on my nipples, nice mouth action, proceeded down and hit the spot, not even taking my member initially, working around it, liking, ball sucking, and going further down, not giving up until my legs were on the air and her face buried on my taint, awesome, so good, full RIM, right hand on my cock. After a while she finally went for my now raging member. She stayed there for a bit until main event was upon us. CG, side CG, and K9. All good, but the best part was going back to that great RIM, right hand on cock until I exploded. This must have been the best HJ I have had. Came in loads, she cleaned me up, had a light massage and took a shower, was helped to dress and was given a great send off, of course a good tip was cal for. She is a sweet heart, please treat her right.
positive I saw Noa's ad on the web and I'm always skeptical as to the authenticity of these girls and their photos. I emailed a fellow reviewer and he said that she's the real deal so there was no apprehension from that point on. Read on for the details but she's a class act and it was a great experience. As I said, I saw her ad on a well know website and around here there aren't very many Asian escorts so I was intrigued. After a little research I learned that she was real and was as advertised so I knew I had to connect with her. After some light screening she gave me the location and when I arrived I got the room number. She was right on time so I waked to the room. Small lobby so it wasn't conspicuous at all and I felt comfortable. I headed up to the room and the door was ajar. That's always kind of sexy. I went in and she was in the bed with a super sexy negligee on but half covered with the sheets. The room was clean and well kept. I talked to her while I undressed so there wasn't any lag time. As soon as I got in bed she started to touch me all over and we had a very comfortable conversation until she turned me over, took off my briefs and gave me the best BJ I have ever had in my life. Her skin is soft and her body is toned without being hard. Her breasts are perfect for me because I like natural boobies, no matter what size over implants. She is very sensitive and sensual to the touch and she gives and receives like no other provider. French kissing, DATY, BBBJ, any and all positions. She's really great and I hate to share all this because I want her all for myself but alas I would be doing my fellow hobbyists a disservice by not reporting. Be kind to her. She's very special.
positive Saw her ads before and set up the meet through e-mail ,great lady at a nice place will repeat After finding the place I was met by a lady looking younger than her years with a great set of tits and a wonderful attitude .After a greeting with a hug and some DFK I took a quick clean up and then it was on the bed for a great BBBJ to get me more than ready to go right into MISH .I slid into her warm ,wet pussy and had great access to her amazing tits.Between squeezing her ass and licking her nipples I didn't make it to another position before I filled the wrapper.After a quick shower and a little more kissing I was on my way .Will repeat
positive I had seen Elsa's ads & was intrigued. I read her one review & felt Elsa would provide a good time. I responded to her ad & shortly received a text reply. She was providing in-call at a 5 star hotel only 15 minutes away, so we agreed on a time. I texted her when I arrive, she gave me her room number & I went in to meet her. Elsa was behind the door as she opened it. She was dressed nicely in bra & panties with a nice lace top & lace stockings. We hugged & she gave me a nice firm LFK as I entered. She looked different than her pictures: her hair was shorter & lightly bleached to a light brown. She is super cute with book-worm type glasses. I liked her new look better than her ad pictures. Elsa is very comfortable to chat with & we talked some as she told me to get comfortable. I was already aroused & she stripped while I laid on my back on the bed. She knelt between my legs & took my hard dick in her hands & stroked it before she started licking & sucking the head. Elsa had plenty of saliva & rubbed my cock head on her lips & cheeks & really seemed to enjoy the BBBJ. I told her that was how I wanted to finish but wanted to try some other positions first. I suggested CG & Elsa climbed on & we got into a great rhythm as she ground her pussy on my cock. We switched to Elsa kneeling on the edge of the bed & me standing on the floor & fucking her from behind. Elsa gave out these sexy pleasure giggles as I pounded her, which told me she was enjoying it as much as me. She slid her knees off the bed & stood on the floor with her face buried in the sheets as I continued to fuck her doggie. Next I asked her to lie on her back & I knelt with my knees beside he ass & her legs on my shoulders for some kneeling missionary. I pounded her pussy while we added some light kissing. It was nice to see the pleasurable look on Elsa's face as we fucked. Elsa asked if I was ready & I agreed it was time, so I laid on my back as she knelt between my legs again & returned to an enthusiastic BBBJ. As I was getting close I asked if I could cum in her mouth. She replied with a maybe, if I was willing to give her a nice tip. I agreed & she sucked me until I explode in her mouth. Elsa let my cum run out into the cup of her hand & went to the bathroom to spit. She brought back a hot damp towel & laid it across my midsection & slowly wiped my cock & balls clean. That was very nice treat. Elsa sat on the bed as I dressed. I slipped the tip under the envelope I had placed on the desk when I entered. We kissed & hugged a few more times as we talked about places in the area to get a good burger. No rushing & I left very happy. The only reason I didn't rate her appearance higher is that she is a little chubby in the midsection. I will repeat & will rate her higher if she happens to lose a little weight. Great girl, outstanding performance, provides great sex, the very best BBBJ I have ever had.
positive I wasn't really sure about the agency since I had never used them before and their pictures looked great but they had reviews of other girls already posted so I gave it a shot. Glad I did. Daisi was super cute and very accommodating. I would definitely repeat when she is in town. Met up with Daisi, she has an incredibly petite body. Very small waist and small tits. Just my type. Just like her pictures. She was wearing a black slinky dress and she really wore it well. We went to my place and she disrobed. An unbelievable spinner body. We made out for a while passionately light kissing only though. She gave me a bbbj that was nice and slow. A little light on the sucking... and then she got on top CG. She was very nice and tight. From there we moved to mish for round 1 wher I finished in the cover. We then talked awhile. She wiped my shaft with a wet nap and then began bbbj again. Now I had her doggie with cover where she took a pounding and then mish again for the finish. All in an hours time is not bad! I would repeat!
positive Just had a fantastic experience and.... another one matches it! I am in a fantastic streak! Repeat: Y E S !!! Knock at the door and again i was instantly fully erected because this tall beautiful girl would have sex with me in a few minutes! After the routine and hug and LFK, the few thongs that we had on peeled from us and there we are naked and walking to her bed, touching and kissing... The BBBBJ was a fantastic appetizer, and so her fresh, clean and tight pussy that responds to your tongue fucking and licking her clit with an amazing noise and she shows that she is enjoying your doing getting even more in her superb job, blow job that is. I guess her stage name comes from the fact that she makes your cock hard as steel or that gorgeous porn star Krystal Steel, but no matter the origin of the name, she is fantastic. We both came and my juices disappear in that beautiful mouth...... just a bit of intermission and Round 2 started when she told me that she really wanted my cock inside of her pussy. I was not in the position to argue with this beauty, especially when she was naked next to me and I was licking her DDs and starting playing with her pussy soon tight around my finger, just imagining how good would feel around my cock.... You know, the invite to fuck, the previous thoughts only have one result and the fact that now she was down on me sucking my cock, I couldn't help, I got steel hard again. The Fantastic Round 2 started with her in top pf me impaling herself with my hard cock, bending down so I could lick and nibble on her nipples and than after my cock was all inside her wet super tight pussy, Claudia started riding me and slow became fast and deep as deep as could be. What a rodeo! Those magnificent DDs bouncing and responding to my squeeze were impressive, I wanted to experience the doggie with Claudia, put my hands on that firm ass and pound away, grabbing those boobs and pulling her into a teaspoon that made her come hard and loud..... too much for me and I also came very hard filling the condom, too bad I would have loved to unwrap and come into her mouth again! Maybe next time, because sweet, smart, sexy and incredible Claudia we will have Round 3 and 4, starting from where we left! Thank you very much, you are a super cool girl, a great woman and an incredible lover!
positive Finally booked Katty after seeing her pics and finished screening with the agency. Typical two-call/text system, got to her apartment and as she opened the door it wasn't the exact girl in the pictures but a cutie nonetheless... As I walked in both of us were a bit nervous but a little LFK broke the ice as I started to gently caress her soft skin. We started to slowly take each other's clothes off and I can finally see what was under those restrictive garments: A cleanly shaved pussy and what looks like natural C cups, if they were MMs I really could not tell. She led me to the bathroom for the obligatory blue toast, and to the shower where I tried to make more small talk but she doesn't know english that well. Lathered each other up, and she really paid attention to the ahole, assuming there would be rimming later on, (conclusion: there was none). No preview BBBJ so we dried off and went back to the bedroom. I didn't have much time since I arrived a little late so I went straight for DFK & 69 and started to lick up and down, in circles around the vulva to get her riled up and she must've really liked it because she was already pulsating. After teasing I lifted the hood and started going to town on her clit which made her really wet. I tried FIV but she told me she's not really a fan but I might change her mind during the next visit :) She's got a decent technique with BBBJ but i wish she licked the shaft and tip more often since that drives me crazy. Got the cover on switched to K9 and the view is just amazing. I started pounding her and this is where her volume really picked up as I started hitting her Gspot. I lubed up my thumb and started rubbing her starfish which she didn't complain about so i'm guessing that was ok. Didn't want to pop so I asked her for CG so I can play with her natural tits and she loved simultaneously fucking and getting her tits sucked. Since I was running out of time I put her in missionary and spread her legs out for maximum penetration. I can tell she was about to cum so I went into overdrive and CIM for the finish. afterwards we cuddled and DFK while I massaged her clit for the remainder of time, showered up and gave me a goodbye kiss. She's not full-on GFE in the beginning but I think for a second visit she might open up a lot more. I would def repeat with her with more time. I think a full hour would've just elevated the already good experience
positive Tatiana is a cute, easygoing chick in her early 20s with a petite body and a chill attitude. Shes easy to setup an appointment with and provides a non-GFE experience. Nice economical option. I would repeat depending on my available funds and availability of other providers. VIPs read on Was looking for a quick economical fix and decided to go with Tatiana. She had had two new reviews pop up in quick succession on TER and both were pretty positive. As another reviewer mentioned, Tatiana was around under a different name awhile back and I recognized her ad pics when I checked them out. Her pics are pretty accurate and give a good representation of what she looks like. I'm not sure why she doesn't smile in any of her pics though; I didn't see any issues with her teeth. Her number may have changed by now, just FYI; she said she is sharing a phone with a friend of hers but that she would be getting a new number soon. Just have to find one of her recent ads I guess. Anyhow, was an easy setup: texted her asking if she was working that day and got a reply back in a few minutes that she was. We agreed on a time and she asked if I could pick her up at a fast food place near where she was staying and then we could just go to a motel near there. I figured sure why not? Parked out front, let her know I was there, and out she comes and hops in the car. She's a petite little thing, cute face, dressed causally in sweater and jeans, has a girl-next-door look about her and was chilled out and easygoing from the start. We started driving and she asked if I had any protection (I didn't) and then said we could just stop at a gas station and get some and I could take it out of her donation. I grabbed some condoms and we continued to the motel which was only a minute down the road. Typical low-end place, the kind that would make me nervous if I was pulling up alone or at night but since Tatiana was with me, we could easily have been a couple just coming for some fun. The place rents by the hour and Tatiana was very familiar with it. Turns out I had to use my id to rent the room because she didn't have hers for some reason which I wasn't thrilled about but wasn't too big a deal. We were only going to use the room for our fun and then leave (I'd only booked 30 min) but Tatiana took the 2 hour room fee out of her donation anyway. Anyhow, got in the room, laid down the remains of the donation, and things pretty much went down as expected. We both started getting naked and I got a look at her body. She's petite as I said, sexy pale skin, has a very nice ass and legs. Little bit of a belly on her but nothing huge and she still looks great naked. Her boobs are probably her weakest feature, A's at best and kinda average in appearance. She said I could get comfortable on the bed, slid the cover on with her mouth and started blowing me. I hadn't been expecting BBBJ based on her other reviews and it was just as well because she had good technique and might have made me pop. I liked watching my cock go in and out of her young mouth. After some head, she asked if I minded starting in mish because I was kind of bigger and it was easier for her to adjust to it that way. I said sure and was soon sliding in and out of her tight pussy. I had asked if she kissed and she said no but then said well, I usually don't but I think I can kiss you. So we had some DFK throughout the session along with LFK here and there. I think she enjoyed herself to some extent and I did as well but not a lot of eye contact while we fucked which always sorta makes me feel kinda creepy, like the girl is pretending it's someone else or not happening at all (or maybe I'm just overthinking it). Anyway, we switched up to cowgirl and she rode me for a bit. Then as we were nearing the end of my time she asked if I wanted to finish some other way, like doggy. By that point, the condom had started to work it's incredible drying magic and sensation was reduced so I just asked for a handjob. Not much technique on her part but the combo of grabbing her ass, watching her little hand pumping my cock, and her cute face watching it got me off in about 3 or 4 minutes. Nice big load all over her hand and then she was off to the bathroom to clean up and get me some towels as well. One thing I wish some of the chicks would learn though is that when a guy cums he usually likes to be jerked or sucked or whatever for a little awhile after the orgasm, but a lot of them just immediately stop as soon as the first few spurts of jizz have shot. I jerked myself a bit as I watched her cute little naked ass in the bathroom to finish myself off, then we cleaned up, got dressed, and left. I dropped her off at the same fast food joint and that was that. Like I said, nice girl, no BS, good non-GFE fuck, and a nice economical option if you're looking for one.
positive Chelsea can't speak a word of English but speaks the language of love fluently. Worth a visit. Chelsea used to be at Cinderella's outfit but she is over hear now. Called and asked to see her because I missed out on her last time. It is in midtown Manhattan area and close enough to everything. Went up and the whole routine is the same. They help you off with your shoes. They get you in the shower. Preview blow job as they wash you and then back to the room. Chelsea has me lay on my back and massaged me for a bit then her tongue licked me from my back to my ass crack. She spread my cheeks and licked deep into my asshole. I don't get the appeal but I don't mind it - I am clean shaven and cleaned up. I stop her and flip over after a few minutes. I rather have my dick sucked. She does a good job of it and after another few minutes I had her cow girl me and she rode me and I came in bag. We rested and cuddled but she can't speak a word of English but I think she asked if I can review her but it came out of her mouth as "you rire revw" it took me a few times to figure out what she was saying but I said yes and she was all happy I said yes. I mention this because while I was happy with service - I have to wonder if it is because I do reviews or not so YMMV. We did round 2 after she did a decent massage. Did Chelseas doggy and hard and she and I came at the same time it seemed. Cleaned up in shower, dressed and off I went home. This place is almost identical to Cinderella's operation so they maybe related or competitors, I can't tell. I will visit again for new talent.
positive I saw Carmen's adds, thought she had a sexy look, so I decided to give it a try. She delivered as promised and was very fun. I have tried to repeat and that's where she has gotten flaky. I would recommend if you can get her to keep the appointment. For this guy, moving on..... I have 3 tries with Carmen. The first was a very fun success, the second went silent mid texting, and the third brought me to the east side where I was left high and dry in an extended stay parking lot. My first, and only I guess, time with Carmen was very fun. She met me on a stairs to a third floor private condo residence. She let me in a greeted me with a very passionate kiss. I fondled around a bit over clothes, and she asked what type of visit I wanted. I went with a QV, that lasted end to end just under 30 minutes. Not a clock watcher. After I put the donation down, she suggested I get comfortable and proceeded to do the same. Her tummy had a little more damage than her pics show, and I thought her butt was a little flatter, but they are a fair representation what you are going to get. We kissed nakid for a while (good kisser) as I fondled her up and down. She suggested we get more comfortable and led me to the couch. She sat me down, got between my legs, and proceeded with a very nice BBBJ. She really worked the shaft, often leaving her hands on my legs and just letting her mouth do the work. After having me in a very aroused state for a bit, she reached for a cover and put it on. We went to missionary on the couch which was a little awkward, but worked and I exploded in the cover. We got up and she ave me paper towels to clean myself up with. She went to the bathroom and came out wearing a towel and we had small talk while I dressed. Quick kiss, and I was out the door. I definitely enjoyed my visit. I reached back out a few weeks later and she said she was available. We traded a few texts, and when firming up the time, she stopped responding. Last week, I reached out again. She said she was free and gave me an address to head to on the east side. It was an extended stay close to where I saw her the first time. When I get there, she texted that she had just left work and would be another 30 - 45 minutes. I kept busy and went to the extended stay at the agreed to time. I texted when I got there and nothing. I tried a few more times with no response, and left after 40 minutes. I did grab a beer at a pub and tried one last time before I left the area, but nothing doing. I clearly enjoyed my time with Carmen and tried to repeat, however I am moving on....
positive Fair representation of the ad. Not the same girl in the picture but pretty close. Scheduling was very quick and easy. Given direction to go to the apartment complex in Fairfax. Arrived, parked and then called the scheduler to get the apartment number. VIPs read on.... Given directions to the apartment on the phone. Instructed to not knock on the apartment door. As soon as I stood in front of the apartment, bunny opens the door in nighties. Escorted to the room and instructed to take off the clothes. Then to the bathroom for shower and clean up. Got out of the bathroom and sat on the chair with mirror in front. Started with LFK, then DFK, and she started going down ny body kissing all over. Started BBBJ, and the view was amazing. I could not hold on for too long and lost it CIM. she dried me out and then went to the bathroom to spit. We laid on the bed for a while talking to her until I was ready to go again. She started agai with nice BBBJ. It was my turn now and I went down on her clean shaved pussy which tasted sweet. It was time to be inside her, cover went on and we started missionary. She was tight and nice. I was feeling good so I lost in the cover missionary. Cleaned up and laid on the bed until my time was up talking to her. Her English was not good but we were able to connect. Took the shower and said goodbye
positive Kari is a real sweetheart. (Most of the negative I describe in this review is merely unfortunate bad luck. It happened, so I've included it, but you shouldn't pay any attention to it.) Kari looks just like her pics, which I think are some of the being advertised. Her face is two clicks above average, but her body took my breath away! I made an appointment for a one hour visit for 15 minutes later, told her where I was so she knew I was serious about only 15 minutes, and she wasn't there when I arrived at her friend's apartment. Her friend let me in and we watched Iron Man 3 for 20 minutes waiting for Kari to "get back from the store." Then we had to cut the visit short for an errand she needed to do. She offered a partial refund, which sort of evened it all out. Has ANYONE ever been offered a prorated refund because the provider had to cut it short? Wow. I mean, like, wow. I made another appointment with her for a few days later, so it's pretty obvious that I do recommend her. Although the visit started late and wasn't as long as I wanted, she is certainly worth the price of admission. When Kari arrived at her friend's apartment she threw herself at me for a big hug and deep kiss like we were long lost lovers. What a welcome! She didn't seem to notice or care how very huge I am. She grabbed a thick comforter and we went into one of the bedrooms where she spread it on the floor. Definitely not ideal, as I have a bad back. I should have canceled, but I really wanted this girl. (The next day I woke up with pretty bad back pain. Lesson learned!) Kari removed her clothes to reveal the body she shows off in her ads. O, Mother Nature, thou hast created perfection! I wanted to just gobble her up. I ran my hands over most of her smooth skin, tweaking her nipples, gently licking and sucking her neck, stroking her ass, fingering her vag and clit and asshole while I kissed her. My mouth descended to her small but amazing breasts where I sucked her delicious nipples for a few minutes. (Ok, look. Every guy always says "she tasted great." But the natural taste of skin is sweat, which is either salty or bitter, or sometimes both. If she's wearing all-over body spray, that stuff tastes pretty bad. So what we really mean is there was no taste at all. I mean, how awkward would it be if she'd spread grape jelly on herself so she would taste good?) (Come to think of it, maybe I'll try that on the next nipple I meet. Humm. I do like grape jelly.) Wait . . . Where was I? Kari gently reminded me that I was still fully dressed. Hmm. Gotta fix that! I stripped and lay down on the comforter. Kari lay on top of me (O, Heaven!) and kissed me for a minute, then descended, kissing and licking all the way, to provide an amazing BBBJ, playing with and occasionally sucking the boys. I said, "I know you don't do it, and I don't expect you to, but tell me you want me to cum in your mouth. Tell me you want to swallow it all." Apparently she didn't understand that I just wanted to hear it, because she said she doesn't do CIM. I tell her I won't do it, I just want to hear it but she just would not say it. Bummer. So otherwise she's doing a great job and I'm fingering her vag and clit and asshole. Anal penetration not allowed. Again, bummer. I gave her warning (as a gentleman should) and she finished the last few seconds with her hands, and it was pretty darn good. I'd brought some small towels, and we used them, since she hadn't brought anything in to clean up with. She stayed naked until I was dressed, and we kissed again, me taking a few final liberties with her ass, clit and tits. Now she threw on her clothes and walked me to the door, one final kiss and I was gone. Phone Quote: $180 per Hour Prorated Refund Offer: $50. I refused to accept it, instead leaving it as a tip, as I want to see her again and want more and a better visit next time. Total: $180 for 40 minutes
positive Yumi, is young, exciting, adventurous and very attractive. Her English is very limited, my Spanglish came handy. She welcomed me with a great and friendly attitude. We talked for a few minutes to overcome the language barrier but shortly after the date got really steamy. I highly recommend.... I'm still mesmerized by her addicting perfume and by her sexiness! She is open to trying new things like watching porn while smashed. She took out her toys and put on a quick and sexy show to start things off! Her headgame skills are on point-unreal!!! She loves being controlled and likes it when she is told what to do in a hot a sexy fashion. She really gets into it and she genuinely enjoys the pounding! Doggy style is her favorite position, mine aswell. After some doggy she laid down and pointed down ...I eagerly began to DATY and would do it all day if I could. Her moaning and facial expressions got me ready for some more doggy. She is the cute and sexy Latina one always dreams off. I honestly enjoyed her open minded attitude. I will see her again next time she visits VA.
negative Had read Farrah's awesome reviews and couldn't wait to meet her, filled out her contact page on her website and we made an afternoon date at my hotel when I was coming to town. She arrived right on time looking movie star beautiful, hot & sexy in a low cut, zipper up the back mini skirt, wearing high heels that showed off her shapely million legs, and nice gym toned body, we hugged and ...................... LFK, leading to some hot DFK, Farrah is a Gorgeous Young Lady, with some of the most beautiful green eyes, and a super fine body.. This GFE/PSE date was on with balls to the walls non stop sex. We DFK'd, for a long while in the living room as we made out way to the bedroom, standing next to the bed we stripped off each other clothes, DFK kissing with her stroking my cock and me sucking her nipples while fingering her pussy, she kneeled down in front of me to BBBJ my cock looking up at me with those incredibly beautiful green eyes, as she Deep Throated and alternated sucking and licking my balls, all the while looking up, man she is a hot sexy lady. Laid her back on the bed and DATY on her sweet pussy, until she had a nice big "O", we flipped around to 69, and went to town on each other with lots of licking, sucking and moaning. With her pussy (and my face) really wet, grabbed a cover, laying her back on the bed with her legs over my shoulders we fucked, hard and fast, then standing doggie with her leaning over the bed with my thumb buried in her ass, as we got ready for a trip to greece, 1st in standing doggie then doggie on the bed and lazy doggie with lots of DFK. we had to lower the AC as we were sweating pretty good by now. Grabbed a clean cover so we could fuck romantic mish on the bed with lots of DFK, her legs wrapped around my back, over my shoulders, cg, asian cg, rcg, doggie and back to lazy doggie. We moved over to the full length mirrors and she gave me a world class Deep Throated BBBJ with lots of ball licking until I came in her mouth as she looked up at me with those pretty green eyes as she was swallowing my load. We cleaned up and cuddled on the bed, DFK kissing, and talking, making plans to see one another again soon.
negative Alisa is a true stunner. I loved her website and I was very happy to see that she was the girl from the photos. Though she looks extremely innocent, she can be the naughtiest of naughty girls what I got to see. I met Alisa in her private clean and nice apartment for two hours. That sexy angel took me to the heaven of loving sensual moments... Alisa is a passionate and warm girl. We kissed first and it was like a real girlfriend kiss which i enjoyed a lot and got hard. Then i got BBJ and she seemed to love it. She did some tricks with her tongue and different techniques with her mouth while playing with my balls. Unforgettable experience. Alisa has very hot pussy, shaved and soft like a peach. I licked it and she came trembling with her body and getting very juicy. I loved having sex with her cause she really was enjoying it, i can tell by her moanings and body response. We changed several positions and ended up doggy. It was an easy access to finger her tight asshole same time and great view. Second time we did in the shower with hot kisses. She did it with her hands and plenty of soap (as per my request). After that i got amazing and relaxing massage. She is natural in what she does. Real girlfriend time. Her english is perfect and she has good sense of humor which i liked. I will come back for more very soon, she is very hot girl and creative in bed.
positive CeCe is my kind of wonderful. A MILF with a tight, spinner body that she knows how to use. She obviously enjoys herself during the session which is a huge turn on for me. She can hold an intelligent conversation and is enjoyable to just kick back with after a busy session. Thought I was addicted for a second (lol!) I saw her soo many times over the past month.  Go get her! The cat's out of the bag! First, a disclaimer. I am a petite MILF GFE lover. CeCe fits the bill perfectly. From the moment I first saw her she let me know with her eyes that she approved. I knew immediately this was going to be a great date. The room was very romantically set with faux candles giving the only light. She immediately came to me and started softly rubbing her body on mine. She offered me a drink of cold bottled water from a wine glass. Then she put a grape in her mouth and offered me half from her lips. Several minutes of DFK followed. Slowly her hands caressed my entire body. She let me know with soft moans that my hands were treating her right. Still embraced we undressed and fell on the bed. She went down on me and demonstrated exceptional DT skills. She seemed to enjoy pleasing me very much. Then she laid back, inviting without asking, and let me DATY. Every time I have been with her the DATY has gotten better and better as I have learned how to best please her. This past week she went absolutely wild, cuming at least twice, and screamed "oh my god" when things got really hot. I couldn't take it anymore and I slipped on the cover. I started with MISH as I just had to keep kissing her. We then moved to doggy, then a modified cowgirl until we both popped grinding very hard with lots of vocalization. One thing about CECe is that she knows how to use her legs. She wraps them tight around you and when she can get into position to rub her G spot with your cock you couldn't peal her off with dynamite! I also love that she tells you when she's cuming. She is absolutely no rush. She also can hold an intelligent conversation as she is well-educated. CeCe is my new ATF and I try to see her 3-4 times a month. The only two limitations I have discovered are CIM and Greek. Treat her well!
positive Had dealt with Hush Girls in the past and Antonella caught my eye. She's even more beautiful in person. Non-VIPs, I will definitely repeat!!!! When she opened the door I saw a girl beautiful than her pictures. She put me at ease and I was very comfortable with from the get-go. We started kissing and while slowly taking our clothes off. We continued kissing on the bed and then the fun really started. I started kissing her all over and went down and did some DATY for a while and brought her to a Climax. Then it was time for me and she gave me a wonderful blowjob. This got me really hard and then she put a condom in we went multiple positions, cowgirl, mish and finished doggie style. Quick cleanup and then she offered me a massage while we had a nice chat. First time with her, but she's already one of my all time favorite. I can't wait to see her again.
positive Saw some reviews and decided to try them out. I will repeat when i mood for asian provider that goes extra mile. Called and set up with elsa, some how it got confused i end up seeing orange. Ahes a petite chinese gurl thats eager to llease. Go into the room and ahe took my pants off and started with some bbbj and licking to get started. Went to shower and got cleaned up, more bbbj in the shower. Came back to the room, did some LFK, she went to town on on rod and then lut the cover on for cg. We switched to missionary. I feel i will be cumming soon, so i took the cover off and pumped her mouth hard. She took the entire load and spit into waste basket. I will go back to see ither talents. I typically really like korean girls but these chinese girls are bar none when it comes to service provided and for the price.
positive I recently saw Chelsea at their new location. One of the other girls handles the appointments and everything ran smoothly. I was buzzed in and Victoria opened the door to greet me. She is easily the best-looking one of the group, but unfortunately is not currently working because she has to manage the place. Chelsea then came out to greet me as well, wearing a light blue and white schoolgirl outfit that I requested. She has a pretty face and nice enhanced breasts. She only speaks a few words of English though. They both took my shoes off and Chelsea led me to the bedroom. Non-Vips - Chelsea is attractive, but I'm not sure I would repeat due to language barriers. When we got to the bedroom, Chelsea offered me a drink. She returned with the drinks shortly after. We took a few sips and then she helped get me out of my clothing and we briefly groped each other. She then stripped naked and we put on towels to shower. The shower was nothing too great, as she washed and dried me with little action. When we got back to the room, she took off my towel and put her schoolgirl outfit back on. She didn't really kiss that much, but when she did, she kind of just stuck her tongue out a little with her mouth open. It was a strange kissing technique. Chelsea dropped to her knees and gave an ok BBBJ. I don't think she can DT, as she only took about half of me in her mouth. She then bent over on the bed and let me lightly spank her. She barely knows English and was moaning out "Oh teacher!" but in her accent sounded like teeshurr lol. I'm sure she was instructed to say it and it came off a bit rehearsed. She is still pretty hot so I didn't mind it too much. I had her lay on her back for DATY. She was reasonably responsive and after a few minutes, I laid down for more BBBJ and into 69. I handed her the rubber and had her get on top for CG. She is extremely tight and felt pretty good. We then switched to Mish and k9. In K9, I did some more light spanking and would rub her clit. She was really wet and moaning pretty loudly, so this was probably our most enjoyable position. She didn't seem to be into FIV and would back away a bit when I tried, so I didn't force the issue. I was having trouble finishing, so she did BBBJ and HJ on me. She kept saying "Oh teacher. I love you teacher." After awhile it was kind of annoying, so I shushed her lol. It felt like time was running near, so I had her sit on my face and I ate her out while rubbing one out. When I got close to climaxing, I told her to finish me with her mouth and she got down just in time as I exploded into her mouth. This is where lack of experience played a factor. After the first wave, she immediately went to go spit into the garbage can instead off cleaning me out completely. Hopefully she will learn from it. We showered quickly again and she dressed me in a nice ritual way. She walked me near the door, where she and Victoria put my shoes back on and off I went. Overall, Chelsea tries hard to please and is attractive with great breasts for an Asian. I'm undecided about repeating as there really wasn't much chemistry between us.
positive Farrah is a great UTR provider. She only had 2 reviews when I saw her but now she has many. She delivers an excellent performance. Her eyes are stunning and her body is built for sin. Highly recommended. Vips read on for details. Farrah met me at the door with almost nothing on. It wasn't long before that came off and she was sucking my tongue. I picked her up and delivered her to the bed. She got aggressive at that point and started an incredible bbbj. I backed her off to prolong the experience and proceeded in executing daty to the point of her dramatic orgasm. She recovered a bit and then attacked my dick with her mouth. I could only take a few minutes of this before cumming in her mouth. We rested and cleaned up a bit and got right back to it. Bbbj followed by cowgirl, reverse cg, doggie, standing mish, and finally mish. She was tireless and never seemed to want to stop. When I was worn out I showered, kissed her goodbye and made my way out. She was the perfect hostess. She never looked at her watch or the donation. A great experience all around.
positive A friend of mine told me about this agency, that they have some HOT girls. I went online and looked it up. I saw some real hot chicks especially one of them aroused my interest. Her name was Leonie. I went ahead and arranged a meeting with her for later that evening. She opened the door and there was this hot girl, standing front of me hardly wearing anything just a tongue and an outfit. I wanted to have her right there. She invited me in and gave me a nice LFK and showed me where i can leave my clothes and have a shower. When i finished she was walking front of me towards the bed. Oh man!!! That ass in a g-string through that mesh outfit was just too much for me! I hurried after her and got comfortable and we started to make out on the bed. We started out with a deep Dfk and a lot of caressing. Her breasts were amazing, they respond on every touch of mine. After a few minutes she turned over and i ate her pussy from behind. I loved the outfit so much i was just moving things to the side at this point to pleasure her. She was super clean and tasty. Then we moved into 69 and she started an amazing BBBJ. She loved to lick up and down my cock and then go deep. Great hand work as well. I asked her to lay on the edge of the bed and i was standing beside of her. She carried on sucking my cock until i couldn't hold out no more and came all over her huge breast. It was everywhere! One of the most intense orgasms i ever had. She cleaned me up and then gave me a few minutes to recover before she told me she wants more. I gave her some more DATY and she came while i was grabbing her beautiful breasts. Then more BBBJ until i was rock hard again. Didn't take long. She covered me up and she slide me in cowgirl. I have to say she did a great job there because my tool is beyond the average size. Her pussy sucked right on my cock. She was moaning and kissing me the whole time and came again while pushing down on me when i was deep inside her. I was very close to the end so i flipped her to doggie and started to fuck her from behind, while i was grabbing her breast and nipples. Doggie style was where i knew i wanted to pop. I asked her to push her ass up so i can squat behind her and have her like that. After a few minutes of looking at her ass and her tan and toned body from top i removed cover and came on her ass. Amazing session. She is a super nice girl and really likes what she does. I love it! Definitely repeat.
positive Smooth hook up in a familiar location, was greeted by a very pretty blond in a silk robe. Her body is made for comfort and she knows how to us it expertly piper is everything a top provider should be. Piper is awesome. May repeat. Smooth hook up in a familiar location in the uptown area, was greeted by a very pretty blond in a silk robe. Piper is awesome. May repeat. I would describe Piper as a young MILF, gorgeous face, womanly body, sensual and mature mentally. I warmed my cold hands on her naked body and the connection began YMMV. as the DFK and fondling began I knew I was in for a special session. Massage was very good and I was hard as Piper teased and caressed me. I got up and put her on the table and dove right into her sweet moist muffin. She came hard grabbed me by the cock and took me to the bed. She gave my cock and tea bag a wonderful time with her mouth and tongue. The ending was climatic.She provided a wonderful GFE service without FS, perfect for me. DATY, BBJ and yes the massage was good also. A really wonderful woman Piper is and I will definitely schedule another session with her
positive Shes definitely the girl next door that if you like that girlfriend experience! typical scenario at an upscale apartment in Costa Mesa. She answers the door wearing lingerie and walks me to the room. I will keep this short and simple. We do our blue toast and shower with no preview. After we get back we do some LFK to DFK and she gets me on the bed and starts to give me a nice BBBJ. This girl know what she is doing down there. I lay back and relax while she blows me. I ask her to 69 and try to FIV but she says no so I just DATY. Her BBBJ is so amazing that I just pop and thats all she wrote! I was happy with it because she does some nice DT because I asked her to and thats what I like so the short session was worth it.
positive I have used this agency a few times and it's been a pleasure each time. Initially I texted asking for Orange and she was available an hour later than I requested but I was on a somewhat tight schedule so I jumped at the chance to see Chelsea. It was also very convenient because we set up the appointment 30 minutes prior to the actual time, everything went smoothly. Chelsea is a beautiful girl that did her best to please, I would (and will) repeat with this agency. As I said above, I set up the appointment and was in the apartment building within 30 minutes. This was the same location as my previous appointments, if I had waited for Orange it would be at a different location near Time Square. Anyways, I arrived and there was Chelsea wearing some kind of bikini thing, I tend not to remember clothing because most of our time was spent without any. Mamasan is quite young and pretty as well, but she didn't tell me a name. Her and Chelsea helped me take off my shoes and Chelsea led me up the stairs to a clean private room. Off with the clothing and quite a bit of LFK and DFK with mutual groping mixed in. I see her breasts listed as D cup but I would say C cup, regardless they were wonderful. I went in to lick them a bit but she pushed me away until after the shower, not a big deal. Anyways, we both wrapped up in a towel and headed to the shower. She cleaned me up with some playful BBBJ for a few seconds here and there. My hands were all over her throughout the shower, she really is a beauty. We dried off and headed back to the room. When we got back, we fell into a long makeout session, lots of DFK. I grabbed her ass then picked her up as we continued making out, super hot. I slapped her ass once and she said she liked it so throughout the session I lightly smacked her butt, nothing too hard though I didn't want to hurt her. She enjoyed it and I really enjoyed it. Anyways, I placed her on the bed and went to town DATY. She was clean, tasted fine and although she had some bush it was trimmed. I must have been down there for a good 10 minutes, she seemed to enjoy it but I think it was just acting. At this point I was really turned on and BBBJ is my favorite thing so I had her start sucking. I generally like to pop once with BBBJ then move on to the main course with some added stamina. Her BBBJ skills are ok but she has nothing on Elsa. It was certainly good enough though and I served the first cup in her mouth. She spit it out into the bin and cleaned me up with a towel. Next, she had me go face down on the bed and started with a light massage, then a little bit of cat bath and finally some rimming, my SECOND favorite thing. Once I got hard again, I flipped over and requested the condom. We went through all the normal positions - CG, ACG, mish, doggy. I gave her a good pounding but I generally can't finish with a condom so I took it off and had her resume BBBJ. Time was running out though so I finished myself off on her chin and beautiful tits. The session ended with a quick shower, I got dressed and was on my way. This agency is awesome and I'll be back soon.
positive Valentina is a gem with Bella Amour. I had great time. I am glad that I was able to meet her while her visit to the US. I recommend! Went to see her at midtown incall hotel. She was waiting for me and I was a bit late. I went and knocked the door and she opened. She is about 5 ft 5, very pretty and with the British accent. She is a beautiful women that looks like a model. It was about 11pm when I saw her so she was kinda laying on the bed as it was her last day at the big apple. So we starting talking about random stuffs about life and it went on for about half an hour. She discussed about her stay at the NYC and her life back in England. So, then I went to wash my hand as I took a shower before coming and we started with DFK. It felt like she was my girlfriend and i am meeting her after a while. Then, she went down and pushed me on the bed and she started a great bbbj. It went on for a while until I stopped her as i was about to cum. Then it was my turn to give her pleasure. I did not stop until she was moaning loud and came. After then, we took a tiny break and started with mish, then we went to doggy, and then RCG, CG and then mish again. Then she went down for another set of bbbj, and the we started mish and I exploded into the condom. By the time we were done, I was way over the time. She did not even look at the clock and enjoyed the moments. I will definitely see her next time she is here.
positive Texted Kari back and forth for almost a week and couldn't find right time to meet ! one thing i liked very much about her ,she is very polite ,responsive and answered all questions. Finally Met her on a week end for QV. other than the apartment i visited i liked everything about her. i Saw 4 different women in the apartment.None of them disturbed me but the place was louder and not good environment for pleasing me . I will only repeat if i can meet her alone or if she does Outcall. But worrh visit As i mentioned above the apartment was noisy ,i literally lost the mood.I thought to leave the place but kari was looking nice and she made me comfortable. I am sure the apartment is not a good place for longer visit. lucky i opted QV.i was escorted by her to an bed room. she uses a comforted on the ground where we had fun., she undressed she looks really pretty on naked. She looks little older than the picture on the ad but still pretty.She is not having any make up nor freshen up ,Her heels are on the darker side of dirt. She kissed and bbbj for a moment, there was a woman louder on the living room which spoiled my mood very much. I wanted to leave the place ASAP. Cover on,started wiith cow girl it went for 5 minutes and finished in doggy for another 5 minutes and left the place. May repeat if she is alone or doing outcall.
positive Scheduled through scheduler and was on my way. Piper is a woman that oozes sex appeal and combines it with a GND look and old friend attitude. A lot of fun and I will repeat! Buzzed when I got to her location and went to her room. She opened the door wearing robe covering bra and panty set she greeted me with a hug and genuine kiss that warms the soul! She offered me something to drink and the use of the restroom if I needed to freshen up before we started. We chatted a little bit about this and that and began moving towards the massage table. She took off her robe and I stripped down to my comfort level and lay face down on the table. She worked her way around the table and my body with a pretty good body rub actually using some good pressure in some appropriate areas and mixed in some teasing that drove the heart rate up quickly and got the blood flowing. Then it was back to work and back to the tease repeatedly. She had me turn over and did the same as before only this time I could see the happenings when my eyes were open that is. I would let my hands wander her body as she worked me over and place her nice breast over my body and eventually my face with a deliberate hesitation so I could lick and suckle her nipples, not that I minded at all! :-) Then she slithered up onto the table with a knee on either side of my head as she ran her boobs down my body and improved my view of her kitty as she started to show a little more deliberate attention to my blood flow. She has a way with body language that will let you know without a doubt what her intentions and wishes are. As she focused on me I started to focus on her and as i did she would wiggle and move to let me know what she was going to do and how I show move forward. First light petting with squirming and a little body language to tell me a little more was needed so a kiss was in play then it was another subtle move or movements to let me know she was looking for a little deeper touch. Then she steps down off the table and offers me her hand as she pulls me up and suggests maybe the bed would be more comfortable and allow a bit more freedom of movement. She crawls to the middle and I follow and we kiss and as we separate I am moving south and as my mouth reach home she caresses my head and when I look up at her she says, put your fingers back in there! Nice to know when I have been doing something right and she wants me to go back to it! She has her quiet sensations and switches places as she begins a YOUR turn assault on making things right in my world. Her hands and mouth work together with a almost perfect symmetry and as things build she moves up so as it appears a ride is in store and she uses her hands and body to simulate a ride of a lifetime to the finish! Well done...I'll be going back for seconds as it was a pretty damn good feeling I must say!
positive Layman is a cute, spinner Suicide Girl. Her photos are accurate although I thought she was better looking in person. She has a tight, athletic body with perky Bs. Definitely not for the ink-averse. With me she was fun and playful. I found her to be very GFE-like with just one exception. I thought she offered a great value. I'd repeat. Layman has had ads for a few weeks but I really wasn't that tempted to see her as I thought her ads were a bit homely. She had a few reviews get posted and they were intriguing so I made an appointment. Glad I did as she was much cuter in person and other than a CBJ was totally GFE. Once i got to her mid-scale motel I was much happier with her in-person than her ad. She does have a lot of tats but I though she was cuter and looked more athletic than skinny as she does in her ad. Once we got comfortable she never hesitated with DFK and was quite passionate. She let me freely play with her and was really up for foreplay. S loved having her perky boobs licked and sucked and really went wild when i went down on her. She had a couple of rousing Os before she asked me to give her a break. She then wrapped me up for a sexy CBJ as I played with her pussy and ass. We then moved on to some really fun fucking. She was as into that as she was into oral. Between mish and doggy she had a couple of more Os. She then was happy to get me off with a sexy HJTC. She does some really great sexy talk that got me to an intense O which she obviously enjoyed. A little chat to end our time and then I was off. I'd definitely hi her up again. Great skills and attitude plus very good value.
positive On a recent business overnight in Orland I decided to try and visit with Farrah. After seeing her ad I contacted her via email. She did not respond immediately but did a short while after I reached out. I offered my info. and credentials for verification purposes and once verified I was furnished a number for us to finalize our plans. She is a beautiful young lady and I highly recommend her and would definitely repeat. Farrah arrived at my hotel on time. She is a beautiful young lady with a pretty face and almost perfect body. After some small talk we began kissing which turned into sensual DFK. This lasted a few minutes and eventually she started kissing down my body until she lowered my pants and began a slow almost perfect BBJ. This only lasted a few minutes and the sensation was to much and with warning I exploded in her mouth. She did not hesitate and continued until I was finished. She then slowly got up and walked into the bathroom with a sexy smile on her face. I retired to the bed and she soon returned. We chatted for a bit and she is a personable intelligent young lady that is easy to visit with. She soon started rubbing my leg and we started kissing again and she slowly moved down for a little more oral attention. This time she paid attention to the entire area and it felt great. Soon she produced a cover and before I knew it we were in RCG with me admiring her beautiful behind. We then switched to CG and lightly kissed as we continued. We switched back to RCG and I commented on how beautiful her behind was. Before I knew it we were off to Greece. This did not last long and she hopped off as I completed in the cover. After a nice cleanup we chatted a few more minutes, kissed and said our goodbyes. She is a beautiful woman and my experience was near perfect. I highly recommend.
positive Samantha is exactly the girl in the photos- she's extremely sweet and definitely a rare find, especially for her attitude/profession. have repeated and will continue to..vip read on Sam came over and first i was surprised it was the same girl lol. I'm only a few years older than her so ymmv in some things but we hit it off. came in and got warm, and we jumped in the shower together. bbbj/cim to finish that then washed up. layed around for a little then gave her a little back massage nude, once i was ready again, another bbbj..then had her lay on her stomach to finish from behind. very accommodating girl, be courteous and you'll more than enjoy yourself.. hands down one of the best bbbjs ever too..fantastic. treat her well
positive Giselle and I have been communicating for a long time; every time something would come up and we postpone. this happened 6 month ago 3 months ago when she was still in downtown are and as recent as few weeks ago she had to cancel due to "inconvenient time". Every time her communication has been impeccable and there was mutual respect and understanding of each other's situation (unlike some other providers who are very irritable and blow off not understanding problems happen day -in day-out). Finally, yes finally we made it and I met her at her very well maintained safe neighborhood incall. Again communication was perfect; texting all along till I was in front of her apartment and there she opens...WOW!!!!! There stands a 5' 8" tall gorgeous SEXY DOLL in a red lingerie with no underwear beneath; Non-VIPS: you must see her. She could have chosen Modelling as a career. Thank fully she is available to us for your enjoyment. VIPS: Read on for juicy details Will I repeat? at the peril of becoming addicted, Hell yeah. As some of the other reviews have mentioned you can call her "passive". yes she is not one of those vixens who will jump on you and ravage you on the bed... She lets YOU RAVAGE HER instead. You ask her what you want and you get it with a blushing smile and a sweet thin voice. If you did not enjoy her at the end of the visit it is your problem since you did ask for it from her. She is YOUR treasure sitting in a unlocked chest in front of you, it is YOU who needs to take it. Folks you can spend the whole time staring at her beautiful face and kissing her shy blushing face. I don't know how much time I spend on LFK and DFK and holding her face in my palms and kissing her all over. She is in fact NOT shy all. she returns sweet kisses and very enthusiastic but blushes a lot. She speaks less, just a little taciturn but once you get her going she talks and her voice is very sweet and when she talks naughty her cheek bones blush...GORGEOUS.. She also has a nice cute pug nostril goes well with her broad face and sweet smile. Of course when i am giving all attention to her face and kissing her neck and making her all giggly...the two enormous tits were all waiting for attentions. She did not wear bra underneath so I slid off her lingerie and took them in my hand and Oh Boy!!! Those are perfect natural giant "Ds" I spent several minutes doing all I wanted to on those...Motor boating them, sucking them kneading them biting the nipples lightly and sucking them. My travel to south was very rewarding and she was ready (I had already told her my penchant to DATY and be ready with a smooth platform for my action LoL). What I found was more than I expected. Her kitty lips were like a flower; petals of a purple Orchid to be more precise. I opened then delicately and inserted my tongue first and then my finger ...and for the next 10 min I was in some mystery land licking and pulling the lips and exploring insider she started to come...I insisted on 69 we swapped and my pleasure doubled with her warm lips around my johnny gave me and at the same time I am still getting the moist kitty. I told her to fuck me and in a quick move she donned me with a poncho and let me inside the rain forest while in a CG position. WoW!!! what a sight of her blushing face and two enormous boobs swinging in front of me....Several min of her doing cardio I came and with in few more pelvic thrusts she also came and she announced in a very thin shy voice.... "ah I came" blushing all over... we collapsed and curdled and talked about the place rent ..school work etc.. all the time my hands playing on there big titties ( they are huge and beautiful like the most visible parts in the whole room for me LoL) Time came for a second action and she went for a BBBJ with different positions and pressure and variation all the time giving me sexy glaces with fluttering eyes which drove me crazy. (I cannot remember the name of a Brazilian actress who also has the same facial expression and fluttering eye glances. SUPER SEXY and very Erotic) Folks in essence my appointment with Giselle is very very satisfying like a sumptuous Thanksgiving turkey feast. She is a girl who does not bore with needless talk...absolutely no attitude, no arrogance..not mean and she is there to serve you...on top of it She is a SEX-DOLL. As Howard Wolowitz in The Big Bang Theory said "When they complete Gene transformation and perfect cloning, I am going order a dozen of them"
positive Vicky is a super energetic provider who will make sure you leave with a HUGE smile on your face. She smiles a lot and is very playful which makes the experience awesome. Highly recommend her. You won't regret it. Vicky is a full of energy RA who is in my opinion 70% PSE and 30% GFE. This is a good combination since she's really wild and into the session but at the same time makes you feel like you are with a girlfriend who is only into you. A lot has been said about Vicky so I'll give some pointers and a few notes: Logistics: 1.) She recently moved down to the South Bay from San Mateo (Thank God!) 2.) Location is in the Golden Triangle at the location with bad reception. This is also the one with the large park and plenty of street parking so I would show up at least 10 minutes early just in case to find parking and get into cell reception range. 3.) 2-call system for recurring members. She's in the same org as Sally, Amber, and HaRa who just left. Hopefully she comes back. Good PO who's responsive and gives good directions. FABS Report: Overall 9 F: 8 It's her in the pictures with some photoshop. A lot of people don't think she's DDG which is accurate if you are comparing her the most beautiful K-girls but I think she's very beautiful and has the GND look. You won't be disappointed. A: 9 Her personality is great. She's really silly and funny and definitely tries to connect with you. You will think you are with a girlfriend. B: 9 Her body is near perfection in my opinion. She has well done breasts which are soft on top and tiny bit hard on the bottom. It's a good complement and size to the rest of her body. She's skinny with a tiny bit of belly and the right curves to hold on when you are in multiple positions with her. She also has those back dimples near her ass which look great when you are in DS. This is the body type I love. S: 10 She is super wild. Her moans are great and she talks dirty. She encourages you to F her as hard as you can and tells you she is horny all the time. Trust me, I smiled the whole time I was there. It was an unforgettable experience. Good menu (DFK, Mish, BBBJ, CG, RCG, DS, etc). She loves to kiss so it was DFK for the entire session. She is also fluent in Mandarin and Korean and in the process of learning English. She's a smart gal so she's catching on quickly. I highly recommend her and she is definitely one of my ATF now. She's planning to stay for at least 2 years which is awesome for us. Treat her well guys! I don't want her to leave early.
positive Standard 2 call system. Texting is used which cuts down on the bad English. Easy to find. Safe and easy parking. Nice K-girl. Young and firm body. Very interactive and willing to please. I have seen her twice and highly recommend. On my second visit I just had to do a little P2P in the shower. Almost lost it right there, but focused and cooled off enough to get dry and to the bed. She did a great cat bath on the bed and we ended up in 69 soon there after. What a great looking pussy she has and the cute noises she makes were a real turn on. More p2p and finally main course. I had to go slow and steady and still was on the brink many times. On to doggy to view that fine body and ass before I blew my load on her back! Great clean up with her mouth and she invited me into the shower again. We hopped in the shower to rinse off and had some more fun and some dfk. After the shower, we went back to the bedroom for more bbbj. I got on top of her to give her some DATY. . I don't know if she used any lube but it was nice and moist. She then got on top to give me some p2p. After a little grinding, I got hard again she slipped me inside her. We start to go at it like horny teenagers. We switch into different positions until I am about to pop. We end up in mish and I start to pull out to cum and she clamps with her legs says, It ok. That pushed me over the edge and my second pop was well, popped. She stepped out to the bathroom to rinse. After she is done, we rested a few minutes then its is time to go.
positive I saw Farrah's reviews and liked what I read. Had to give it a shot. Email only contact for first visit and I guess if she approves she gives you her number. Easy to set things up with her and I hope definitely to repeat. Easy to communicate. She responded promptly to emails. Got to her hotel which was slightly upscale and gave me room number. She had the door cracked for me and she was wearing thong and bra. Wow. Just an awesome beautiful face and body. Something about her makes you feel very comfortable from the start. Started with some DFK and before I knew it my clothes were off. Like in her other reviews and as she stares on her web site, she wraps her lips around your dick and looks up at you with those incredible eyes.... I could just pop thinking about that. She got me very close with that incredible BBBJ. Had to try some RCG. Just a great site to see. Did that for awhile. I was really thinking how great it would be to pop in her mouth so I asked if that was ok and she said of course. It didn't take long and she drained me of every drop. It was awesome!! Still had some time so we layed around and talked. She is a really nice person. I hope to see her again soon.
positive Text Sofia late one night because another provider didn't do it for me the day before and to my surprise she responded and I was on my way to her location I get there and call and she tell me where to see her and she is the girl in the pics but a little different once inside I get inside her hotel room and we sit and chat for a bit and she then starts to rub my lug then my cock (le check) and I grope her tit and she then says let's have some fun she goes to the bathroom and tells me to get comfortable so I take my pants off and lay on the bed she comes back and she starts to strip and she has a few nice curves her ass is nice and round but her breasts are smaller then they appear in the pics and with her bra on and they are a bit droopy but owell, she grabs a cover and starts with a cbj after I got hard she asks how I want her and I ask for cg but she said she doesn't do that so she suggests doggy ok we go at it for a while then we switch to mish so I can look at her pretty face as I pound away hard and she takes it good, I tell her I'm about to bust and she tells me yes "yes daddy cum" and that got me hyped, I ask if I can come on her face she says no so I ask if coming on her tits is ok and she agrees, I keep pumping till I'm about to blow and pull out and take cover off and unload on her tits and belly, she gets up and we both get dressed and I leave might repeat if in the mood, but I like variety
positive Call and text system. The mama-san told me I could go up to choose a girl, but as soon as I walked in a gorgeous, slim and busty Chelsea in see-through lingerie came to me and kissed me like she was an old girlfriend. Gorgeous face, beautiful eyes, cute nose, smooth skin, perfect breasts, great proportions. I was immediately turned on, and went into a private room, with a large bed and mirror (always sexy), for a session I'll never forget. Chelsea is super bubbly and enthusiastic, but also frequently showed flashes of an edgier and kinkier side. Sometimes she over did it with her enthusiasm, but overall I would recommend, and will probably repeat. FYI: I initially booked through AsianSensation88, and was told I could choose a girl. I was eventually paired with Chelsea. I realize now, after searching for her specifically, that she's listed on DiscretePleasures. Mama-san asked me by text for my TER id, which immediately made me self-conscious since I realize that they could read my reviews. But the upside of that is that they really go out of their way to please since they're familiar with what TER members like. When I arrived, I was struck by hoe calm and soothing of a place it is. The dim red lights and scented air make it a very peaceful getaway. Chelsea greeted me right away with the enthusiasm of a puppy. She was wearing see through lingerie that showed off all her assets. Her breasts, though probably fake (I couldn't even really tell) were perfect. And her face is gorgeous. Very smooth skin, beautiful eyes, and a cute little nose. After I took off my boots (warning: try to bring easy-to-take of shoes when you go), Chelsea and I went into a private room. I was very happy to see that there was a large mirror right next to the bed, which always makes my sessions twice as hot (I wish I could search incall agencies on the basis of whether or not there's a mirror in the room). Chelsea refused to let me take off my clothes by myself- she insisted that she take off my clothes. Throughout the process we were rolling around on the bed, alternating between DFK, fingering/stroking, and coy playfighting. I felt like I was a teenager again, and I mean that in the best way possible. When we were finally in a sufficient state of undress, Chelsea zealously serviced my cock, balls, and taint. To be honest I was surprised that she went as far as provide some really enjoyable rimming. And then she got on me, spun, and before I knew it we were 69ing. I was pleasantly surprised that her pussy and ass actually tasted good. Her BBBJ dicksucking, meanwhile, was awesome, with a good amount of DT and care for the boys. When the time was right we finally put the cap on and went at it. We started in missionary. It was good, but I'm not going to lie, I was a bit taken out of the moment by Chelsea screaming loudly and telling me "You're so good baby, fuck me!" It felt kind of fake and was distracting. I would have preferred to hear gentle moaning, which is why I would often kiss her during the act. I eventually flipped her over to doggy, which looked fantastic in the mirror of course. Although I usually like CIM, and the way things were going she probably would have done that, everything felt so good that I just finished in the cap during lazy-doggy. Chelsea tried reviving the snake for a second go-around, and I was impressed at her efforts, but I was tired and content to just play with her and get a little massage. After some clean up, we took a shower together (which was also sexy) and then got dressed. Overall a great experience and I will probably repeat. Chelsea is definitely someone who goes to great lengths to please. The only knock is that her very enthusiasm can be excessive to the point of feeling fake, but I feel like this is the type of thing than goes away with increasing comfort, which is why I'll probably repeat.
positive Called the number on the ad and she picked up. She was very clear and up front about the services. She wasn't the girl in the photos but had all the same features and was very attractive. She was wearing black lingerie and really high heels. She gave me a hug and she escorted me to the bedroom. She asked me to get comfortable and lie on the bed & leave the donation on the dresser. She turned on some music and left the room for a few minutes. The massage was decent with oils. She made good conversation asking me about myself. When she flipped me I was nervous and soft, but that didn't last long. I asked if I could touch her and she said yes, so I went straight to town. She wasn't toned like the girl in the photo but she was extremely fit and tight. Pussy was shaved and extremely smooth to the touch. Breasts were rock hard. I popped and it was a good time overall. I think it was a little expensive for what it was, but if money wasn't an object I'd do it again.
positive I had seen Lyn's posts on TER and some other sites and had to see her. I contacted her through P411 to start the screening process. We emailed and texted each other a few times to get something set up. She is very professional and I couldn't wait to see her. We set up a date/time and I arrived at her incall. She gave me great directions. I opened the door and she stood behind it wearing a sheer black robe over some thigh highs, heels, sexy panties and a bra set. She looked amazing. She gave me a hug and a quick LFK. I had brought some red wine and we moved to the kitchen to pour ourselves a glass. We talked a bit, but i couldn't get over how hot she was! We started to kiss a little in the kitchen...some LFK and DFK with a little rubbing. She walked me to the bedroom and we sat on the bed and made out a little more. I told her I needed a shower after the day and she got everything ready for me in the bathroom as I undressed. I asked her if she wanted to join and she said definitely. I left the donation on the bed and got in the shower. She joined me and her tits and ass looked amazing as she stepped in. We started with DFK and she moaned in enjoyment. Soon, she was sitting on the top giving me a world class BBBJ. She may give the best BBBJ I have ever had and that is saying something. We dry off and move to the bed. She continued with her BBBJ skills. I sat on the corner of the bed with her on her knees in front of a mirror in the room. She would DT, spit, suck on my balls, use 2 hands...it was incredible. Soon, I asked if I could cum and she said "anywhere, but I want to taste you!" Damn! I about lost it there. I stood up and she opened up, sticking her tongue out as I jerked my rock hard cock... soon I unloaded all in her mouth and on her face. She rubbed it all over her tits and spit some back out of her mouth...So hot! It was true PSE. I am hard thinking about it. I moved her to the bed, applied the cover and we started in Doggie. She has a great ass. We moved to Mish and started some more dirty talk. We did CG, reverse CG and other positions before back to mish. She likes some light hair pulling and dirty talk. Soon she had a huge O. It was so hot to watch her cum. I could have fucked her all night. She asked me to cum again in her mouth. I lost cup #2 in pure ecstasy. We laid and talked a bit. She was never concerned about the clock and really knows how to treat a man. I really enjoyed my time with her and cant wait to see her again. She may be my new ATF! Thank you, Lyn.
positive I have seen the lovely Farrah a few times at her nice incall locations. She is everything that is advertised. She is a hot, intelligent spinner and acts much more mature than her age. NonVIPS she does screen - so check her out if you can. I consider this one a close replacement for the legendary Michele 1 L - who left the game recently. I met her at her incall near OIA. She greeted me each time in a bra and panties. Very receptive and mature - great eye contact and you can tell she really enjoys what she does. She begins by some light kissing and some light fk all the while she is removing my clothes - while my hands are busy roaming all over her. She then goes to a BBBJ on her knees with a lot of her own juices flowing. Funny thing is I asked her on my second visit how she got so good at this at her age and she told me that she had only had two real boyfriends (I guess before entering the hobby). Anyhow, after a while she covers me up and we go at it with her on the bed and me pounding her off the side of the bed - what a view! We switch to doggie and after a brief time I shoot into the cover. She offers to clean me and lies on the bed naked and we talk about the hobby and general things for a while and way past my time allotment - not a clock watcher. She is very sweet and I hope she stays that way! I will repeat as often as I can.
positive We had be communicating back and forth but schedules didn't align. Shortly thereafter they did and boy I'm glad! Fella no questions asked go see Leya. VIPS read on for the details.... So excited with address I'm heading to a spot I have frequented so get there no wait given the room and head up. She opens the door and is hiding behind and out pops this sexy tall lady. Glad I pulled the trigger lets get started. We TCB and I head to restroom to freshen up. Out to the bed and she on the dick nice head really nice. I sampled the pussy which was fresh and clean and I shit you not she damn near drowned my ass. My face chest neck was all drenched! I was loving it and apparently she was too she asked if she could lay down while I ate sure she must have skeeted 6 times! She was past wet and told me to put my fingers in and I did. I was massaging the starfish too. She finally got her fill and said get in this pussy and I did. Straight doggy and nothing else she moves well and the pussy is snug. We go at if for about 10 minutes then I bust in the bag. No rush chilled out in a wet bed! Then mustered up the strength to clean up and dress and she compliments me I how well I ate the pussy and said please come back. Well shit now I feel like a star. Don't fuck this up gents she's a gem. I will repeat! Happy hunting!
positive was in manhattan, checked out the latest offerings at my favorite agency. I saw Angelina Nicole's pics and really loved the hardbody...easy set-up as always, head to the spot, Angelina opened the door and the fun got started tight away, non-VIPs, she's my ATF, VIP's read-on Angelina opened the door and launched into the hottest deepest dfk and groping, super nice, super sweet, smoking hot, some hardbody chicks are a little too muscular, but not Angelina, just 100% bangin' body... i hit the shower to clean-up, come out to a angelina in super sexy bra panties and garters, proceed to lots dfk, progres quickly to PSE dirty talking, spanking, generally having a good time. i untied the two bows that held her panties on, finger her gently, sucha sweet shaved pussy. she lays on her back on the bed, im kneeling at head, she starts BBBJ, probalt he best i've ever had, sucking the balls lots of spit, while I continue to play with her clit. finally, i get too hot, I have to fuck her, i flip her over, she's likes getting tossed around. i cover up and hit ut miss till the first pop. in the cooldown after the first pop, instead of the sometimes-awkward forced banter between rounds, she say "do you want to wokr my pussy the vibarator and watch me come?" i say OF COURSE! she lays on her back, gets out a giant vibrato, i'm knelling between her legs. she works it herself until she comes, then hands it to me an says you do it. feeling her taut legs tense up an shake while she came and came was incredibly hot. i cover up for round two, start miss, flip to doggy, then doggy off the end of the bed, the standing up from behind, then baggy to doggy on the bed and i finally pop he second round. she hopped in the shower with me on the way, and we had a great time chatting. i can't recommend her enough. my ATF, i shall return...
positive So a month ago a provider friend gave me a call and said she had a friend I should meet.She put Devin on the phone and we hit it off like gang busters. So I went and picked her up , we went to a nice seafood restaurant and while Devin ate very little she enjoyed it and conversation was non stop. We get back to my place and Devin enjoys a few glasses of wine....yes in the rotation as a weekly Now Devin has baby fat but with her face and personality it does not matter.Once we get to lfk then dfk everything heats up. So in the bedroom we get au natural and start the making out.Devin is so great at everything I am not sure where to begin... First off let me say this lady can kiss with the best of them, and we kiss for like 15 minutes just getting amped up hotter and hotter.Then I venture south and she is sweet and tasty and really enjoys it when you put your fingers in , in fact she loves it! She climaxes several times this way and she is whimpering up a storm. I come up (face drenched) to more dfk and then she goes to a spirited BBBJ , then she reverses for 69 and I am tearing up that pussy with fingers and tongue , eventually we start in misch tho. She rubbers me up and I enter her and she starts climaxing right away ( you can tell cause she tightens up and if your not a full mast she will push you out), and man it's so intense .I give her a few minutes then I'm back in there and less than 3 minutes she is O'ing again. Then she wants on top , and in short order I understand why, in this position she easily controls things. Blasting off a few more O's squeezing him nicely, as I am suckling those nice ta ta's . Then it's more making out , more bbbj, more 69 , more ,more ....I do come later in misch but by then the sheets are soaked , as is my hand, face and balls, wow what a woman!! Eventually I will do a double with her and my friend ( as they are both bi).
positive Anastasia agreed to meet with the typical 2 text connection. We met at a motel and I was a little spooked with the number of staff wondering around cleaning up the motel all with walkie-talkies and using them. Granted it was noon. I moved my car to a more out of the way place and went to the room. She was wearing a simple black mini dress, panties and heels. She greeted me with a kiss and a hug and we sat down for a second. Next thing I know the dress is off and she is in just her panties, I felt very over dressed. Would I see her again, yes. for the details on to the VIP ... Only my 2nd trip to see a provider but this time less nervous. Brought two bottles of white wine and we sat and had a glass and talked to get to know each other. I had scheduled 5 hours with the expectation we would go at least twice. Once she slipped off the dress, things progressed quickly from there. Because of her name, I brought a grey tie, rope, handcuffs, .... more as a joke. We did not use any of that. I brought rubbers and she wanted to use one when she went down on me, not a problem for me. She is in her 30's but I gotta tell you, she is tight. We went at it for a good two hours, multiple positions, her on top, me on top, and then I finally got off. I noticed about every 5 minutes she was grabbing at the sheets and rolling her head. This gal REALLY enjoys her work, she gets off on it. Seeing her get off so much was a first for me, I enjoyed that. Took a little break, had a little more wine and we were back at it in no time. We were busy for 4 of the 5 hours we were together, really had me panting. Unfortunately I did not get off the 2nd time and she was working at trying to get me off right up until I zipped up my pants. I had to go. :-( I have a thing for stockings and garter belts, nice lingerie and she came in a black A-line mini-dress , heels and pink cotton panties. :-( She promised next time she would dress for me. As far as attitude, performance, making me feel comfortable, taking her time and giving her all, she was fantastic. The location and atmosphere took a little off of it. Once we got going, I wasn't thinking of that at all. Would I see her again? Safe, friendly, outgoing, eager to please, decent body and face, and fun to fuck, Hell yes I will go back.
positive When I first saw her add I decided that I wanted to see her. The first time I tried to schedule a session there was a computer problem so But he time it was fixed I was no longer available. Early in the week I sent an email requesting availability and was able to find and schedule with this lovely lady. Arrived at location and rang the bell, was let in and walked up to her suite and opened the door. I was greater by a tall blonde lady wearing a silky reveiling robe over her bra and bottoms. Was treated with a welcoming kiss and hug. Proceeded to undress and move towards the massage table for the fun to begin. Upon climbing onto the table her top immediately came off showing off her very nice looking natural breasts. She started the session with a very nice moderate pressure massage more than occasionally reaching in to tease and please. After a few minutes of this she dropped her bottoms and started to lean over me warming my body with those tantalzing breasts. Then climbed on the table as started a body rub were I could enjoy and feel the warmth and sensuality of her curvy body. I reached up and felt her warmth and her response to my touch was " do you want to just turnover or shall we move to the bed?" I chose the bed. When getting to the new destination started in with DATY and was pleased with her readiness, willingness, and resposivenes. A real dining pleasure. It was not to long before it was my turn and she was more than willing and able to return the favor and although Piper is new to sensual massage she is and expert with the BBJ and the BLS combination. Combining the mouth and hand had me totally relaxed and happy. When finished with that went back to kissing and nibbling on those beautiful nipples and her on mine. Through he session we had a lot of light conversation about th hobby and some of our mutual aquaintance but never enough to break the sensuality of the session. A beautiful lady with a wonderful pesonality. Definitely glad I chose to see her.
positive I set up an appointment by email with Pipers scheduler. After a couple verification emails, appt was set for later in the day. I arrived on-time at a familiar incall studio that she shares with another fantastic provider that I had seen before. Overall great experience. I would recommend. I arrived and was buzzed in. After climbing a few flights of stairs, i was greated by beautiful blonde piper. She showed me to the table and offered me a water. I declined and procceded to undress and got on the table. Piper started with a nice massage with deep pressure which i prefer. After some time massaging, she lost her panties and climbed up at the head of state he table and layed on top of my back rubbing her large breasts up and down my back while teasing my sack from behind. She asked me to flip and rubbed my front with a little teasing. Then we headed for a he bed and i put a couple fingers in her already wet pussy and finger fucked while rubbing her gspot and her clit wih the other while she was stroking me. I slowed her down on me so she could get off first. After she had acouple strong o's , she started a fantastic bbbj to completion. It was a very nice time and I may repeat.
positive I've never been with a black girl before and wanted to give her a try. Glad I did. Called and set up was easy. Met her at a hotel in the area. She knocked on door and I looked through the peep hole. I got instantly hard.... She walked in with a smile, and a light kiss on the lips. She asked if she could freshen up and I showed her where the bathroom was along with the donation. After about 5 minutes she came out, with me waiting on the bed. She crawled up on the bed and asked me what my favorite position was and I said doggy. She said that was her second favorite. I asked her what she liked doing the most and she said riding that hard cock of yours. She unzipped me and started giving me a wet sloppy blow job. I was still hard from the moment she walked in and she got me even harder. She had me lay down and took her clothes off. The rest of mine came off too. She climbed on top and started riding me slow at first. Then she picked up the pace and was moaning my name loud. She asked if I wanted to take her from behind. HELL YES I SAID.. She climbed off of me and had her ass up and head down, just the way I like it. I pushed inside of her tight pussy. I was pushing forward and she was pushing back. She asked me to pull her hair, which I did and turned her head to look at me. The lust in her eyes made me shoot into the condom. After a while she said she had to suck me off once more and she did a great job. I came in her mouth and she excused herself and spit it out. At least I think she did. We talked for a bit and said our goodbyes.
negative Very easy to get a hold of, super response, and easy to make an appointment. Met her at her incall location. The sweet young beauty greeted me from behind the door as I entered her place. A pretty significant language barrier as she doesn't speak much English (use simple words), but her body was absolutely amazing... She welcomed me into her place wearing only a bra, panties, and kindly asked me to leave my shoes at the door. She directed me to her sparse bedroom where we got straight to business. Very little conversation and little foreplay, she went straight to a BBBJ (which was a little lackluster). Quickly moved on to some 69 for a better view and a taste of her lovely pussy. After a bit, she moved on top and had a great ride to finish me off. She has a truly wonderful sexy body. Even though we had some time left, she seemed to shut down a bit, no interest in round two. Not much of a GFE, but still an amazingly hot woman. All depends on what your interest is.
positive Silk Tigers is my favorite establishment and I've had my eyes on Bianca for awhile now. I finally took the plunge and was very satisfied. Very hot girl who was eager to please. VIPs read on. . . Same easy set-up as I've come to expect from Silk Tigers. I was able to book a session with Bianca within the day. Arrived on time and was met by the friendly mamasan who brought be back to the room. I got ready in the room and waited for Bianca to arrive. When she is, I was very pleased! Wearing a hot, tight dress which emphasized her very full tits. She has a nice face also and a good round ass, which is a plus. Went back to the TS and got the standard treatment. Good scrubbing with light talk and a little cock play, but front and back. Bianca has a great attitude and made me feel like I wasn't her umpteenth client of the day :). Back to the room. . . took care of the house fee and then time for a nice massage. As per usual, Bianca is not a therapeutic masseuse, but still makes an effort. There was a lot of teasing along the way, which is a very nice mood enhancer. At one point, I asked her if she would take off her top for the remainder of the massage, and to my delight, she obliged. This was fucking hot as hell . . . as she massaged my back and legs, she let her full titties rub along my body. So hot! After the flip, we agreed on the price and took care of payment. I went for the full service. She didn't take too long to deal with the cash, which was nice. Back in the room, she stripped down to her thong and let me admire her hot, full-figured body. Wow! Those huge tits sure as hell look natural. She climbed on and started kissing me up and down my body, then moved down and started slapping the tip of my cock against her nipples. Damn! She grabbed some oil and greased up her tits then slid my shaft back and forth between them. . . I almost blew right there. Then down for the patented oral application of the condom into CBJ. Very nice. I was in the mood to get going, so I stopped the cbj short and asked her to climb on. A little oil on the kitty and she started a very nice ACG session. I asked her to spin around for some RCG and loved watching her ass grind away from behind. We moved into mish and I stood up with her sideways on the table. . . before blowing I wanted to get in some doggie so we got up and assumed the position. I rode her to the finish line grabbing those delightful titties from behind. What a session! Silk Tigers have a new ringer in my book. Afterwards she flirted with me as she dressed me up, which was a nice touch. Then out the door!
positive I have been seeing Katty for about a month once every few weeks. She is a cute and fun k-girl that aims to please. The initial screening process was quite easy and the location is at a nice apartment complex in OC. Once I got to the door and knock I see this hot korean gem and she greets me with a warm DFK. We walk to the bedroom and the fun begins. Katty is a fine korean girl with nice natural breasts and tight pussy. She loves DFK and was pretty much down to do whatever I asked as long as I was respectful. We do the usual routine the shower first. Then I lay on the bed as we gives me a solid BBBJ. After I can't take anymore and ask to fuck her she puts on the condom and gets on top of me. Once thing I really enjoy is Katty's cute little moans as I am fucking her tight little pussy. It kind of felt like I was in a Japanese porno. The session was never rushed and it truely felt like a legit GFE experience.
positive I met Neva at an incall location in downtown Montreal. She's fluent in English. She is in great shape and is extremely athletic looking. She matches her look with a great attitude. We had a very hot session. I booked with Neva (who is in high demand) a couple of days prior to the session. James runs the agency and is very easy to work with. He texted me the address of the incall location, and when I arrived at the building, he provided the flat number and I proceeded to the flat. Neva answered the door and we had some nice conversion... her English is better than her French so she was happy to hear that I am a native English speaker. She's around 30 years old, so she is a bit more interesting to talk to than the younger escorts I usually see. Soon we went into a passionate DFK, which Neva seems to adore more than most escorts. I could have done that all day but I also needed to explore the rest of Neva's body, which is as tight as I've ever seen. Her six-pack abs told me that she spends hours per week in the gym. I went down on her for DATY and she was responsive. She answered with BBBJ and a rim job (the latter of which I never had before)... Very hot. Full service (with condom) was missionary and doggy... I had to go slow since I wanted to get my hour's worth, so I wasn't pushing any boundaries there. I removed the condom for more oral action, and finished in her mouth. We developed a great rapport... it was nice to talk to a Montreal escort so effortlessly (with no language barrier). It definitely helped my comfort level and resulted in a thoroughly enjoyable session. I plan for a repeat rendezvous with Neva when I visit Montreal again.
positive I go fairly regularly to spellbound and decided to give mika a shot. i'm glad i did as she is one of the best providers there. more than worth it. vips read on mika was wearing a robe as i entered that revealed a smoking hot boy and immediately started small talk and making jokes about baseball and Green Bay packers. after I got undressed she immediately got quiet and came in close rubbing her legs on mine. very nice. after some nice rubbings she turned away to me and showed me her fine ass and starting gyrating it. nice! I slipped down her panties and immediately set to caressing her clit and wetness from behind. after a while she turned to face me and lay back down on the table and i slid down, licking my way to her clit. little circles all around with my tongue. very nice. after a couple minutes she convulses in a giant o, or at least she is a very very good actress. after she recovered i hopped on the table to join her and she gets down and lubes up both hands and gives me an exquisite two handed release. very powerful. she cleans me up and am out the door. she is easily one of the best providers at spellbound and a lovely woman. I would rate her higher 10 but I don't think any of the extras qualifies her for a score higher than 7. treat her nice and often. I hear they raised their prices so it may be awhile before I see her again.
positive Standard 2 call system. Super easy to set up. No doorman, nice building. Walked up stairs so didn't have to ride elevator with anyone, door right outside stairs. Phone girl was hot and Chelsea was suuuper cute, place looked clean and reasonably nice. I'd go back there, and Chelsea was great, but I wouldn't see her again. I want to want to, but I just don't want to. She might be perfect for others though - nice, skinny, very pretty, nice boobies... Just didn't work out well enough for me to repeat. Walked in and was led into the room by a very happy Chelsea. She's super super cute and eager to make out. Not a hardcore one, but just nice enough that it seemed sort of natural and not porny or annoying. Quickly undressed. She's got a fantastic body if you like skinny girls with great little grapefruit tits (I do). Puss was shaved below and trimmed on top. I prefer fully shaven. Took me to the standup shower which, honestly, was kind of gross. Shower curtain was super moldy. Pretty big turnoff. But she gobbled my dick down in there so whatever. Took us back to the room where she gave me a nice, not amazing, bbbjtc. That is, she sucked my dick til I busted in her mouth. Then she spit it out in the most awesome way ever. Took a swig of water and then literally just opened her mouth onto the floor as if she was a steamshovel dumping out fucking debris into a dumpster. I thought it was onto the floor, at least, and then I saw that there was a garbage there. Didn't matter. The noise she made, like she was coughing, gargling, and dying all at once made me laugh. Anyway, then cuddle, a little sucking again, then she sat on my face (nice puss), got ready to bone. And that's where things fell apart. I dunno, maybe I was too big for her... She wouldn't really let me in all the way. Doggie was not fun (she kept her back arched like an angry cat and wouldn't let me all the way in). She rode for a bit but did the same shit. Then back to her back where I finished. Then I showered, asked the phone girl if she'd ever consider working, and got on my way. Chelsea's attitude was great, she was really really attractive. But the sex just didn't work. Oh well.
positive I tried several providers I had my eye on and wasn't connecting with any of them. Trisha couldn't see me until later so I told her I would call another day. I set an appointment with a new girl and went to her location but she wouldn't return my texts (said she was getting ready for over 30 minutes!) so after awhile I called Trisha and said I could make the later time - one of the best moves I ever made! She was very pleasant on the phone and said she would be glad to see me. I rushed across town to a nice suite hotel and ran up to her room. When she opened the door, I realized the guy who posted her first review was dead-on in his evaluation; she's a babe! Trisha opened the door and I was stunned by a gorgeous little spinner. I thought right away she had been a high school cheerleader (which she was). She had a tight top on that showed a great rack and yoga pants that were perfect on her. We sat on the edge of the bed and talked. It was obvious she hasn't been in the biz long, but we soon started touching, then I said we should get undressed. She pulled off her top and I almost fell over - the most perfect set of tits any man could ever want to behold! Big and firm naturals. They felt great and I sucked and kissed them much to her delight. As I was sucking her, I ran my hand down inside her pants and felt an absolutely perfect ass! Firm and plump. We both tore the rest of our clothes off and kissed like teenagers. She started playing with my dick and I was hard as a rock. She got lotion and started giving me a hand job, and we both got really hot. She grabbed a wrapper and put it on then climbed aboard - I wasn't even upset that there was no oral, but I really wanted to go down on this babe. She rode CG and those firm tits were right in my face. After a few minutes I told her I needed to worship that perfect ass. She laid on her stomach and I kissed and cuddled her butt - which she loved! I asked for lazy dog and she smiled. It felt great and she moaned and smiled the whole time. Her ass rose to meet my thrusts and I soon exploded and gusher. We stayed locked together and kissed some more, then it was clean up time. She never got dressed so I continued kissing and fondling her perfect form. She never rushed me and we talked for a bit longer. Obviously, this one is a keeper and very close to my ATF! She called me a few days later and said she needed to do a special - $80 for a SS, which I jumped at! This time I was determined to try some DATY with this beauty and she didn't disappoint! She countered with a good BBBJ then we 69ed - total heaven staring up at that perfect ass and pussy! She really enjoyed the oral portion. Finished in MISH. I noticed she had a pink toy laying on the table beside the bed - already planning the next visit!
positive I have seen her ad for a while but waited until she got some reviews on here so I decided to call. Very light screening over the phone and easy to talk to. Set up an incall at her south Naples apartment. Jillian is very nice and has a great set of naturals. She's not quite the provider I typically enjoy, although very nice, so I probably wouldn't repeat. I really love thigh high stockings and platform cfm heels. I asked Jillian if she took clothing requests and she instantly said that she always looks nice but prefers not to wear thigh high stockings so I didn't push the issue. Jillian is an attractive milf type and has amazing natural D's. She seems to only prefer LFK which is a bummer because kissing is well... AWESOME. We both stripped down and she stroked my ego by complimenting my physique and asked about by exercise regimen, she likes to talk. I tried to go in for those beautiful natural D's but she was very hesitant to allow too much action there. She has the most sensitive breasts I've known so I didn't get to know them well which was another bummer. She went down for bbbj which was fast with short strokes and too much hand action with no attempt at dt and little attention to the boys. I sometimes prefer oral over sex and really like to watch so I asked for eye contact which she obliged. She asked if she could use her vibrator and gave me a nice show. She is vocal and likes to talk dirty. After she O'd and with a mediocre bj we moved to covered cowgirl. She seems to enjoy this position and rode me until she O'd again and then I O'd into the bag. She helped wash me up with a warm washcloth. I used the restroom and we chatted as I got changed. There may have been another cup but I was ready to leave. Again, she is extremely pleasant and seemed genuine so I would recommend her but she's just not my cup of tea.
positive This was my 3rd visit with this agency. Top notch. Typical 2 call system..very smooth. Had seen her pics for awhile and jumped when in my area. Met at nice hotel and entered open door as instructed. Yumi lay on the bed in a shear gown and g-string. she stood up to greet had a hell of a body and knew this was going to go well. We started with light kissing and heavy petting. She lead me to ensure my hands where clean which was good sign for future use. Back to bed and clothes came off. sat on bed she started dancing and swinging that awesome ass in my face as i sat on the bed. My cock rose quickly and she really seemed to like the size. BBBJ from there and then time for DATY. Her pussy was very sweet and fingered her as i sucked on her clit. Based on her reaction and squirming she enjoyed. I knew I had to blow while doggy style so we moved to missionary. When we got to doggy it was on. She has an amazing ass. I pounded the fuck out of her and she was really moaning. Once i blew she helped me cleanup and we lay on the bed and used her phone apps to talk. She said the size of my cock made her sweat. This girl is so hot but the language barrier made it hard to really make a connection.
positive It was a nice homecoming on the Thanksgiving week, back to work and the search.... another day another russian! Stay is incredible and repeat is not a question... the question is when? Arrived to her nice incall and welcomed with a nice hug and a mouth drilling tongue.... that's what I call DFK. Once we got to the bedroom and I was able to unwrap that fantastic body of hers I got an instant erection. Stay went to perform a perfect BBBBJ and I couldn't resist to reciprocate, 10/15 minutes of fantastic 69 brought both of us to our climax, if Round One was so fucking fantastic, I could not imagine how good Round Two would be! It didn't take too long to get rock hard again, her voice, her accent, her body, caressing her, with a great help from her mouth again, did the job and after putting the condom on the hard cock, I was ready and she inserted the whole cock in her clean, fresh, tight pussy, slowly and bending over so I could lick and kiss her sexy breast. The ride was a fantastic view, feeling the inside of that pussy grinding my cock fast and furiously was an amazing ride! CG turned into a RCG and then a series of doggie positions, including bulldog and my favorite, teaspoon! Intense fucking and the noise, the moaning and her voice encouraging me to fuck her deep and right there got the best of me and I collapsed on her, great lazy dog, both coming and no stopping to make the partner pleasure the highest possible. Fantastic Stasy, sexy, sweet, smart with a great ass, that I was only allowed to admire and grab during doggie..... I hope she changes her menu, I really want a second or third round right there in that firm inviting ass! Please Stasy, if you read this grant my wish! I will see again! Thank you
positive I was up late and wasn't ready to go home quite yet, I had noticed Stasy's ad before and I had been wanting to reach out. I'm very happy I did. I called and after screening (I'm white listed on TER which always helps) I was told where to meet her, a nice place near where I live in Culver City. Parking was easy and communication was great - I got to her place and met her at her apartment. A gorgeous Russian blonde opened the door to greet me and what followed was an unbelievable and unforgettable hour that left me exhausted, drained and incredibly happy. VIPs read on.... Stasy is young, hot and insatiable. She loves what she does and almost as soon as I walked in the door, she was wrapped around me and kissing me hello with DFKing -- already yanking off my shirt. The apartment she works out of is spacious and nice - we walked to the bedroom and I took a shower. When I got out, she was in incredible lingerie waiting for me on the bed. We started with LFK into DFK - the pushed me down onto the bed and proceeded to give me an incredible BBJ - with lots on movement and eye contact. It was incredible. Being a hobbyist you sadly can become spoiled and used to certain sex acts, but Stasy got me back to feeling like a horny teenager. We were all over each other, and it was fantastic. After some great BBJ, on goes the cover, and we cycled through mish, doggie, cowgirl and finished hard on on her amazing tits. I was tired and it was late so I didn't have it in me to finish the second round, but we had fun trying to get me there. Gentlemen, Stasy is hot and fun and it seems, genuinely gets off on her work and loves pleasing and being pleased. When she walked me to the door we kept kissing like high school students and making me wish I had booked two hours instead of one. As I write this review, all I want to do is book an hour or two with her right now. Guys, see Stasy, be clean and be respectful and you will have a really wild time you won't regret and will be anxious to repeat.
positive Was feeling horny so I set up a meeting with Hushgirls. Easy to set up, and wanted to see Antonella based on her pics. Went to the location, two-call system, and ran up to the room. Antonella greeted me at the door in a slinky dress, with her nice tits practically falling out of the top. I knew I was in for a good time. VIPs, the rest is for you. Take a look at her pics on the website, and know that they are a good representation. Antonella's body rocks. She took me by the hand, we went to the bed and started rubbing bodies. I immediately went to suck on those gorgeous titties, and she moaned in delight. She unzipped me and soon I was naked. I asked her to take my cock in her mouth and she gave me an exceptional BBBJ. I was in a great place, but as I reached to touch her, I knew I wanted to get inside her. On went the cover, and she mounted me and rode me like a bronco. This girl is fun! I flipped her over and banged away missionary for a good while. She was moaning like she was really into it, with her legs wrapped around my back. Flipped her over to get in some doggy and remembered why I love this hobby. Great, hot, young women -- and Antonella is one of my faves. Flipped her over again and finished deep inside her in mish. Some light kissing and some HJ followed, but not to completion. I was spent, tired, but very happy. Highly recommend.
positive I saw some good reviews on Pinkii and decided to check her out for myself. I highly recommend and will repeat. We texted back and forth and setup a date but I had to reschedule due to a knee injury. The day came and a few texts and calls had me at her hotel. She opened the door and I was very pleased to see that she was true to her pictures. We chatted for a few minutes and I took care of the donation. I got comfortable and she began a really good BBBJ. This went on for about 3 minutes but I was hard and ready as soon as she opened the door. I suited up and she got on top for some cg. Pinkii has an amazing body and I could've easily finished in cg but I wanted to explore other positions. We switched to mish and locked lips. We stayed in this position for a few minutes and it felt amazing. We then switched to doggy and I released in the cover. At no point did I feel rushed. I cleaned up, we chatted for a few more minutes and I left with a smile. I will repeat.
positive This is a real cute girl with a good attitude and sexy body. She delivers as promised, I recommend. VIP'S read on. Sent a Whatsapp message to the agency, they responded a few minutes later. Setting up the appointment was fairly simple. Went to the love motel, waited for the always exciting phone call asking me if I was expecting company. Of course, I was, and of course they let her up. I took one look at her, and knew we were gonna have fun. As I stated, she has a sexy body and a cute face. But she has that look as if she is a really fun girl. She didn't disappoint. She has a nice menu of options, and we used them all, of course. She went in to shower, and when she came out, I was already on the bed in my boxers, ready to go. She joined me on the bed, kissed my chest and worked her way up to some LFK that turned into some DFK. This went on for a few minutes while she reached down and started massaging my manhood. If I was semi-hard before that, there was no doubt I was rock hard after that. I motioned for her to make her way downstairs and she obliged. She gave a really nice BBBJ and would have probably taken CIM if I hadn't stopped her. But I did. On went the cover, and she jumped into cowgirl right away. She looked real good bouncing up and down on top of me. We tried a couple of other positions, of which doggy got me the most excited because of the shape of her ass and small waist. Eventually made it back to cowgirl and finished up that way. Overall a good session with a cute girl with a nice attitude.
positive I met alisa at her place yesterday and had such a nice time, at that price I will be back again and again Alisa opened the door wearing a sexy corset-thing that was super hot. I couldn't wait to fuck her with it on and she was awesome about wearing it the whole time, even though she could probably barely breathe, although her tits popped out at one point, which was even better. I have a half-clothed fetish and seeing that tight satin and lace wrapped around that tight body was a real experience. I loved rubbing up against it as I was pumping into her. She took it good for a while in a very close and loving missionary. Then we switched over to doggy and I popped. We chatted for a few minutes and she stroked me to get me going again then she gave me a very sloppy bj and got on top and rode me until I came again. Hot girl and great price she is on my regular list!
positive Texted the phone girl, and got an easy appointment set-up without any problems. Went to location, rang the doorbell, up the stairs, and Vicky opens the door. She is so cute. Too bad she doesn't work anymore. Oh yeah, Chelsea was there too and she was all smiles with a sexy school girl uniform. Read on fellow mongers. Chelsea sat me down and took off my shoes, and offered me some wine. Or was it Vicky that offered me some wine. Who cares. Wine was brought over to me, and I was the only guy there at the time with a house full of half naked sexy girls. I wanted to fuck everyone, but remembered I was there for Chelsea. She lifted her shirt and fondled her own breasts. She jumped up and down several times to get my attention. She got my attention down south, and I was in boner heaven. It started to hurt (in a good way), so I tried to take off my clothes as fast I could to let the one-eyed monster out. Chelsea helped of course. Off to the shower, and she lathered me up real good. Soap on my chest. Soap on my ass. Soap on my dick. Soap back in my ass. Chelsea put her hands all over the place. Felt awesome, and I was horny. Dried up, and back to the room. "You want massage" and I said NO. She understood that, and started sucking the living shit out of my cock. Lots of spit. Really, lots of spit. I wanted to cum in her mouth, but was able to pull away for a second to finger her. The next 10 minutes was bliss. She kept wanting to suck my cock. I couldn't fight it, so let her suck while I kept fingering her. The mirror on the bed was a bonus. She has such a great tight body. No fat anywhere. I sucked her tits, continued to finger her till I finally told her to put on the hat so I could pound away. She kept moaning louder and louder which kept me pounding harder and harder till I busted one hell of a nut in the hat. Pulled out, pulled off the condom, and she sucked the rest of the cum off my dick. That was sexy. Rested in bed for a few minutes while we talked about life. Got cleaned up, said our goodbyes, gave her a well deserved tip and off to the cold streets of NYC. Life is good.
positive Texted first to get the formalities out of the way. Showed up mid afternoon. She came to the door to meet me wearing jeans and pull over top. Built very nice. She really took good care of me. Good conversation made the whole experience great. Easy appointment with in an hour after first text. Greeted me at the door, I followed her up the stairs. We took care of the business side. She got undressed then helped me out of my clothes. She went down on me (bbbj) and was great at it she was very good with her hands on my boys too. Let me touch her all over and play with her pussy. She gave me head from many different angles so I could keep playing with her pussy, even came up for a little deep kissing while I was able to bang away at her with my hand. She actually did get pretty wet. We then put on the protection fucked a little and since I don't finish well with a condom she removed it,and went back to the BJ let me finish in her mouth. Well worth it will definitely repeat.
positive Easy to set up appointment. Two texts with my questions the. She called me with address. She met me at the door dressed right for the occasion. She really knows what she's doing. Will definitely repeat When I arrived for appt she met me at the door. She showed me in we discussed things. This was my first escort experience. She undressed the. I did the same. She then sat me down and started bbbj and licked down on the balls. While doing so she let me play with her pussy a lot. She then put a condom on me and we had sex. Both missionary then doggie. Afterwards we removed the condom and she then gave me some more good head. She let me cum in her mouth she went to spit and rinse. It was an awesome first for me.
positive Met her first thing at her hotel in Diamond Bar. Very nice on the phone. Shy at first but a good provider. I would repeat. I showed up and she was wearing a robe. She took off the robe to reveal an almost japanimation body. Very curvy. A body R. Crumb would die for. Just brick house stacked. And proportional. We kissed for a while, which was a surprise and then she put on a condom and gave me a good enough blow job to get me nice and hard. I laid her down on the bad and slid it in. She was lubed up and I had no problem getting in. After a while I flipped her over and grabbed her ample ass and pounded away. I ripped the condom off and blew a load on her gigantic tits. It was a good session. I would repeat. She let me take photos, but no videos for some reason.
positive Communication and arranging the meeting was painless. Once I was close I texted and got precise instructions. When I walked in orange met me and I was pleased with what I saw. Overall it was a great experience. Orange met me at the door and I was pleased with what I saw. Her face is not gorgeous but rather cote. She hugged me and helped me to take off my shoes. We proceeded to her room and once there she started to grope me while we were kissing and I was slowly exploring her tight body. She helped be to undress and I could not wait to see the rest of her body. She went down on me and tasted me a little. I got pretty excited and she took me to the shower. Needless to say she took good care washing me and then put some Nauru jelly and slid on my back massaging me with her slippery tight body. I turned over and she did bj which really put me on edge. Once back in the room she asked me to lay down on my back and impaled herself. I could hardly hold on but managed to take her in mish following by k9. While in k9 I massage her ass and tried to insert finger, but she resisted and I gave up. I could not hold on for longer and released in the bag deep inside of her. After that we chatted a bit whileshe helped me to dress. Overall it was very good experience and I look forward to see other girls from this agency
positive I was passing through Gainsville, FL, and saw her ad. After I did my homework, I called and she said that she was just leaving town, I told her that I would not take long to visit, and she was accommodating. She gave me her address through the phone and once I found the place we made a quick connection, even though she had to leave earlier. I would recommend her. I got to her place and the door was ajar, I opened it a little, and she greeted me with just a towel. She is not a young skinny model, but she is definitely a hot MILF. I looked at her bush shaped like a landing strip and had an instant hard on. She had told me over the phone that she had to leave soon, so we agreed on a qv and got started. I already had a hard on, so I put a condome on, laid her on the bed and penetrated her tight little pussy. She really worked me. Once my cock head was inside her snatch she gasped and started humping me back. Her pussy and body were undulating with my strokes. I decided to pull out because I was about to cum and take her from behind. At first we started slow, but then she got so into it she started grunting and playing with her ass hole. That is when I told her to turn around once again because I wanted to see her little landing strip as I came into her pussy. She planted her feet and raised her hips so I could plunge my cock in while I was kneeling. I fucking worked that pussy for a good minute before I could hold no longer and started cumming. Once she felt my spasms, she bent down so she could take my cock deeper inside. She definitely knows how to milk cock. would definitely recommend. I would rate her higher, but I don't know what other services she offers.
positive After reading a few review of Stasy, I had to check her out for my self. New location for me in Century City, parking was fairly easy and her apt wasn't a maze like some other providers have. I got to her place and behind the door was a tall Russian girl. Beautiful eyes and gorgeous smile spinner body, Stasy was wearing a pair black lingerie. We LFK for quite a bit before she led me to her bedroom... She ask me if I wanted to shower first, I nodded yes. Head to bathroom and took a solo shower. When I got out she was laying in bed waiting for me, I approached her. Standing beside her bed with the towel around my waist, she sat up and we LFK and DFK she then slowly pulled the towel off my waist and made her way down to my chest with a little nipple play and then for some BBBJ with BLS. Stasy's BJ were soft and slow not enough for me to bust, but watching her suck my cock was just awesome. While she continues to suck my cock I unhook her bra and began fondling her breast. they were small, not a C cup like on the ad but more of an A size cup. Stasy is very quite and shy, her english was ok, we hardly talk during the session. But it didn't stop us from having fun. Stasy motion me to lay on the bed. I laid on my back and she resumes BBBJ. Stasy comes back up for DFK then I motioned to lay her down so I can DATY and return the favor for the long BJ she was giving me. We DFK then made my way down to her neck, chest and suck on her tits down to her stomach and waist and legs then dove in for the DATY. She moans and shivers after what seems like 10 minutes I crawl back up to her for DFK, She then resumes for more BBBJ then place the cover on me and inserted my cock into her for a CG I was fucking her deep, she leans in for DFK while I thrust my cock harder and deeper inside her. She O's after a few minutes and stop to take a break. I continued to fuck her after a couple minutes on CG until we motioned to MISH. I'm fucking her fast and hard, until blew my load on the cover. I collapse on top of her and left my cock inside for a while until I pulled out to clean up. I then laid beside her, Stasy started kissing my shoulder while she had her arms around my chest. Stasy is a real sweet heart, I started to talk to her and try to break the silence. Once I did we started chatting and laughing, we're having fun chatting now. Sadly she leaving in two weeks and most likely wont come back. But her room mate Lolita will be Staying and from what I've read shes another Russian worth seeing. Which I just might do in a couple of weeks. Overall Stasy is not exactly the person on the CV ad, but shes still a looker and a solid performer. Shes shy and quite for most part, but once you break the nice shes a really fun person to talk to, even though her English is rusty its still enough to hold a conversation. Stasy delivers a solid GFE and worth seeing at least once. That's if shes still here.
positive Been checking out some of Sapphire's reviews, just never pulled the trigger, finally decided to do so, and happy I did. the is a very good provider, fun and looking to please. Enjoys what she does. I arrived at her place and we chatted for a bit. She is an older provider, older than what I usually see, but still nice looking. We both undressed and I laid on my stomach for a nice relaxing massage, eventually i turned over and sensual massage began. I love getting my inner thighs rubbed and she could tell. This was getting me really worked up. She moved in to the 69 position so I can have full access of whatever I wanted. I was playing with her pussy as she was rubbing my cock and inner thighs. This all went on for a good 45 mins. Then she took a hold of my rod and really started pumping it. i was already on the verge due to her teasing so I let out a huge load. man was i drained. i will be seeing her more in the future.
positive Got there a little early and she wasn't ready yet. Texted to set up and confirm. She gives you a map of how to get to her place. When I got there she was wearing a short black dress. She is very pretty and has a subtle Russian accent. She led me to the room left while I got naked, laid me on an air bed and came back in a bra and undies. Non-VIPs she is definitely worth a visit. I will go back. She started with me face down. She sits on your butt in her thong. It felt really nice. Massage was ok. She is fairly new to this. She teases your legs and butt with her fingernails which felt nice and when she sees you are ready she has you flip. On the flip she takes off her bra to reveal very nice and large tits with big puffy nipples. She is somewhat mechanical throughout the process but she is very nice and easy to talk to. I busted pretty quick as she really had me going. She cleaned me up and massaged for the rest of my time. She is pricy but I enjoyed it.
positive Called Jillian earlier in the week, prior to my trip to Naples, based on her many positive reviews. Left a voice message and she called me back, pleasant on the phone and I could tell early on that she was fun-loving. We scheduled a time to get together on a Saturday afternoon, and I sent her a little information for an easy verification. On the appointed day she came to my Hotel for an incall, arriving just a few minutes early, tastefully dressed and attractive. Came up to the room with me and we sat together to chat a bit. After the preliminaries she gave a great body massage, and then got down to business. Non-VIPS's, this is a mature and professional lady who wants to please and is worth a visit. VIPS's, read on... Personal confessions first: I am new to the hobby and this was my second session with a professional escort. While I usually do not suffer from ED, the anxiety associated with meeting someone new for this kind of intimacy was a boner killer for me. Jillian is full of life and knows how to put you at ease. She was appropriately cautious at first - but once she decides that you are safe she absolutely will not let you walk away dissatisfied, and really goes the extra mile. Her one hour donation fee is $300, which is pretty standard for the Tampa market. Started off with a nude body massage, which was extremely pleasant and relaxing - had to fight a little to stay awake since I was sleep deprived during this session. Her eyes are her stongest facial feature, with a Sophia Loren vibe about them, although she shared that she is of eastern European extraction. She is soft, supple and curvy and had good hygiene, with no tattoos or piercings, which I prefer. After the massage she followed with with some playful kissing and nude cuddling. Her breasts are full and wonderful to touch and kiss. For kissing, she would allow a little tongue at first but clearly prefers closed mouth kisses, which I think is because she is cautious. Her breath was sweet and fresh, with no tobacco taste or food odors. We did discuss the ground rules, which in her case is no fingering and no anal, fine with me. Did not ask about DATY, but I didn't feel inclined to go that way during this session. My cock was not making much of a response due to my performance anxiety, and no reflection on the lady. She got to work with a BBBJ, showing both skill and enthusiasm. After I got a little harder, we slipped on the condom and she jumped on top for some cowgirl action. She was open to different positions, but when anxiety started to make me fade, she got her astroglide and went to work again with a very enjoyable hand job which resulted in a pleasant orgasm on my part. She said she could work magic, and I believe her. This woman wasn't taking no for an answer! The session was full and unrushed, and she was so sweet and encouraging despite my performance issues, very thoughtful and sincere. Afterwards she did not jump up and dress, but stuck around for a little more cuddling and intimacy with small talk, which was a great way to wind things down. Walked her down to the hotel lobby after we dressed, and she left me with a big hug and a kiss that had me believing that she enjoyed our time together. Overall Jillian is an authentic courtesan who knows the art of sex and what a man needs. She is playful and fun, but at the same time takes her work very seriously and clearly enjoys what she does. For someone with my newbie issues, I can't imagine a better lady to spend time with, and when I am in the Naples area again I will definitely repeat.
positive Nicolette is a sweet beautiful girl who is great to talk to. Her tan smooth skin and perfect body are unlike any other provider. She has the perfect shape if you like nice curves. I can't go on enough about her body! Have I mentioned she has a great body? She's definitely worth your time and I highly recommend her. The combination of looks and personality can't be exceeded in my opinion. She greeted me with a smile and a light kiss. We've seen each other probably a dozen times over the last few years so it's like visiting a long distance GF when we see eachother now. Over time I've been able to learn what she likes and she's learned what I like. I start with shower, like always, and give her a pair of black stockings and underwear I bought for her. When I get out of the shower and see how well they fit her, and how incredible her body looks just standing there I get a little weak in the knees. She is super complimentary and tells me how much she likes my body which is always nice to hear when you are really into working out. I am staring at her beautiful legs, otherworldly ass and perfect breasts and it's hard to communicate for a moment. This happens every time I see her at first...she is that attractive. Her face and hair are beautiful too and the session starts with smalltalk. After a few minutes I remove my towel and this time I ask her to massage her so I can admire her body some more. I start on the back and quickly move to the ass and upper thighs (since the stockings and thong are still on. I can just see the outside of her pussy the way her legs are slightly spread and I work my hands on her upper thighs, slightly caressing her outer lips. Occasionally I'll lean down and lick her inner thighs and ass crack but nothing further at this point. Next she gets me on my back and puts her body in the DS position perpendicular to mine so I have a perfect view of her rear end while she goes down on my. She stares at me with her intoxicating eyes while taking me in and out of her soft lips and it's hard not to explode immediately but somehow I hold it in. I ask her to 69 which I've always wanted to do with her and she is happy to oblige. She's not an actor, so she doesn't make crazy noises but her movements and moaning at least let me know she is enjoying this. She tastes amazing and has a very clean looking pussy that is addicting to lick and kiss. I can't last too long so I ask her for missionary first so I can control the tempo. Being inside her feels like what I imagine heaven would feel like. It's so hard to control myself but when I feel I'm about to cum I just leave it all the way inside and stop thrusting until it subsides. What I'm really looking forward to at this point is DS so I ask her to let me get behind her. She gets on all fours on the bed and arches her back in such a way that presents her ass and pussy perfectly and I again slowly slide inside her. Somehow I'm able to keep from finishing and it isn't an easy task considering the view and the way she feels wrapped around my cock. I notice a large mirror by the other bed and I direct her to stand sideways next to it and bend over and place her hands on the other bed. From this angle once again, her legs and ass are stunning in the black thigh highs she is wearing and I can see her pussy in the mirror. I walk behind her and for the last time slide my cock inside her and this time the sensory overload is too much for me and I let go in under a minute. What an amazing feeling to be able to have an experience like this with a woman that you would fantasize about if you saw her on the street because her beauty and sex appeal are so strong that she seems unattainable. Every time we meet I leave with a great feeling that I'm so happy she can give me. I hope I can see her many more times in the future.
positive Familiar place and MW parking and access to this place was a breeze. Vivian is very cute girl with limited english and uses an app on her phone to communicate if need be. I wasn't sure Vivian was the girl on the oic on CV she looked somewhat different but she was still cute and I was already their. Vivian greeted with LFK as soon as I was inside her place. Then walked me to her bedroom were we both got undress. She kept starring at me and made feel awkward, we head to the bathroom for blue toast and shower with preview BBBJ. After the shower "I ask why you keep staring at me?" She said im cute and handsome, my kind of customer.. I said thats good then. We head to the bedroom were she had me sit on the edge of the bed, She had a rice cooker on top of her nightstand. She opened it and she hand warm wet towels in there. She grab one and wiped it on my crotch and hands. She starts giving a slow and sensual BBBJ. Vivian O's 15 minutes into our session. She gets really wet and I can feel it dripping on my legs. She then asked for K9 in which I obliged. She bent over and I thrusted in to her after a few minutes, she grabs the cover and finally placed it on me. We're now on a MISH, we LFK and DFK while I was thrusting my self into her and she O's for the second time. I stopped, Laid next to her while she still recovering. We laid together facing each other and sensually LFKing. She then takes my hand and place it on her pussy were she was really wet again. I was like, wow. You're wet again. She tells me She really likes me thats why shes so wet. I got on of her, we LFK and DFK then made my way down to breat. stomach and down for DATY and after 5 minutes she O's for the third time. My face was so wet from her juice. But I didn't mind at all. We rested and chatted again, shes telling me how cute I am and how much she likes me and that I was the only one that made her cum 3x. My time was running out and I asked for CIM. She tried hard but it wasn't doing it for me. So we showered. She ask me if I didn't like her or if she wasn't good because I couldn't cum. I told her that it wasn't her and I just me. She then made me promise to see her again and make sure that I cum 3x. She then whispered " I love You" to my ears (LOL). and I just said well, I Love you too. we hugged and and kissed just before I left.
negative My email to Carli was handled with a thorough but efficient screening by her scheduler Joey. A standard two call system led me to her incall door at an upscale hotel right on time. Any time would be the right time with Carli. Make no mistake, this lady is sensational in every way. I have found the kiss and tell rating of technique, physical attributes, and performance of a romantic interlude less than chivalrous. This scoring lends itself to braggadocio or at the least a betrayal of the trust so key to intimacy. Nonetheless I must say my experience with Carli convinced me there is such a thing as a 10. This lady deserves every accolade. Plus she is devastatingly nice When I entered the room I was immediately captivated, dazzled by both her sparking eyes and smile. She stepped in, tilted her head and gave me a soft kiss. She stepped back and flashed that wonderful smile. Only then did I notice the alluring cleavage peek out from her short kimono. She took me by the hand and led me over to the bed where I pulled up a chair and faced her as she sat with her wondrous legs crossed. She has a drop dead gorgeous figure. We chatted like old friends and she began to rub my leg and I hers. Soon we were kissing, slowly, tenderly with a gradually increasing intensity. Our tongues found a rhythm, a dance of their own. In a very natural easy progression we found ourselves naked and holding each other. As we lay on the bed, our hands explored each other interrupted only by occasional tight hugs. Carlis alabaster skin is lush and soft and yielded to my kisses of her neck and magnificent breasts. She began to coo as I worshiped her inner thighs. With an uninhibited surrender, she presented her treasure to me. Her response to my licking of her vaginal lips was encouraging, exciting and ultimately completely satisfying to my male ego. She worked my mouth with pelvic thrusts and we both entered a zone of ecstasy. Nothing makes a woman more beautiful or memorable than responsiveness. I lost track of time until we were once again holding each other, her eyes mirrors of pleasure. Soon her gentle lips were pleasuring me with a tempo that matched perfectly with my building climax. Afterwards, we cuddled for a long while both of us delightfully spent. I am eager to see Carli again but I cannot imagine it being any better. Thats OK because you cant get better than a 10. Carli is beautiful, sweet, and totally wondrous.
positive Have heard about this location for a while. Tried to get an appointment, but they were booked on a Thursday so ended up seeing Orange for a weekend special rate. Gave my info via email and was approved quickly. Got to corner and was told location. Easy to find apt in a discrete no doorman building in east 50's. Mamasan and Orange greeted me. Pretty standard service. Taken into the room, exchanged pleasantries and little chit chat. Undressed, dfk, then off to shower. Cleaned me up good, back to room, where i got a quick massage followed by bbj. She did a good job for someone her size. Into 69, then she got on top for a little. Switched to mish, where I could tell she was having some issue taking a hard pounding. She held on until I finally bbbjtcim. Very willing to please and great attitude. Second round, similar to first, except it was mostly doggy then blew in bag. She was trying to get me to cum faster, telling me I'm too strong. I could tell again she was having issues with the vigorous pounding as most petite women do, so I don't fault her for that. Got a hot towel, and was on my way.
positive Gave Angel a call, she answers the phone and set up a date. she texts me her address, decent hotel, very simple set up. The as pics are accurate, I had a great time and definitely recommend. It's been a while since I've been out there and was feeling like a champ this morning. I decided to skip the gym as I had a different idea for reaching my target heart rate. Angel was close by so it took me about 10 minutes to get to her hotel, which was decent. I call her from the parking lot and she gives me the room number, nice and easy... When I get there she answers the door in a black wife-beater looking exactly like her pics. She's a shorty, barely 5 feet tall and very cute, she's so tiny the wife-beater fit her like a mini skirt. She gives me a hug and I can feel that everything is extra firm and tight. I know right away I'm gonna have fun with. I enter the room engaging in some small talk lay the donation on the bed. She quickly counts and stashes it. As I'm stripping down she shows me her tits which are tiny, firm and adorable. As I'm massaging them she reaches inside my boxers and pulls my cock out... Very nice. I immediately lay her down on the bed, she complies. I pull one of her titties out and begin sucking on it. I take her hand and wrap it around my dick, "It's getting big", she says with a smile. I can tell she like's having the girls sucked on, her response was hot watching me go from one nipple to the other. I tried to taste her clit but she told me I can't lick there... I tell her to play with her pussy which she does with enthusiasm. As she's touching herself, I can here her moist pussy lips. I stand up at the edge of the bed watching her play with herself as I slide a hat on. She's laying on her back growing hot and I could've stood there and watched her for a few minutes but I only paid for a 1/2. I grab her hips and slide her towards me slowly pushing my cock inside her. Her face wrinkles up letting out little moans that grew louder as I fucked her harder and faster. I eventually crawled all the way up on the bed to fully mount her. From here I was able to rock her little ass until she splattered cum on me.....which of course was awesome. I stood up next to the bed and rotated her so her head was on the edge and she was staring right at my cock. She readily opened her mouth so I could feed her. I slowly fucked her mouth while prying her legs open to play with her clit. Before I knew it she was gagging on my dick, I pull out and then right back down her throat and she took it like a champ! I back off of her so she could get up and collect herself as I laid on the bed. She comes back to the bed ready for the next round. Still wearing her glasses, I tell her to give me some head and she goes right in for another cbj. As she's sucking me off her glasses kept slipping down her nose and she would push them back up while sucking my dick which was adorable... She eagerly climbs up on top of me for some cg and rides me fast immediately letting out sexy moans. I eventually catch up with her and start fucking her from the bottom. Watching her ride me was hot! I'm fucking her at her speed, which to me is like light speed. At that rate I figured I only had enough gas in the tank for 60 seconds tops. If I'm lucky I can fuck her hard and long enough to break her down. My plan worked and she eventually down shifted to my speed which is easy like Sunday morning. We stay in cg and the maid knocks at the door. When she comes back she reminds me of the time. I fucked her a little bit more and then pulled out so she could watch me jerk off. She watched every drop of cum squirt out of me and we wrapped things up. Angel is a lot of fun, she's a typical Cali girl, friendly and loves to fuck. I'm not one to repeat but I'll probably see her again.
positive I saw Lyn's advertisement while surfing the internet and decided I wanted to meet her...filled out the contact form and got a reply within a day. Screening was easy but thorough, and we soon had an appointment set up. She sent me the address beforehand, and it was easy to find, then a phone call got me to the door of the nice incall location. I knocked and was let into a neat, clean, well-decorated apartment by a stunningly beautiful young Asian lady...great face, great smile, great body, great attitude. Winner! VIPs, read on below for more details... Lyn is mid-20s (my estimation) and has a fairly athetic body, soft skin, long black hair...and she's really pretty. I mean I was stunned. Anyway, she asked me what I'd like to drink and then led me back to the bedroom. I'd just showered so I didn't need to freshen up (though I offered anyway and she appreciated that) and we sat on the bed and chatted briefly before she moved in for a kiss. Wow. This girl can kiss, and likes to kiss! One thing led to another and the clothes started coming off. The mutual kissing soon turned into a BBBJ of superior quality, and then I turned her around for some 69 (she was clean and tasted great.) She was enjoying what I was doing to her there, but I wasn't able to finish doing it before I popped (that happened a little faster than I'd expected due to her enthusiasm and a little bit of mild dirty talk.) She cleaned me up and we laid there, got to know each other, and eventually she gave me a massage. I had made a fairly lengthy appointment so that I'd have time to rest and recharge for a second round, but I found myself getting excited again before I thought I would, and this was probably due to her still being aroused and subtly letting me know it. The massage mysteriously evolved into another round of 69, then we covered me up and she mounted me in cowgirl. That went on for quote some time, and was vigorous, before we switched to missionary. We started slow and gentle but once I found the right angle and tempo, I put her legs up on my shoulders and sped up the pace. This soon led to my second pop and smiles on both our faces. Another cleanup and a lot more cuddling talk followed. She's really cool and gets to know you by asking questions and starting discussions about different things. There was sporadic kissing throughout, and not always just pecks on the cheek but actual real, passionate, deep kissing. It was really nice. Anyhow, eventually the time came for me to shower and go, so I did, reluctantly, because I was having such a great time. Overall, Lyn is definitely well worth seeing and goes the extra mile, not to mention she's gorgeous and enthusiastic. Highly recommended!
positive Brandy is a very attractive, early 40s provider. All of our correspondence was through text. Brandy came to my hotel and was exactly on time. She was wearing a very sexy t-shirt dress, and was well groomed. We shared a cocktail or two while we chatted and she got comfortable. Then she excused herself to change, and came back in wearing very sexy lingerie. Non-VIPs, I will repeat. VIPs, read on Brandys see-through negligee revealed very nice natural breasts, firm with very nice nipples. We moved to the bed where we kissed for a while, and she requested I undress. Being a gracious host, I accommodated her. She then started a nice BBBJ. After a while, I wanted to return the favor. While I was DATY she was getting excited and I thought it was time to try out this tasty pussy. However, she wanted some more oral which I provided. I must have been hitting the right spot, because she must have had at least three orgasms (she is vocal). When she had rested, I asked her what position she liked. She said that she does not like fingers or cocks in her ass, but otherwise she is open to whatever positions you wish to try. We started in CG, where we she gave me very deep sloppy kisses. We moved to doggie, and I told here I wanted to finish in her mouth, but in doggie I had such a great view of that fine ass, and where she again got vocal and dirty until I exploded in the bag. We cuddled and chatted for a while. I am pretty much a one-shot guy nowadays, and I sensed she knew that. Brandy is a great find and I hope to get back to see her often.
positive Been awhile and I had some money to spend so decided to call up one of my usual agencies for some fun times. This place is in a block where there's very little foot traffic and no doorman. Good if you don't like to be seen and it uses a standard 2 call/text system. If you like hot little Asian girls, Orange is well worth the visit. The photos of this place is normally spot on so I had a really good idea of what she looked like and when the door swung open, I was pleased to see that she looks exactly like the photos. I am really into Asian spinners so it was pleasing to see her small tiny barbie body and wonderful face. In the bedroom I might have been a little too eager because she left the room for a few minutes after giving the donation and came back to me already unclothed. She giggle a little bit and gave me a nice DFK and she really enjoyed kissing as it happened throughout the entire session. I normally expected to head to the shower first but she just started things off by getting on her knees and giving me a terrific BBBJ. It's difficult to explain but she does this flicking thing with her tongue at the tip of your dick that just impresses you with how much she can do with a small mouth. We headed to shower shortly... In the shower, she gave me a soapy body message and continuously kissed me. However, having already felt her incredible bj, I was just anticipating the end of the shower knowing that she'll be on her knees again. I wasn't disappointed as I watched her wet soapy body bend down and proceeded a sequel of dick sucking (the sequel sucked just as good as the first). Inside the bedroom, I laid down as she began her tonguing of my entire body and the best part was when she started to tongue fuck my ear. I had no idea that ear fucking could feel this good but it was getting me so rocked hard that I thought I might have popped without her even touching it. I had to slow down the pace a bit before going too soon as this place always allows for 2 pops but I knew I was just going for one tonight. I did some DATY for awhile and then when I calmed down a bit, stopped to let her start the fucking. She asked what I liked and I said I wanted her to do all the work. She giggled and go right on top in various cowgirl positions. I didn't even know when the hat came on because for a second I thought I wasn't even wearing one. Her pussy technique is incredible, she can just be completely still and yet you feel on the inside that your dick is being pumped. It was magic. Just before finishing, I asked if I can just finish in her mouth and she happily obliged. Got back down and just sucked hard and fast until every drop was released right in her mouth. Eventually I had to tell her to stop as I was definitely done but she continued to suck. I have always enjoyed going to these Asian providers as they go the extra mile to make sure you're a happy customer. Highly likely to come back again.
positive Stasy is gorgeous! Looks like Scarlett's Johansson. Had a good time with this sexy Russian it being my second time with the Russian ladies. Got to location in century city and got word of Lolita was on her period, they pulled a bait and switch, but decided to go forth with the appt. she gave me a BBbj with some lfk as I stood next to the bed and she laid on the bed and gave me a bbbj. Than I laid on the bed and more bbbj. She applied the cover and she went on top, did some more lfk and made nice sounds, session was nice but that's about it. Wished I could've seen Lolita, but oh well maybe next time. Stasy was hott though! Won't repeat with her though.
positive After reading a previous review I was very cautious however after meeting the young woman she delivered as promised in a safe environment. Overall a great time I would repeat. She opened the door and we had a free chat he had me touch her breast and pussy and I did the same we then proceeded to the bedroom where she stripped down gave me fully nude massage. She gave me a nice back rub A two hands groin massage and when that was over we talked for a little bit. Overall she's a nice girl I'll see her again.
negative Taylor is a hot, blonde society party girl. She is really easy to set up with and responds VERY fast to emails. She's a perfectly all-natural blonde. Petite, busty, no implants of any kind. She's really nice and helps you feel good about yourself. Worth every penny. She arrived wearing a sexy red dress and heels. She was an all-natural blonde, at least it looked like it. I am obsessed with blondes. We talked briefly. She has an interesting life outside of the hobby, but I am not allowed to post details because of the TER rules. She's really fun, though. I talked to her about the nightlife and whatnot in town. She knows all the promoters for the nightclubs and can get you into places for free if you ask nicely. Pretty much ANY hot chick can get you hooked up with good deals. Just the nature of Las Vegas, I guess. I told her that I won big at the blackjack table and that's why I decided to see her. She excitedly told me a couple stories about how she went on a couple burners and got lucky at the craps table. I told her she should be my good luck charm and come with me next time I gamble. She said, "deal!" We started with french kissing and this led into me sucking those perfect tits of hers. I know that lots of the top-tier Vegas girls are VERY busty and kinda follow the Pamela Anderson template for body type, which is fine for some, but I kinda like my girls looking like the hot girl in front of me in line at Starbucks. That's what Taylor York is. Progression led into BBBJTCIMNQNS. She is very enthusiastic, passionate, and doesn't use teeth. I HATE how some women use teeth!! But not Taylor. I did some DATY after, which she was very much into. She gave me a very, very good massage followed by another BBBJ to get me hard again. I put the rubber on and entered her via missionary position. We had sex like that followed by doggy style for a while. We did some light anal because I'm kinda of a smaller guy. Very good. She has perfectly soft and smooth skin. I came again in doggy style position. We ran about 15 minutes over. She didn't even complain! Great gal, will repeat.
positive This is the second girl I have seen with BAD, and as previously it was a pleasant experience. You will not be disappointed. Go see her... VIPs read on... I would definitely recommend her. As normal I arrived at the door and it swung open. Behind the door was a nice looking Korean girl behind the door. She is not drop a drop dead model, but definitely nothing to turn away from. She has work done to her extra large lips... More to follow on that. She lead me to the bedroom and started kissing and moving my hands to touch her body (I can be shy). This was nice and eased me into the mood. She started undressing me and would occasionally come up for a kiss. Her lips are nice and fun to press up against. She put junior in her mouth and gave me a small preview, LIPs! Thank you!!! She took me to the shower and really washed me. Spent a lot of time on the backside and I soon found out why. She gave me a little longer preview of BBBJ in shower. When we got to the bedroom, she laid me down on my stomach, and she started kissing every inch of my body... Even my Toes!!! She sucked on them, NICE TOUCH! She continued kissing up my legs and I was wondering why this was taking so long. I should not have wondered that! When she got to my round spot, she cleaned it... I thought it was clean in the shower, but I was wrong. Her tongue continued and it felt great. She rolled me over and started a great BBBJ. Then she threw my legs up in the air (first time MY legs were up in the air and not the escort hahahah) and she went to town for a second cleaning. It was awesome. We then moved to 69, then RCG, CG, K9, and mish. We stopped mish and gave BBBJ, then on with condom and finished mish. Her volume and tone were perfect. She either gets a grammy or she went. Probably a grammy, but hey who cares it was great! She finished by giving me a 10 minute massage. I would have went for second go, but I could not stop this massage. I have paid over $100 for a lesser quality massage at a legit massage parlor, and it couldn't hold a candle to her. GO SEE HER!!
positive First, if may I declare: What an exceptionally fine ass. Very feminine truly sexy little spinner that defines bedroom eyes. Slim physique with lo body fat, about 5' 3" and 115 lbs. Very very pretty with a hot office secretary look ; not over made up & dressed exactly as I requested. Heart shaped back aside I could stare at and lick it for hours on end. She takse real good care of her body, entirely & knows how to use it. Will absolutely see again. GFE CFS LFK DATY BBBJ MSOG Looks and smells fantastic absolutely all over. Easy to book, easy screening and arrived on time dressed in the yoga pants I was hoping for. I was at ease the second I laid eyes on her and loved her very upbeat attitude. She is really really cute and totally not inhibited. Busted me and herself out of clothing & I had a hard time keeping a grip while she bent over and over with small talk while running a bubble bath for us in my hotel tub. She washed me a slid up and down and in and out of my mouth, my fingers a few times and clearly loved riding my face. I has a couple of great rounds finishing off twice, a real feat for me. I love a woman that makes a lot of noise when she cums. I'm a betting man and betting she came at least twice, also. One of the very best ass views that Ive seen. Hot sex cant be avoided here. a must do.
positive I have met Natalya a couple of times in San Diego. I've seen her posts on a local site many times and finally on "preferred411.com". She's young, blonde, beautiful and sexy. A girl that all men fantasize about. The first time we met, I contacted her on the local site and gave her some references. We're were able to set up a meeting that same night at her incall hotel. I nervously went up to the hotel (busy place) and sat at the lobby. I texted and she texted me back with the final destination... I walked into the room and my mouth dropped opened. WOW, she is gorgeous. Just like her pics. Beautiful all over. She hugged and DFK me like we were lovers. I held her tight and her body felt so good. We talked a bit to get to know each other. She looks at me seductively and licked her lips. I wanted to just jump her and fuck her good. But first she requested I wash my hands, (I've already showered at home). We laid on bed, kissed and felt each other's bodies. I motioned her to start a BJ (it's CBJ, the only downside, but who cares when she is so beautiful). We went 69. Her ass and pussy look so good next to my face/mouth. After it was CG as I licked and suck on her tits. We switched to MISH, then doggie, and finally rear spooning. I finally O. It was a relief. We laid there panting and exhausted from our sexercise. We chit chat a bit more and she was in no hurry to rush me out. I scheduled 30 minutes, but when I left, it was about an hour long. It was getting late. We said our goodbyes, till we meet again soon. What can I say... Natalya is tops. The "8" is for the CBJ. Otherwise, she great. I will definately see her again and again.
positive TALE OF THE TWO KOAS: I have read the four previous reviews and, in general, I agree with the first 3. It is the last review, by the good doctor (miobby3), that I take exception with. I am a medical provider as well and while his dx may be correct - breast surgery scars and bilateral abdominal scars, HE MUST HAVE EXAMINED A DIFFERENT KOA! Right dx, wrong patient! Koa is a very attractive, oval faced young woman with a slender body, soft skin, and in no way needing to loose 5-10 pounds. She is neither cherubic nor pudgy. Nor does she have any surgical scars. SHE IS AN ORIENTAL DOLL. In support of the good doctor, it's possible that there are two Koas. More likely, though, is that when an advertised provider doesn't muster in the morning someone else is given that name for the day - Koa du jour. This would be easy to do as all the models on DA have their faces blurred. If you are interested in Koa, and you should be, my advice is to ask up front which profile the Koa you're going to meet matches. I am not saying the agency switches girls or try's to mislead you, but the disparities between these two profiles is striking. This was my first time with any agency and I found the dreamasian club easy to work with. There was a light screening, a time was set, and after a two call system I was at Koa's door in a nice, moderate hotel. I walked in and Koa came out from behind a door smiling in a bra and thong and saying hello. We kissed and hugged hello and I immediately began exploring her body with my hands as we looked in each others eyes and smiled at each other. This lasted for awhile then Koa offered my a shower and mouth wash- nice. We layed down together and Koa removed her bra and panties and began kissing and licking my chest. Koa spent a lot of time suckling and nibbling on my nipples and it felt very good. I was caressing her beautiful breasts and playing with her clitoris as this went on. Koa kissed her way down my abdomen and began a bbbj with plenty of attention to the fellas. At some point I communicated that I wanted to taste her pussy and she accommodated by rolling unto her back, spreading her legs, and tilting her pelvis up so that her sweet pussy was in my face. Koa has a pretty pussy and she smelled and tasted good. After a while Koa asked if I was ready, capped me and slipped me inside of her cg - she is very tight. She began pumping me up and down like a jack hammer until she tired. We moved to mish where I deeply stroked her for some time until I went into a spasm and dumped a cup. We lay together for awhile with Koa's head on my chest and tried to talk. As previously stated Koa's English is limited. It doesn't necessarily take language to communicate warmth, friendliness, and interest, and, Koa communicated those qualities very well. While lying next to me Koa did use a iphone translator app which might seem a bit disconnected but was actually fun and allowed me to express myself and get across to her in ways I otherwise would not have been able to. It also allowed Koa to ask me questions about me and get long answers that she understood. Rather than being remote I found it fun and intimate. As time was running out (Koa is not a clock watcher) Koa suggested that I shower again. Koa helped my dry off and as she pulled up my briefs she took the time to give the little fella a last kiss. I told her I would see her again, we kissed, hugged, and I left. Koa brightened the rest of my day. She could do the same for you.
positive Have seen Vicky multiple times when she was in San Mateo and now in San Jose. Probably the most high energy, enthusiastic, and PSE experience I've had in this hobby. She's pretty cute but not eye candy, but the service is usually really good. Pretty thin girl but with a hint of a belly. Between her relative looks and her body type, dropped her down in points for looks.. Still an enjoyable repeat when I need a good hard romp in the hay. I've started off with Vicky with shower or no shower, but I prefer shower so I normally ask for one. Regardless there is a ton of DFK action with her aggressive tongue action. Shower is normally on the quick side so we can get to the action in the bedroom quickly. She goes hard at a standing bbbj usually and she takes my lead from there in rythym. Sitting on the edge of the bed bbbj, laying on my back bbbj, or some 69 action, I do enjoy her suction. She is responsive to daty and seems to enjoy it if you do it right, took me a couple visits to find the style she liked. She does seem to enjoy a good romp! Heavy p2p action usually ensues, with her teasing the tip of junior with her gateway to heaven. Have had to asked for a cover multiple times, safety first especially with these high volume girls (or any of these girls for that matter). She's pretty tight for a high volume girl who has been around for a while and definitely enjoys whatever motion you ocean takes. Have repeated and probably would again. Vicky definitely aims to please.
positive Good Day !! I noticed her post and enjoyed her new pictures with 2 of her friends. They seem fun, classy, Interactive and I decided to get in touch. Also, her 2 reviews sparked my attention , both are well known and respected reviewers . Rachael is a warm person with a friendly demeanor. She has a slim waist ,flat tummy, and a curvy bottom that is Yummy !!! I sent her my references and I was approved. So we set things up. The 2 prior reviewers mentioned Rachael was new , still learning and needed some direction. It's true, she is new to the Hobby but she really understands the art of pleasure. We had a one hour visit than evolved into a 4 hour marathon of competing to please each other. So , I would say finished Under Grade, and is on her way to the Masters. Her skills are impressive and come will a natural enthusiasm from sheer enjoyment. Non-Vip : Rachael is Up & Cumming and you will be too after your visit . Wink Vip : Yes, I plan to Repeat !! Wow, the new talent in Atlanta can be fun !! Rachael arrived at my hotel 10 minutes early and I told her to come up in 5 minutes. She walked in and we hugged and just stood there for a moment. She slowly turned her face and we shared our first kiss. Nice , warm and real . I knew we were off to good start. Rachael was wearing a nice cotton skirt that showed off her nice curves and a light sweater. We continued kissing and I let me hands roam down to her butt , rubbing and caressing along the way. She reached under my towel and began to rub and tease my cock. This really did break the ice and the party was soon to start. She sat on the bed, pulled me towards her and swallowed my cock. The flow was good and it was clear that her oral skills on point. Soon, we laid on the bed and began to explore each other. We were Kissing , touching and caressing each other, while I began to finger her and noticed her soft moans. Rachael began a great oral treat from the side position and I rubbed her sweat spot as we proceeded. She started getting wet and my Dick was jumping with joy as her oral treat ramped up. Next, she moved to the front between my legs, continuing the oral flow and giving my balls the feather touch with her hands. MY balls drew up like raisins and she knew this was a good sign. She kept the flow going for a while, then she started to rub my ball sack with her thumb. Needless to say, she cracked the nut and swallowed every drop. CIM at it Best !!! We relaxed for a few, chatted and cuddled and I requested to add another hour because my time up. She agreed. We enjoyed some kissing and rolling around which led to more BBBJ. We switched to 69 and the fun continued, with me rubbing her clit, FIV and slowly blowing air in her Virginia and ass. She got wet and I barred my face in her ass, biting and grabbing her juicy ass cheeks. At this point she was raring to go.!! I asked her to try a female condom and she said sure. This was her first time using the female condom and she was excited to try it. I Inserted the condom while kissing her and rubbing her clit to keep the moment. Next, So, we started off in Missionary with some great kisses. I began to rub her clit slowly and gently while I stroked her. She started to moan with approval, and I kept up the motion and the touch. She started to hug me and kiss me with more passion. Soon, I felt her tremble and she clamp down on my dick I continued with a soft touch to the clit and deep stokes until she had her first nice O. We kept the flow and she caught 2 more and thanked me with a panting breath. I could feel her juices run on my hands and she appeared content . After, her O, we relaxed for a few. She has great oral skills and She laid across the bed and gave me surprise head again. I decided the next position would be reverse cow girl ,so I could grab her juicy ass. We got the flow, I stroked her from the rear and squeezed and smacked her nice butt. This position is too fun and she rode me lick a champ. Things heated up and I let it blow !! Fucking Wow !!! We took a break , ate some dinner and relaxed. I requested to extend our session and she agreed. Our last period reminded me of a rainy Sunday, tucked away indoors, and lots of loving going on. We explored each other, trying some doggie, cow girl and the warm GFE Missionary finish !!! I really enjoyed pleasing her and she responded so well to my dick penetration and clit play. Again, this young lady is already schooled in the Art of Pleasure and more than capable of knocking your socks off. I would say I'm a tuff Nut to Crack but she rose to the Occasion like a champ. This lady is warm and her loving feels real. What more can I say ? Cheers, punter4u
positive Hot little blonde with a great attitude. She has great eyes and smile. Said hi and talked for a few and then we hopped up on the bed and got down to business. She's a little firecracker and we had a great hour and I Absolutely recommend. Saw her on the last day she was here and would have come back if she was staying longer. Stripped down and hopped up on the bed and really went to town. Started out with some DFK - she really enjoys kissing, BBBJ and some ball licking - really great blowjob. Nice not too large tits and did some sucking. Some FIV and she started to warm up, added some DATY and she really got fired up! Back to BBBJ with some DT. covered up and started in CG and went to Missionary. Ended up with some more BBBJ with CIM. She really wants to please. Some Extra for pics and video. Scarlet is a real sweetheart and I hope she comes back to Nebraska soon!
positive Typical 2 call system. Was hesitant because pictures looked fake but she is just as you see her in her pictures. What isn't told about her is her booty is one of the best butts I've seen on a white girl. Hoping to repeat soon. Definition of a very attractive curvy white chick. I called Tiffany and she answered, she gave me the name to where she was staying and I called when I got there. Walked in, took care of the logistics. When she turned around I was caught off guard by her booty and did not know if I wanted her booty or her titties more. She started out stroking me and then went on to CBJ, which was decent but I was more so looking at her booty as she bounced it while she sucked. Went on to MISH and she was awesome to look at, she had moans as if she was enjoying wasn't sure if they were real or not. We got to the part that I'd been waiting for, turned her around for Doggy and went to town, went on to getting her on the side of the bed and then she let me slide in between her breast, at first she made me keep the rubber on but I told her I wasn't gonna finish doing that with the rubber so she allowed me to take it off as long as nothing hit her face. I finished, we exchange goodbye and I was out the door. I would definitely repeat and you should experience her before she gets a reduction which she said she was going to do. Definition of a curvy white chick.
positive Saw TER reviews on Angelina and couldn't wait to see her. Made apt in the AM with Kim as she said she books up fast. Boy am I glad I did. This girl did not disappoint. Easy to schedule, met at high end hotel, got the room number and went up. VIP's read on. I requested a school girl outfit and was greeted by a vision in exactly what I wanted. Once the door was closed, she gently pushed me up against the wall and asked me if I was Italian. I said yes and she said, that's so hot and DFK and we had a close embrace for a real long while. We kinda of stayed in a role play as she was the naughty school girl and I was her professor there to spank her and fuck her silly. We DFK some more and then I went to freshen up. When I cam out in a towel, more DFK, then she slid me to the edge of the bed and removed my towel to reveal my erect member. She was almost worshiping my cock. Caressing, licking, DT, lots of spit, BLS and great hand action. I could have popped right there but I wanted this to last. After about 10 minutes or so, I stopped her and we again DFK on the bed. Lot's of hugging and DFK. She really likes to kiss and hug as do I. She complimented me as I can be very sensual and aim to please as much as being pleased. We really seemed to hit it off. Now it was my turn to taste her. I went for the DATY and FIV. She is very responsive with moans and gyrations. Real Hot. I stayed there for a while and she came at least twice. She wanted to lick her juices off my face and we then resumed to more DFK. From this point there was more and more foreplay. Always DFK and hugging. We kept switching from BBBJ, to DATY to 69 amd back to BBBJ. Finally with only about 20 minutes left, we went for the CG and mish. But before I knew it, we were almost out of time. I then asked her to ask Kim if I can stay a 1/2 hour more and we agreed on a price. We went back at it with more DATY, DFK and BBBJ. It was there she finished me off to a nice explosion. Lot's of hand jerking and sucking real real hot! After clean up, we DFK and hugged some more. Some small chit chat and a little more DFK and then off to the shower and we said our goodbyes. Angelina did tell me how much she loves the Island and wants to stick around a while longer. Lucky for us! She is with out a doubt, my ATF.
positive first time at this location on the UES. very clean and respectable building at the upper edge of midtown east. orange really took care of all my needs enthusiastically. typical text exchange and set up. i'd used the same service but at their other location. this one is much nicer overall. was met at the door by orange in a school girl costume. she introduced me to the beautiful candy and then took me down a half flight to our room. the room was clean with music playing. she immediately started DFK and seemed happy to see me. her english is okay, i understood most of what she said, but there were definitely gaps. she undressed me and carefully hung my clothes giving me a little BBBJ in the process. asked if i wanted a shower, and i said yes. we went back up by the front door to the shower. she carefully washed my whole body, including my asshole. orange has a great spinner body. she's tiny with perfectly smooth skin and eager/perky breasts. very expressive with lots of smiles. and an interestingly wide tongue, which i liked seeing my cock on. we went back to the room. more DFK and BBBJ then she got me to lie down on my stomach. she gave me a very gentle massage, rubbing her breasts over me as well. she pushed my legs apart and started rimming me. it was pretty nice. not something i've had done before. would probably do again, but not go out of my way for it. after she was done, she gargled with listerine and washed my asshole out with it as well. i flipped over and we started DFK. i went down for DATY which she seemed to like. her snatch is shaved and incredibly tight. i put a finger inside her and rubbed my thumb against her asshole. i then climbed over her and pushed my dick in her mouth. she was pretty happy as she DT'd me. i pulled out and rubbed my dick on her tongue and lips. she smiled and moaned. on with the cover. she wanted mish, but i pulled her to the side of the bed and bent her legs up against her chest so i could really see as i thrust into her. she was super tight. it was hard not to cum immediately. we did this for a while until i couldn't hold back. i told her i wanted to cum in her mouth and see climbed up and shot in her. when i was done i stood up next to the bed. she wiped her and myself up a bit before going for BBBJ. i layed down. we chatted for a bit. she seemed very sweet. she offered a hot towel or shower. i took the towel. she came back with that and some water. she actually poured the water in my mouth, which was a little unusual. she wiped me face, cock, and ass off. had me gargle with listerine as well. finally she very carefully dressed me. she was very meticulous about the process which was endearing. i left with a kiss. i had a great time and orange was extremely considerate all around.
negative I was fortunate enough to extend a doubles session with Bobbi Banx and Envy Jolie for a few more hours - although Envy had a prior commitment. Bobbi was amazing - no issues in joining me at my hotel after the initial incall appointment for a nightcap and more. Non-VIPs, Bobbi is definitely not the petite spinner type. She is a goddess deserving of worship, and you should treat her well. Would repeat in a heartbeat. I mentioned a lot of the details about Bobbi's professionalism and demeanor in my last review of her and Envy, so I'll go straight to the important content. Bobbi is this incredibly sensual, focused, attentive lover. Between the amazing kissing and her oral skills, I already knew I was in for a treat. We got up to my room after sharing a drink downstairs. We made out like teenagers for almost an hour. She then slid down between my legs and proceeded to give me an absolutely fantastic BBBJ. Bobbi approaches oral sex with this sensual, confident attitude where you look down on her and know that she absolutely knows what the hell she is doing down there. I took about as much of her oral talent as I could manage before returning the favor and dining on her down below. Impeccable hygiene, btw, which was impressive given that not an hour ago I had already given her a hard ride in the earlier session. Consummate professional. We proceeded to enjoy each other in mish, but I knew greek was an option and I wanted it. This is where the highlight of our session occurred. I had her bent over the bed while we were enjoying slow greek, and I grabbed her hair and told to her to look at me in the mirror while I took her from behind. This is a very submissive act, and she obliged beyond expectations. It was what I needed, and she provided. Gents, that's what you want in a professional. Do yourself and see Bobbi as soon as you possibly can.
positive Her pics are accurate. If you like short, Italian PAWGs with big boobs you will be well pleased! Very easy to talk to, maybe a little submissive, if that's your thing.... Ok, so I saw Bella's ad pop up recently. Had to check it out. Found some reviews here and coincidentally, she also just showed up on p411. With that in mind, I made contact and am glad I did. Bella's pics are spot on. She is one hot little big boobed lady! She does seem to be KIND of new to this or at least new to the notion of going outside her group of regulars, but she warms up pretty quick. We set an evening date and I arrived on time at her place. Nice safe area, btw. She came out to meet me and walk me in. She was dressed kind of casually but that didn't bother me. Fancy clothes or sweats, they all look the same when they are in a pile on the floor! She is very large chested and I believe natural. Boob lovers rejoice! She showed me in to her place. She does have two dogs that were well behaved and calmed down pretty quickly. She showed me upstairs and the dogs basically stayed down stairs. I only mention this so a) nobody is surprised and b) if you have allergies, you might want to get your own room. Bella was a little stand off'ish at first. Not rude, but not overly warm either. She did greet me with a hug and a kiss, though. We made our way upstairs and she got comfy on her bed while we chatted and shared a drink. I asked to use the shower and she had everything set up. Once I started disrobing and got in the shower, she seemed to relax a bit. I guess johnny law won't get nekkid. Anyhow, we chatted a bit while I was in the shower, the usual stuff. I dried off and wrapped the towel around me, only to find that she had gotten completely naked while I was showering!! Did I mention the big boobs? There they were in all their glory! I tossed the towel and joined her on the bed while we had some more drink and chatted a bit. Once she got comfortable with me, we were off to the races! We started with a bit of LFK that led to body exploring. Naturally I went for the boobs, but tried to take my time getting there. Her breasts are responsive and she seemed to enjoy the attention. I explored her a bit more, then maneuvered around so we were in a 96 position. Bella has a nice shaved cat that definitely seemed to enjoy my attentions. After a bit of mutual pleasure, I had to sample some more of that kitty. I went in for DATY (not normally something I do) and she REALLY seemed to enjoy the attention. I slipped one then eventually two fingers inside, gently working her g-spot while i licked and sucked her clit. She wanted to return the favor but I was ready to f*ck! I slipped on a cover and eased in missionary style. Things were mighty slick down there so it was not a problem. We did mish for a while then we switched to cowgirl. I have been with several squirters and one thing they have all have in common is that they seem to get there best squirt in cowgirl. They typically use one of two hip actions to... ah, you know what? Do your own research on squirters lol! Anyhow, after several minutes of her riding in first one then the other of those special ways, I felt her let loose all over me. Kaching! I'm pretty sure she enjoyed the ride but I wasn't done yet. We switched back to mish and then back to cowgirl. I asked her if she liked having her hair pulled and she said sure (within reason). So while she rode me, I grabbed a handful and gave her a good pull every now and then, just to test the waters. All the time, the talk kept getting dirtier and dirtier until I finally asked her 'can I fuck you in the ass?' She said yes and it was on! She got into doggy and gave me some lube. I applied it liberally to both my unit and her asshole. It went in without a problem and pretty soon I was giving her a good ass fucking, smacking her ass and talking dirty all the while. I will say this, it went in her ass relatively easily. I suspect this is something she genuinely enjoys. I didn't want to overstay my welcome, so I asked her where she wanted me to come. She said 'anywhere you want' but I asked just to be safe: 'how about down your throat?' Here is where the only negative, if you can call it that, came in. She kind of laughed and said 'well, anywhere but there. How about on my face?' A great second choice! I pulled out and she spun around, I yanked off the rubber and busted a good sized nut all over her face, boobs and bed. We had just about run out the clock, so I didn't dawdle while getting dressed. She wasn't rushing me, I just don't want to abuse time. All in all, she was a fun date and a lady I am likely to see again! Oh one final note: Bella claims to be a little past 40 but could easily pass for her 30s.
positive Called Dani but got voicemail and she texted back fairly quickly. Responded quickly to texts and set up a time the same day. Her location is in a large office complex near the 5 and Ortega highway. Arrived at the complex and she texted me her office number and I met her at the door. Dani was really nice and looked good and I was please with what I saw. She led me upstairs to a large office suite and into her massage room which had a nice massage table and bathroom / shower. She offered a shower and had me get comfortable on her table while she stepped out. A moment later Dani came back into the room topless and wearing a G-string, she looked great and made me feel relaxed with her. She began by giving me a really nice professional massage on while I laid face down. At least halfway through she had me flip over and she did a really nice job completing my massage and she left me speechless as she promised. I will definitely return as I was very satisfied. She began by giving me a really nice professional massage on while I laid face down. At least halfway through she had me flip over and she did a really nice job completing my massage and she left me speechless as she promised. I will definitely return as I was very satisfied. Dani was really cute and sexy, she looked and is about half French and performed and heated me up as I would expect a French Girl to do. As I was face down she did a nice job rubbing her perky tits and erect nipples on my back and across my body. That was perfect in getting me excited and relaxing me at the same time. The lighting and room was dim and perfect. When I flipped over she continued to rub softly at that time to peak my anticipation of what I was expecting. She rubbed her pussy on my hand/arm at the same time. She them began to massage my cock with just the perfect amount of pressure and started with an awesome deliberate stroke that was better than I could have done myself. She continued at a perfect tempo and not too fast. She then got up on the table on her knees and straddled one of my legs and continue to stroke my cock now with a little faster movement. I felt her perfect size tits with her nipples now standing up at attention and I loved playing with her nipples while she stroked my cock. I soon blew my load as she continued to slowly stroke the head of my cock. It was great. She got some warm towels and cleaned me up and asked if I wanted to shower. I declined and I left feeling amazing. I gave her a nice tip. By far the best massage I've had, worth every penny.
positive I have read the reviews for her so I knew what to expect. Overall I must says she is definitely a looker and for non-vips I would recommend seeing her for an intense but short visit. I had read the reviews and so I had an idea of what to expect. I emailed her and spoke to her assistant Amy. I had previously schedule with Amy for another provider and thought I would be cleared but apparently I went through the screening process again which was a little irritating but reasonable. When I opened the door I saw a beautiful Latina woman behind it and got really excited thinking maybe my experience would be a little different then some of the negative ones I had read. Arriving at the room we got comfortable and she proceeded with a good but short bbbj. She then put the cover on and started riding me like a wild bronco. While doing this she gave me some dirty talk which was a turn on. She then asked if I wanted doggie and agreed. While in this position she was extreme as well. Seeing her ass shake while going up and down on my dick felt great but was too much and I didn't last long to my dismay. She then proceeded to clean me and this is were things got a little awkward. I tried to start a convo with her while I changed, knowing that second pops aren't usually the norm and I went for a hhr stay, but she didn't seem to want to. I said my goodbye and left happy but I still had an itch. Overall I would put my experience as a good one. While my stay was short, as I anticipated, I felt like I was in a porno based on the intensity of the service. I will keep her on my radar solely because of how hot she looks and how active she is during our session but she wouldn't necessarily be my go to.
positive On business to San Francisco for a week. Haven't partaked of the hobby in Northern California for years, but there were a large number of kgirls advertising here. My contacts from Seattle and L.A. helped me get access to appointments here for nearly every evening I was here. The most popular girls get booked for the day very quickly and I was too late to get them. Nara was one of the few available kgirls during the afternoon, so I decided to give her a chance. It was a TOFTT experience with a surprising caveat. Her most accurate pic is "Nara1", but all pictures look dated compared to her looks in person. VIPs read on. Nara opens the door and her mouth hangs open. She began gushing about my appearance and while I was flattered, it was difficult to reply with an honest compliment in return so I ended up just thanking her. Once we were in her bedroom together, Nara immediately asks me why I made an appointment to see her when there were so many other more attractive girls to book with. I replied by asking her what she thought the answer could be. Nara looked a bit clueless as she pondered the answer. Suddenly she beamed and asked if it could be because I found her pictures very sexy. I nodded my head with a smile while thinking we'd narrowly averted an awkward start to the session. Nara was happy that I'd agreed with her answer and said she'd make me feel really good. She reached up and pulled my head down to hers for a prolonged Dfk. Nara started stripping off my clothes and eagerly played with my cock. After some fondling it, she knelt down to take it in her mouth. Her technique managed to raise it up to an angle akin to the Tower of Pisa. More kissing and she invited me to the bathroom for the obligatory mouthwash and body wash with BBBJ. She gave special attention to cleaning and massaging my asshole. I'm not a fan of rimming and joked with her that it was now the cleanest part of my body. Nara giggled saying she couldn't wait to put her tongue on it. Back into the bedroom and Nara was all too excited to show me her routine. She asked me to relax face down on the bed and gave me a tongue bath. With some reluctance, I gave into her insistence to licking my asshole as she was clearly turned on by this. After some time there, she asked me to flip over as she went to town on my cock. She was vigorous and I was experiencing a twinge of pain with the pleasure. I lay back as she savored giving me head and could only close my eyes as time slowed to a crawl. I had the vaguest sense of her releasing my cock and straddling my pelvis. I then felt her moving back and forth with her pussy over my cock. The P2P felt great and I only opened my eyes when I felt her raise her hips and lower them again as my cock was slowly inserted into a warm and tight cavity. I realized she'd put me in sans cover and Nara was looking down at the torrid connection with a expression of lust. Her juices coated the length of my cock as she slowed slid up and down. She bit her lips as she made eye contact with me. I asked her why sue hadn't used a condom and she answered that she only wanted to make me feel really good. I think she was also enjoying the pleasure as she kept moving her hips. While the sensation was incredible, I told her that we should stop and gently pulled her off of me. Nara looked a little crestfallen and lay down next to me. I turned over to her and kissed her, saying thanks for making me feel special. She kissed me back and spread her legs apart touching her pussy admitting that she felt good too. I watched her absentmindedly playing with herself as she stroked my cock. It was slick with her juices and it turned me on knowing my cock had been inside her. My body was over hers as we went back to making out and Nara moaned (Work in Progress)
positive used this agency a few times. no problem setting up an appointment. nice and save area with upscale condo near. arrived a few minutes ahead of time and waited to be given an apt no and wen in when door opened. greeted with a lfk, nice asian girl wearing two real small pieces. went to bedroom and proceed with some more kisses and fun began. recommend and will definitely repeat when she's back Pure is a beauty! She is not usual asian spinner, but her ass is full-bodied so to speak and I have enjoyed it during the whole session. As I had had a shower just before heading to see Pure, we skipped shower and went straight to bed. Kissing and I went down to her sweet pussy while she turned and started sucking... It continued for sometime and I had to slow her down as it was hard to hold it. Her pussy went wet almost immediately and it tasted real good! She was a one who asked to be fucked 'now' and I felt like she wanted it for real :) there we went, her on top AG for sometime and then I wanted to see her from behind. I have to tell you that's something not to be missed! I could hold it anymore and blown a full load... She cleaned and offered a massage, which is nice but I didn't want to waste more then five minutes on it as she's hot and I was almost ready for the second shot. She did some hj and suck it some more and there we go again with her on top again but reversed. She did it perfectly!! Time flown by and we barely had anytime left for quick shower and I left with a huge smile.
positive 2nd time seeing her. Booker is very accommodating and easy verification since I've seen their other providers. Typical Kgirl mouthwash and shower with no preview. Very pretty face and tall. MCC has a beautiful face and nice tan. Walk in and asks of I need a shower and since I was coming from work I opted for the shower. No preview and she washes all areas thoroughly except the rear end so I know rimming is not on the menu. Not a fan of it anyway. Lots of dfk out of the shower and onto the bed where she goes down for a bbbj while I was standing on the bed. Plenty of saliva and great use of hands and mouth for 10 mins and then she lies on the bed and spreads her legs inviting me for daty. Clean shaven and clean I was down there tasting her juices when she asks if I want her to have an O. She O's and returns the favor with more bbbj and then puts the hat on has me just enter and lay next her. Couple minutes later missionary, doggy, and then she took cover off and goes for more bbbj to completion. Had an awesome time and will definitely repeat.
negative Ms. Ivy appeared on my radar while scanning for interesting providers, having been fatefully scheduled on business in her city. On her site she positions herself as "an intrepid explorer of all things sensual," an accurate depiction for which she indeed deserves due regard. She understands... pleasure. You can hear it in her voice, sense it in her movements, pick it up in her conversation references. It's all there. She is an exceptional encounter. And I do not say that lightly. I was working the day of our date, so I asked for a late appointment. 11pm would be perfect for me, but I don't want to keep you up all night. Well... perhaps I do, but you know what I mean, came her response. Ivy The Night Owl was letting me know to expect a fun time. And with good reason. Through email we booked some hours together, kicked off by cocktails at the bar and finishing each others' sentences while discussing mixology, music and other pleasures of the senses. Many more pleasures came to rich fruition in the frolicking that followed, something I would absolutely repeat. Professional courtesan Ivy isnt only the most physically striking provider in my experience; she is one of the most psycho-sexually intriguing beings I, or likely you have ever encountered. She is tall enough to meet your gaze in heels, light enough to lift (with the utmost care & respect) and throw onto a bed, and cut like a gymnast  a position at which she would excel, were pole work or sexcapades Olympian events. She is a sensual specialist; a natural expert in body-to-body transposition. If a team of sex scientists and sociologists were to hijack a ballet studio to create the ultimate seductress, they would create Ivy. And what a force they would unleash; heaven help us all. She's an enthusiastic, driven lover who devours her charge with intense, real satisfaction. As an aficionado of the fairer sex, I have enjoyed a variety of flavors. And as an American male gentleman, sexual intrigue has remained  at least for me  a significant though enigmatic part of my life. On this site alone, I've read enough reviews to fill a saucy novel. So through this consideration, I can declare that Ivy is indeed the Real Deal, and likely beyond what you might experience with a routine provider. She isnt just about doing a job: shes about matching your energy and enjoying it all the while: kissing, caressing, inhaling, conversing, or cavorting like spirited animals. The curve of her runs from slender neck to toned legs. It teases you to come closer, and if you're a healthy adult, will raise your BPM by at least 50% on sight. Her arms are developed and strong. She could definitely beat bruises into you, if that's your kind of thing, of which she could also speak knowledgeably. At length. Ropes' length. You may have met this type of person somewhere before: an exotic dancer with moves like a serpent in heat; the innocently charming bartender enhancing your intoxication; poly-amorous lifestylers extolling the thrills of erotic openness. With a mind to match her raw appeal, Ms. Ivy is one such seductive siren, a sex-positive sensual creature in touch with the primal force that connects us all. And yet, she will sweetly make you feel like a king. On our date, we slithered to music like fluid streams of notes from a virtuoso's bow. In and out of DATY, BBBJ, CG, Mish, K9, 69, and sizzling DFK through the wee hours. Her lips, strong like the rest of her, could draw a man into quick surrender. I survived, but only through sheer will as I took in her talent like honey dripping from her smile, toothy and sincere, yet fiery. Seeing her softly chiseled face in ecstasy, exuding gaspy moans one after the other through her draping red mane... it's the thing lasting fantasies are made of, the kind that scar so you have to seek them out for a lifetime. And that's actually the reward; the journey. Characterizing time with her as GFE is accurate but not enough. She is a vessel of sexual electricity and charm worthy of your very best who will treat you likewise. Time with a provider of her caliber is a rare experience, unless you're smart enough to make it happen again, which I definitely intend to be.
positive Texted made to the contact and away to her provided location. So worth the trip guys. I donot know how I have missed this diamond for so long. Entered and she did some light chatting. Asked that I get comfortable. I did just that and placed the donation on the dresser and went to wash my hands. Came out and she was waited on the bed for me. Her clit was so appealing that I went in for a dive. Licked her pussy and boy was it nicely taken care off. Inserted one the two fingers and licked more. Then the fluids started to flow and she was cumming back to back to back. I did not think that is was possible. But we did this for at least 15-20 min. The bed was saturated. When I came up I could see, a whiteness of cum all around her pussy lips. Oh I wanted that pussy so bad. But, had to have my dick sucked 1st. She just that and really well. Smooth like she was gliding and then going very deep on my dick. It felt so fabulous. I rolled her over and started licking her again. Just to get more moaning and that pussy really wet again. It worked so I covered up and went to heaven. What a nice kick ass fuck she is. I want to go back rate now. Guys she is witty, pretty and not to be fucked over. Just respect her please and have a nice time with a top notch provider. Fuck her well !!
positive Met Samantha after texting and talking at her place. Friendly girl. Opted for 30 minute visit. I'll do more in future. I recommend. Samantha let me in her incall after easy set up and directions. Opted for 30 minute visit. Went through standard procedures and hit the bed after undressing ourselves. She got directly to business with a superb BBBJ. Incredible techniques with lots of spit and hand action. I didn't last long. And what a finish via CIM. I will most definitely repeat. Samantha is a great find if you are looking for a great BBBJ for a nice fee.
positive Riley communicates by email and text and it took us several messages to get a schedule that worked for both of us, but that was not her fault. I was visiting Nashville. When she arrived at my hotel, we talked for the first half-hour and we both enjoyed the conversation. Then she excused herself to change clothes and came back in an attractive an skimpy outfit. VIPs can check the details. Riley provides a great girl-friend experience. She is a great conversationalist and likes to cuddle and be held. She has a great body if you like skinny women with small breasts with excellent high-beams. If you are a big-tit guy, she probably is not a great fit for you. On the other hand, if you are a believer in "The closer the bone, the sweeter the meat", she might be right for you. Because I am much older, 70, I am not easily aroused, but I really enjoy providing oral services to young women and Riley was very accommodating, finally coming to orgasm in 20 minutes or so. It is always a special experience to feel a young lady get off. If she was faking it, she did a great job. So, Riley offered other services (i.e. oral, etc.), but I wanted to spend the time enjoying all of her female parts which worked out great. And I can report that all the parts worked fine. I am sure some of you younger guys will find this a bit weird, but age takes it toll, and Riley helps the older guys feel young again, at least for a memorable hour or two. It's an experience one can think about and smile quietly to yourself. I hope to see Riley again the next time I am in Nashville.
positive I was looking for an Asian and found this little doll in Rowland Heights. She is hot for an older Gal, a total GFE, and very accommodating. I will repeat. VIP;s read on.... First, You have to be escorted in by a mama-san but that is ok. Once inside - Saw a beautiful older woman, she offered me a shower which accepted (take one it will be worth it) She assisted me in drying me off. She took me to the bed and proceeded to give a massage that included rimming and touching, kissing all over. She nibbled on my ear as she whispered turn over baby. I obliged and she went to work on my chest moving down to my package. She teasingly went past to get the rest of my legs but then hungrily took my engorged member into her mouth. She gave a great performance in bbbj which included lots of DT and eye contact. I had her move around do i can play with that pussy. It was great and sweet and fresh. She then asked to hop on and she rode me till she came not once but twice. She then wanted me on top of her so I can ram her good. i did as she asked and we both climaxed together. All in all it was a great session and if your in the mood for some Asian treats. You should look her up...
positive Made a last minute appointment with BDJ, great agency, easy communication. Went up to the room, knocked at the door, Angelina Nicole opened the door hiding behind, as usual. Inside things would happen that I've only seen on pornos, or heard from exaggerated stories. Angelina Nicole is Fan-fucking-tastic! Do NOT miss out on this girl... As read earlier... Typical call, show up, knock, enter. Only this time there was no awkward hello/exchange. I was tackled at the door by a sexy brunette with a rock hard body. Thrown against the wall and there were suddenly more tongues in my mouth than I am used to having. Angelina Nicole is a Ferrari... 0-60 in 2.5 seconds. If you're timid, shy, want to be held gently... You're in the wrong place. This girl wants to fuck, likes to fuck and is a firecracker. We had a few exchanges of pleasantries, "what do you do?" "where are you from?" but that was only as we seemed to race each other taking our clothes off. A/N LOVES to kiss... loves it, DFK mostly, but soft and gentle as well. We made out like our plane was going down. Her body is incredible, she's that crossfit/bodybuilder chick you always checked out but didn't have the balls to approach. I made the first big move, throwing her on her back sliding off her tiny thong and diving head first into a nice DATY session. Clean, smooth tasty pussy... I could have spent the full hour down there. After making her O, A/N spun me around and started an amazing BBBJ. She gives head like a porn star, DT, taking care of the boys, spitting. It was quite a show... I asked if CIM was ok, and she said yes, but also wanted it all over her tits and face. What a girl, my God! After a little bit of chit chat (like 2 mins), I soon found my cock back in A/N's mouth, and thats how our conversation continued, like a girl talking to you while licking a lollipop. When I felt I was ready, she knew... "Wanna fuck?" My issue is that I'm pretty thick, so condoms aren't always the best for round 2. So between that and her super tight pussy we didn't finish round 2. A/N gave it a go with another BBBJ, but it wasn't my day for 2 pops. Overall... This is not your typical GFE. She was like a PSE/DOM hybrid, asking me to smack her ass as hard as I could. If you book A/N you better saddle the fuck up, this is no pony ride... She's a goddamn bronco!
positive I really love spending time with ladies who are intelligent and really have their acts together. Lyn definitely fits into this category. I was actually very curious about how she was able to appear on the scene from out of no where and garner such a great reputation and business in such a short amount of time. Most new girls struggle to acheive what Lyn has accomplished in only a few months. Lyn's reputation and reviews are well earned and she is most definitely worthy of your time...I highly recommend. Since my ATF was busy and I had some rare free time become available, I decided to try someone new. Lyn's pics intrigued me as I really have a thing for ladies with soft, curvy and natural bodies. Lyn and I exchanged a few emails and I really liked her energy. Lyn's correspondance was always upbeat, personable and positive which really sucked me in. A date was set and I was on my way. Lyn was professional and on time which I really appreciate a great deal. When I walked in, Lyn was wearing a sexy pink bra and panty set along with black heels. I was very attracted by what I saw and Lyn's beautiful smile immediately put me at ease. After a quick shower, Lyn and I laid in bed and talked for a while before she came in for a DFK. While we kissed, my hands rubbed her shapely thighs before moving inbetween her legs. Lyn was very wet which is always a good sign. I then moved down to give her natural breasts some attention. Lyn moaned approvingly as I kissed my way down to DATY. Lyn had a bit of a landing strip which was actually quite refreshing considering most ladies are bald down there. I licked and ate Lyn as she moaned and grabbed my head and hands. We then moved to 69 so I could continue my meal. Lyn pulled away so she could concentrate soley on giving me an awesome BBBJ with DT. Lyn continued to swallow me whole until I couldn't take it anymore and requested a cover. We started out in Mish with our arms and legs wrapped around each other. Lyn is a very passionate and gentle lover which are two qualities that keep me coming back to a provider for more. Lyn felt incredible and very tight. I knew I wouldn't last very long but I had to see that curvy ass in motion before I popped so we moved to doggy where I had a much needed release. We then cleaned up and Lyn laid in my arms while we got to know each other better. It was very relaxing and exactly what I needed after a long stressful week. I felt like our time was coming to an end but was unsure. As I was reaching over to check the time, Lyn and I started to kiss again which led to a round 2 that I wasn't expecting. While we kissed, I could feel Lyn getting warm and wet again so I covered up again and we went at it in Mish until she came. I then started to get up and Lyn says, "well aren't you gonna finish?" with a smile on her face. Since I'm really only good for one pop and saw that we were way over our time, I respectfully declined and excused myself to the shower so I could rush back to work. Lyn is an incredible young woman who really knows how to treat her man. I left Lyn's place feeling refreshed and extremely satisfied. I will definitely return.
positive Found the website and perused the girls. I liked what I saw and gave them a call. Super quick screening and appointment was easy to set up. I arrived at my appointment that evening. Chelsea was very cute and eager to please. Overall it wasn't a bad experience. The agency was similar to a KMP... I gave the agency a call and the woman on the phone asked for some sort of verification since it was my first time with this agency (I gave my TER tag). Waited a few minutes for her to check it online and she confirmed via text. I was scheduled with Chelsea for later that evening and was given the address. I requested an outfit (which you can do per the website) of a buttoned-down shirt and thong but Chelsea did not wear this at all (not a big deal, other reviews of this agency indicate that the girls oblige school-girl outfit requests) I arrived at the residential building with no doorman. The room was on the second floor so I took the stairs to avoid anyone in the elevator. At the door, a young lady, who I assumed was a mamasan of sorts greeted me and helped me take my shoes off. She brought me to the bedroom and left to get Chelsea. She came back to introduce me to Chelsea, who was in stockings, heals, skimpy daisy dukes, and a mesh bra. Chelsea has a tight, slim body and a cute face. It was difficult to talk to her since she doesn't speak much english but that wasn't a big deal. We kiss a little bit and undress each other and she leads me to the bathroom for a shower. In the shower, Chelsea rinses and soaps me all over, with some DFK throughout. I'll be honest, she's kind of an awkward kisser. She just sticks her tongue out and wiggles it at my mouth without really engaging me, but I guess she's trying. She dries me off and we head back to the bedroom. Chelsea has me lay back on the bed. She puts her stockings back on and stands on the bed over me, teasing my body with her feet. She asks if I like. Luckily, I indeed have a foot fetish. Next she comes down over me and kisses me all over, giving me a cat bath, leading toward my cock and some really hot tongue action on my balls. she brings my legs up, knees bent, and without me asking proceeds to rim me, which feels amazing. Then for a few minutes, Chelsea proceeds to give me a bbbj. Eventually she brings her pussy to my face and insists I eat her out, which I'm happy to do. Unfortunately her pussy was pretty hairy, not a bush, but hairier than I prefer. Her pussy didn't taste bad and in fact, there wasn't much taste or scent to it at all. We switch positions so I'm on top. I play with her tits, sucking on them and bring my hands to her pussy but she doesn't let me finger her. Finally we get to the FS. She rolls the condom on and once we get going she starts yelling "oh yeah, fuck me baby" repeatedly, which sounds automated and rehearsed (A common practice at KMP's as well). As I come, she puts her hands around my throat with light pressure, which was pretty hot. Chelsea cleans me up with a hot towel and then she climbs up on me and we cuddle for a little bit, which was nice. Since she doesn't speak much english we have difficulty making small talk. She offers another shower which I take and once I get dressed I'm on my way. The agency is very good and easy to set up appointments with. Chelsea is a cutie-pie with a nice body who definitely aims to please. My biggest complaints would have to be the awkward kissing (Since i'm a fan of DFK), hairy pussy, and fake/rehearsed dirty talk. But those things didn't ruin the overall experience.
positive I was drawing by her picture and I want to see Viki for quite a while but every time I call she always off so this time . When I saw Viki, she looks exactly like her picture in the ad just difference hairstyle. She is attractive with very sexy body, I mean very sexy with natural breasts. She was wearing two pieces pink bikini. She takes my hand and we walk to the bedroom, once inside we kiss DFK then I hand her the donation she did not go out to put money away. She helps undress me then we start kissing again and I help remove her top and bottom. I did play with her natural breast. Shower time with some rubbing and preview BBBJ, she licks your balls and you dick and then BBBJ. She helps dry me off then we went back to the bedroom. Start with I am on my stomach and she rubbing her breasts over your back and kissing my ear then move down to give you some rimming but just outside not that deep. Then the flip she move up to kissing me on my lip turn to DFK then suck on my nipples slowly move down to licking my balls then move up to my shaft, top of my dick then slowly swallow my dick, her BBBJ was good but she did not go deep. I want to fuck her so signal her to change position. I went down on her for DATY she is very sensitive with my licking her pussy. I want to P2P and move up put mu dick over her pussy she thought I was going fuck her without condom told me no and reaching for condom, I try to tell her but she did not understand me so I let it go. She put on the cover with her mouth and I penetrate in missionary. I slowly put my dick in but not all the way just teasing her then put it all the way she was surprised when I did that. Her pussy felt very tight. I put her legs up and start to fuck her faster. I close to come so I stop and ask her for Doggie position. She put her head on the bed and her butt was up high I like this position. I pump away until close to come stop and change back to missionary again. She was having fun this time start help herself with her finger. She helps herself until she came I can felt her pussy was so wet and it has nice feeling inside, after that it did not take me, long to blew my big load inside her. I stay in that position for couples of minutes then pull out; I collapse next to her, cuddle with her, and talk. Her English was not that good but I was able to communicate with her. We cuddle until time for second shower, she helps dress me. Before I left, she asks me to go to her ad in cityvibe and give like her heart. I said yes. Viki is very sweet and nice she might not be young compare to others but she has very sexy body and she also horny and got into session with you. I will see her again. She plans to be here for a long time. Treat her well please.
positive Was trying to hook up with another FBSM provider, but our plans through. Tried to find a last minute replacement, and came across Autumns "bodyrub" ad. I only had a few hours before I had to leave, so I was not really expecting anyone to be available. Looked on TER and found a positive review for Autumn, so figured I'd give her a call. To my surprise, she was available, close by, and ready to see me. I explained my predicament, and she happily agreed to see me for a 30min appointment at the same rate I was going to pay the other FBSM provider. She provided directions to her incall location via text. She greeted me at the elevator (card access), and I was immediately taken with her attractiveness. Her photos are dead on, not aged/edited at all. We got to her apartment, and she gave me a brief tour (it was actually very clean, spacious, and modern...could see why she wanted to show it off). She then invited me into her bedroom, where the king bed awaited. She offered to let me take a shower before our adventure began. When I came back, she was on the bed waiting for me. I had a really great time with Autumn, and I would definitely repeat the next time in in NOLA. I have no idea if she's planning on doing this for long, but I would recommend seeing her while she's in the business. VIPs read on. As I climbed onto the bed, she sauntered over to me with a naught look in her eye. We embraced and started kissing tenderly. I was about to ask her how she wanted me for the massage, when she leaned me back and said, "okay, let's not forget about the 'massage' (wink wink)". She then rubbed my shoulders/traps for about 5 seconds before leaning in for DFK. She then placed her perky tits in my face, and encouraged me to suck on her nipples. At this point, I realized that our FBSM would be a full service appointment (seemed like this happened to the other reviewer, too!). I wasn't really ready for this, in the sense that I had been purposefully "saving" myself for the other FBSM masseuse that fell through (the girl I was originally supposedly to see was apparently skilled at edging, so I wanted to make the most of the tease and denial aspect of the massage). I'm mentioning this because I knew there was no way I would last more than 30 seconds with Autumn. She started going down on me for a fantastic BBBJ. Great hand/mouth action. Lots of spit, moaning, and good sensual eye contact. I had to keep slowing/stopping her to keep myself from cumming too soon. When I couldn't stand it anymore, I asked if I could DATY. Her eyes lit up, and she said, "how could I say no, to that!" I then proceeded to lick and taste her delicious, shaved pussy. She started moaning softly in ecstasy and rubbing the back of my head. I asked if I could FIV, and she hungrily agreed. Her pussy is super wet at this point, and she starts groaning loader as I thrust my fingers in and out. She's now grinding her hot pussy harder and faster onto my face as she has her orgasm (if it was fake, then she's an excellent actress). I'm getting super turned on by this, and I don't realize that I'm raging hard and that the friction on the bed is causing me to almost lose control. At this point she reaches for the condom and goes to put it on. Before she does, she leans down to give another refreshing BBBJ. This is just too much for me. As she places the condom on, her hands feel so good that I just have to cum. I tell her I'm coming, and I place my hands around hers as we stroke out one of the best orgasms I've had in ages. She exclaims, "wow, that was so hot!" She offers me a shower again, I get dressed, we chat a little, and then we have a sweet goodbye hug/kiss. I feel bad for not being able to pound her, but it really was a fun and erotic session. I did not ask about her limits (CIM? anal? 2 girls?). What I do know is that I can't wait to see her again the next time I'm in NOLA. Thanks for an awesome time, Autumn!
positive First things first, she does not receive texts on her phone. I got to the specified location and used text to contact her. She said she never received them and only got back to me after I called her half an hour after I waited for a text back. Other than that, we had a good meeting. I don't think she looked like her pics. I think she was prettier, and the pictures represented her well. After I was able to contact her she told me to go to the floor where she was staying. Once out of the elevator, I went to the hall way and she was waiting near her door, I walked over and was happy with what I saw. This girl is stacked. She is a chubby, but everything in in her ass and her chest... huge chest. I set my envelope down and began to get comfortable. We got on the bed. I was naked but she was still wearing underwear and bra. She wiped my cock at the beginning of the session, which I thought was incredibly presumptuous since I was going to wear a condom and I showered before. The cbj was really good. She finally took her bottom off right before we got to CG. I fucked her like that for a while, but had to fight her bra, that she kept on to play with her humungous tities. I finally got her bra off when we switched to doggie. Her ass is also out of this world, so it did not take me long after we switched to cum into my rubber. After that, we rested for a while, then I turned her to mish and fucked her HARD, the whole time hanging on to her huge tits. I came within minutes. All in all it was a good time. I also wanted to fuck a voluptuous girl for a while. I enjoyed myself, would recommend.
positive Great friendly provider. This girl is the greatest PSE honey I've ever dreamed of. Hella energy, all natural, likes to dance and flirt. She is very vocal. vIP read on... Got in to a nice comfortable apt complex. Little bit hard to find the right place but, I got there in time. When I saw Vicky, she was a petite girl with nice curves. DFK from beginning to end. She was real nice and welcoming, and as we hit the shower, BBBJDT and she wanted me to CIM. Best I ever had hands down. Slurpy sloppy wetness, we went at it in 69, then CG as she climaxed on my hard one. We kept going and rocking the bad, it was great as I pulled her to the edge and smacked the Gspot hard she grabbed her rock hard nipples and squeezed her breasts as she screamed "fuck me!! Deep!!" We did so many positions i couldn't stop. It's a shame I only stayed an hour long, but def will repeat.
positive Easy 2 call setup,decent hotel. When she opened the door I was very happy with her face and body. She gave me a LFK and a giggle. I new this would be fun. She was wearing a 2 piece bikini style outfit that really showed off her great little spinner body. Very friendly English is just ok. VIPs read on others worth the trip. She helped me undress and got the shower ready. When I came out she came to me and started to LFK/DFK and our hands were all over each other. I removed her top to show a great pair of B's that look very youthful. I enjoyed playing, licking and sucking them which she really enjoyed. She pushed me back on the bed and worked her way down with her tounge stopping at my nipples then Jr and kept going for a unbelievable rim job. Stayed there awhile then went for a BBBJ that was awesome. I flipped her around for 69 and found a clean fresh and youthful pussy. We did oral on each other for awhile then she covered me and climbed on CG. She rode very well and would lean information DFK and to feed me those great little breasts. The I rolled her over for some Mish, Sidesaddle and doggie. She aloud me to go deep and loved to fuck. When it was getting near for me I asked for more BBBJCIM. She seemed happy to oblige with just the right amount of hand/mouth. She worked me good before she went to spit and clean me up. She asked if I wanted to go again (with a giggle) but there wasn't enough time so we just laid there and tried to talk. Fun girl
positive I have used this agency many times so making the appointment was easy to set up. So I noticed that we had a new girl in Orange County so I made the call and I was on my way. When she opened the door I was very happy with what I saw in front of me WOW. She led me to her bed room and helped me undress and led me to the shower and washed us both real good front and back and we all know what that means later in the bed room. Then she dropped to her knees and VIP's read on ....................................... And OMG she gave me a preview BBBJ W/Deep Deep action of what was going to come later in the bed room. Then she started to do DFKing and I told her that I was ready for the bed room so we dried off and away we went to the play room. She told me to lay on the bed face down and she started kissing me all over my back then down my legs and up to my but area and what a rim job that she performed for a good ten minutes. then she had me turn over for one of the best Blow Jobs of my life. She would take it soft and deep then deep deep again and just keep it in there for a while then she would take it out and put those puffy lips all over the head then take it deep again I think she wanted me to CIM but I wanted to last longer so I said my turn and then she started some deep DFKing and wouldn't stop until I told her that I wanted to taste some of her juices and man she was really wet down there and tasted so good and I think she had a couple O's when I started to DATO with FIV because she went crazy just before she spun around for some 69 that was so much fun then she said I want to feel you inside of me so on with the cover and she went on top for a great ride first ACG to RACG then back around to ACG and DFKing and I lost it right there. Then we lay there and we did some more DFKing until it was time to shower and she sent me on my way a very satisfied man. Will I be back Many time as long as she is here. She asked me when I was coming back to see her. WOW
positive Doing research before my trip to Dallas I saw Ariel's ad. It stated she would not be in Dallas during the same time I was so I went with a different provider. However, the day before my trip to Dallas was over I saw Ariel's ad that she would be in town the next day. I immediately contacted her to set an appointment for the next day. We communicated through text and set an appointment for 9:00 pm the following day. A few minutes before 9 pm I got a text that she was at my hotel. I texted my room number and a couple minutes later she was knocking on the door. I opened up to see a lady who, in my opinion, was much more attractive than your photos. She came in and we sat on the couch and talked for a while before I asked for the fun to begin. I highly recommend Ariel if you like her look and into ladies who are a bit more submissive and non-talkative. VIP member please read on. After talking for a while I asked Ariel to remove her clothes so we could get the fun started. She agreed and stripped down to reveal a tight body with a few tattoos. She laid on the bed so I stripped and laid beside her. She asked if there was anything I didn't like and informed me that she did not like FIV. In our earlier conversation I mentioned I wanted Greek so she then asked if I was still interested and I said yes. She then began to give me a bbbj and she utilized her tongue ring, which was a first for me. After I was good and hard she placed the cover on me and mounted up for some covered cowgirl. She was very tight and felt really great. After a few minutes I knew I would not be able to last much longer so I asked for Greek. She lubed up and got in the doggie position. I got behind her and she guided me in a very tight ass. We started out slow while she got more comfortable. I then was able to enjoy the view and her soft skin while highly enjoying my trip to her Greek Isle. After several minutes I asked for a new position and we moved to Greek missionary. She was so tight I knew I would not last long so I just went straight in and banged away. Her soft moans put me over the edge and I unleashed in the cover with great pleasure. My legs were a little shaky but I made it to my feet. Ariel asked to use my shower where she took a short shower to clean up a little. She then dressed and I walked her to the door. She was a very sweet and sexy girl. If she lived close to me I would be making appointments with her at least once a month. If you ever find yourself in the same city of Ariel I would try her out for yourself.
positive I had seen her pics on Jasmine's site, so I went ahead and set it up with Jas(She is a real pro, & handles her business well). I am now considered a regular, so set up was a snap, & I was off to the incall location, where Leah stepped out from behind the door, &........ I was more than pleased at her appearance. She is a slender young lady, with a petite frame, & everything proportionate to its location on her body. Really nice B cup titties, & a smack-able tight ass that i cupped in my hands, as she laid a wet DFK on me, & we shared a passionate kiss for about 5 minutes., right at the front door. She cooed in my ear that I was a great kisser, & I complimented her on what a piece of ass she is, & she reached down to rub my throbbing dick through my pants, & looked me right in the eyes, & said "This feels nice. Do you want to put this somewhere"....with a lil twinkle in her baby blue eyes.(She is VERY pretty too, if I hadn't mentioned.). I said yes indeed I do!! She knelt down & unzipped me, and as I shimmied out of my pants & shirt, she slide her lil dress over her head, looked up at me, said "I wanna start in my mouth", & she just attacked my fat cock with some gusto!! She moved right to deep throat, as much as she could, & licked up & down, tickled my balls with her tongue, & even a lil taint action too. after about 15 minutes of this, I was weak at the knees already, when I playfully grabbed a handful of her golden locks, pulled her hair back over her face, & looked her right in the eyes. I said "You are too good at that, I may just have to just go ahead & unload on you right now so I can recover for my 2nd pop"!! She was so slutty at this point, moaning with delight, & she looked me right back in the eyes, & said "Can you cum in my mouth & face when you do. I would love to taste your cum"......How good is that?? A smoking hott young lady, who has porn star looks & aspirations(I found out later in the session), looking you in the eyes & asking to be splashed with cum?? So I obliged, & started stroking my fat boner right in front of her face, & mouth. She went into full porn star mode here, flicking the head of my now engorged cock, teasing & rubbing my balls, & telling me how full they felt. I asked her to show me her cum face, so she squeezed her perky tits together, opened her mouth' licked her sexy lips & said "Please feed me your cum".........DAMN!!! So I did, & it was one of the biggest loads to date for this old fuck like me, but I was amazed at her tenacity for being a true porn pro here. She flinched a lil bit when the 1st blast of cum hit her forehead, but she just hung in there with her mouth opened, moaning as each of the 4 more big spurts rocketed of her cheek bones, into her wide open mouth, & bounced off her neck & tits too. This girl was impressive with her tenacity towards getting all of the cum she could. When I finished blowing, I playfully grabbed a hand full of hair, held her head back, & slick my cock into her throat as far as it would go. I let go of her hair, & she grabbed the base of my cock, & oh so slowly slid my bone out of her mouth, making sure to suck every drop of belated jism into her mouth that she could. This was top 5 moments in my ten years of this hobby guys(& gals). She opened her mouth & showed my how much seed she was holding, & then downed it all in one gulp. She giggled about how much was still on er face & tits, so I rubbed my dick across her cheeks tits, scooped up what ever jizz we could find, & fed it back to her, as she lovingly scarfed it up. I was done, no second pop, knees weak, so I collapsed on the bed, she went to clean up, came back & laid next to me, as we chatted about the life, the porn industry, et al. Time came to an end & I was out the door, with yet another erotic memory from Jas & her girls. I actually inquired with Jas about her about 10 days after this visit, but she said she went awol, so I think she faded out quickly. I hope she isn't on anything, or isn't in any trouble. This life can be hard as hell, I know.
positive 2nd visit a little further away but easy to find. She gave me the apt. # directions upon arrival. I was greeted at the door with a kiss by a beautiful model in sexy clothing. Offered a drink or water which I knew from past experience I would need. She has no mercy on your body and parts. Candles were lit for a romantic atmosphere. After a quick shower with her we got in bed and made out like I was her true love she hadn't seen in years. The rest of the exciting details are below. We kissed and she is an awesome kisser with a soft athletic body to rub and caress. I could just do this all day and night. She is such a girl friend type in bed. Johnson was getting aroused so he came to attention with a slight touch with Lyn's soft hands and she gave me a flutter of the tongue bbbj which really got the party started. I took it as long as I could thinking of monkeys at the zoo to hold back, but then I remember one I saw jacking off and had to hold off. I calmed down and started my secret technique to get Lyn hot. I don't know if she came but I sure she was close because she was getting wet. Not wanting to waste her condition I had her start cg which allowed me some time to rest partially. She was told to slow down and she climbed off where I could do more of the secret technique that she really loves. Hot again I climbed on top for mish which is my favorite position . She moaned throughout every position. She really loves men and sex. Sometimes when you take a little break she will start stroking the Lilly herself. Her body is awesome and responds well to your kissing and stroking . The nipples get hard and the Lilly gets moist and swollen. We repeated the process and rested and talked for almost three hours till I was soaked in her juices and her cum. I rolled her over for mish and one final attack on the pink Lilly. I ground her and entered her untill I could do it no more and blasted in the cover. We both laid there having both had a wonderful experience. It is amazing what a woman will do for a man if you pet her and show her that she is special. This was my birthday present fantasy. I gave her a Christmas present which she enjoyed. Will be coming back for sure.
positive been trying to book Katty for a long time, finally got it and it was so worth it. I am not a writer so I will keep it short (i would use bullet points if i could). Hot ass kgirl, showered together, dfk, towel off, pushed me down on bed (i loved that), excellent bbbj with constant eye contact, 69 for a bit, then missionary with condom on, pop within minutes :(. cleaned me up. lay on bed tried to chat but kind of difficult since her english is limited. started kissing her body after awhile. But junior was not in the game :(. Katty tried bbbj but junior was still no go. Not her fault at all, I was tired from work. showered, walked me out, kiss at the door. i will definitely go back.
positive She is a wild cat, that's all you need to know. Won't go wrong seeing her. Go now. The moment I entered the room she aggressively grabbed me and started some serious DFK before the door was even closed. I didn't even have time to look at what she was wearing as it was such a blur and they came off so quickly (it was when I was leaving that I noticed it was some sort of high school uniform costume). Then she stopped briefly and mentioned that she was a kisser and went back at it again. After don't know how long I said I probably need a shower and she reluctantly let me go. After the shower we were at it again with lots of groping and rolling around in bed. Then she gave me a BBBJ and it was wet and enthusiastic. Lots of ball licking and even rimming. Then it was my turn to taste her pussy juice. She seemed to like it and cum several times. We did 69 for a bit and then on went the cover. Started with doggie but changed to mish and finished because it was awesome looking at her bouncing tits and perfectly flat stomach. I only felt like having one pop that day, the curse of getting old, but there was no down time with her. More DFK all the way till time was up. Overall, an unforgettable experience.
negative She showed up looking very sexy. I was in for a treat. She's a natural blonde with a pretty face. She works out regularly and it shows. She's so charming that you won't be able to contain yourself. Next time I'm probably going to book a whole night with her just so I can enjoy her company in and out of the bedroom. In any case, my limited time with her was wonderful. After some fun conversation I wanted to get started with the REALLY fun part. We started making out, french kissing and rubbing each other all over. I ripped her clothes off and I started sucking her tits. She has very well-proportioned tits and they're all natural. I was honestly pretty impressed by that. We kept going and before I knew it I was eating her tasty little pussy. I was pretty into it, as she was very responsive to my tongue action and efforts. She then dropped to her knees and started eagerly sucking my cock. I love the way that shit feels. There's nothing more loving and selfless than a pretty girl giving a blowjob. I couldn't help but grin like an idiot while she was doing this for me. I was rock hard and came in her mouth and a bit on her face. She wiped up the cum with her fingers and put in her mouth, swallowing it after. I was still hard because I took 100mg of Viagra, so I put on a condom and started fucking her. Missionary, doggy, cg, rcg, you name it. When we were in doggy, we did a little bit of Greek, but I stopped and replaced the condom and returned to traditional sex. She was doing it, but I prefer to go faster and didn't wanna risk hurting her. We went at it like this for a while and I came. We ran a bit over time because we cuddled after and she was playing with my cock, sucking it lovingly. Can't wait to see her again.
positive Crystal has GND looks with a gorgeous, curvaceous body and excellent skills. Texted Crystal for an evening appt after seeing good reviews. Booking was easy. Text to get appointment, another to confirm address and time, and the last one for greenlight to walk in. Door opened after one knock and I was greeted by a smiling Crystal in a blue bikini. Went to her room where we began LFk and groping immediately. She reached into my pants as we kissed and groped each other. She helped me undress and I Took care of business and she undressed to give me better access to her amazing tits. She has GND face but her body is amazing. Great perky breasts with big pink areolas. Slim waist with an excellent booty for grabbing and squeezing. Mouthwash and Shower with no preview, but back into the bedroom we went with further kissing and groping. She dropped to her knees in front of her mirror and went to town on Jr with all the deep-throat, head bobbing and rocking side to side that I could handle. Eased onto the bed for continued bbbj and then flipped around to return the favor to her gorgeous ass in 69. She turned around and grabbed a rubber but she did some generous saliva-assisted p2p beforehand. It was heavenly, but we put on the condom and went all the way. Started off slow with some nice cg and then moved into rcg and doggy. She was quite vocal for me and she was actually frantically pulling me down to kiss her as I felt her pussy squeeze me hard again and again in prone doggy and in mishionary. It was passionate and I wish every session could be like that. I was taking longer to come today for some reason, and I opted for more of her lovely bj. Loved to see her head and gorgeous long hair bobbing up and down and side to side. Eventually she finished me off with a hj-assisted cim. She held for a moment and then rushed off to the bathroom where I eventually joined her for the follow-up shower. She seemed a bit distant at this point as we were probably running late for her next appt, so not much in the way of talk, but that's not why I visited her anyways. Got dressed and I couldn't help but admire her shapely curves again. She showed me the door and with a goodbye kiss I was out the door. All in all a great session.
positive Emailed with her scheduler, who sent extra pictures of Piper. Very easy to work with and is in a location I have been before. Piper is kind, friendly and willing to please! She was great to talk with, used her hands and body very well! You'll be happy you saw her! I requested stockings, she was wearing them with a robe that showed some fantastic cleavage as she let me in. She has a great natural body. If you are looking for some photo shopped woman, she isn't that. You really have to admire a real, natural, woman like Piper. Offered me a drink and we talked a bit. She said let's go have fun on the table. She took her bra off and unleashing her healthy natural breasts. She takes her time giving a great massage, with very long meaningful strokes all over my body. She made sure to pay attention to every inch of me, using her body against mine. On the the flip she let me suck on those fantastic breasts of hers. I love sucking on tits and she seemed to love to have them sucked on! She has me hard in no time, puts some lube on my dick and starts to stroke. She lets me suck some more on her tits, and let started kissing her way down to my cock. She looks up at me as she slowly starts to suck and stroke my dick. She gives a great blowjob, really sensual and in no hurry to get it done. A real pro at it! I can't hold on any more, I ask if I can cum in her mouth, she doesn't even take my cock out of her mouth and say uh huh with a nod. I blow and she takes every last drop in her mouth willingly. She gets up and swallowed my load. So amazing! I had some extra time, so she got on the table cuddled with me for a while. It was just a overall great time. I'll see her again and you should too!
positive Had to pick a friend up from the airport and had some time to kill. Did a little research and found Tamara. Pics are accurate. Tamara is an attractive mid thirties Hungarian. She's a spinner all of five feet tall with an enhanced rack. Enjoyable session and I would definitely repeat. VIPs read on. Typical two call system and I arrive at Tamara's incall location. Tamara buzzed me in and greeted me at the door in a pair of shorts and a tank top. Pics are spot on and she has striking blue eyes. She's a hot little spinner and I was dying to get her out of the little clothes she had on. I laid the donation on the table and we both got undressed.! Tamara wiped my hands with alcohol and asked me to lay down.Tamara has a lot of artwork on her body not apparent from the photo, this girl loves her tattoos. Our session started with Tamara kissing and licking my nipples, while I rub her breasts. She grabs my cock, which is already hard and she complements me on my size. She applies a condom and starts a very nice CBJ. Not sure Whether Bbbj was on the table, didn't ask. After a little bit she asks what positions I like I say dogie and CG, I ask her and her and she says missionary. She apples a little lube and we start in missionary. I start slowly and pick up the pace and Tamara starts moaning. Not quite porn star moaning but you get the picture. We switch to doggie and she starts to rock her hips and twerk. It feels good but I feel as though I'm going only half way in, never feel fully sheathed like I was in missionary. We switch to CG and Tamara really starts to get into it, the moans now appear in earnest.. lol. She's impaling herself on my cock but appears to be getting tired so we switch positions again to Spider where we are both facing each other and leaning back on our arms while she's astride me. This is a great visual as I'm watching my cock slide in and out of her pussy. We switch to doggie again and Tamara now meets my every stroke. I don't last too long after that and cum. Tamara cleans me up and we chat while I'm getting dressed. On the way out I meet her cousin who appears younger and equally attractive..will have to give her a try. . She going back home for the holidays but will be back post the Holidays.
positive New girl with some nice photos had to try her out. Tbe real Darby is just about as skinny as advertised so was pleased by the fair representation. The USA pounds and her profession havent gotten to her waisteline yet! Face is just ok, a bit older than advertised. Service wasnt anything to seperate heraelf from the pack either. Her face seems PS'd to make her look younger, probably really mid 30's or so. Also couldnt get past her name, havent found a chick named Darby before, couldnt stop thinking of that movie with Jamie Foxx. Her service needs some work, she needs some time to realize how hard it is to make a buck out here. Maybe with time shell improve. No preview bbbj in the shower. Hardly got any touching in the shower, if it wasnt for the cleansing probably wouldnt have. Once in thr bedroom the bbbj was decent, though she didnt seem to want to make it an extended bbbj session like i wanted. Enjoyed her large bolt ons for a bit during the bbbj and contined during some mish. They wete probably the best part of the session. Continued in mish so i could enjoy that rack. Had her go cowgirl to completion while i played hard with those titties. Second round wasnt in the making as i took a bit too long during the first round, thougj i did have her try with some hj and bbbj combo. Couldnt say i would repeat, like em younger with better service.
positive I've seen Lacey's bio for awhile but didn't really click with the original photos that were posted. However, the new photos posted just a few days ago really showed another side of Lacey and my interest was piqued. After seeing her in person, I will say that the newer photos do her much more justice. She is really pretty, has nice perky titties, and a nice ass. Her attitude and willingness to please really made for a great session. Another reviewer said some vague comment about not liking her "body type" but did not go into details. I guess that reviewer likes anorexic skinny girls or really chunky girls, because Lacey is right in the middle with a great, athletic, firm body. Exactly what you would want. Overall, very satisfied and had a great time. VIPs read on... Lacey greeted me at the door and gave me a hug. She didn't seem to be in to kissing, so I didn't try. Her mom was on the couch, which was a little weird, but I wasn't totally shocked since I knew her mom was also a provider and shared the same available days. Anyway, we got to the room and Lacey started with some small talk as we got undressed. She was quick to come over and we started some mutual rubbing as I groped her nice titties and licked them and played around a bit with them and her ass. Meanwhile, she began stroking me and tugging. I eventually asked her to get on her knees and give me a BBBJ and she jumped right to it. Good technique. She goes deeper than most girls I've had but not what I would consider deep throat --probably 3/4 down, whereas most girls only go 1/2. I enjoyed watching her go to town and she looks up occasionally and makes eye contact, with a sexy smile. Nice touch. She asked if I wanted to finish my first round with BBBJCIM and I asked for BBBJCOF. She said she really didn't like to do COF, but I asked her "Pleeease" with my most pouty look. I tried my best not to seem pushy or demanding and I think she felt my playfulness about it and she agreed. Yay! I was enjoying her BBBJ for awhile, at least 10 minutes, when I noticed she seemed to be getting tired. Some of these girls seem to be able to go forever but I have to remember that most girls' jaws are going to get tired before too long. Anyway, she took a few seconds to catch her breath and then started back at it with intensity. I let the tension build and pulled out of her mouth at the last second and released on her face as I moved back and forth from cheek to cheek with her tongue licking my tip repeatedly. When I was done, she licked the tip several times and backed away a little so that I could see my cum on her face. I was hoping she would take me in her mouth to finish me off and get every last drop, but she didn't do it automatically and I didn't want to push my luck. Haha. She took it like a champ and looked great. We both went to clean up and then laid on the bed and chit-chatted while I waited for the stamina to go for round 2. After about 10-15 minutes, I asked her to get me going and she started another BBBJ, just as great as the first. Unfortunately, I didn't have the energy or stamina that I usually do (getting older, I suppose) and I had trouble staying hard to have sex. She gave me a good CBJ to get me hard again but it didn't last too long. I didn't get hard enough to really enjoy it and I'm sure it was disappointing for her as well... Anyway, she offered to finish me off with BBBJCIM and really worked at it. We switched up positions and she gave a great BBBJ and I kept getting so close and tensing up so hard that I was shaking but I just couldn't finish. She really got into it and gave it her all for like 15-20 minutes but my body just wasn't having it. I wanted to finish so badly, but for the first time for me, I just couldn't. I have to give her props for sticking with it and trying so hard, though. No fault of her own. She was a real trooper and would have kept trying. I thanked her profusely for putting up with me and trying so hard. She was great and I really enjoyed myself. I'm sure I will see her again and hopefully I will have more energy next time!
positive So I saw Angelinas pics and was drawn to try. Made the call and when i got there and the door opened... .....She closed it and pulled me to her and WOW !! We were on !!! Hot make out session with awesome DFK and we were grinding against each other for a good 10 min...I finally broke free quick shower and when i came out....all I can say is it was awesome being attacked !! She pushed me back onto the bed and undid my pants and took my throbbing c-ck deep down her throat. She sucked and licked and teased the head and in between teased the boys till I couldn't take anymore. I rolled her over and we DFK some more and then I made my way to those great t-ts and sucked and lightly bit her hard nipples. Finally i made my way down to her soaked p-ssy and ate her till she was arching up and moaning and she pulled me up and DFK again and said take me. I suited up and took her doggie. Pounding deep and she was backing up to each thrust.She pulled away and pushed me back and climbed on CG and rode me like crazy finally we flipped to MISS and we were soaked and were going at it like teenagers and finally I unloaded DEEP inside and we collapsed on the bed after a few minutes I composed myself and made my way to shower again and was on my way a happy man. XXOO
positive This is my first review in this board, so be forgiven. Not a newbie in the hobby, though. But, just decided I could share some info to help, too. I am going to start with a sure hit, Neva. Have met a couple of girls from Euphoria, hope I will have time to write their reviews soon. I regret missing an opportunity to meet her when she was still with Nadya VIP. The SP I booked that day had called it off and they suggested me to see Neva. As I didn't know anything about her, I believe I hadn't seen her pics, too... So, I denied and right after I realized my mistake. Had to wait quite a while to have this chance as she is quite busy nowadays. Actually, I was luck enough somebody cancelled and I got his spot! I will try to be quick and keep focus on the important points! Agency: quick and easy communication by sms, mostly talked to James, but Matt has also helped me too. Great location, easy to park, not fancy but clean and functional condos. Pics: Very accurate. Looks: Neva is as fit as it gets, and her body is just as close to perfection as it might get. It can be intimidating for some, but she does not have that bodybuilder look, she is very fit in a natural way. Exotic and charming, sexy at the same time. Perfect medium and round ass. Amazing legs. Beautiful and soft to touch man-made boobs. Sin tanned skin. Sexy lingerie, high heels that she kept through all the session. Short, 5.2ft. Hot details for the VIPs... Attitude: ***** She is one of those girls that defines the benchmark of the industry service here in Montreal. A must see. Always a willing to please attitude. Made me feel very comfortable from beginning. GFE+ but still very much professional, if you know what I mean?! ;-) DATY: **** Shaven, clean, pretty and sexy kitty. Amazing perfect clits. She seems to be into it, a pleasure to touch her. BBBJ: ***** WOW skills! She touches softly, wet, but at the same with some teeth in it... Amazing technique. BLS and even some soft rimming, she got close enough, but never touched my O-ring, which I appreciate a lot! Main course: **** WOW again, she can do lots of positions, very flexible. She is into it, very energetic but faded a bit towards the end. She was very professional as I took a bit too long to finish. Never gave up on me or rushed me. Repeat? Yes, when the time is right! Recommend? Yes! Sure! Don't know what you guys are waiting for. Yours, Horny-He-man
positive Easy agency... just like EA. 2 calls and I'm at the hotel for a daytime appt. Koa is cuter than some of the EA girls I've seen (I assume the agencies are related). She answered the door in a nighty and gave me a hug. put donation on dresser and began to undress. Koa assisted and lightly scratched my back and ass. she then turned the shower on to get it warm and invited me in (she didn't join, but she did help with soaping the privates). pleasant. finished up and back to room and she patted me down. Mouthwash too in bathroom she dryed me up and moved down my legs patting me dry. she then put her knees on the towel and put me in her mouth and looked up . nice touch. kissed the boys a bit as well. We moved to the bed where we dfked and fingered her a bit... she moved down my chest and sucked my nips and got down to junior and began a slow and steady bbbj with some fondling and sucking of the boys. she's peitie but can take it all in. I didn't want to burst so broght her up to my face for a kiss and then grabbed her ass and broght her pussy to my face. she sat on my face and seemed to enjoy it. placed her hands on the wall. nice clean pussy. not much talk. I got tired and we moved to some 60 just to get me hard. told her I'm ready and she grabbed a cover. She mounted me cowgirls and did most of the work. I brought her in for some dfk which was nice. eventually I got on top of her and plowed away. 90 more seconds and its over. Clean up and some back scratch and I showered again and dressed. I'd repeat.
positive when I found this hotty I booked her right away! Her her updated look so great. I called bill and set up the appointment. When I got to the room and saw her I knew I made the right choice. She was slim and banging body. no VIPS I would definitely reccomend, VIP's please read on. I got into the room and she motioned for me to come sit next her. We started with a DFK and before I knew it everything was off. I like my bbjs and let me tell you she gives one of the best that I have had yet. She goes deep and slow with lots of juice and plenty of eye contact, I just got harder and harder by the second. She would alternate between my head and my balls until I was about to explode. I am usually a one time poper, so I asked for a cover and she got on top and rode me slow and deep. Thats what I can say about this girls is she likes to go deeep. I then bent her over and started to fuck her doggie, man let me tell you she has the sweetest ass, slim and tone. I kept banging her while pulling her hair and I just couldn't hold on any more and blew my load everywhere. I collapsed on the bed and we cuddled for a few. Got dressed and out I went. Guys I would highly recommend. She is a real sweet hart.
positive Sent her a text based on her pics and the other review. She answered quickly, agreed to do outcall. Was on my doorstep in a matter of 20 minutes. She has an adorable face, and is as sweet as she can be. She's a little skinny, lacking some of the curves you might want on a woman, but she's totally awesome. Look forward to treating her again. She's a sweetheart gents, be nice to her. Went back to my bedroom, she climbed into bed with only bra and panties on. We talked for a bit, then kissed for a bit. Eventually she removed the bra so I could kiss on those adorable little breasts for a bit. She's somewhat shy, but incredibly sweet. Feels like a GF you're having sex with for the first time. I asked if she'd kiss a little further down on me. She obliged with a very nice and slow BBBJ. After a few minutes, she removed the panties and laid down. I normally like to finish mish, but she looked so cute there, I didn't have the heart to ask her to get on top. So I slowly eased inside her. She's way WAY tight, and she even flinched a good bit when I got in, and I'm pretty average sized. Because she felt so tight, and it was my favorite finishing position, I wasn't able to control myself like normal, and it was probably over in 5 minutes or so, vs the usual 10 or more. But that's my fault, not hers. I had no feeling of being rushed whatsoever. She was wonderful, and I look forward to seeing her again.
negative Had seen her posts and decided to try her out. Will Never Again! So after arriving to her low budget hotel. She told me the room number, went up and she didn't even get ready. Appeared to have literally just rolled out of bed. I tried to look past it but she defiantly didn't shower either which was very strong bad odors that were left on my fingers for days, I even tried bleach. So after realizing that she hadn't showered and I already paid for an hour, well I wasn't going to stick it in her after that unbearable smell I just decided to get a bj and could barely stay hard cause of the horrible body odor and gross stench of her pussy. I popped and quickly rinsed off. I wanted to ask for a small refund cause I was only there for 20 mins but decided to just cut my losses. I'm sure she once was great and talented but her lifestyle choices have ruined this one. Sad deal!
positive Texted for an appt. Gave an answer about what time was good for me. Set ir for two hours later. Gave me address. Texted her at my arrival. Gave me apartment number. Went up and saw the girl in the pictures but better looking. Non vip Iwill repeat. She ask about donation , Left ir at nightstand. Told me to undress, i did.She was in lingerie. Istarted touchin her ant said for me to wait until I had turned was ok to touch. She asked me if She could seat at my butt I said yes , it was very ertic feeling her pussy very warm even with the panties on. She started the massage at my back giving hard rubs up and coming down using her fingertips at different times and speed at the return putting me real Hot. By the time that she finished my back my Dick was already at the mx and She saw it. Then the massage Started at my legs and teasing me touching my balls. She did my feet with diferent presure. Then tod me to turn around and I did, She took her top off letting her beatiful and youthful breast for me to see and touch something that I enjoyed very much I started to go down with my hands She stop me telling me that Ir was not allowed to do it. And She started stroking my Dick with different presure and going around the tip putting me at opongo to not standed anymore and I cumm real hard , her strokes were excelent She knows what She is doing. After all She asked me if I wanted to take a shower and I did She said good by with a big hug and a kiss on my cheek.. Golf me to call her next time. And I will call her soon for anorher sesion
positive Crystal is super cute, has a great and works hard for the money. You will be satisfied and will repeat. Crystal looks great upon arrival, very fit body and sexy personality. She kissed me with DFK right away and looked hot in her skimpy outfit. Turns out she loves DFK and this was a highlight of the visit. Undressed and headed over to the bathroom where I got a chance to caress her excellent body even before the shower. I realized her boobs weren't real but they looked good nevertheless. Looking back, her sweet smile and playful personality definitely helped make her more attractive. Not much action in the shower unfortunately, e.g. no preview bbbj, but was still fun with lots of dfk. Walked back to the bed and got into more dfk, which i'm realizing she's really great at, and then she drops down to bbbj, which i immediately realize she's also great at. Loved standing there and thrusting into her mouth with my hands intertwined into her hair, especially since we're standing right in front of the mirror. I moved onto the bed and laid down, and she immediately jumps on top and licks me all over, then moves down for more bbbj. She starts pushing herself down into her throat and it's amazing. I'm thrusting into the back of her throat and I soon lose it with CIM. Dayum. She goes to the bathroom to spit out and rinse, then comes back to cuddle. I finally find out she doesn't really speak much english, so we spend the next 10 minutes just sucking face and it was great. She takes the initiative and moves down for more bbbj. I'm not getting full wood so move on top and I shift her over to 69 to return the favor. I get a finger into each hole and I'm fully in daty with two fingers plunging in an out. It was hot and I'm rock hard and deep in her throat. I'm ready so I move on top but we futz around too much trying to get the hat on, and I'm now deflated. She makes a valiant effort to blow me back to shape and I'm sure her neck was sore after our session, but alas no go. In the end, a super hot session with a super cute kgirl. Can't wait to repeat.
positive I had heard Manny was fun, so when I saw her ad, I gave her a call. Set up an appointment easily by phone, for the same day. Met her in the parking lot of a local notel, provided a gift preview so she could get a room, and then met her at the door. She's a GND cutie, for sure, and I couldn't wait to get behind closed doors. She lived up to her reputation - I recommend and will see her again. Manny's very petite and very pretty, with beautiful skin and sweet, perky little breasts. We got right to it, a little kissing and I went necking and beyond till I reached her cute little pussy, where I lingered for a while, enjoying the taste, the look, and the feel of her while DATY. That got me so hot that I soon covered up and entered her mish, nice and tight and wet, and began some slow stroking. We soon found some good rhythm, but she felt so good I had break it a couple times to keep from coming. After getting my too-soon-urge under control, we got a nice horizontal dance going. Manny was happily up for guidance so we danced in doggie, lazy dog, and CG, too. She's pretty reserved but has a lot of energy, and I was lucky she decided to unleash some of that energy on me - in CG we took turns fucking each other, till she came loudly, then whispered 'holy shit' in my ear. We relaxed for a few minutes, I was ready to finish but she needed a quick break, so as we lay there I slipped off the cover, hugged her closely and asked her to finish me with her mouth. She gave me her pixie-ish grin, said 'sure' and told me to lay back. When she began the BBBJ, I whispered 'holy shit' myself, and the transition into nirvana commenced - one of the best BBBJ's ever! When I was close to coming, I asked her to move to 69, and though she was too sensitive for more DATY I caressed her cute little butt and back, as the sensory overload was overwhelming me, and she sucked my cock and caressed my balls expertly, till I exploded like I had not in a long, LONG time. Manny swallowed every drop and came around smiling. I think I had screamed. No rush or drama from this sweetheart, but I had to go. The only downside was that the hotel was really lower-end, but Manny really brightened up that room for me!
positive Got a tip that there was a diamond out there in Lyn. date made and sure am glad I took advantage of opportunity. Arrived and not only is she a beauty but very friendly and a girl that puts you at ease quickly. Minimal chit chat and off to some kissing. she is a good kisser and we quickly made it to the bed. I kissed her boobs which are nice by the way all the way down to the pussy. Then, looked at her and her eyes gave me that what are you waiting for, eat me look so i did. she moaned lightly and next thing i know we were in 69 and she was devouring my dick like she had not been fed in a long time. Starting fucking her mish and her pussy is ever so tight and soon had her legs pinned behind her ears pounding away while she sounded kike she was in delight. got in very deep and she loved every second of it. it was so good I forgo other positions and pounded her a good 15 minutes before I blew . clean up and she gave me a body to body massage which i enjoyed so much as she teased me hard again. This time asked her to stop and blow me. she did . Excellent bbbj. Ready to fuck i fucked her CG, RCG and doggy. Ready to blow asked her to finish me in her mouth. she did!!!Lyn really loves to fuck was the impression she lkeft. Definitely will repeat. she is a jewel for sure.
positive My first time at this midtown east agency. Very nice experience. Entered a dark apartment, greeted by a young woman who led me to a small bedroom, where I was told to get undressed. A few minutes later Chelsea entered... wow, surprisingly attractive. Chelsea has a very nice demeanor but speaks very little English, so there wasn't much conversation happening. She asked if I wanted a shower, but having just showered I declined and asked to stay. Chelsea happily began to undress.... Fantastic tits and soft skin. We had some LFK, but Chelsea's kissing style wasn't for me and so I backed off a bit and lay on the bed to let her tongue explore elsewhere. After some light licking around my chest and legs, she moved up, and I began fingering her, which she seemed to like but not really want to get into. She moved down and began a solid BBBJ with focus and great technique. I had planned to move into some other positions, but the BBBJ was so nice I just enjoyed it a while. After a few minutes I spun her around and went into 69. She wanted more and climbed up onto my face, which was kind of hot, and I just went to town. Nice, unscented pussy. She soon I think faked an orgasm, which was OK by me because I didn't want to go on much longer, and she came back to suck me until I popped in her mouth. Afterward, she went and got a hot towel, cleaned me up a bit and began to give me a massage. I was soon ready for action again, and this time after a bit of BBBJ asked for a cover before doing some mish, RCG (excellent), and doggie. Overall a great experience.
positive I don't like seeing a provider without seeing pics of her. Nevertheless I was glad I saw Barbie. VIP's ymmv but I recommend ... I read a positive Ter review for Barbie and decided to see her. I do like young white girls and IMHO Barbie is a tall sexy cutie. When Barbie walked in the room it occurred to me she was about to become the tallest girl I have ever had sex with. I am 6' and she is about 6'1". I wouldn't call her pretty but def cute. Barbie is thin. Not curvy and she has big hands & feet. But make no mistake.. She is very feminine. I was immediately excited to "do her" as I appreciate variety. We got down to business quickly. A little lfk led to dfk. I stripped and she took me in her mouth. A nice slow bbbj morphed into 69. Her pussy was amazingly clean, fresh and odorless. I must have been her 1st appointment of the day is what I thought to myself as I feasted on her. I lapped up her clit and shoved my tongue deep in Barbie's hole. Barbie O'd twice and I told her I was ready to mount her. Once I was strapped up I entered her and pounded away in mish. Barbie came again and I erupted hard in the bag. As I cleaned up and got dressed we talked about both of us hailing from Brooklyn. I walked out happy and wishing I had booked an hour long appointment. She might not be the hottest girl @ Jewels's but believe you me... Worth a visit!
positive I had seen Kalani's ad on City-Source and decided to reach out to her, just know she has a booker. I sent the required screening information and was cleared. I have seen Kalani three times (outcall and incall) and have a fourth date set before Christmas all of my bookings have been for 90 minutes. She is attractive, sexy and has a body that aches to be touched and pleased. Kalani is also intelligent and can carry on a conversation, an added plus for me. The following is a synopsis of my latest visit to Kalani's incall in DTLA. Parking hasn't been an issue (but could be) and when I arrived I texted the booker to let her know I had parked. I was given the okay to walk over and Kalani would meet me. Just know Kalani is the real deal and I highly recommend her. VIP's read on for the details..... Kalanii greeted me in a pink robe w/make up on. She looked absolutely amazing. I asked to use the bathroom to freshen up. When I came out Kalani was in the kitchen making coffee and asked if I would like any, I passed. We then sat on her couch and caught up with one another. As we talked I would touch Kalani first her leg, then her arm and neck. As we talked she would smile and it lit up the room. I let her know how beautiful she was and how good she smelled. After awhile she suggested we moved to the bed, Kalani removed her robe and was naked and got under the covers. I quickly undressed and joined her. We began touching and caressing one another then proceeded to LFK the DFK as our hands roamed. Her kisses were sweet, soft, and wet. Kalani began a nice hand job (bbbj is on the menu but the hand job felt so good) and I was soon at attention. Kalani felt so good pressed against my body, her breasts are magnificent and I touched and kissed them, Kalani let out soft moans of pleasure. I worked my way down to her kitty and started daty. She tasted sweet and amazing, soon her juices were flowing and she was quite wet. I could have done this the entire time as Kalani began to breathe shallower and moan. She then said are you ready, the cover went on and we began in mish. Kalani felt so tight and wet, we exchanged kisses. Kalani felt so good and looking at her face pushed me to the edge and before I knew it I had cum. I got up and cleaned up. Kalani asked if I wanted to take a quick shower as our time was coming to a close. After I got dressed and gave her a hug and kiss. I then left walked to my car and texted the booker for another great time w/Kalani. As I mentioned earlier Kalani is a must see, she is sweet, sensual and aims to please. I'm thinking she is my new ATF....
positive Saw Bella's ad and read her reviews, contacted her by e-mail and we started texting each other to set up a date for an evening when I was going to be in town. She sent me the address the day of our date and she came out to meet me when I arrived, with a hug and a kiss on the cheek, we went in and headed ............. Upstairs to her room and her started LFK, leading to some nice DFK kissing, Bella likes to kiss and she is a very good kisser. I jumped in the shower which she had all set up with a fresh towel, came out and we started DFK kissing again, and she got naked pretty fast. Bella is an attractive lady who likes to work out, we got on the bed continuing to DFK and making out like teenagers, with me fingering her pussy as she was stroking my cock, she kissed, her way down my body to give me a nice long spirited BBBJ, with a lot of ball licking. We grabbed a cover and fucked in mish, with her legs over my shoulders, on her side, back to mish, and then to doggie, she was cumming a lot as we lubed up her ass and went to a long hot trip to Greece, in doggie and lazy doggie. Switched to a new cover and fucked standing next to the bed with her legs over my shoulders, until we moved next to her bed and she kneeled in front of me and gave me a Deep Throated BBBJ with no hands until just as I was about to cum she tilted her head back and had me cum all over her face. We cleaned up and hugged goodbye.
positive Took me a while to get a hold of her but when I did I was a half hour away. Asked her if she would still be available and she said yes. Arrived in Eagan and didn't hear from her for about 5 minutes so I was worried she would cancel, but called me and gave me the address. She sounds very sexy on the phone and very bubbly. I arrived at the hotel and she gave me the room #, I went up and when she opened the door I was blown away with how beautiful she was, Make up / Hair / eyes / outfit all stunning. She is a very nice girl as well please be good to her :) Will repeat as often as I can! When She opened the door she let me in and we had some small talk, I put the money on the tv stand and laid on the bed. she laid next to me and asked if I wanted to have a bit of fun during my visit. you all know my response. She told me she had to use the bathroom quick so I waited until she came back out. After she came out she started to undress and I did the same. I love her tattoos they turned me on a lot. I laid naked on the bed and she got ontop of me, with her blonde hair in my face gave me a kiss on my neck as she went to get a condom, Sofia started to play with my cock and got me hard. she put the condom on the tip of my cock and slid it down the shaft. The condom wasn't big enough for me unfortunately... but it worked fine. She took the whole thing in her mouth and proceded to suck on me. she asked me to get ontop of her as she laid back on the bed. as she laid back she spread her legs and exposed the most beautiful pussy I have ever seen. Mmm I just wanted to bury my face in it so bad. I slid my cock inside her juicy tight little pussy and she let out a nice moan and grabbed my hips and started to force me in and out of her. She put her legs up over my shoulders and I grabbed her nice ass and fucked her as hard as I could. I could tell she was loving it. I opened her legs and leaned down and kissed her neck, she asked me to fuck her from behind. so I pulled my cock out and let her bend over. Her tatoos were such a turn on fucking her from behind. I pounded her pussy from behind and she was a bit quiet for the rest of the session but I still thoroughly enjoyed it. I asked her to get on top of me which was declined not sure why but I wasn't going to complain. She laid down in the prone position and let me grab her arms and fuck her from behind. her ass looked great. I rolled her over and she told me she wanted my cum. as I pounded her juicy pussy I rubbed her clit and could feel my cock getting ready to explode. she looked into my eyes and told me she wanted my cum inside her, I exploded into her pussy the second I heard that. After was nice, she is very down to earth and I enjoyed talking with her as well! Highly recommend giving her a try, but be good to her :) she is a great girl!
positive PSE GFE+ services from cute girl, great attitude. Not rushed, but was let out 10 minutes early. Will likely repeat for the services. I saw Vicky before when she was up with Leah in San Mateo and just saw her again. Greeted at the door with a big DFK, she was wearing an orange bikini and looking good, I couldn't wait to get inside that bikini. In the room she gave me a preview BBBJ and some DFK while I was getting undressed, then we headed for the blue toast and a shower. Plenty of DFK and BBBJ in the shower, complete with a surprise rim job when she had me turn around to wash my back- I'm not really that big into rim jobs, I can usually take them or leave them but Vicky got down on her knees underneath me, and the way she gave me a handjob from underneath while licking my ass from underneath was amazing. After the shower we proceeded to the bed where she had me sit on the edge where she could continue the BBBJ. While she was down on the floor going down on me, she proceeded to give me a prostate massage- she has great technique. After ten or so minutes Vicky asked, "You want to fuck my pussy"- of course! I mounted her in mish, plenty of kissing and her biting my nipples until I exploded inside of her. The clock in her room was ahead so when she said "Shower" after I came, I thought it was because our time was almost up but after the shower when I left I looked at my watch and noticed I was only there for a little over 50 minutes- I would have liked to have had the time to go for another pop. That said, I will probably repeat for the service.
positive Quick and easy screening through her agency and was off to her nice incall in the CM area. Greeted me at the door wearing a sexy little black nightie. Her pics are definitely PS'd but she looks damn good. Once in the bedroom things only got better. Non-VIP I highly recommend. She stripped me down and laid my clothes nicely on hangers and we then went to the shower. She washed me which is a nice touch and I got to admire her very nice body. Her English is very limited so there wasn't much in the way of conversation but it was fun nonetheless. After the shower we engage in lots of DFK and I do DATY on her and she responds nicely. She's dripping wet, grabs a cover and proceeds to hop on top and ride me. She's got some expert moves and we've got a good rhythm making sure things last as long as possible. A few more positions and I couldn't help myself and finish in the bag. She gently cleans me up and we lay there making out and her rubbing her kitty on my leg. She starts grinding faster and faster while giving me a nice HJ. When she finishes she proceeds to give a very nice BJ and I finish on her tits. After we're both spent we hop back in the shower, get cleaned up a hug and kiss good bye. I highly recommend checking her out, she is something else.
positive Easy to set-up since I have used group before. Arrived at incall and after second call room was given. When I entered the room I was greeted by a huge tit lady in a black night gown. Immediately she rushed me to the shower. I don't mind since hygiene is high on my priority list daily but this was excessive. When I came out she was sitting on the bed. Nice looking and did I say huge tits? I removed my towel and her dress and on to the bed we went. I laid down and let her get me going. Started kissing my body and then on to my cock for BBBJ. Nice technique and lots of DT. She really got me going and rock hard in NO time. We switched and I gave her some DATY which she seemed to enjoy. On with the cover for mish fucking and dropped a huge load. Nice time just not sure I would see again
positive I had an unexpected opening in my schedule and hoped to make a short notice connection. And I remembered having just read a review of Devin that interested me. It mentioned what a great kisser she was. So I checked her ad out and she was cute - and definitely had the particular skills I was looking for. I called her up, introduced myself and we set a date for later that day. Devin was very friendly, helpful, and really seemed excited to meet me. I liked her personality right off the bat. I met her at a mid range motel that was located northwest of Atlanta. She met me at the door and she's a fun bundle of energy I enjoyed spending time with. Non-VIP's if you are into sweet, enthusiastic, accommodating MILF types you'll have a good time with Devin. VIP's read on... Devin met me at the door and gave me a nice hug and kiss. She was wearing a robe with a tank top and panties underneath. She looks like the cute MILF next door, not a spinner but you can tell she's a lot of fun in bed. We immediately got into a lip lock and she proved to me right away she was a very good kisser. Clothes came off as we made our way to the bed. Her room did smell a bit of smoke, but Devin herself smelled fresh and clean. And she didn't smoke while I was there. I kissed down to her very large boobs and spent some time enjoying them, then worked down to her shaved kitty. Devin was very appreciative of my oral efforts and had several O's. Her kitty was clean and fresh and a joy to orally please. And as an added benefit her pussy became very wet from the attention. Devin has some stretch marks and a bit of a tummy - she is a MILF, so that really shouldn't come as a surprise. But her enthusiasm and attitude is top notch and more than makes up for any physical imperfections. I always say give me a girl with enthusiasm, who really knows how to ride, who can kiss well, and that has a tongue stud and knows how to use it - I'll take that over a pure beauty that doesn't know what she's doing any day.  Speaking of tongue stud, I decided to let Devin show me her skills. She dove right into a very nice bbbj. So nice that it didn't take long and I was ready to pop. I told her that it was time for the main course and she handed me a cover, which I applied. And then Devin got on in cowgirl and started to ride. And ride. And ride. I don't know if she kept switching it up (short strokes, deep strokes, teasing my cockhead, plunging it deep) for my benefit or hers but it was working. I was enjoying it immensely and Devin... well... Devin's one of those girls that once they start orgasming they can't stop. It's just a rollercoaster of wait a minute - here comes another one! And her pussy convulses when she cums so you get a great sensation while inside her. I wanted to change it up so we switched to mish and I could dfk with her and get a really nice rhythm going. I lasted as long as I could but with Devin's pc muscles massaging my cock with every orgasm, her expressions, and words of encouragement, and our passionate kissing it pushed me over the edge. I came hard in the cover and it felt incredible. Devin brought me a babywipe which I used. A warm washcloth would have been better, but I was headed to the shower anyway. When I got out we chatted a bit then I hit the road. I had a very nice time with Devin. She knows all the tricks and genuinely seems to love what she does, which is always refreshing. She gave me everything she had when I was there and made me feel like a king - and I couldn't ask for anything more. I even found out that she had recently injured her knee and must've been in some pain. But she was a trooper as I didn't notice anything wrong with her performance. If you like an enthusiastic MILF type that knows how to kiss well (and do everything else well) then Devin is your girl. 
negative Not sure if anyone else has seen her but non VIPs I'd recommend you stay far away. Called Kammie to set up a massage and blow job while I was in Houston. I noticed her ad on that she looks great. Called and set up an appointment with ease. She said she was close and would be at my hotel in 20 minutes. About 30 minutes later she knocked on the door. She was a little heavier than the photos but looked like she had a nice rack. I stupidly left the $200 donation on the bathroom sink to put her at ease. She asked me to get naked and lay face down. She started a below average massage then got a text. She said her friend who dropped her off had her bag with all of the supplies she'd need. She said she never goes up to a room with her ID or anything in case its a cop or something blah blah blah. She said her friend was meeting her right at the elevator and she'd be right back. I wanted to say please leave the donation if you are going to leave the room but I didn't want to upset her or make it seem like I didn't trust her. About 2 minutes later I peak my head out of the door and nothing. I texted her if everything was ok and she didn't respond. She put up a new ad later that evening. I've never been taken before but I guess that's why you should always come here first. Ugh. Rubbed one out and went to bed :-(
positive Saw that Amanda was available with BI and wanted to give her a try based on reviews. Got there and was met by a gorgeous woman. She's definitely a looker. However, she was a bit reserved and the session was only okay. I suspect YMMV. I wouldn't repeat but others may have better luck. Saw her on an afternoon appointment. She opened the door and I was struck by a tall beautiful woman. Her best features are definitely her eyes. She has the most mesmerizing eyes. We started chatting and I could feel that she was a little reserved. I wasn't sure if it was just me or if she's like that in general, but based on previous reviews, we probably just didn't click. She started with a pretty good BBBJ, which she got me to pop with the first time. She swallowed it all and it was hot. We then started some chit chat. Not the greatest conversation, but she's a cool chick. We then tried to go another round. One of the things that was sorely lacking for me was the lack of passionate kissing. We kissed, but it was LFK at best, and kissing is one of the biggest things for me. I was disappointed in that area. After some kissing and missionary, we gave it a go, but it just wasn't doing it for me. All in all, my experience wasn't great. There was little passion or electricity. It felt a little like going through the motions and she was quite reserved. But she did give a good BBBJ and tried to give me two pops with some good effort. I suspect YMMV. And she is gorgeous.
positive Favorite girl at favorite Asian agency unavailable and everyone else was booked. Suggested Chelsea at a sister agency. Offered room service outcall for small additional fee. I booked and 2 hours later came a knock at my door. Cute girl with a hot body waited at the door. Came in, donation provided and the session began. No obligatory shower though I told her I had showered recently. Great GFE session with dirty talk. Highly recommend. Clothes flew off while we kissed in LFK and DFK. Nice rack and unblemished white skin. Her face was cute, but not as pretty as some other Asians at the sister agency, but her service was on par. BBBJ with eye contact. One of the better techniques, slow, occasional throating down half the length of my average equipment. Ball licking but no sucking. Went to doggie where she became very vocal. I feared my neighbors might knock on the door, but never happened. Switched to missionary where the dirty talk started from her. I went along. Soon she started calling me daddy. I have heard the Papi cry from Latinas before, but no provider had told me to "give it to me daddy" and "I like your dick daddy." Felt like I was in a Taboo porno film. Never thought the daddy cry would get me off, but it made me go deeper and harder. The only issue was how loud she got. I told her to quiet a little a couple of times, but it did not last long. I actually found it pretty hot after I got over the fear of my neighbors hearing it. Blew a weeks worth. Rest and back at it. A couple of positions and doggy finish. She tried to get a third cup from a BBBJ/hand job, but I could not deliver. Left me a very happy man. Highly recommend her and her agency.
positive Sweet girl , easy contact - treat her right Called Nikki when I was passing through her town, scheduled a time to meet. It was a old motel right off the highway, one of the biggest dumps I have ever been in, entire place smelled like smoke but I don't think that Nikki smokes. Showed up and she was freshly showered with still wet hair, her hair is more brown then blonde, Photos accurate. I got undressed and she went right down on me BBBJ, decent skills. I sucked her nice breasts then started to head down to see if I could eat her out, there she stopped me and said that she never wants guys to lick her . Then on to MISH. Eventually I asked if I could pull out and cum in her mouth, she eagerly obliged, removing the condom and taking my load in her mouth. I tipped her , dressed and left - all in a 15 minute session, YMMV I would have wanted to stay longer but really wanted to get the hell out of that place, her new ad says that she has moved to a more upscale location. Overall a good session , shy sweet girl, please treat her right.
positive Decided to check out Crystal since I was able to grab prebooking from her PO. She was one of the kgirls that I had my eye on since I arrived in SF. Contact and setting the appointment was easy as I had used the PO before with a kgirl back in the summer. Directions were pretty clear, the same recognizable apartments in San Mateo area (each PO seems to operate in a different but nearby apartment complex). I reached Crystal's front door and she opened it revealing herself in a 2 piece bikini which fit her very nicely. I would repeat depending on the circumstances, but I do highly recommend her. She matches the picture in the ad pretty well and she definitely has a sexy body and a hot face to go along with it (nice handful of tits - not that fake - and a decent ass!) After going into the apartment, Crystal led me to her bedroom and I put out the donation. When she came back, she helped me get undressed and we went through the blue toast and shower routine. The shower routine did come with a very nice BBBJ preview. Around this time I had asked if she spoke any mandarin and she confirmed and we pretty much continued the rest of the appointment in Mandarin (I've recently had a thing for providers that speak Mandarin, I think it's really hot when an asian provider speaks an asian language and not semi broken english). She dried me off and we went into the bedroom where we DFK'd a bit (we DFK'd before the shower and a bit afterwards). Her DFK skills are sublime and I cherished every kiss. She then had me sit against the bed and got on her knees and began an awesome BBBJ which involved some DT, ball play, cat bath, and a lot of focus on the tip. Eventually I asked if I could DATY too and we 69'd for a little while. She seemed responsive (was hard to tell) but she didn't seem to like FIV since she was pretty tight. She was totally fine with finger outside and around her pussy. YMMW. After the 69, she rubbered me up and got on top for CG. I was pretty exhausted that day so I decided to have her do all the work and just enjoyed CG/RCG. CG was especially nice because I could grope her bouncing tits which looked really nice while she was riding me. After about 10 minutes, I popped and she cleaned me up and then we snuggled for a little bit and talked. We then showered and cleaned up (without a second pop offered), which made me feel it was slightly rushed, as I definitely would have liked some more time with her (I had booked a hour, ended up leaving 8 minutes early). Overall, Crystal definitely knew what she was doing and the first 30 minutes of the session was outstanding. I would definitely recommend her as she is one of the hotter kgirls I have seen (amazing tits and a fairly nice ass). I may repeat depending on the circumstances.
positive I saw Vicky on Monday night. It was easy to get an appointment with her. PO is very easy to deal with. Got the address right away and no confirmation but I text to confirm 2 hours before to make sure. I have been to that address before. Easy parking got one right in front of the gate. Got the code and room number but once inside got confused a little with the map. When I saw Vicky, she is pretty like her photo. She was wearing 2 pieces bikini. I did not pay that attention to that my eyes were fixing on her face. Non-VIP: Must see this girl. When I saw Vicky, she is pretty like her photo. She was wearing 2 pieces bikini. I did not pay that attention to that my eyes were fixing on her face. I put down the donation and went to use the john when I came out she already naked, she helps undress me put her hand into my boxer and grabs my dick. We kiss and DFK, she takes me to bathroom by holding on my hard dick. Blue toast then shower. I was expected her famous shower routine but did not get one just preview BBBJ. In, the bedroom, no script, we just started making out in the middle of the bed. I was on my back and she starts kissing me and suck on my nipples and move down to attack my hard dick. I mean she was attacking my dick, try to make me come in her mouth. I had to stop her and we switch position. It was my turn to do the same to her. I went down on her and eat her out like no tomorrow. Slowly licking her pussy and finger her at the same time. Her pussy gets soaking wet. It ready for me to do P2P. I got up and went for P2P, I slid my dick over her pussy and start fucking her on the outside. She moans louder and moving her head side to side. She probably wants my dick inside he, she asks me to stop and want me to penetrate her. Hat went on and I slowly slide my hard dick into her wet pussy. After that, the race went on who was going to finishing line first. I fuck her in missionary for 10 minutes then want to try her in doggie. Signal her to get on her four, butt up head down, I notice that my dick was all soaking wet with her juice. I fuck her in doggie then push her butt down to flat doggie. She told me she was going to come I stop and change position. I went down on her DATY until she comes big time she squeezes her legs so I could not move my head. She told me it was too sensitive. After short rest I got up and fucking her in missionary until I could not hold it, anymore we both came at the same time. I stay inside her for couple more minutes. She has good muscle control. I can feel her pussy sucking and squeezes on my dick and would not let me withdraw my dick. Finally, she lets me go. She cleans me up and we cuddle and talk. She initials the second round I told her try if she could wake up the sleeping giant. She tries but the giant had enough for the night. We talk some more then second shower. She helps dress me and put the socks on too, what a service. Vicky is up to all the hype. I will see her again. I should have gone see her when she was in Peninsula now it is a long drive for me but it worth the trip.
positive Have had my eyes on Lyn Dariling for awhile and finally made contact. She is an extraordinary girl--smart, very pretty, and lots of fun. After efficient and thorough screening I arrived on time and was guided in. Met warmly at the door by the very pretty Lyn Darling and she proved herself worthy of her name. A warm hug and a passionate kiss and some pleasant exchanges really made me feel comfortable. We made our way into the bed room for some more great dfk and the hands started to roam. As she undressed me she smiled and finally made her way to my zipper and freed its contents. Gently stroking she went on her knees for the beginning of many wonderful bbbj's--she is so very good at this it's hard to get her to stop. I fell to the bed and she kept at it always looking up with her gorgeous eyes--she is very pretty. it was my turn for some daty and she enjoyed it as I licked and tongued her tasty spot and inserted a finger and she responded with much pleasure. She is vocal and loves to talk in ways that are exciting. More bbbj and then onto 69 and then on with the cover for round one that started in cg, then went to rcg, then mish with hot kissing throughout and she announced that we should cum together and that we did as she stroked herself and thrust herself into me and as I reciprocated back. Totally awesome experience! We then talked for awhile--she is well spoken and very smart--and then she started with some soft caressing and I immediately responded. This led to more bbbj and mish and doggie where I erupted again in lazy dog. Lyn is a darling and made good on her promise when we started that she was going to make me feel like a king.
positive I decided to give myself an early Xmas present. Oh, did Santa deliver for me! Ivy is a delightful escort. She has the skills and temperament that make this activity worthwhile. I am so very glad we met. If you choose to make a date and are lucky enough to enjoy her acceptance, you won't be disappointed. We've been having an unbelievably warm Fall/Early Winter here in NY. But, today it was seasonally cold. Perfect weather to cuddle up and have body heat raise the temperature of the room and one's spirits. Ivy booked us at one of those nice, clean, pocket hotels in Midtown West. She greeted me wearing a silk robe hiding an attractive bra & panty outfit. My hands were cold and she told me that she'd warm them up in a heartbeat. She didn't exaggerate. Her glasses and sweet countenance (see her ad) reminded me of a young school teacher. I sure wish I had one like her growing up. We kissed, tongues slightly touching (LFK) and I went to wash the city's soot off my hands. When I returned to the bedroom, there was something perfectly natural that overtook our activity. Kisses grew more intense (DFK); embraces led to light touching; bodies merged and clothes shed allowing great intimacy. The chemistry was very special. Doesn't happen all that often, but when it does, it makes these dates really satisfying. Ivy is pretty; she has a lovely, young body; modest breasts with the most wonderful nipples. Her hair is thick and flowing. Really sexy! Being with her had none of the "feel" of P4P. Rather, it was so much more like what GFE is meant to be. Our tongues played with each other and Ivy held me close as I played with her nipples and reached down to her womanhood. I began to kiss her neck and breasts and worked my way to her sweet pussy. She really enjoyed my DATY combined with FIV. My tongue surrounded her vagina and we fond a rhythm together that resulted in her having a soft, deep climax. More DFK and embraces followed. We rolled over with Ivy on top and she began to kiss my body. Slowly, methodically she worked her way to my shaft. She made love to me orally (bbbj) as if we were committed to one another. Really great technique and pleasure. I broke off and we kissed some more. The DFK seemed to bring us closer and more aroused. I asked for a condom and we fucked in MISH; then CG. Ivy's body and our eye contact indicated she was enjoying my being inside her. I was very excited by now and asked that she bring me to orgasm orally. She shed the cover, took me in her soft mouth and I CIM convulsing. It took a while for me to calm down. We held each other and talked about how Ivy arrived at this place in her life. Also, about travel and her future. I played with her and brought her to a second orgasm by cunnilingus. She loved it! Time flew by and it was time to go. We talked about a longer session our next meeting. Ivy is a sweetheart.
positive Devin is a super friendly person .easy going and pretty she has some baby like some people said but with her attituded you forgot all that great kisser I start texting her she respond quick and asked me a few questions I told her That I'm a TER MEMBER and she said thats a big plus the day of the appoinment she gave the address. And when a get there text me the room number I was glad to see that is the girl in the pictures and very pretty she smiled and get a hug knowing what to expect from what I read from previous reviews we just start dfk then 69 she really enjoys you can tell by the sounds of her getting wet after that she gave a really good bbbj then she puts me on the condom and I asked her to be on top her titties are huge I start kissing and licking with passion she really liked then we went missionary and thing went even hotter she starts making sounds and I felt her comming and kissing me with passion and the same time It was awsome later I came in bag and she gave some tissues to clean up overall I had a really good time with a beatifull easy going great kisser woman
positive So I called mynusual tai service ( Pam ) and she had a girl Paris who had good reviews ..she is tall and pretty so I went for it .. Met near Ohare and was met by a tall pretty kinda shy at first tai woman behind the door .. She loosened up as I joked with her an she got more comfortable with me .. Go see her guys she's definitely worth it .. Somimwalk ishe greats me with a hug and lite kiss and off to the shower we go where she cleans everything well lots of attention to my junk with the soap which I liked .. She had me get out and she soaped herself up which I'd rather have done as its been fun to do that it the past with others .. No preview bbbj which was disappointing but it got much better as we hit walked to the bed and standing up groped each other and did some kissing as she went for my junk which was now hard with some very sensual rubbing .. She dropped down to her kness and began an awsum bbbj which I was loving dt and lots of spit this went on for 5 mins then we fell on the bed she then attached my dick with allot of moaning and a fabulous bj I was loving it as she positioned herself so I could p,ay with her nice shapely ass and p,ay with her puss on the outside .. She was getting wetter and wetter as we kept this up for 15 mins .. I then positioned her on her back where I could feed her my cock as I continued to finger the outside of her pussy .. We then switched to 69 for a bit then I laid her down so I wouldn't bust yet and continued to lick and eat her till she came hard in my mouth .. Very hot !! She then dove back down to my dick and said yer turn and sucked me good for another 5 mins felt great I had her put a glove on and fucked the shit out of her with her on top riding for 10 mins then hit her doggie and lazy dog .. I almost came a few times but have trouble coming in the glove so I ripped it off for more bbbj followed by a great Hj where I busted all over her tight in shape hardbody !! Cleaned up and cuddled an I was out the door a happy man .. Go see her she's very pretty and has some great skills and loves the sex!
positive After seeing Leonie once a while back, i knew i had to see her again sometime. I was lucky i was able to book an appointment to her. I went to her hotel again. Leonie let me inside and wow she still looked amazing. I still couldn't get over how hot she looked. Her service hasn't changed anything, it's still outstanding. She didn't remember me initially, it had been a few months. She had me disrobe and then she led me to the shower. It was a solo shower. While i was in there we chatted and by the end of the shower she remembered me perfectly. Then we went to the bedroom where we kissed and i grabbed her two huge boobs. She grabbed for my cock which was getting hard fast. While we caressed each other her lingerie came off. We were both getting really hot for each other and suddenly she pushed me down to sit on the edge of the bed and went down for some awesome BBBJ. Her deep throat technique was good as before. I had a great view of her ass from the mirror behind her and her head bobbing up and down on me. I reached around to start feeling her pussy, she started groaning into my cock. She jumped up and crawled on the bed spreading her legs wide for me. I went DATY, she was getting wet from it. Her moans were getting louder and louder. I went up to kiss her so she could taste herself, she seemed to like it as we continued kissing. I asked her if i can tittie fuck her and she said yes. At this point we were both extremely heated up. Finally i had to be inside her. She wanted to be on top first because she wanted to start slowly. I tried to fuck her fast, but she kept me down, she was driving me crazy. I wanted to pound her. She wanted it too but she was just teasing me. Finally she gave in and we fucked fast and hard. Then we moved to mish with her hanging off the edge of the bed and me standing. Leonie really liked this. She was making so much noise as i plunged into her deep and fast. I don't know how i held on while i was watching those beautiful bouncing tits. I had to change position before it was too late, so i flipped her to Doggie . Seeing that nice ass below me was such a great view. She made another O. I decided i wanted to see her ass, her face and tits at the same time so i had her sit on me RCG on the edge of the bed in front of the mirror. Wow she looked F..... Hot. I was very close to the finish so i asked her to change back to Doggie. I pushed her flat because she was so tight in this position and she let me thrust deep into her. The sound of her moans were music to my ears. I pulled myself out of her, i ripped the cover of and released my load on her sweating back and ass. I collapsed on top of her and we were both breathing heavily. I needed a few minutes to get back to myself. After i went for a relaxing shower and when i came back she offered me a nice massage. I needed it. While she was working on my back we had a nice chat. She tried to wake me up again but after a session like this, no way. After the massage i dressed up and she gave me a kiss and goodbye hug. I'll probably be back to her again because that body is so perfect and she is gorgeous.
negative Ariana's assistant was very helpful and very on top of things. She ensures everything is in order for a once in a lifetime experience. Ariana arrived at the defined meeting place on time wearing a sexy body suit. We got to know one another and eased into the date naturally. Another reviewer mentioned that Ariana is the holy grail. After my experience, it would be hard to refute that statement. Ariana is one of the most beautiful women who I have had the pleasure of spending time with. She is really sweet and fun to get to know on all levels. At some point, we both knew the date would be moving to a different activity and Ariana had me help her out of her sexy outfit. Her body is perfect, not much more I can say. Perfection. We did some LFK and eventually she was lying on the bed with her legs spread for me to orally partake. She encouraged me and told me what she was liking more. We continued with some additional foreplay where she got off the bed and knelt down in front of me, standing at full attention of course. She was using her hand and mouth and I had to slow her down some to keep from erupting. I wasn't going to hold off much longer and soon I was spraying her chest with pop one. We talked some about the industry and Ariana asked me how long it takes me to recharge. I knew it wouldn't be long and I was correct. She raised me back up with her mouth and hand, putting on protection, I entered her in the MISH position. Soon she asked if I wanted to switch to doggie, which I was hoping for actually. Able to control myself easier after round 1, we stayed in doggie alternating rhythm and speed. Sexiest thing was when she would glance back at me. We reached the finish line and I shot inside the condom since the feeling was too good to pull out. We showered and said our goodbyes. 10/10 does exist.
positive I had some free time after work and found out Miranda came to town new. Texted the agency and got confirmed right away. Though my appointment was delayed by 15 mins or so, the agent kept the communication open and ensured that my appointment was not impacted by ones behind me. Miranda was beautiful and funny in a way that we joked about the location of the apartment and Seattle weather, etc. Shower together was great with she noticed that my shoulders were stiff, and gave me some wonderful hot water plus massage. French preview in the tube was sessional! Back to the bedroom, she asked me to lean by the bed and kneeled down with BLS and BBBJ with combination of licking, sucking, with hands and tongues. I enjoyed her wonderful back and perfect ass while my hands were playing with her 33c boobs, and I felt that her tits were getting harder and asked her to lay down so I could speak some french to her. DATY with my hand on her right spot made her came with juice flowing down my mouth. We went on with 69 and my fingers were all over her. She applied cover with her mouth and went on BJ for mins. CG, K9 and various missionary positions, we tried and she was dirty talking the whole time... She really was a combined PSE and GFE!
positive First time using Discrete Pleasures but the reviews were encouraging and I wanted to try somewhere new. Emailed the evening before and got a response the next morning, had to switch times same-day but it didn't seem to be a problem. I had actually requested time with Elsa, but only Orange was available at my preferred time which wasn't a big deal to me. Location was an apartment in Midtown West, quiet block in between very busy avenue blocks. Standard two-call setup, on arrival I was asked to leave my shoes in the hallway and let into a clean and fairly spacious room. Orange entered just a moment or two later. Non-VIPs, I would absolutely repeat with the agency and would recommend Orange as well. Even before I had my coat hung up Orange gave me a big DFK. As she helped me undress for the shower the flattery started - I actually appreciated that she was more verbal than lots of other providers, even when her English failed her. Standing shower was a more playful experience than most, with mutual washing and more DFK and BBBJ. Back in the room, Orange put what looked like Korean porn on the TV and got us comfortable. I'd left the donation out on the dresser, but there was never talk of house fee or tip nor did she seem to touch it until after I left. On the bed, the session was less rushed than most I've had. No massage preamble, just down to lots of DFK, BBBJ and 69 until the main event. Orange is an aggressive kisser, perhaps more so than I prefer but I'm sure it's to lots of people's taste. CFS was very good - she's so tight that after all the lead-up it was difficult to pace myself. After we were done there was lots of playful chatting and laying about together. Second pop was offered but I was happy enough to just relax. I'm interested in seeing the other girls DP has on offer but wouldn't hesitate to repeat with Orange as well.
positive Jenna is hot and sexy. Her touch is great and is worth seeing if you like a girl who is very much in shape Jenna waited for me in the hallway wearing a t-shrit and masseuses pants and welcomed me in. I gave her the donation and she asked me to get naked and lie on the table. Once she got in the room she took of her short, pants and bra, and stayed in a g-string only. The massage wasn't therapeutic t all and didn't seem it was intended to be. She touched me very lightly but always very sensually, her hands coming all over my body, her breasts touching me occasionally and her lips very close to my ear when she passed by. After some nice teasing, playing with my balls while still lying face down ,she asked me to flip over. She teases me a bit more and then started touching my willing cock. Until now the massage was on dry. she reached for her bottle of lotion and poured it over my cock and started playing with it, stroking, stopping, stroking again. She used her breasts as part of the cock massage and allowed em to much them. Her body is so toned! She clearly works out a lot and cares about staying in shape. I never felt such a firm ass in my life, and I have felt many.... I tried my luck, slowly moving my hands from her firm ass a little lower to her covered pussy. I was lucky :) Soon enough she mover th string of her thong aside, giving me a view of her super tight ass hole and soon to be wet pussy. I brushed my hand lightly at first over or ass, moving toward her clit and she seemed to enjoy it, started reaching heavily and getting wet, which helped me with a more fluent movement around her clit. unfortunately, with this view i didn't last much longer and popped in her hands, not having enough time to maybe being her to an orgasm too. I would very much recommend to go see Jenna! Have fun :)
negative Beauty is always in the eye of the beholder, but I think you might need to be blind to not think Ariana Marie is beautiful. Ever since I first laid eyes on her, I have been crushing hard and no one was happier than me when she decided to make herself available to her fans. I reached out with an introductory email and after being cleared by Ariana and her assistant (who is a delight to work with - she's super easy going and very responsive to email), we set about finding some time to spend together. We decided on a 2 hour date in LA (she was in town already) so we wouldn't have to rush - best decision ever BTW. Typical call when arrive and get room number setup. I managed to get lost, but quickly found my way to her room with some help from her assistant (damn you multiple towers!). I was ridiculously nervous, and when the door opened, I was absolutely floored by the beautiful woman in front of me. I think I'm in trouble here. The bar has been set impossibly high as far as I am concerned. While the number of reviews are low, they are all glowing for a reason - Ariana Marie just might be the embodiment of perfection. She is stunningly gorgeous - seriously, just absolutely breathtaking. And she's even more beautiful in person that she is in her movies, which is pretty damn impressive considering how perfect she looks on camera. But what sets her apart and puts her in a league of legends is the genuineness of her enjoyment of the time you spend together. There isn't an ounce of the "hot girl syndrome" that some girls can have - she is easy going, friendly, and exudes sweetness. She is great at reading people and I think she has an uncanny ability to please whoever she is with. And in doing so, she never makes anything seem forced or contrived - it all just seems to flow. She is beautiful on the outside, but so much moreso inside too. And that smile... Holy crap what a beautiful smile. If you want to spend time with a genuinely sweet, warm, interesting woman who just happens to be one of the prettiest people in the world - yes, not just porn, but overall - and to top it all off is an amazing partner in bed, spend some time with Ariana. Spend some time getting to know her and treat her with respect and she'll repay you in spades. Gents, lie, cheat, steal (well, please don't really do those things), but do WHATEVER it takes to spend time with this amazing woman! Ariana almost immediately put me at ease by responding favorably to a couple of little things I had brought her. Her smile melted my heart completely and immediately. It's not fair how beautiful she is. But as I came to discover, her true beauty comes from within. She was absolutely radiant in this grey dress and striking high heels that accented her perfect figure. I couldn't believe I was sitting there talking to Ariana Marie! Rather than immediately rip each others clothes off, we sat down and got to know each other. We talked about our experiences, our lives, the industry, and I really felt like I got to know Ariana. It was a great conversation - I felt like we connected on a lot of levels and are of the same mindset/approach to a lot of things. She exudes authenticity - I never got the sense she was hiding anything or saying what I wanted to hear, but that she was letting herself be herself and genuinely enjoy the time we spent together too. And as someone who strives very hard to please, that made our date a lot more enjoyable on my end too. I never once looked at the clock, but I think our internal clocks both chimed at the hour mark and we both seemed to want to experience each other. I excused myself to the shower and emerged to find Ariana honoring a wardrobe request I had made. Now I get that a lot of people want to live out their own porn fantasies and want the "porn-star experience" when they spend time with these performers. But for me, I wanted to spend time with the most beautiful woman I have ever laid eyes on. Our physical time together was much more GFE - and that was because I wanted it that way, and Ariana picked up on that immediately. She's definitely a pleaser. We kissed and gradually let our encounter progress. My towel and her lingerie were quickly discarded. I started quickly kissing my way down her neck and spent quite a bit of time kissing, licking, and sucking on her soft, perfect natural breasts. Her nipples were responsive and hardened as her excitement - and obviously my own - grew. I kissed my way down her perfect body and greedily spread her legs and started to kiss and tease her soft pussy lips. She seemed to enjoy that I didn't dive right in, but that I worked her up a little before starting to lick her perfect (sense a theme here?) pussy. She tasted sweet, and I spent some time making sure to get her nice and wet. I slowly worked a finger inside her tight wet pussy as I licked and flicked her clit. As I said I'm a pleaser, so her moans and encouragements really turned me on further. And when she came on my tongue and finger, I was both supremely proud and supremely hard. As she recovered, she quickly made it all about me and started to lick and suck my cock. But she and I were both eager for the main event and before I knew it, the cover was on and she lowered herself onto my throbbing hard cock. I had to start thinking about all sorts of random things to avoid cumming instantly. We worked into a nice rhythm, but I had to keep stopping pretty quickly to avoid cumming too fast. We switched to missionary, which is always my favorite so I can look at my partner and when that partner is as perfect as Ariana, wow. She seemed to love it when I pushed in deep and hard, rocking our bodies together. Finally we switched to doggie. Good lord this girl is perfect from every angle. I reached down to rub at her clit as I thrust into her. It didn't take me too long to reach the point of no return. We had discussed a facial beforehand, so I pulled out and she encouraged me with a twinkle in her eye to cum on her pretty face. I was all too happy to oblige and erupted, my entire body getting weak as I came. She smiled that perfect smile at me with my cum on her face - what a sight and I took it in for a moment. Then I went to get her a towel to clean up. Our time was nearly up, but she wanted to take a shower together. Lucky me! We rinsed each other off and shared some more conversation and laughs. I can't stress enough what a sweetheart Ariana is. By the time I got dressed and ready to go we had gone a little over but she never said a word or rushed me out the door. I hated having to go but wanted to be respectful and after a couple more kisses and a great hug, we parted ways. Ariana Marie is perfect. There is no other way to say it. Just wow. She is everything you could ever want from a provider and more. I am extremely grateful to have spent time with her, and am probably extremely lucky we don't live in the same city or I would be 100% bankrupt. I will absolutely repeat as able. Thank you Ariana for the most amazing time together! Treat her well gentlemen - as a couple others have already said, she absolutely is the Holy Grail.
positive Angie was very easy to contact and work through screening. Kept me updated on status and arrived at my outcall exactly on time. Fun time chatting and great GFE. Hope to repeat. Very nice GFE visit. She agreed to meet at my place and showed at the door looking nice, somewhat casual ... hair pulled back. She is not BBW, but built well and thick in the right areas. Enhanced breasts look very nice. Started with a little light conversation, slow undressing, then deep kissing, mutual massage, FIV, slowly working to BBJ. After a very nice time with that, asked if I was ready (definitely), then moved to CG where she really knew how to work her assets. Switch to doggy and I have to agree with the other review on how nice the backside view is. Worked that for quite a while and then moved to mish where the mix of close contact and kissing was the perfect combination. Definitely couldn't last the whole hour, but used the time after to hang out, chat, and caressing. Very sweet girl. Would recommend a visit.
positive Was in town for business and saw Farrah's profile and reviews. Decided to give her a call and was glad I did. Screening was easy and she was over to my hotel in a flash. Non-VIPs I would repeat. Farrah arrived at my hotel a little late due to traffic. But she quickly made up for that by giving me the whirl of a lifetime. She quickly excused herself to the bathroom and came back wearing an attractive bra and panty set. Her body is pretty solid, thin but with curves in the right places. She immediately started a long and deep kiss while unbuttoning my pants. We moved to the couch where she grabbed a pillow and proceeded for a long and sensual BBBJ. Lots of eye contact, spit and sucking of all types. Eventually included some rimming which was a first for me. Eventually we moved to the bed for more BBBJ followed by 69 which she seemed to enjoy. Put on the hat and they started a variety of positions. Mission, Doggy, Reverse, all where in order en executed flawlessly. I toyed with the idea of greek, but decided to save it for next time as I was close to the edge. Finished with more BBBJ to CIM. Overall a very stimulating experience.
positive TER really paid off on this provider. Manny's reviews were great and I got the same results. Small spinner with a great attitude. Easy to work with. VIPs read on Manny is one of my new ATFs. Very cute, easy to work with, great attitude and a great provider. She is definitely a spinner who is barely 100 pounds and no chest put she looks perfect if you are looking for that type. And her service was incredible. A couple of text message got me to her hotel. Nothing special but clean and safe. I came in and she was wearing a t-shirt and sweatpants and looking very cute. A very quick LE check and the donation on the table and we each started getting undressed. I paid for hhr and wished I had more time to stay. Laid down together and enjoyed some very nice DFK. Could have done that the whole time. Asked for a BBBJ and she obliged. It wasnt the best bj I ever had but good enough and enjoyed how she would look up as she did it. I had to stop her so it didnt end too quickly and I did a bit of DATY to give myself a break. After that, the cover went on and I finished with some incredible MISH with so more DFK. Manny has a great attitude and is fun to be with. Definitely a combination of GFE and girl next door. Treat her well.
positive Saw her post and checked TER and seems like a nice provider. Took a few calls to get to her and met her at the hotel 30 minutes later. non-VIPs, I will repeat. She greeted me at the door and the photos in the post is pretty accurate. She is a very friendly and pretty girl with a killer body. Once I got comfortable, she cleaned me with some wipes first and put on a cover before the bj. It's a cbj, but she did a pretty good job and have good eye contact. After a few minutes, she took off all her cloth and got on me. It is quite a view of these natural dds. They are soft and feels great. I then asked to get on top of her and started riding missionary. She is pretty pleasing and talks dirty. After I am done, she cleaned me up again and we chatted for a while and I hugged her goodbye. Overall, a very nice friendly busty girl and the price is good. I will repeat if she's in the area again.
positive I've used this agency before and so had no problem setting up a meeting with Darby. It's the typical 2-call system in an upscale condo. Non-VIPs -- I was blown away by the combination of Darby's gorgeous GND looks, her genuine GFE, and perfect, playful attitude. Already repeated. New ATF. VIPs -- read on for the juicy details. I have seen a lot of great Korean and Thai girls lately, so it was not going to be easy for a new girl to really impress me. I saw Darby's pictures and was intrigued by her different look and curvy build. Her reviews looked good, so I decided to check her out. I've now seen her twice and can't wait to see her again. Looks -- Darby is definitely the girl in her pictures, accounting for some PS'ing, as always. Unlike her pictures, Darby has cut her hair shorter now and wears it tied back, and she doesn't wear all that makeup. Instead, she presents herself as a casual babe which suits her rockin' GND looks perfectly. She's listed as 5'3", 100 pounds, 32D natural, which seem right, except that her twins, while gorgeous and feel nice and soft, are definitely man-mades. As can be seen from her pictures, she has a beautifully proportioned medium build with sexy curvy hips and ass that stand out beautifully from her thin waist. No doubt a 9 in looks as far as I am concerned. Attitude -- While her english is limited, she has no trouble coming across as my long-lost hot girlfriend. Darby is energetic, attentive, and takes direction very well. Best of all, she seems to love sex, or at least acts convincingly like it. That makes the whole experience so much more fun for me. She doesn't rush and, in fact, we spent a good amount of time cuddling toward the end of my last session with her. It's amazing to me how she is able to make me think she's my girlfriend. Service -- Starts off with a high-quality rimming for a few minutes. Then, after enjoying some time with her boobies, I feast on her beautiful shaved kitty and ass. She really enjoys it and gets nice and wet. She's down with FIV but not FIA. I can honestly say giving oral to her is among the very best I have experienced, perhaps the best. Darby has good BBBJ skills and enjoys all the usual positions. I especially like mish with her so I can look at her pretty face and DFK to my heart's content. She's flexible and is happy to fuck with her feet on my shoulders or her knees pressed against her chest. As for the ending, once I blasted away into the bag during mish. The other time I exploded into her mouth with a hot BBBJCIM. Darby is my new ATF, and I am very happy to recommend her. Actually, I would rather keep her to myself (-: but, like all these girls, she needs the business or she won't stick around for very long. So go check her out for yourself and see what you think!
positive I texted Kayla on a late afternoon wanting to see her on the next afternoon.She was pretty quick to answer and we set the time for 3 pm on the next day. I had already saw her on a previous occasion and was really excited about getting to see her again.I had thought about doing a review after the first time I saw her but never got around to it..so after seeing her for the second time is why I am on here...WOW!!!...OMG!!! Kayla is a true GFE and she makes u feel very welcome and relaxed.All her attention is on u and what u want to do within her boundaries.She is a really sweet girl and guys I highly recommend going to see her...You will not regret the visit. I got to her incall location and shot her a text to let her know that I was there.It was a mid level hotel but was clean.She sent me the room number and I was on my way up to the third floor.Knocked on door and it opened and there she stood.WOW!!Kayla is a beautiful woman and is petite..looks just like her pictures.She invited me in and told me to make myself comfortable while she finished getting ready in the bathroom.She came out in a couple of minutes in nothing but a bra...I couldn't wait to get her in my arms and to kiss those sweet lips.A lot of DFK that I really like.I slid that bra off and starting licking and sucking those nice perky tits while we were still standing.I could have licked her all over!!I told her that I was gonna have to eat that pussy.She asked me if I was hungry?Oh yea.. She got on the bed on her back and I buried my face in that cock licking that clit and sucking lightly on that clit and pussy.She started to really get into it and after about 10 minutes she said you r gonna make me cum...I love it when a woman tells me that and she had a nice O...She said know that it was her turn so got on my back and she started with a real nice covered BJ...God it felt good and she really knows what she is doing.I felt that losing it feeling coming on so I asked her to stop and start some CG.She climbed on top and started riding me really good..Her pussy is really tight and feels like heaven.Kayla really gets into it and after several minutes of CG I could tell that she was gonna orgasm again so I started talking dirty to her telling her to fuck me hard. She had another really nice orgasm.We started some nice K9 with me standing and her on her knees backed up to me at the edge of the bed.The sight of that beautiful ass backed up to me with her face on the bed was awesome. We did this for a while with her moaning and I could tell that she was into it.This is one of the reasons that I like Kayla because she really gets into the time together!! I couldn't pop in this position so I asked her to go back to BJ...I layed on my back with her between my legs on her knees and she started giving me one hell of a BJ.. I could feel the rush building and told her that she was gonna make me cum.The pace of the BJ picked up and I filled that cover up..WOW!!! Had an intense O and had to lay there a while to regroup...Loved it..Had a blast and will definitely go back to see her. Guys go see her!!
positive Set up my appointment with BAD, this agency typically delivers beautiful K girls with great service. Alli was no exception. While not the model type , she was still attractive and very willing to please. Went up to the apt. , opened the door and there stood a very p[retty Alli. The DFK started almost immediately and was enthusiastic throughout, Great session. VIPs read on We moved from the kissing and groping in the entre way and into the bedroom, Continued making out as her deep DFK was a real turn on. Had her start BBBJ while I was standing and this went on for a while until we went to the shower. Intense cleaning for both of use and some fingering behind to get us going. Out of the shower and into the bedroom where the non stop fun began. Alli gave me another excellent BBBJ and then I moved to DATY with FIV and a little FIA - unusual for a K girl. Went at it until Alli had an O and then it was my turn. A little rimming thrown into the mix and then she hopped on top. First in RCG then CG. She definitely rides like a champ! Came after a while then she cleaned me up and we hung out for a while. Limited English but we could still communicate. Very sweet girl. After a while we got back into it and Alli gave me an enthusiastic BBBJ followed by an excellent HJ to O #2. Great time, enthusiastic girls you will not go wrong with,
positive Discrete Pleasures and its affiliate Asian Sensation are quickly becoming my favorite AMP's in the city. Typical two-call system. Nice residential building in midtown east (they also have location in midtown west). My old favorite Vicky was not available and the phone girl recommended Orange. I am glad she did. Non VIPs it was another enjoyable session with this agency. VIPs read on... I was buzzed into non-doorman apartment building and arrived at apartment. Door opened and Orange was coyly hiding behind door. Once I got inside and got a look at her, I knew I was in for fun. She is quite petite with a cute round face. She grabbed by butt and led me inside. She helped me off with my shoes and we went into her room. She was wearing a skimpy bikini. We made out of a while and then she helped me out of my clothes. I opted for a shower, so we went back down to bathroom. She stripped naked and gave me a very soapy rubdown in shower and teased with a little BBBJ before drying me off. Back in the bedroom we started a mutual massage. She has nice soft skin. After 10 minutes of massage and teasing, I was rock hard. She gave me a cat bath, paying extra attention to the boys before moving on to a BBBJ. After a few minutes, she told me to roll onto my stomach and proceed to rim my butt hole vigorously. After a few minutes of that, I rolled back over and grabbed her, pushing her onto her back. I took my cock and stuck it in her mouth and, without being too forceful, f*cked her mouth. I came powerfully and she took it all in her mouth. Once I was done, she excused herself to spit / rinse. She returned after a few minutes and wiped me with hot towel then gave me a nice massage. It only lasted a few minutes before she was stroking my cock, getting me had again. Once I was hard, she pulled out condom and on it went. She then straddled me and rode me cowgirl until I came. I did get a second cup, but it paled in comparison to the more volcanic first round. I guess I was tired. Anyhow, she cleaned me up and I got dressed. Excellent session all around.
positive Easy setup via text. Used the agency several times. Koa opened the door in white underwear and greeted me with a hug and a kiss. Nice looking young lady with beautiful shapes. After the shower, Koa laid me down and to proceeded to a BJ. She spent a lot of time playing with and kissing my balls and gave me rimming. Very hot start! Time for me to explore her body. I work up to down: DFK, spent a long time on B cup breasts, very firm breasts. DATY and DATO time. Very clean. She seemed to enjoy that portion. Cover timed. She sat on me and went from from cow girl at various angles, to reverse cow girl. We moved on to mish, then doggy. Time to relax with a 69, nice juicy and tasty Y. She was BBBJ and HJ at the same time until CIM. Will most definitely repeat.
positive Saw Sarah's ads and wanted to meet her. I had some time during the day and called and she picked up. Said she was available in a few hours we made the date. Slight screening and then two call system. Went to the room and was greeted by a petite girl who looked great. Had a little get to know you conversation and then the fun began. I will see her again. We continued to converse while we both got undressed. Once I was naked I got on the bed she came over after taking off her clothes and slipped the condom on and began a CBJ. She went up and down continuously on my cock all the way to the base. I have had BJs before where the girl will try to take it and then stops Sarah went up and down all the way - she knows how to give head! After a while of that bliss I said I wanted to suck on her tits she hopped on top and immediately had my cock in her pussy. After a few strokes we switched to mish. I wanted doggy so turned her over started in dog and then lazy do. I really banged away and as I finished she kept moving so as to milk all of the cum out of me. Great girl who knows how to please.
positive She was easy to book, texted then called, checked a reference, and set up for afternoon. Sounded really hot on phone. I told her of my entrance fantasy and she laughed lightly Well when I got to the door she was into my fantasy. Bra and nylons and had my pants down and cock in mouth before I could close the door, but I did insist on closing the door. I thought she was going to make me explode thru the ceiling and be done in 5 minutes, but at the right time she got up and helped me finish undressing . We laughed and chatted for a bit then started kissing. We did everything I could think of that I like, twice and finished miss, my favorite. She really got into cowgirl, She rolled me over and slid my pounding member into her literally dripping vagina, then rode me like a bucking bronco, the bed was bouncing and was about 6 inches from the wall when we finished. I tried dogie for a bit but got on top to miss, I needed to see her eyes as I exploded inside her. Oh and she made a mess of the bed, she is a squirter. Do not miss this girl. She helped me dress kissing me all the time
positive Have had the extreme pleasure of seeing this gal several times over the past 2-3 years; under another name. Fella's once you cross the threshold of the door, you are all hers. She greets you like a king with some of the best LDFK that I've ever experienced. You don't even have to [actively] take your cloths off...it's like they just fall over all by themselves!! Before you know it, you being handled in ways you have only imagined. Take a chance on this one fellas...you will not be disappointed!! Walked into the door and this gal is all over me...the kind of thing that you wish your wife would do, but well...just never seems to. Preslee knows EXACTLY what a guy likes, and she's quick to address that desire. Plain and simple, this gal loves cock...in her mouth or her pussy...never went for her ass, but I'm sure she would be glad to accommodate. She's an exceptional kisser, so she takes her time in getting everything all wet. She's quick to tell you how she loves cock in her pussy. Every experience has been covered, but based on my most recent visit (#3) she verbally indicated that I could "fill her up". I didn't, but I'm confident she would have been fine with it...I was pretty detailed about doing it in our moment of passion and she was giving it right back. Her well-groomed puss (and month) are so nice, you'll not not need her ass to lose your load...actually holding your load will be the challenge. She's not a clock-watcher, so it she senses that you're about to cum...she'll delay. She's never been shy...even when I told her that I wanted to cum on her, lick it off and feed it to her. Don't fool around with her...if you do, you're simply wasting your time and money. I have to admit, unloading in her mouth is the best treat...not just for the obvious, but for the way she seems to enjoy it as well. When you are with her, you are KING!
positive Easy to get to Midtown location on the west side. Easy set up. Would recommend with some caveats. Members read on. As stated in the general details, it is an easy to get to Midtown location on the west side. Easy set up. No need for advance booking etc., Since I visted befiore the process is much easier for me. Almost like setting up a restuarant appointment. I wanted to see Orange but she was busy previous attemots but the stars aligned for an hour after work day. Went uo after work and here is where I mention the caveat - previous set ups to this place were at off hours or weekends. After workday hours they are busy. And you notice. They try their best to make sure no one runs into anyone elese but the shower for the stand up cleaning which is standard at these places was wet and just used. I try not to be a clean freak a germ freak but that always bothers me. Standard cleaning in shower - cock and balls and asshole are cleaned. My asshole is hairless because I manscaped and she saw that and went to town rimming it in shower as she soaped up my hard cock for a rusty trombone under shower water. This helped me forget the shower was used seconds ago. Went back into roiom and she had me lay on stomach and went right into my asshole for a while. Then she flips me over for blow job and I came in her mouth. I usually last forever but the rimming stimulated me. She seemed upset somehome - like I denied her the pleasure of my cock in her pussy but I had her on b ed and fingered her rigourosly till she came. I got hard as I did this and asked for a rubber and fucked her pussy doggy stykle while slapping her ass playfully. She came (sounded like) at the same time I did for a mutal orgasm. I collpased got a massage and we went to shower. I told her I wanted to pee and she held my cock as I pissed into toilet as she smiled at me. Showered up - she dressed me and off I went. Will repeat. Her looks are OK for an Asian/Chinese. The hair color ads an anime feel to her but she is not model material just normal attractive Asian features.
positive Set the apt with the agency a few days before Christmas with Lyza. From the pictures, she looks very nice and cheerful. Personally I prefer youtful provider with a willing and happy attitude. The day came for the appt and waited an email to enter the incall location. AS usual i always have this rush of excitement and not knowing the unknown tends to send me this "rush" that is quite like non other. Found the room number and step right in.. She was in all black bra, garter belt and sexy stockings. Very hot, gave her a hug and lay down the donations. sat on the couch, chat a little and keep touching each other while admiring her smooth white skin. The bra came off soon enough and reveal some nice metal piercing on the nipples - Yummy. I told her this is my first time licking some nipple metal. LoL. We laughed and then proceed to the bedroom for some fun bbbj and boy! I must say this is definitely one of the top BJ i receive from any girl - hands down. Suck, spit, deep throat and all that. I did not want to finish my first pop there and decided to have her put on the cover before i take her in mish. I just pump away, t-bag, doggie and then got my first pop. When it ended i look at the clock and have another 10-15 minutes left due to the amazing BJ i got earlier. As they say, when you are having fun time flies.. So for the next 10 minutes we just chatted and leave happy and skipping along. Overall, this is one of the best session ever, even though i only get 1 pop - which in my book that is quality over quantity. Will i repeat? hell yeah !! :)
positive Easy setup via email first. Then she gives you her phone and communicates via text. Gave me her address the day of the appt. She is the girl in the pics and her in call location is easy to find. Upon arrival, she met me outside the door and led me to her upstairs bedroom. I'll return to see Bella. VIP read on... Once in the bedroom, I excused myself to freshen up in the bathroom. She then did the same and I made myself comfortable (naked) while I waited for her to come out. She came out naked and I got my first view of her incredible breasts. Clearly, they are her best feature and I certainly did enjoy playing with those all natural DDD. I mentioned that those are made for fucking and she said we could do that. She was enjoying my attention to her Boobs as evidenced by FIV which were wet. Soon I wanted to go for daty and she was all OK with that. She has a very clean shaved kitty and soon had a massive O. Now I rolled over and Bella took her turn at returning the oral favor. She gives an excellent bbbj with lots of attention to the boys. I had asked her before about cim and she said that's her one no no. That's a shame as I really do enjoy a bbbjcim. But I knew that from reading other reviews so I told her it was time to fuck those big titties. We lubed them up and started fucking them. Damn, those were so nice that I probably didn't last 5 minutes before shooting my first load all over those wonderful boobs. She went into the bathroom and cleaned herself off and brought me a towel to clean myself off (imho, it's a nice touch for the provider to do this). We talked a while awaiting time for a recharge. She is intelligent and easy to talk to. Round 2 started with Bella giving me a hj and a bbbj until I got hard enough for a condom. I asked her what was her favorite position and she said doggy. That happens to be mine as well, but we started in Mish for a while until I told her to roll over and get that beautiful ass up in the air. She assumed the position and I pounded away and she took all I could give her. She was enjoying it as much as me, but I slowed down because I really wanted to enjoy a trip to Greece with Bella. She had a bottle of lube by the bed so I squirted some on her ass and worked a finger in to spread the lube and then worked my hard cock into her tight ass. The sensation of fucking her tight asshole was too much for me and I shot my remaining load into the cover. This was a very hot experience and one I'm hoping to repeat. Bella has a very pretty face and incredible boobs. I would have to say her overall figure wasnt the best, but the complete experience was excellent. If you're looking for a spinner go somewhere else. If you want a woman with curves and huge boobs, go see Bella Knight.
positive Contacted Mari through a booker who books another girl I see regularly. Easy two call system in Mid-Wilshire. Arrive on time, asked to wait a few minutes and off I go. Door opens as I stand in front of it, no need to knock. Behind the door is Mari. Beautiful, slender and with an easy smile. Take off shoes and off to the bedroom where the fun begins. Non-Vips, well worth meeting Mari. I will repeat We get naked in front of the mirror. Mari has a beautiful body and knows how to get pleasure from it. She turns her back and put my already hard cock between her legs for some p2p. She takes my hand, and puts one hand on her breast and one hand caressing her wet pussy with my cock. She pulls her hair to open her long neck and lets me kiss it. I can see from the mirror and feel from her wet pussy that she is enjoying this. She kneels down and takes my cock in her mouth for a slow and sensual bbbj. She alternates between taking my me in deep throat and licking my whole dick from the balls to the tip. I lay her doggy by the side of the bed and go daty and lick her ass. She is very sensitive. Lets me put fiv while I pull my self towards her mouth. She takes my hard cock in her mouth while I fiv. I massage her ass with my thumb while all this is going on and I can tell she wants more. I slowly start inserting my thumb in her ass. She likes it and asks me to go slow. We go into reverse doggy, with me on top. She is licking my ass, her tongue is going crazy while I daty and dato with both my fingers in her. Her entire body is gyrating underneath me. She turns around and climbs on me. Put the condom on and slowly lowers herself, and lets our a sigh of pleasure. She rides me every which way imaginable, and finally comes while having me fully inside her. It's amazing to feel her cum while inside of her like that. You can really feel the spasms. After she came she lowered her face and we started making out softly. I turned her side ways and fucked her scissors, with deep side way thrusts while fingering her ass. I came in her mouth. She swallowed until the last drop. We cuddled after sex and had time for a nice massage and a shower. She is really a very sensual and sexy woman. I will repeat as often as I will have the time.
positive Wanted to give myself an early Christmas gift and decided to get 2 hours with a fine girl. My choice was no longer around so I went with a MMS recommendation. The incall is always nice and welcoming. The MMS is such a pleasure to talk to and I was surprised with how much like her photos Orange was. When I arrived, I was lead to the room by MMS and was told to wait. Orange comes in dressed as a school girl and I was so happy. We immediately, start DFK and I have to say it was nice. She gives good kisses and isn't over the top like most Asian providers. We undressed and she started giving me a sample BBBJ. HOLY HELL, does she have skills. It took a lot not to pop right there. She got up, offered me a drink, and returned with a whiskey. Orange went right back to sucking me off! She couldn't keep that thing out her mouth. We paused on that and went to a shower where she scrubbed me up and then continued to blow me both in and out the shower. Once back in the room, a solid 69 session happened and that were I popped. She leaned over and spit. While getting ready for round 2, we cuddled and danced to whatever music was playing and then we sat and smoked cigs while chatting with MMS, who is a real awesome woman. It felt like I was at home. I ready for round 2 and we did RCG, Mish, and I finished in doggy. Round 3 came around real fast and this where I fucked her brains out. She was moaning and twitching all over the place and I worked up quite a sweat. I didn't know if I was hurting her or not so I got off of her and said finish BBBJ. she ripped the condom off me and went to town on cock. I blew my last load straight down her throat. She doesn't typically swallow, but I guess she had no choice this time around. I had an amazing time, Orange is great, MMS is awesome. I'll have to come back and get with 2 girls as per their suggestion.
negative Megan Nutwood had videos with her ad and I couldn't find a review at the time. This experience was probably one of the worst ever. Her videos really sold me. I personally learned that the videos can be as fake as the photos. Standard two call system got me to the parking lot. I'm quizzed as to whether I'm a cop. She didn't give me the room number, but told me to park in a certain part of the parking lot and call he back. I'm starting to feel like I shouldn't be at this lower level hotel. Stupid me had been watching the video of her jacking off her cock as I drove to her hotel. Even though I'm feeling I shouldn't be here my little head just has to see her. I called her back and because of where I parked she now has eyes on my car and me. After what I experienced inside her room I'm surprised my car wasn't jacked. After knocking on the door it mysteriously swings open and I descend into a dark cave with a candle on each side of the room. As I enter I am sure I see someone head into the bathroom. It is so dark that it is difficult to see much in the room. She grabs my hand and puts it on her package and requests the donation. Instead of saying "no" I hand over the $200. At this point she wants to know if I am interested in a double. I inquired about this and I said I might if I could see the other person. She said only by first giving her an extra $150. I had no more money on me and I'm already to leave, but I figured I would see what she was backing. Even though I couldn't verify her looks in the darkness, I can say her cock was not that of the one in the video. It was maybe 6-7 inches when erect. I sucked her for a bit, but I was not into it and I was afraid whatever was in the bathroom might come out and do damage. I just quit, put on my clothes and left less $200 and full nuts. Never will I repeat with this loser.
positive Saw Natalie's ad. Met her at a hotel in midtown she showed up looking super hot. I will definitely repeat. Natalie is a super fine young lady. Met her at the hotel and went to the room, she let me take some naked pictures before we got started. She asked what I wanted and I said for her to suck my dick and lick my ass which she did. I nutted in her mouth and she spit it out. I then eat her pussy and it was very tasty. After she came we proceeded to fuck and after about 10 minutes I told her I wanted to fuck her in the ass. She took it like a champ, after I came we cleaned up and left. Natalie is a freaky sexy young lady and has become my favorite.
positive I had seen this agencies other girls before and they are always beautiful and accommodating. Contacted agency by phone and never actually spoke with Samira until I entered the room of a nice hotel in Independence. When I first walked in, I wasn't surprised how pretty she was because this agency always produces a quality product. She immediately gave me a nice hug and kiss....so sweet a personality and I loved her Latino accent. She had just the right amount of low lights, romantic music playing softly, and a couple of candles lit for atmosphere. We small talked for a couple of minutes and then got down to some business....I would definitely recommend and definitely worth every penny...A1 experience. We both got naked and she lay down on the bed and I got on top and started kissing her. After a few minutes, I slid down and started kissing and licking her pussy. She lightly moaned and moved her hips to meet my mouth. After a few minutes, I lay down and she started to suck on my penis sensually while looking up at me. I loved her technique of using her hand to stroke me between sucking. She was really getting me excited and after a few minutes, I had to stop her because I would have cum soon. I told her to fuck me and she put the condom on me, and sat down on my penis with me on my back. This girl has a very nice body with great tits. Her tits do have implants but they are so well done that you can barely even feel them. After a few minutes of her on top, I wanted to try some more positions with her. We got into missionary position and that also felt so great. I was kissing her and she was kissing me back so sweetly during our tour through this position. Her body is tight and I wanted to pound her from behind so that I could see and feel her great ass. She bent over on the edge of the bed while I pumped her. It felt great and was a great visual. Finally, I turned her over on her back. I moved her to the edge of the bed as I stood there pounding her hard. I got her legs over my shoulder and just pounded hard until I came. She is a goddess. After I finished , she went and got me a dampened towel to clean me up. She laid down again next to me and we talked a couple of minutes. I don't know if she would done me again but I would be willing to bet yes as she was so, so accommodating. I was just too spent to go again. I would definitely recommend this beautiful Latino girl with a fantastic attitude!
positive Had been anxious to meet Preslee for some time, since her reviews were good and her Eros ad and pics were what I was looking for. She turns out to be a fantastic gal - sensual, intense, GFE time Good directions to nice hotel and Preslee met me at door with big smile and LK. I excused myself to wash up and returned to see her in very sexy matching bra and panties. She has a hot little body, like her pics, with a nice round ass and as I would find out, full natural breasts. We stood in room, LK became DFK and my clothes began to fall to the ground - and our bodies grinding together with my hard cock pushing against her to her delight. Before I know it - she on her knees licking my balls and shaft, teasing my cock until with a sly smile she takes in all in. Great BBBJ with eye contact and it was all I could do to hold off. But we did make it to the bed for a long DATY session, where she was amazingly wet and came hard. This was in incredible turn on for both of us -and we started CFS with a spirited CG ride with my hands on her breasts as she bounced up and down. The next 30 min were a a blur of positions - but most memorable was a doggie were I came hard -and I think she did to. We cleaned up and talked a bit. Really nice girl.
positive Orange works out of either a convenient Midtown West or Midtown East location. This is popular Agency and they are easy to communicate with, organized, and provide a professional service. This Agency is also willing with work with clients to ensure a good time is had. Orange is cute, youthful, enthusiastic, and willing to put in the extra effort to ensure her clients are happy. These traits are representative of the other providers employed within this Agency also. Nice session with Orange and would recommend. My experience with Orange is similar to previous reviews. Communication with the Agency is simple and straight-forward: I initiated via text and after some light screening scheduled an appointment with Orange. After the standard two-text messaging to confirm the location as this was my first time with this Agency, I ended up in Midtown West in a comfortable building with no doorman and an apartment with quick access to the front building door so as not to disturb the other residents of the building. Upon entering the apartment, was lead through the foyer into the living room and to a holding room. After a few light hearted questions from the phone girl, she lead me to Orange's room and it was a happy sight for me. Orange was dressed in the usual Asian provider uniform of sexy bikini and had a welcoming smile on her face. She immediately DFK'ed me as if I was the first person she kissed in 10 years -- very engaging and I was instantly into her and was happy with my choice. The room had a flatscreen, which was playing a porn movie scene on loop - I wasn't much into this at all but took it as the Agency doing their best to cater to clients preferences. Orange then helps me out of my clothes and gives me a quick preview BBJ, which was nice and demonstrated her skills. We had to the stand-up shower to clean and it is the usual cleaning of all the right areas with some soapy body-to-body and then again another BBJ before we dry off and head back to the room. Here is where Orange is at her best. She makes her best effort to anticipate her clients wishes and then goes for it. She starts with a proper BBJ this time that last 10-12 minutes, which would easily have been more if I wanted. However, I was in the mood at this time to just f*$k her and put in a good day's work. We ran through the standard positions: AC, Mish, standing Mish, and I finally finished DG. Orange is really up for just about anything and there is no judgement - to me, this is what makes her a pleasure to be with. If there are any shy guys out there, Orange will encourage you to let go of your inhibitions and tell her what you want and she likely will be up for it. Overall, enthusiastic and fun girl. Orange is really a good f&$k. Totally worth it and an enjoyable time.
positive Holly is an attractive, athletically built, and mature woman who understands and appreciates attention to detail and service. She is intelligent, confident and a sensual woman who aims to please. I have seen Holly on several occasions and have always left satisfied and treated as the center of her focus. She is very skilled and if you are looking for a complete experience with a woman who can hold her own with anything from conversation to making you feel like a privileged man in the bedroom - she's a must see. Our appointments begin with a standard two call/text arrangement and some light screening. Holly always provides a comfortably appointed and candle lit venue in a nicer hotel that sets the mood.... After getting the room number, going up and knocking on the door I'm greeted by Holly who is wearing some sexy lingerie under a silk robe. She invites me in, we exchange a kiss and some light conversation before heading back to the bedroom. We engage in some LFK while she helps me undress and I remove her robe. She has a beautiful athletic build that looks hot in the lacy boy shorts/bra lingerie. She tells me to lie back then climbs up/straddles me and we engage in some DFK before she works her way down to give me some excellent CBJ attention. I almost popped when I saw those bedroom eyes looking at me through her hair as she filled her mouth with me so I had her straddle my face for some DATY which was gorgeous, clean and tasty. Next she booted me up for some CG where I started enjoying her snug fit before moving on to DS where I continued to enjoy her and popped in the cover after feeling some strong kegel clinches that sent me over the top. She cleaned me up and we chatted briefly before I left. Another great experience and I will repeat.
positive I usually prefer Asian ladies, but that day I didn't have a chance to go w/ my usual agency. So I searched for options in Boston - and found Sarah. Not my typical choice, but I decided to give it a try, and I'm glad I did! She was (almost) everything I wished for as Xmas present, and she delivered. I would repeat in a heartbeat. Non-VIPs, I recommend. Ok, I'm writing this from phone, so pardon me for such short review. In general, Sarah has really sweet voice that is seducing, and even better in person. She is nice, cute girl, that, if chemistry works between you too, will make you go crazy. Now, as step back, I just want to say that she is not your model type; rather, that cute girl in college you wished to have fun with ;) We had great DFK from start, and chemistry followed. Compliments, groping, squeezing - everything was there. She knows how to do a great handjob, which I wasn't fan of until that day. Her blowjob is good, with DT and CBJ. I personally prefer BBBJ, but CBJ worked okay too. I had played with her great responsive nipples, and she was wet already. Down to DATY, was already like a waterfall there! Some nice action, switch to 69, then to mish, and came soon. We had great conversations, after which we jerked each other off, which I liked so much (remember what I said about her skills?). She offered doggy and other positions, but I refused, since I just enjoyed cuddling, and our talk. Would definitely repeat and recommend.
positive Miranda works for a local agency and comes to the area from SF on a regular basis. Her reviews are great and since my regular was unavailable I took the chance and was well rewarded. Miranda is a classic K-girl and you can't go wrong, just be prepared to play hard! Screening was uneventful and I was let in the door on time in a nice Bellevue Condo that is home to the hobby. Behind the door which open before I could knock was a very pretty Korean girl, mid 20's and quick to take the donation, guide me back to her room and help me off with my clothes. She initiated a deep kiss with tongue at full extension that was repeated many times over the next hour. Then to the bathroom for mouthwash toast, shower where Miranda both washes me down and then falls to her knees for a BBBJ and great eye contact. Out of the shower to the bed where she asked my to lie face down as she proceeded not with a massage but rather rimming. Not my thing so she flipped me and began 69 with a great deal of energy and enthusiasm. Without a hesitation Miranda applied a condom with her mouth and began CG with was so vigorous I almost lost it so I bucked her off and started doggy. Miranda's figure is really perfect with soft skin and muscle below that is toned and her workouts are apparently paying off. I then visited the Y and gave her a long slow "O" that she later described as a 7 of 10 that she prefers to prolong. I finished in MISH with her tongue darting to the back of mouth. After collapsing, we chatted a bit and Miranda tried to tease out another round, but I had enough. She is an energizer bunny that truly gives her all for the full hour. Highly recommend catching her on her regular visits to the area.
positive McC was a last minute alternative when my long anticipated birthday appointment with the leader of the Seattle Three was unexpectedly cancelled :( What followed was one of the most wildly uneven experiences of my hobbying career. Non-VIPs this seems to be a classic case of YMMV. I you like her look and the balance of her reviews I say go for it. VIPs if you need more details of the YMMV situation read on... I will begin by stating that mine is not an issue of hygiene. While it is not always possible for me to shower ahead of an appointment, I always make sure my oral hygiene is impeccable in order to make a fresh first impression at the door. I think the issue for McC was my goatee. She was very begrudging when it came to kissing, allowing very weak at best LFK, and actually pushed my face away when I tried to DATY. Very strange, a first in all of my years of hobbying. That being said, when it came time to fuck, it was like McC was a completely different girl. She got me to bust twice in the hour purely from fucking, which is pretty much unheard anymore for me. Round One consisted of CG, to ACG, to sidesaddle, to spooning in front of the mirror with one leg pulled up so we could watch in the mirror as Little William worked his way in and out of her box. Round Two was a more straightforward missionary pounding with McC's legs over my shoulders and the headboard keeping time against the wall as my pelvis slapped against McC's ass and she grunted with each thrust. If the oral action (both receiving and now that I think of it giving as well because her BBBJ was average at best) was anywhere near as good as the fucking I could add a point (maybe two) to the performance score. Oh well, you can hit a homerun every time. Treat her well gentlemen...
positive I had seen Yumi was visiting the area. I had used the agency previously, so it was straightforward to setup an appointment. When I got to the hotel, it was a 2 call system to get the room number. There was a bit of a delay as the agency was waiting on her to give the okay to come up. Overall, my session with her was somewhat YMMV. I think I chose the wrong time because she had just gotten a food/takeout delivery to her room which I think was the reason for the delay and my session being a little bit subpar compared to others. Lookswise, the photos are accurate. They are glammed up, but I was greeted by a very gorgeous latina with a nice body. As previous reviews state, she speaks spanish mainly with little english. She asked me to wash my hands which I did. I don't speak too much Spanish but know some words to get by. As stated earlier, I noticed takeout food still in the plastic bag on the desk. My initial instincts were she was going to try to get me out of there as soon as possible so she could eat. I felt a little bad that she hadn't eaten yet, but at the same time, I had no idea that she wasn't going to have time to eat prior to my appointment. She had on a black robe with black bra and panties. When I came back, she removed her robe and revealed the nice body. Kissing was done mainly without tongue. It was pretty minimal as I could sense I hadn't broken the ice yet. She had some music playing on her phone and danced & grinded on me. She asked me to get comfortable and then move to the bed. I had seen she grabbed a condom and started to open it. I wasn't sure if she was going to try for the main event so soon or do a CBJ. I asked if I could DATY. She was clean and responsive. At first she was very reserved but I'm confident in my DATY skills and just kept at it gently, lightly until I got her to relax her legs and open up some more and then let me go at it normally. I felt I finally broke the ice between her and me as she got into it a lot more and orgasmed. Digits were not allowed. After a while I moved up for the BJ, it was a good BBBJ. It was good but she then was trying to go for the main event after a few minutes. I asked for 69 to which she agreed. We did some 69. I was finally ready for the main event and the cover came on. We did RCG as she rode me very good. We then did doggie. I ended up popping. She cleaned me up and asked if I wanted use the shower. Which indicated that a second pop wasn't available. She went to clean up and then put on her robe, which made it clear that a 2nd round wasn't available. Overall, it was an okay session. She is really hot but it was not really the GFE session I was hoping for. Otherwise, I would have definitely repeated with her during her tour. She is still hot enough that I might gamble to see if things are better the second time on a future visit. It is hard to say if I caught her at the wrong time or she is just businesslike. YMMV
positive Wow, was in Orlando and found this little hidden gem with the TER search function. Yeah, this is what makes VIP totally worth it. She got to my place and...... entered and said hi looking just like her photos. She after we talked for a minute she asked to use the bathroom and I directed her to where it was. (I was in a large timeshare unit.) I hopped on the bed waiting for her and she soon came out wearing a cute nightgown and joined me on the bed. We quickly started kissing DFK for a few minutes. Then Farrah went down and started a BBBJ that was excellent, one of the best I have had, with lots of attention (BLS) for the twins. This went on until I was getting close to exploding all over and had her stop her. I didn't want to pop that soon. Rested for a minute and I was going to have her hop on my face front ways, but she quickly got in the 69 position which works for me. So we're totally going 69 for awhile until she has a good O and got too sensitive there. Rested for another another couple of minutes doing still more kissing. Then on went the cover and it was CG time for quite awhile followed by a little mish with her on top. Then still more kissing. Then she started another totally great BBBJ until I exploded on her mouth and she took it all like a champ. Did clean up and then snuggled for awhile and walked about our lives. After awhile we got dressed and went out to the kitchen area and got her some water for her as she requested. We continued to talk for awhile in the kitchen and then she headed out. I've got to tell you guys, this is one excellent provider. It is very, very, rare for me to give a 10 on performance. If I had seen her more times and she had been consistently this good I would have. But to be fair, I usually would only give a 10 for a really good 3 way or a provider who I have seen enough to be sure she is very consistently excellent. If I could, I would give her a 9.7 on performance. If I lived near her I would definitely be adding her to my short list of providers to see more often. As it is, I guess I will have to settle for trying to catch her when Orlando. Be good to her guys, she is a very sweet nice young lady and deserves to only see nice respectful guys. She is very highly recommended!!
positive First time seeing a Kgirl in LA. You communicate with her agent by text. Got stuck in traffic on the way to see Mari, and had trouble finding parking, ended up paying $14 to park in a garage. Recommend getting there early to find parking. LA Kgirls pices are a little higher than I'm used to, but Mari was worth it. She was a total babe, pretty face and a banging bod. Found her on Kgirldelights. I think she's actually hotter in person than in her pictures. I left a very satisfied man. I tried to see her again before I left LA a week later, but she was on vacation. When she opened the door, she was wearing booty shorts and a tank top. I found this incredibly hot. Most of the other Kgirls wear lingerie or bikinis, but I thought Mari pulled off the LA, girl-next-door look very well. Even though she's fresh off the boat from Korea, she had this very cosmopolitan vibe and California girl attitude which I really liked. She sat me down, took off my shoes, and led me to the bedroom. I let me hands wander all over her, then inside her shorts and tank top, just like I was back in high school again. She played the part well, total girlfriend material (though YMMV with kissing...with me it was mostly no tongue). Her sexy clothes didn't stay on her for long. Before I knew it we were writhing around on bed naked together. But first we went to shower. After that there was a good 15 minutes of foreplay....lots of touching, sucking on her excellently shaped breasts, bareback blowjob, and vagina licking. We had sex for about 15 minutes. Did all my favorite positions. All the time she was very into it, moaning loadly, and gyrating her body to my thrusting rhythms. Started in mish, squeezed her legs together to almost bring me to climax, then turned her over and went at her from behind, moving into various combinations of doggystyle. First, doggy with her on her stomach, then with her bending her knees and sticking her butt up in the air, then with me standing and her on the edge of the bed, and finally with her standing on the floor, bended over the mirror, while I watched. I couldn't believe I was having sex with such a hot, young girl with killer breasts and a sexy body and pussy. Afterwards, we were both tired, and just lay there touching and talking. Second shower, and then she very courteously dressed me, even put my socks and shoes on me. I'm not used to being so pampered. I really wanted to repeat before I left I, but Mari unfortunately wasn't available that day.
positive Saw Noa's ad and liked what she said. Easy call and set-up near RDU. Knocked on the door and liked what I saw when I came in. Non-VIPers, you will not be disappointed. VIPers read on... Came in and put the donation on the dresser and was greeted with a warm hug and kiss. This turned into an extended standing makeout session as my hands roved over her fit body, finding those perky breasts. I suggested we lose our clothes and continued to makeout on the bed and started sucking those wonderful breasts. She went down for some BBBj which really got me going, so i stopped her and returned the favor. Then on with the cover and we tried them all - mish, doggy cowgirl - which I liked a lot because I could fondle her breasts as she went up and down and sit up and suck her nipples, too. It was too much or me and I came buckets. What a wonderful girl. thanks Noa, I'll see you soon.
positive Finally was able to meet Juliana, as our schedules kept on missing each other. Definitely was worth the wait, VIPs read on... We met at a nice hotel in midtown NYC. When I walked in, my eyes were astonished, as she looked amazing and just told me she was wearing a new outfit (really nice lace lingerie). I quickly showered up, as I didn't want to waste any time (only had an hour). When I got out, she was waiting for me on the bed and did some small talk and then she put some of this strawberry gel on junior before she started giving a great BBBJ. Only after a few minutes I was about to pop and had to to my best not to, so then I asked for the cover and she started on top. It was such a great view, her tits are amazing and very full with large nipples. I definitely enjoyed sucking on them, then we moved into mish. I brought her to the edge of the bed and started ramming her hard, which she seemed to love. We then moved into doggy where I finished. I cleaned up and we just lied and talked some more and definitely didn't feel rushed. She kept trying to get my junior up for round 2, but it was not meant to be that night. Maybe I should take something so that I can definitely go one more round? haha anyways definitely recommend and will repeat!
positive Nice AMP in Midtown. Easy to set up with Mamasan. Standard call then text. Orange is totally worth it. Start off with BBBJ then LFK. Orange really gets into it. Rolled over and got a light massage including a nice rimming session. Orange likes to tongue that asshole. Switched to 69 and gave her back some pussy and anal licking. She really works on the whole tool, balls, shaft, sucking and licking. On with the cover and then some K-9 and miss. Finished with her pumping like crazy on top of me. She is almost too tight and small. Off with the cover and some more BBBJ. Second pop with a nice long hand job.
positive Had been wanting to see her and was not disappointed. Easy to schedule and communication skills very good. Met her at a nice 4 star. She is very open minded and a doll. Will see her again. Met her at noon during the week. Arranged the day before. Standard two call system and was soon at her door. She was dressed casually and looked great. Nice youthful breasts and a gorgeous ass were apparent from her attire. Both got comfortable with some conversation and mutual touching. Enjoyed some LFK and DFK. She pulled her top off and I enjoyed some nice nipples sucking. All the clothes were off soon and she started with a BBBJ. Her oral skills were very good and she alternated with a HJ to add to the fun. I went down on her for some sweet daty and forced her legs back toward her head for some dato. Moved to some 69 for more dining pleasure. She was bobbing nicely on my hard rod. On with the cover and some CG and ACG. Moved to mish and plowed away for a while. Layed next to her for more FK. She reached over to night stand and pulled out vibrator and told me to stick my dick in her mouth. She proceed to blow me while working her pussy over with the toy. Sucking increased as she approached O and she raised her back and ass off the bed with her legs as she climaxed. Took her a minutes to recover but I took control of the toy and get working on her clit. I was ready for a pop so I had her lay on her back with her head off the side of the bed for more bbbj and then finished by jerking off into her open and welcoming mouth. She exited to spit and returned for some quiet conversation. She is really a sweet girl and fun to be with.
positive Seen the pics and didn't know if they could be true. Saw some reviews and gave her a try. I called and left a message, she texted back and from there on we exchanged texts. A little tricky to find her place. She is the girl in the pics. There was a little awkwardness at first, but she has a good setup and got to the massage. It was fairly standard, but she is a beautiful girl. Coming in to her place, she was a little hesitant, bit of a limp hand shake and directing me to the room. Offers restroom and shower for after which is a definite plus. I lie down on the bed, she comes in in little bikini panties and bra. She has a fantastic ass, but not much chance to see it. She has music playing and uses a good deal of lotion. A nice massage, just a little bit of teasing when she worked on the legs. She sat on my butt while she worked my upper back, which was also nice. The disadvantage of the bed is that she doesn't move around and get within reach. On the flip, I got to see her wonderful tits. She did a little massaging before moving in for the stroke. She is sensual about release including some play with her breast. Had a wonderful release, then got to use the shower. She was quiet throughout, but after, while I was dressing, she started talking. She offered some food and water and talked about herself. A very nice girl.
positive After some lurking, i decided to give this place a try. Overall very high effort into service, few things that i should note... Vips read on After the two call verification, i got buzzed in and in came chelsea in a school uniform. Outfits dont do much for me but it was cute i guess? I was assuming the donation was 3 as it showed on ter, but she only asked for 260. Who am i to complain? Into the shower we go and shes cleaning up and giving me a preview of bbbj and thats when i noticed she hasnt shaved her arm pit hair. This was a turn off a bit. So i tried not to look at it but yea, kinda hard not to look. Back into the room, gets on her knees for more bbbj and i lay on the bed and she starts an awesome rimjob. Nice combo of dt, bbbj, and rim and i pop all over her face. Quick clean up and some more bbbj and rim. I ask for the cover and do doggy and then mish. She brings her arms up by her head and i see more armpit hair. Ew.. So i change position and she keeps yelling "f me" repeatdedly in a very agressive manner. Just a turn off for me in conjunction with the lack of body grooming. I pop in the cover and head for a clean up. Over all ok, but some grooming should be done by her.
positive My ATF stood me up again so was time I looked for a new one. I got ahold of EM and made a time for us to meet. I got to her incall which was very nice, she shares it with another girl we all know. We both got undressed and I headed to the table. Guys, this girl is hot and has all the moves to make sure you have a good time. If I could rate her a ten on performance I would, I had a great time and will be back for sure....I think she could be my new atf, VIP members read on...... So when I was on the table and getting a nice back rub I could tell piper was getting into the massage also, she did reach under and make sure I was at attention, which I was. She told me to flip and I saw a beauty...long blonde hair and a nice body. Piper did grab ahold of big Jim and asked if I would like to move to the bed...heck yah. So I decided to explore her body a bit lightly sucking her nipples and heading down to the promised land. I don't know if I have ever been with a woman who gets as wet as she did...omg it was fun to feel that. I did head down and gave her about 10 min of tongue lashing, she is very clean and smells great. She then returned the favor with one of the greatest blow jobs I think I have ever received. This girl knows what she is doing. If she did full service I think I would go broke...she is just that hot. Guys if you have not had the chance to see her, you should. Run don't walk. Thanks Piper and next time maybe TL could join us.
positive Been looking at her adds for a while now, and decided to give her a text. She responded quickly, and we aranged an outcall to m. She arived ontime, and kept in contact with me on the way here (she had a driver as well). Had a great time, will definatly see again. VIPs read on. Greeted eachother sort of stiffly, as it was our first time meeting. I welcomed her inside, and she took off her cloths to reveal some really cute underwear. I started to touch her, and we shared a lot of LFKs, then moved to the bedroom. I was mostly interested in her oral skills, which was extreemly impressive. I'm 6in downstairs, and she can deepthroat until she kisses my base (BBJ). We try this in a few different possitions until I CIM. At this point, it's only 20m through the hour, so we cuddle and talk a bit, I touch her downstairs (FIV) and she touches me, too. I get hard again, and she rides me until I finish in the hat. Overall a great and flexable provider that I will deffinatly see again!
positive I was able to see Vicky with a same day appointment. I contacted the PO in the afternoon and was able to setup an appt for the evening. I was running behind by 10 minutes and notified the PO who was cool about it. Once I arrived I got the info and I was on my way up. Overall great girl, her pics are accurate, go see her! Once I got through the door I was greeted by a beautiful K-girl whose pictures in the ad represented her well.. She was wearing a typical two piece with heels. After formalities, I got undressed and went onto the shower routine with a preview of what was to come. I have to say Vicky gives one of the best BBBJ I've had in awhile, reminded me of Pink's ferocious BBBJ. After the shower and dry off, I laid at the base of bed and Vicky came back with a BBBJ which than transitioned into me laying back for a bit rim action. She Vicky bounced from rim back to BBBJ and then unexpectedly blew my first load so soon, haha rookie move. Vicky cleaned me up and had me lay face down for a small massage. We chatted a bit before she asked if I was ready to go again. Vicky got me up again quickly with her BBBJ skills. Next thing came was the hat. Once the hat was we went into a mish, cg, and finished off with k9. After that we chatted a bit more and then hit the shower for a cleanup. Overall Vicky was a great experience and definitely one to tryout. Treat her well as she will reciprocate it back by making you feel like a king.
positive Sent a text message and received a quick reply. Quick verification process and I was told to go to a location in midtown. Once I was there I sent another text and got the location. I was greeted by a very attractive Chelsea in a sexy school uniform. She looked like the pictures and had nice perky breasts and a slim waist. She gave me a hug and a kiss and we went to a nice room where I gave my donation. She offered a shower and I agreed. She washed me and gave me some special attention while doing it. After the shower we went back to the room where she put the uniform back on and called me "teacher". It only got better. Would repeat. After she put the uniform on she asked me to lay on my stomach. She then started kissing and licking my back and my ass she rimmed me for a little bit then took out a vibrated and asked me if I wanted it used on me. I'm not too into ass play (on myself) so I said it was not needed. She seemed a little disappointed and tried to tease me with it. I grabbed her head and pushed her mouth on my dick. She stopped being disapointed very quickly and enthusiastically gave me a great bbbj to completion. After a quick rest we went for round two. She gave me another bbbj while I spanked her. Every time I spanked her are she would smile and suck harder. I got up and went around where I played with her ass some more and then she gave me a condom. We did multiple positions and she seemed to enjoy doggy the most. She has a great ass but has no idea how to arch it to make it look better. She seemed to enjoy it much more when I was rough with her calling me "teacher" and saying "harder I'm horny". When I was close I had to finish with another bbbj as I have trouble finishing with a condom. The only other issue I have is she finishes that off with her hand. Not in mouth or even a facial. She moves her face away when I say I'm close and starts using her hand. Still good though. I plan on repeating with this agemcy. Maybe trying another girl.
negative Beware she is a scam. Not the girl in the pics but a close comparison. Typical two call system. Met at a hotel. Ran off with the donation and no service provided. Avoid at all cost. Just a scammer who'll run off with your money and you won't get anything out of it.. Had me place the donation on the table. Took it to to rest room to "freshen up" then came out stating she called the cops and shee was calling hotel security. See the above description for more. Apparently I should have checked the reviews before booking as others have had issues as well.
positive Sophie was easy to schedule and delivered as promised. Limited menu FBSM from a beautiful woman. Nothing more, nothing less. Not sure if I will repeat. Had seen her ads for a few weeks and the photos caught my eye. They are of her, but she may have gained 5-10 lbs since the photos. She is very attractive with amazing, natural breasts. The Russian accent is great too although she is not much of a conversationalist. I was at her apartment writhin 20 minutes of the initial call so that was a plus. She also has a shower which is nice. The massage was on a mattress on the floor which was ok. She was a little particular of where I was positioned on the towel. Face down for 15 minutes and she actually gave a nice, medium pressure rub down on my back and legs. Not much teasing though. On the flip, she removed her top to reveal her best assets and allowed my hands to experience them. No touching below the waist though. Also, she did not talk or moan or really anything verbal to enhance the experience. Perhaps she gets into it if you repeat and she feels more comfortable? She ended with a decent HJ while I rubbed her breasts. I popped, she gave me a smile, then I hopped in the shower and we said our goodbyes. She was nice, just reserved for our first meeting. Not sure I will repeat.
positive Had watched her pics and reviews since Lacey appeared on agency site and met her once when I was seeing another girl, which made me to finally schedule a session with her. Pretty girl, good service. Met Lacey behind the door in red hair (recently dyed) black street clothing which I liked. Hugs and kisses upfront and she remembered my promise that I would come to see her. In the bedroom we resumed kisses mostly LFK but definitely with tongue action. Lots of mutual groping and I loved fondling her ass wrapped in the body shaping pants. Helped her out of the tank top and bra so that I could devour her cute youthful tits and very responsive pencil eraser nipples. Further down to remove her pants and panties with some light rubbing of her pussy which was already wet. Swicthed position as I sat the bedside and watched her go down on Junior. Pretty good BBBJ, plenty of eye contact, not DP but 2/3 or 3/4 in like others had commented. 5 minutes into this she asked whether I wanted the cover. Instead, I asked her to assume the 69 position so that we could enjoy each other. Later I had her lie down for DATY and FIV, which soon drove her over the edge and she responded with loud moans and violent body twists. Time for the main course as she put the cover on Junior. I started with Mission in hope that I could rest a bit in CG later and bet better prepared for the Doggie finale, which proved to be wrong. Mission was always good with lots of LFKs, variations of paces and angles. I was a little surprsied that she wasn't as flexible as she looked like, but I did have lots of fun. Asked her to ride and she hopped on swiftly. Some more LFK, she started the ride slow and shallow but soon lifted the pace. 5 minutes into it I had to ask her to slow down as I didn't want to finish at the half way line. She obliged and went back to the long slow sensual strokes. Then she went to ACG and not long obviously was turned fully on as she leaned toward me, begging for kisses and starting to slam herself onto Junior. I knew it's gonna driving me over some time soon but was hesitant to stop her since the view and the feel of a redhead riding me crazy was not something to have every day. So she kept increasing the pace, the strength and the range of her movement; we were sweating like pigs; I grabbed her tit with left hand and spanked her ass with the right hand, and spanking her pretty hard; she never complained but responded with even harder pouding on Junior. She grabbed the bed frame for support and the bed was shaking and squeaking, and I was reasonably worried that we would end up cumming on the floor. Well no worries since a couple of minutes later we ended up cumming together with suppressed screams and shaking arms and legs. Got to be one of the best Cowgirl I'd ever had. She invited me for a shower but I was too tired to take it right there; so she took it by herself. Then she put on her street cothing which kinda surprised me since there was 15-20 minutes left in the hour. I didn't ask for anything else but rested till I got up and took the shower. She sent me to the door and kissed goodbye.
positive Earlier in the week, I had a lousy experience with a new provider, but knew that I had lots of success with Jaz's agency so trustingly but warily I tried another at this agency, Lacey. I scheduled for an hour and was given my requested time slot. As you may have surmised, I am known at this agency, and Jaz does a great job of trying to accomodate my crazy schedule. At the appointed time, two calls got me to the door of the incall appartment in a nice area of town, and once I knocked, Lacey opened the door. Lacey is a tall, good looking young woman with a smile bright as the sun. We hugged and made our way back to the bedroom of the agency incall apartment where she offered the shower, but I declined and she had no issue with my declining but i did use the mouth wash. While I disrobed, so did she and once finished I gazed upon a beautiful woman with a come hither smile, and a wicked twinkle in her eye. I had hope that I was in for a session to remember, and I was. For you non vip'ers, I would most definitely recommend. For those of you with VIP access, read on below. Lacey is a keeper As we disrobed we talked and became more comfortable. We lay on the bed in our underwear while we discussed her do's and don'ts. Her only don't, no anal. We kissed, no tongues, and fondled before I made my way down south for some DATY. She likes the mutual touching and light sucking on her breasts. I removed her bra and panties and unexpectantly She moaned a little. What a great sign. Lacey's motor was already running. I proceeded to DATY and she moaned and bucked and writhed all over the bed as I hung on for as long as I could. However, after about 10 minutes, she did not reach the intended result even though I believe I had her closed. We kissed again and I returned to fondling her. At this she again started to moan and writhe on the bed, and within a few minutes, she came vocally while begging me not to stop. After she had enough foreplay, she wanted her turn. I stood up at the edge of the bed to remove my shorts, and before, I had a chance to sit back down, She agressively attacked my now raging cock with her mouth. I am standing and she is on her stomach with one hand on my ass, pushng me into her mouth harder and faster. Within 5 minutes, she had me ready to blow, but I needed to be inside her. She placed the cover on me and we started in CG. She would buck and moan, lean down to kiss, my mouth, my neck, my ears. It was passionate.I then entered her in Mish while kissing her lips, neck and breasts, and she moaned and requested "fuck that wet pussy harder, Oh just like that, Don't stop". Very hot.. I started a faster rythym and then moved to standing mish where our rythym increased. She really started to respond and quickly moved her had to her clit to help achieve O #2. From there we moved among several different positions finally arriving at standing k9 facing a strategically placed mirror. She had a devisih gleam in her eye and a grin on her face as she lloked me in the eyes through the mirror and said "fuck me hard and fast and don't stop". With about 15 minutes left in our scheduled appointment, her eyes rolled to the back of her head, she vocally gasped and groaned, and her legs began to shake as she grabbed my hips to stop my motion. I stopped and took off the cover, and she spun around, dropped to her knees and once again aggresively attacked my cock with her mouth. By this time I had been fully erect for 45 minutes and it did not take her long for me to erupt into her eager mouth. I warned her my my imepending arrival, and she took it as queu to suck harder. Drained I lay back on the bed, while she went to spit and rinse. As she stepped back into te room she annouced that it had been a long time since she had orgasmed three times in one hour. I replied that it is always so much more fun for me when it is for you. We both took a quick shower, and then I dressed, kissed her and made my way to the door. She is attractive, athletic, with a bright personality. I like her and will be back alot. YMMV, but you will need your vitamins. She has stammina for athletic and sweaty pursuits so have at it. Hobby on you wayward sons andplease be good to Lacey
positive After my company office party, was looking to set up a intimate get together to help spend my bonus. Luckily for me, the first person I found online was Chelsea so I made a quick call and got the location. An hour later I was at the specified location. Time well spend w/a quality provider. After being buzzed in, Chelsea awaited me behind the door (why do they always do that?) w/a smile and a warm hug. I received a brief kiss on the cheek and she led me down the hall to the room. She was wearing a very hot 2 piece lingerie that amplified her sensual thin figure to the max. I took care of the fiscal end of the transaction and Chelsea excused herself momentarily while I doffed my clothes and lay down on the bed. She came back in, dimmed the lights, and I watched in anticipation as she removed her 2 piece to reveal her delicious body. I noticed that she was 'au natural' down there and had a couple of tats but that didn't distract from her beautiful face and her eagerness to please. She straddled my back and began a competent rub down. I SO enjoyed feeling her soft skin slide back and forth on mine. Every now and then I'd luxuriate in her nipples being dragged up and down my back and a soft whisper of a breath on my ear. Maybe she liked me? Who knows? After a bit of fondling of my balls w/her soft hands, she whispered for me to turn over and she put the condom on my cock and began a superb oral work. Felt great (even though I preferred not to have a rubber but I understood the safety reasons). 5 mins later, she maneuvered my throbbing dong into her soft quim and began to undulate to perfection. Wow but was it great! I had to hold her hips to keep from firing into the bag on a couple of locations and finally swung her around to insert into her doggy style and worked up a excellent rhythm w/her pushing back into me and low moaning. The Moaning sent me into orbit and I came hard!! We lay in each others arms for a bit before I somehow managed to get dressed w/her help and head back out into the night w/a stupid grin on myself. I slept excellent that night and will repeat!
negative Before I begin, I need to point out to anyone who's traveling to Vegas in the near future that it is freaking FREEZING in the Mojave this time of year. Not even kidding. I find it mind blowing that anyone can live in a place that gets up to 120 and goes below freezing with no rain to speak of whatsoever. In other words, bundle up so you're not like me scrambling to buy warmer clothes once you arrive. So I contacted Taylor through her site. She's responsive and friendly. She's a not-so-typical hot blonde that has lots of that youthful perk and energy but is still mature enough for you to be happy to bring her to dinner or something. Sadly I only had two hours with her, but we still had fun. After drinks we had an amazing time together and I would recommend this beautiful lady to anyone who's interested in a low-volume gal who will fulfill any wish you might have. We left to my room and we got right do it after we finished our drinks. We started with some nice LFK which led to DFK, then we moved over to the bed. I had a nice room with nice amenities, so to have this beautiful blonde dragging me over to the bed was quite the feeling. I felt like such a rock star! I sucked on her very perfect natural tits (I love the way blondes look topless) and moved down for some DATY. She was responsive and tasted great. Important to me, because I love me some DATY. She came a couple times and she moved down to suck on my cock. I was rock solid and she started giving me the best BBBJTCIMNQNS I've had in a while. She gave me a few to recuperate then massaged me and brought me back to being hard again with some BBBJ action. I was up and put on a cover. We started in cowgirl because she likes doing that. She has the face of the hot blonde popular girl from high school or college that was too good to talk to normal people. Imagine having sex with someone like that. It was great. Loved every minute. She then switched us down to missionary, then flipped over to doggy style. She's very loving and passionate in missionary. Makes you feel loved. I came after a long time. My second cup is WAY harder to spill, but she found a way to make it happen. I will repeat in a 3 way with another girl next time I am hobbying in Vegas.
positive Koa is like a fairy GFE. She smiles throughout the entire hour and speaks very little. She is soft, smooth, and very pleasant. And all yours... Koa greeted me in a white panties/bra set and smiling. LFK hello transitioned into passionate DFK before my shoes came off. She felt and smelled fresh and ready. Her soft skin and manicured feet and hands are magnetic. I proceeded to orally assault her from lips to lips which she absorbed and responded to with a smile. Whence both naked, I retreated for a quick shower. Upon returning she pulled me into her open arms and legs to continue kissing every inch of her satin skin. She got very turned on by all the body kissing leading to her immaculate pussy. She has the absolute smoothest, cleanest, most inviting pussy I've seen this week. And she can accommodate all of DATY you want to give her. Scrumptious! We proceeded through the full standard menu of games and positions. Starting with BBBJ 69, we cleaned each other in preparation for more intimate connections. Sliding from DATY into Mish, we continued our dance. Koa made easy transitions into CG, than spinning into RCG. For additional variety we explored doggy & lazy dog, but returned back to Mish for the last furlong. We reached mutual eruption to collapsing in each other's arms. A very nice first date together. Ended with cleanup 69, quick shower, and back to the cold cruel reality of Monday.
positive I was in Texas on a business trip and decided to splurge while away. Ariel Redd was one of my splurges (another review will be posted later on). I am glad I went for it. If you are into soft skin and submissives, she is the one. Ariel has many tattoos, not sleeves or anything like that but multiple pieces of art scattered over her thin, fit body. She has skills and I recommend her for sure! I was in Dallas and my ATF was unavailable so I did some searching and came across Ariel Redd's photos - wow, long, brown hair, tattoo art across her tender body (she has one of Disney's Ariel on her arm - and she's not a far cry from that character I must say), all on a petite-ish frame, I couldn't resist. I emailed her with references and my contact information. Later that day I heard back and we set up an appointment at my hotel. Ariel is just like the pictures she posted on her website, but actually is better looking in person. She came in and we took care of business, then chatted for a bit. She is on the shy side, or soft spoken, but don't let that demeanor fool you one bit! After a few minutes of getting to know each other we started LFK which let to DFK. I love that, and took advantage of my hour to pretend I was a teenager again. As is my custom, I like to start off with oral so I went for some DATY. That got her excited, esp. with the use of a finger as I went for her clit in a firm, rhythmic fashion while thrusting and wiggling around trying to tap her G spot. She eventually came with a thrust of her hips up in the air and needed a bit of time to come down from her high before we moved on. We started in mish then switched over to K9. That was a sight to see - her tight ass was up in the air and her head on the pillow, my hands spreading her cheeks wide for a great view of her starfish. She does Greek but I wasn't looking for that this evening, might be up for it the next time though. On to RCG and CG, then wrapped up the exercise back in mish since I like the feel of our bodies against each other (her hair smelled great BTW). After catching our breath we cleaned up and said our goodbyes. Ariel is a super-sweet person, and a beauty for sure. I would definitely repeat, and the next time go to Greece. That will be a fun trip!
positive Been looking at Katty for some time and decided to make the call. Pretty easy screening and somewhat quick. Greeted me at the door pleasantly and she led me to the bedroom. VIPs read on. Non giver her a spin. I initially thought she was independent, but apparently not. I think she was really cute and pretty. She was really similar to the photos, but I think she was definitely made to look better in some of them body-wise. Her face was a look that made me feel at ease and was a lot prettier than I expected. When she smiles, she has one dimple I think. It was such a turn-on for me. It was a little awkward for me at first because I wasn't too sure how proficient in English she was. She didn't talk as much as I'd like to with her, but she tried and I had a good time having some laughs with her. She hung some of my clothes up, which was nice of her because I just dropped them on the ground. I gave her the fees. She checked. Then she brought me to shower with her and we did the blue toast. My dick was totally happy seeing her when she led me through the door and she helped wash my areas. I don't know how experienced she was, but I guess I'm a little sensitive as she washed my penis. She put soap in my hands. I didn't know what to do and just lathered her as well. She had a cute laugh. Then we dried up and she lead me to the bed. My heart was thumping and I was pretty ready to go. We sat down side by side and she gently placed her hand on my chest, kind of pushing my chest down as she started kissing me. She slowly started kissing down to my lower regions and I was pretty ticklish when she kissed my right lower ab. It almost contracted. Then she went to my dick and started biting around my balls. I wasn't too into that, but I guess it was hard to communicate to her that. I think she was not too experienced giving blows or maybe I was just too sensitive. I felt the teeth and she went to town on it. I couldn't really last very long as she was going too hard too quickly. I didn't mind though but I felt slightly embarrassed, but I think this was standard kgirl procedure based on what I read. It was my first time at an agency. I forgot to mention that. Anyways, I cummed in her mouth, taking everything I had. Then she went to bathroom to spit it out. I asked her if she was ok and I was sorry. She seemed to be fine. Then she cuddled up next to me and started kiss me and stroke me. I reciprocated. After awhile, she grabs my cock and tests to see if I'm ready for some work. I decide to tell her that I wanted some DATY. She seemed ready for it! I was actually pretty inexperienced with giving oral and I asked for a little guidance. She said yes, but I don't know if she understood. I just kissed her inner thighs slowly and I found out that she actually shaved pretty much everything off which was nice.I caressed around her vagina and started teasing her with everything. Honestly, I wasn't sure if i was doing too well, but she was giving some slight moans and I tried to respond accordingly. Her breathing got a little heavier and the view was quite great. I got pretty bored after awhile and wanted to get on with the act. She motioned me to lay next to her and she finally pulled a condom out and placed it on my cock. She then proceeded to mount and she made a loud sound as it went in her. It felt a little odd but she seemed to bouncing happily on it for awhile. then I told her I wanted MS. We got to that and I had to have her guide it in because I suck. I started painting that shit as she gave some small O's. I moved her legs around a little and her pussy tightened, making me go crazy. I licked her feet. I didn't really have a fetish for that. I just thought why not. I actually really liked her legs. She closed her eyes a bit and I wanted her to look me in the eyes. Her eyes were beautiful. Then I wanted to go doggy and she submitted. Again I needed help from her. I went slowly at first. Then the pace started picking up as I rammed her really hard, mixing up some of the timings that my dick kept falling out. I think I stayed in this position longest as it was really nice to see her back and butt as I kept pounding it. I played with her hair and breathed really heavily on her with some smooches on her back. Then I reached the grand finale and tried my best to go faster without pulling out. I finally came after awhile and plopped on her back. Both of us were breathing heavily as my dick just stayed inside of her. Then I pulled out. She didn't take it off right away, but we had a good laugh and I forgot what happened towards the end. I thinke she took it off and tossed it away. Then we cuddled some more with me giving a kiss on the forehead and me stroking her hair and body. She asked if I wanted to shower, but I told her to stay a little more. After I was ready we did another blue toast and she cleaned me up really well. I lathered her body again in soap. Then I put on my clothes. She also asked if I wanted water and she got me some. Then we headed to the door and I got a nice hug with a sweet kiss. Then I was off. i'd like to see her again, but I'll tell her no biting next time.
positive After seeing some stellar reviews of Miranda who seemed to be just my type I was able to set up an appointment for my narrow window of opportunity. I hadnt been there before but good directions and easy parking. Got the OK to go up and behind the door a gorgeous girl, prettier and hotter than her pictures. I was very happy! Non VIP go see her before she leaves! VIP read on. A quick hug and kiss, off with the shoes and into the bedroom where she didnt hesitate to engage in some DFK and quickly move down with clothes flying everywhere for a very nice BBBJ preview. As I finished disrobing we took care of the donation and she quickly returned and we engaged in more DFK and relieved her of her outfit which was very cute, revealing an exceptional figure underneath. A loose flowing orange colored top that let you see just the right amount of her luscious breasts and some tight shorts that accentuated her tight ass. Off to the bathroom for the mouthwash and shower which was an adventure in itself, lots of soap, rubbing all the right spots with her hands and breasts, ending with some more delightful BBBJ. Hopped out, dried off and back to the bedroom for more fun. The rest of it is kind of a blur, my mind in overload. I remember some more exceptional BBBJ and her rotating around for 69, suiting me up and going for some aggressive CG which then transitioned into mish where I soon lost it. She cleaned me up and we cuddled for a while and talked. Her English is pretty good, she has a great personality and is easy to talk to. She then gave me a very nice deep tissue massage that got me totally relaxed. Back to the shower to get cleaned up, she helped me get dressed, more kisses, a piece of candy at the door and I was on my way. Im very happy I had the opportunity to meet Miranda and definitely recommend her.
positive I was intrigued by the reviews. I liked what some mentioned about the aggressive action from the beginning. I made an appointment. Easy set up. Got to her in call. (terrible cell service). Once inside I got a very warm hug and quick kiss. Shoes off and ushered to her room. I was a little disappointed with her face. BOdy looked nice. Slim but curvy. Once in the room, I started to rub my hands together because it was so cold outside. She rubbed her hands with mine, then started to kiss them. Started talking about weather. She speaks very little english. We moved on to a make out session. disrobed and gave donation. She went out, and by the time she came back i was buck naked. We showered, got a preview in shower. Once in the room, got a GREAT BBBJ. Slurps, hands, DT and the whole package. even a quick gag! It was one of the better bj i've gotten. And I love those mirrors!!! I DATY, she likes slow and easy. Loves to be teased. p2p, she was very wet. SHe grabbed my junk and used it on her clit like a vibrator. She told me, "please come fuck me" NO POBLEM!! COver on and mish first,CG. I wanted to finish in DS cuz the dimples on back are such a turn on for me. I started slow, cuz she looked to be in a bit of pain. I asked if shes ok, she said it felt good, so onward till pop. She later told me that she was getting a cramp (I assume) on her hip, but she wanted me to keep on going. CLean up, small talk and no time for a second pop. I will def. return.
positive decided to try out the east side of agency, as it is very near of where i work. called and they recommended Liz for first time, but when I got there, she was unfortunately busy. So they offered chelsea. she was still pretty new there. was wearing the purple fishnet bra you see in her pics. accurate pics and friendly service, but we just did not click so would not repeat with her, but ymmv. vips, read on she takes me to the room downstairs and hugs me. really nice and soft body. strips me down and proceeds to give me a naked lap dance. she was new and i look young for my age so there was a bit of awkward there. by the way, she spoke barely any english so communication was also very difficult. anyway, onto the shower. stand up shower, very small. the thing that threw me off was that the lights kept switching colors and i was like what? haha. anyway, standard clean, very special attentions to balls and dick and ass, and constant make out, which i absolutely love. i can spend the whole hour making out with a girl and not do anything else but that would be a bit waste of money. after shower, she cleans me up and we go back to the room. i offer to daty and she got really excited. did that for ten minutes, she got wet but didn't cum. went into 69, after that. i was hard but her bbbj needed more suction as im not very sensitive down there. then she put the hat on (just a heads up, the hats are really small and tight, so if you are above average, bring your own). we did multiple positions, from miss to cow to rcg to a bit of doggy (not my thing). it was over 45 minutes now and i was just not cumming so she takes the hats off and then we just made out like crazy while she gave me a handjob. she really did try her best, but there just was no connection between us. i guess since it was my first time, it just felt awkward. i did proceed to visit this agency three more times, of which i will post the reviews soon hopefully.
positive Been trying to setup an appointment with Chelsea or Elsa for a while. Finally found the time. Screening over text. I was a bit tipsy before I got there and Chelsea was very playful and eager to please. She doesn't speak much English but that was not much a problem at all. Elsa was there as well, both are pretty hot and friendly. Overall a great experience... Did some verification over text. Pretty easy. I had a few drinks before I got there and it was easy to locate. Got there a bit early and was let in. It's a residential building with no doorman. At the door, Chelsea greeted me. The photos on the site are very accurate, clearly tell that those are her photos. Chelsea is cute with a sexy body. She helped me undress. In the shower, she really cleaned me up and even bbbj a little bit. Back to the bedroom, she offered me a beer which I accepted. That was continuing the buzz I had. Typical tease massage with her breast which I'm not a big fan of. She did a good rim job which again I'm not a big fan of. Turned over for more of a tongue bath then finally to some bbbj. This was amazing and went on for a while. After a while she mounted me for some cowgirl, she asked me to fuck her from behind and I finished there. I'm fairly certain round two was on the table but I had to leave for another appointment. Will definitely be back to see Chelsea.
positive Orange was the provider I was looking to see that night, I called for Cinderella and she told me to come over but when I got there I was paired with Orange. I was a little disappointed because it wasn't her I want to see but she did make the appointment enjoyable. Orange is cute she was in this black lingerie set and high heels as soon as she got out of her high heels I notice how short she is. She helped me out of my clothes and we headed to the bathroom for a quick wash. This is a great agency all the girls there are hot and things seems to be well managed. You cant go wrong with any of there girls I just want to try every girl there. Higher recommend. She helped me out of my clothes and got on her knees and give me a great BBBJ preview then we headed to the bathroom for a quick wash. She gives my ass a nice soap wash from that I knew what that met. In no time we were back in the room she asked me to get in my stomachs give me a lite massage with some lite touches, then started give me a cat bath licking every part of my body. She made her way down to my butt and gave me and overwhelming rimming job he had her face buried into my ass. She asked me to get on all four spread my ass cheeks rimming and stroking my cock at the same time thats multitasking! I got her on her back and did a little DATY and she really got very vocal, DATY didn't last took long she had her O and she wanted to suck my cock. This girl is skilled when it comes to her BBBJ, soon I wanted to suit up and she lube herself and we start with Missionary. WOW! She like to fuck and get fucked, quickly to CG, RCG and we finished with doggy where I gave her the pounding of her life she moaning on top of how lungs and Im sure the whole apartment heard her. The best part was the mirrors on the wall as she watches me pound and fuck her good. I was getting ready to blow my load I ask her to get on her back ask I whack off into her mouth, she kept sucking until the last dropped then she got up and spit it out. I cleaned up and got dressed and was out the door I was over my time by 10-15 minutes which didn't seem like a big thing with her. Thank you Orange I would love to do a duo but from the reviews I read it doesn't seem like these ladies do much lesbian actions. I will definitely repeat after I see every girl at the agency!
positive second time visiting, mamasan knew me already so no problem. shoot a text for half hour, she said i should come meet orange and i would enjoy it a lot. that i def did. i may in fact visit her again today if luck plays out well. vips, read on once at the door, orange greets me in a schoolgirl outfit. she is so cute! i just wanted to do her right then and there. regretted only booking for half hour and that regret was so true. anyway, she takes me downstairs and just jumps on me. constant hugging and kissing like we were old lovers. it was great. it was also a blurr. since it was only half hour, no shower. she stripped me naked then allowed me to take off her uniform. what a great body. she pushed me into the bed, got on top of me, started grinding and making out with me. i flip her over and go down. she gets wet instantly and is constantly squirming. what a delicious pussy! after a few minutes, she pulls me up, and we go 69 for a bit. she can deepthroat for a small chick. i suddenly feel like a release and she comes up and makes out with me. not sure what happened there but it was great and hot and well not gonna question it. then comes the cover, and in goes cg. she is to tight, it was amazing. we go to miss next and stay till times up. at the end, she was sad and said next time to do an hour and she will show me real fun. unfortunately she is super booked all the time and its rare to get her as ive been trying for a while lol. anyway, best part is that she didnt even mention the fee till we were at the door. i slipped a bit extra cause it was a fun service. i would recommend her but i also want to keep her for myself so you all better not book her at once
positive Had read some good reviews and am liking what I'm getting lately from the massage providers in Mpls. Great group of girls overall. Piper is no exception. I wouldn't say she's a knockout by any means, and there are others who do the same or better job. That being said, I had a nice one hour session with her that could been shortened to a half hour and still gotten all the kinks out. Might repeat. It took us over a month to have our schedules align, due to my own schedule difficulties for the most part. But eventually we set up an appointment, all through email and also with her assistant. Good, open communication and no surprises. Nice location in Uptown with plenty of street parking. Felt like a safe place. Walked in and was greeted by Piper, we shared a brief kiss and then got comfortable. I disrobed and climbed up on the table. It was nice and warm atmosphere, but she stayed in bra and panties to start. Great massage, she took plenty of time on the back and shoulders, then went after the calfs and thighs, with some light brushing of my flaccid cock, bringing it to attention. After about 20 minutes she climbed on top and did the slide, all oiled up and getting us both hot. She kissed the ears and did a nice brush job all over my body. We decided to settle on the bed and started out with some DFK while fondling each other. I gave her an O with fingers and back rub going at the same time, then she returned the favor. Started with a nice hand job but quickly moved down to the nipples, nibbling away and making me even harder. Then worked her way down to my member, kissing stomach along the way. Once she started working her mouth magic I was lost in bliss and came in a couple of minutes. It was great, both of us had a good time. Showered up and hit the road. Nice time overall.
positive Called up Devin one early afternoon. Had seen her ads and reviews and really wanted to see what the fuss was all about. She is way more beautiful and sexy than her pictures give her!! If you are looking for a short, stacked female who is very responsive to your touch, then she is the one you want!! Overall, a very good experience with someone who might end up being my fav!! VIP'ers read on. There was some hesitation on my part initially as I found out that her location is far away from my work place and because of the time of the day, it was going to take me almost an hour to get there. I almost bailed on her, but I kept my promise and took the hour trek. Glad I did. Once I got to her location, I ended up on the wrong side of the building. Once we figured this out, I went to her room. I excused myself and came back to the bed. We chit-chatted for a little bit and then began to undress. She asked me what I liked, and I told her oral. We laid naked on the bed together and I explored her body. I played with her tits and she was responsive to my touch with a few moans. I kissed around her neck and the rest of her body and went down to her "jungle room" There, she was very responsive to my overtures. Her clit was very sensitive and was at full attention as I soon as I paid attention to it. Before I knew it, she was moaning and squirming around on the bed. I continued to munch on her and before I knew it, she was tightening up. It didn't seem like she had a true orgasm, so I continued down there. Again, very quickly, she tightened up again and appeared to have a orgasm as she was very sensitive to me kissing her area down there after her O. We switched positions on the bed and she began to caress my manhood. She continued to get me harder and harder as she looked at me with her bedroom eyes. I asked for a condom, so that she can get on top. It didn't long for me after a few humps with her on top. I felt drained as she took care of the condom for me and provided me with a wipe. We ended up talking about what was on TV and how stupid some shows are. I talked to her a little bit longer before I headed out. Overall, great experience. Found her very sexy and will try to stay in touch with her. She did seem a little out of it, like she was stressed about something. It wasn't anything bad, as I am willing to try her again!!
positive Exactly the girl in the photos. Standard text/call and LE check and I was on my way over. Not photo-shopped or anything. My type of girl, spinner type. Would recommend for anyone to try her out. Quick text/call and I was on my way to see her. She's exactly who she is in the ads. Being my first time in Ohio, I was nervous about who I was going to meet. I was a bit nervous given her first review said she was a hit-and-run scam. But she was the first to reply and I'm glad I gave it a shot. Came into a motel she was renting out of, and she was in a shirt and tights which is my personal favorite. I hate the trying hard with lingerie but more of a GND look. She gets into bed and you follow suit. She's very sweet and makes you feel like you're with a girlfriend. Everything I wanted to do, she was very accommodating. Give her a nudge and she'll respond in kind. I felt really good about her and overall had an amazing experience. I came into her room and she gave me a quick hug and invited me into bed. She's very soft spoken and very sweet. We cuddled and made out for a few minutes before going down to business. She has the GFE vibe and her BBBJ reflected it. We swapped over to 69 and I really enjoyed that. She's very clean despite the motel she stays in. She's either a great actress or I assumed she was really getting into it and we went into MISH and DOGGY for finish. The moans she made excited me even more and I really didn't last long with her. She's absolutely gorgeous, thin but not anorexic like some other reviews mentioned. She is a mother and her middle region reflects that but I didn't even have that in my head with the amazing service she was providing. I will 100% repeat without a doubt as she left me feeling high on life. Only cons are if you visit her incall location, it is completely smokey. Herself was clean, no hint of smoke and her bottom area was wonderful. But the room itself, all you could smell was smoke. I left and my entire wardrobe I wore stunk to high heaven. Obviously I looked past that with how wonderful the service was.
positive I had seen previous reviews on Teena, and all were great so I decided to contact her. Her body looked fun. She doesn't show her face, but still went for it. I was happy I did. Teena is a sweetheart. i have to admit I always go for the young women, but I will definitely see Teena again...highly recommended. She arrived at my room looking very classy. Beautiful lady. We did the usual and chatted for a few minutes to get to know each a bit. I only went got 1/2 hr, but she does not watch the clock at all, we were both very relaxed and comfortable with each other. After some light kissing she excused herself to the bathroom, so I made myself comfortable and disrobed. She came out in ger panties, and it was on. I went in for some DATY, very clean and tasty. I camped there for about 10 minutes. She then returned the favor once I wrapped up. I flipped her around and went in doggy style. Shit was she tight...she released a nice moan when i finally penetrated. Felt like i had to pop through. After some doggy, I pinned her legs back on mish and really went to town. I know she could feel my nuts hitting her ass. My session was for 1/2 hr, so I had to let go...blew a huge load in the cover. My only mistake was not seeing her for a full hour. I wont make that mistake again...:). I recommend Teena for sure..
positive I gave Yen a call and it was pretty easy to set up an appointment. She is very friendly and relaxed. I will certainly repeat! VIP'ers read onward! I walked into the room and Yen greeted me with a friendly hug and kiss. There was instant chemistry right off the bat. We made some pleasant conversation which turned seductive. We started with the massage on the bed as she told me to get comfortable. She helped me take off my shirt which was a nice touch. She started on my back and I must say that she has excellent technique. There was some LFK involved. Eventually she worked her way down to my legs with lots of teasing - she paid lots of attention to junior. I was allowed to roam her respectfully. She looked stunning in a bra but eventually that came off. She edged me four or five times until I finished in russian. Wow what a time and performance. I had a great time and will certainly visit her again when she is in town!
positive Visited her before for an incall at her apartment, but this time she came to me. Sent her a text, hammered out the details, and she came straight over. Not a lot of screwing around, she got straight to business. Not the best, but definitely worth the effort. She came in and we talked for bit - she can be very chatty until she really gets down to business. Very quickly she lost her clothes and removed mine, laying me back on my bed. A hand job worked to put on the condom and get me fully erect, with a perfunctory blow job to top it off. She spent more time on it last time I saw her, but it's when she mounts you that she really shines. She's so small and flexible, and she knows how to work it. She rode me for several minutes, then asked to flip over for doggy, so I came in no time flat. She seemed a little tired this time, understandably since it was late at night. So if you can, catch her in the middle of the day.
positive Been to this agency before but only at the East Side location where the building itself was discreetly located but inside the apartment, you will run into residents in the building lobby if going during busy hours. Recommend taking the stairs at that location. The west side outside locale is not quite as discreet but the inside of the building is more discreet than their East Side place so it's a trade off. Both places are very clean and spacious. Nice big rooms with full sized beds. Orange is very popular and it took me awhile to finally be able to book an appointment with her but glad I did as she is very nice and very accommodating. She's tiny and short (spinner type) and totally natural from head to toe. Agency is easy to set up appointments with and you can do everything by text as soon as you become a regular. They get very busy, though. Been here before and didn't really click with the last girl I was with (was a substitute for who I originally wanted to see who was not available). This time around I was determined to see Orange and tried twice before finally getting a spot. After first session with her, I can totally understand why she's popular. Her looks and body type remind me of one of my favorites KMP girls from Twinkle (Miki) except Orange is not Korean (Chinese, I think). This place has really good service and they will treat you like a king as soon as you enter the door. Total geisha girl experience if that's what you're into. They won't even let you take off your coat and shoes, they insist on doing it for you which is nice. Orange is super friendly even with her limited English. She definitely knows how men like to be treated and did not disappoint. She's very young (gotta be 22-25) and still loves the biz. Totally not jaded at all with a lot of sexual energy. I went for the full hour but do recommend going for a half hour on your first visit just in case you don't click with the girl. Only reason why I didn't do that this time around is that I knew she was popular, her pics were verified by several people to really be her and I'm really into that type (spinner all natural girl-next-door type with a wild side). Almost don't want to write this review but you can see from previous posts that I'm not alone in my opinion. She did everything I requested down to the outfit and hair (I asked her to tie it back in a ponytail which I like to see on girls with sexy slim necks like hers). The shower is a normal stand up and Orange will join you and let you fool around a bit in there. Girl's got super smooth skin and perfect teeth as well. Before the main event I did something I rarely do and upsold myself asking for another hour on top of the one I scheduled. I knew right there I wanted to go for two shots and one hour is not enough for me to get two in these days. She did have another appointment after mine but told me I can add another half hour which I did for an extra $150. Once I got that out of the way, the session itself was really good from start to finish. She knows all the right spots to get you hard in no time and can read your body language. BBBJ skills were amazing with lots of eye contact and she really made me feel like a long time lover. She does a rim job too which I'm not really into but the way she does it really got me hard as stone. I knew the first one would be quick and I didn't even make it to the main event and CIM right there before she even had her top off. Even when she knew I was about to go, she didn't let up, increased the pace and let me let it rip. Amazing. She spit it out on a paper towel went to the restroom and came back helping me relax and massage for awhile before round two. Once I was ready, I took my time on this one exploring her body and spent a lot of time dining at the Y which she really responded too. Quite loudly, actually. Hearing that young voice totally getting off from my work was music to my ears. I know I made her come because she was dripping all over my face. She went for another BBBJ after that but I was ready for the main course and entered her slowly in mish to start. Wanted to gaze into those eyes of hers. After picking up the pace she started getting vocal again, licking my ears and and digging into my back. She wrapped her legs tightly around me, it felt awesome. Did not want to lose it too early so switched up to pretty much every position I can think of, CG, RCG, Doggie, Lazy Dog, Standing Dog. Man, this girl can really keep up and will tire an older guy out easily for sure. I was having a blast until a finally blasted cup number two in the bag while standing side of the bed mish. Great provider. Hope she sticks around awhile as I will definitely repeat.
positive Screening through her agency took some time but was able to get an appointment on the same day. Location is in a nice apartment complex in the CM area. She appeared to be slightly older and slightly fatter than the pictures. However, still an attractive woman none the less. VIPs read one. Katty greeted at the door with a shy smile. She seems a bit shy and timid at first. But after some small talk and showering, she warmed up a lot more. The fun begins after showering. She started off by teasing you and licking you all over body. She then proceed to bare BJ which felt like heaven. She was totally agreeable to DFK and FIV. After some position change and some moaning and groaning, I finally let go of everything. Her attitude was great throughout the session. Definitely felt like a gf and doesn't rush with time at all.
positive Mb is easy to deal with. Meet at an upscale hotel. Knocked on door and when opened there was a beautiful blonde on the other side. I usually am attracted to slender women, Leonie is not. She is not fat just not thin, however very attractive. Her tits are amazing. I took a quick shower and the fun began. Non Vips -- good session, I would repeat after a quick shower I meet Leonie on the bed. We started LFK and I moved to her awesome tits. If you like perfect fakes ones then these are awesome. After some more kissing, licking etc... she went to BBBJ. asked me not to cim, so when I was hard she rode me CG. Awesome, she seemed to enjoy this and was riding and grinding real hard. as my hands were caressing her tits and body , I noticed that she was in a good sweat which turned me on and I popped. We relaxed for a few minutes then we started LFK again. She went down for another BJ and after I was hard again I put her back on CG. The fact she was riding so hard with a light sweat was a turn on and couldn't get enough. This went on awhile until I popped again. I washed up and get dressed and said goodbye. Good session, probably would repeat
positive Her apartment is kinda hard to find. but finding her was well worth it . She is young and a very beautiful girl. Her incall wax clean she was dressed in a nice top and a pair of blue jeans that came off rather quickly. I would definitely see her again. she is fairly new. she had some small talk and went. Straight for the boys while she licked and sucked down my shaft while rubbing softly against my lower ball area i had to stop her or i would have exploded in 5 seconds brought her up to me so that we could kiss for a bit i asked her if she had any protection she reached in her top drawer and pulled on out i told her i wanted to start off with mesh so that i could look into her eyes she is very responsive and slowly moaned with each stroke. I let off in seamed like no time. We layed there just chatting a bit. Before she started with the second round. She begin rubbing and squeezing my shaft. Then put her lips fully around it taking it all the way down she swallowed every drop
negative On a recent trip to Las Vegas I had an appointment with Kelly Klass. She said she knew other industry girls and that I should contact her when I returned, so before I headed back to LV I contacted her. She had a few girls but indicated that she knew Ariana Marie well and highly recommended her. I wasnt familiar with Ariana, so I located some photos and was truly impressed. Kelly and I discussed what I was looking for in the appointment and everything went exactly as discussed. I met Ariana in the hotel lobby, and she is stunning! She just stands out with a demure appearance that is so amazing to behold. Ariana has a natural beauty to her  she doesnt need makeup to be gorgeous. Shes like the prettiest girl next door with the tight cheerleaders body youve ever laid eyes on. If that werent enough she has a wonderful personality. She is very intelligent and very mature for her age. She made me feel comfortable almost instantly and her giggle will have you smiling too. Shes adorable and fun!!! Once we got back to the room, we chatted briefly and were comfortable immediately. She then proceeded to step out of her dress and was wearing only a small thong. She has the most perfect 100% natural body Ive ever seen. Her breasts are much nicer in real life than in some photos. Her breasts are perfectly proportioned for her petite frame. Her body blew me away! She was breathtaking! She helped me undress. Started with some DFK, and I was almost instantly ready for action. Her BBBJ drove me wild! I couldnt wait any more and we moved to the main event. Started in CG then on to mish. She was incredibly tight & felt amazing wrapped around me! I lasted as long as I could. Pulled the cover and released on her stomach. Time went by quickly as we chatted again. I had been a busy boy and couldnt recoup for round two, but she was playful and friendly throughout. Amazing woman. She quickly moved to the top of my must see again list!
positive Started w/a DFK as soon as I walked in the door and didn't stop throughout the session. It's go time w/this young lady and I had a great time trying to keep up w/her. Truly recommended. Very easy set-up w/her PO via text. She wasn't available initially, but her PO texted me back when an opening popped up. As soon as I entered her apartment it was go time. She's standing there w/the tiniest of aprons on and nothing else. So I'm greeted w/a DFK by a naked girl w/ perfect B's and a nice squeezable butt. Off w/the shoes, hand over the envelope and off to the bedroom we go. She comes back after putting the envelope away and it's DFK all the way into the bathroom for a blue toast and a shower. Quick clean up and then she goes to town rimming my ass while reaching under and stroking my soapy cock. Rinsed the soap off and a preview BBBJ before drying off. Off the to bed for more BBBJ with me sitting on the bed. Nice eye contact and deft switching back and forth from my balls to my cock. I let her get me off since I wanted to try 2 pops anyway. She spit into a tissue, excused herself for another blue toast and came back to cuddle for a bit. Tried to get me going again but I still needed some more time, so it was down for some DATY. Nice clean pussy that was receptive to a FIV. Found her G spot and a good tongue rhythm and got her to a shaking, head squeezing orgasm. Now she needed a bit of a rest while she calmed down. She started back on me w/a BBBJ to see if I was going to be able to pop again. She gave it her best but I just couldn't get er done. I had a great time and definitely see her again (and again).
negative Had read Jenesis Jade's awesome reviews and pictures on the website of the agency in Phoenix - They are the "A" Team, and never disappoint, with any lady you see with this group. Filled out the booking form in the morning and set up a date for later that for that evening. Went to the incall and was met by the stunning, beautiful Jenesis Jade looking very hot & sexy in Matching Bra, Garters, Thigh Highs and a Cool Pair of CUM F--k me High Heels, We hugged and ........................ LFK'd leading to some hot DFK in the living room as I was admiring her perfect beauty, and flawless toned body, We moved to the bedroom, I stripped out of my clothes and we were standing DFK kissing at the end of the bed, I helped her out of her bra and kissed and licked her perky breasts, as I made my way down her body laying her back on he bed as she removed the garter so I could slide off her panties, she likes to watch everything in the big mirror on the wall so I started a long wet DATY on her sweet honey tasting pussy, nice long, wet, sloppy until she came very hard, With her pussy nice and wet we grabbed a cover an I stood at the foot of the bed and we fucked with her laying back on the bed her legs over my shoulders, standing doggie, then again to her on her back with her legs over my shoulders, until she wrapped her arms around my neck, I lifted her off the bed so she could watch us standing up as she bounced on my cock as we stood in front of the mirror, in a standing fuck. Very Hot to watch in that mirror on the wall. Laid her back on the bed and we fucked in a hot mish, legs up, over my shoulders, on her side, doggie facing the mirror, she has one of the nicest finest asses I have ever seen and with million dollar legs, Jenesis Jade is in a class of her own, then on to lazy doggie with lots of DFK, we were in full swing. Took off the cover and she gave me a long hot BBBJ with lots of eye contact and ball licking, but as I was also watching her hot ass in the wall mirror, I was craving to fuck her again. So we grabbed another cover and she got on top of me cg and rcg so she could watch herself in that mirror, things were really heating up as we got in front of the mirror and she kneeled in front of me and gave me a another BBBJ and Ball Licking until I came in her mouth and she sucked me dry and went to spit. We cleaned up and she is so cool, she even ran me a shower, we were talking thru my shower and continued doing so until I took my leave. Jenesis Jade is without a doubt a legend in the making!! TOR, continues to out do himself with each and every beautiful "A" Team lady he delivers to the Valley of the Sun
positive Emailed her scheduler and got a response quickly. I setup for a morning session and was asked if I could bump it to the next time slot which worked out fine. I arrived at the place in uptown and buzzed the door. I walked up to the room and was let in by Piper. Very hot girl that is in the pics. She offered me something to drink but I was fine. There was a massage table and bed in the room. She asked me to get more comfortable so I removed my clothes and got on the massage table. She then started a nice massage on my back for a couple minutes and then the fun began. VIP read on. Non VIP, you must experience this girl at least once. She is very hot and knows how to make you feel amazing. After massaging me for awhile she would also occasionally tease me by reaching her hand under and grabbing my manhood. She stripped naked and got up on the table and started rubbing her nice breasts all over my back and head. She then started kissing my back and ears. After a couple minutes of this she asked if I wanted to go to the bed and I said, "Yes!" At the bed we layed there and DFKed for awhile and I also sucked on her amazing tits. She then had me lay on my back and started sucking on my nipples. She eventually kissed her way down to my cock and started licking it then sucking it. While she did this she looked me right in the eyes which was hot as hell. She would also suck on my balls while stroking my cock. She also had me put my cock in between her tits and squeezed them together while I slid in between them. She really worked me to the point of blowing. At the end she had me lay on my back while sucking my cock again. When I was getting close I told her I was going to cum and she just kept sucking and said, "mmm hmmm", with my cock in her mouth. I blew my load in her mouth and she looked at me and swallowed it all. She then cleaned me up and offered me a shower. After that I said goodbye and told her I would definitely come back. Guys she is the closet thing to FS as I have got without the actually FS. A true GFE. Run to her, you will be glad you did.
positive I am a regular patron of Dream Asian. They are professional, clean, and good-natured providers -- for the most part. I decided to give Koa a try, as she had been receiving positive reviews. She is very cute. Her face is beautiful. Her body is nice. She is a little to petite for my liking though. If you like a cute, young-looking spinner, Koa is for you. She always smiles, as some of the other reviewers have said. Non-vip's she is well worth the time and money - if you like a happy, cute, Asian spinner. I dialed up DA, and set up the appointment for the next day. Koa was changing locations, so she wasn't going to take any appointments until 1pm. I called the morning of the appointment, and got the location and re-confirmed the time. I was running a little bit late due to traffic, and called to let the agency know. They were fine with it, as Koa was stuck in traffic too. I called the agency again when I arrived, and Koa had just checked in. They asked me to wait, and`10 minutes later I get the call with the room number. I knock on the door, and it opens with a cute happy go lucky young woman standing behind the door. I gave her a nice peck, and asked her to turn up the heat, as the room was still cold, since Koa had checked in shortly before. I then removed my clothes and placed my donation on the desk and hopped into the shower. Once out of the shower, it was time for the fun to begin. Koa was laying on the bed and sat down and rolled into her arms. Her kisses were nice, but a little hesitant. No complaints, it was her first time seeing me. Koa commented on how smooth I was around my pecker, which I thanked her for, as I have had electrolysis done, and am now as smooth as a baby's bottom all around down there. Koa just looked and smiled for a minute or two as she stroked me. On to a nice BBBJ, and then I moved her up for some DATY. She seemed to like it, and I did too. Nice, clean and fresh. I think she O'd maybe once, and then we went onto the main event. First started in mish, and she seemed to be getting tired. I then asked her what she liked, and she said "doggie". So off we go, Koa on all fours, as I mounted her from behind. I pounded her pretty hard, and I think she maybe O'd again. I really don't know for sure, for it usually takes me a couple of visits with a provider before I am able to tell for sure if they are really O'ing. Time was getting close to the hour, so I decided that it was my turn. I then rolled Koa back onto her back, and gave her my best. I came hard and fell over on the bed next to her. Koa is super sweet, and has a super happy face. She is not my top provider at DA, but she is a sweet provider, who tries her best. I just have a sweet tooth for the older, curvier DA girls! :)
positive I figured I'd start 2016 on a good note and made an appointment to see the lovely Orange - I'd met her briefly at the end of an earlier visit to the agency and was intrigued by her looks and her playfulness. Plus, this agency (and its sister agency) has never let me down - every single lady I've seen has been sexy, sweet, and horny. The short version - had a great time with a fun and wickedly mischievous hottie. Now my conundrum - I'd like to stop back for a threesome, but who do I choose of the four wonderful ladies I've seen here? Anyhow...back to the review! Orange answered the door wearing a sexy schoolgirl outfit that made me wish I'd had students like her during my professorial days. She led me to the room and latched onto me before I even got my coat off - big hug, DFK, and pressing that slender body against mine. Five seconds into the room and junior is already straining to be released! We broke apart long enough for me to take off my coat, and then she's pulling my shirt off, licking my nipples, and unbuttoning my pants. I reached around...sorry, got to be VIP to keep reading. I reached around and grabbed her firm little buns, pulling her into me, and she ground herself up against me while continuing to DFK. Then she reached around and unhooked her bra, revealing her girls - not very big, but perfectly firm, nicely formed, and tipped with nipples that were already standing at attention. I had to give them a lick and a squeeze, then Orange dropped down, gave me a wicked little smile, and started a quick pre-preview BBBJ that had me so hard it was starting to hurt. She smiled, then dropped her skirt and pulled me onto the bed. Some more serious making out followed, then a suggestion that we take a shower. The shower was a lot of fun (but then, what's not to like about getting wet and slippery with a hot young lass?) and included another quick BBBJ plus a lot of groping and squeezing. I'll be honest with you - I was ready to get started right there, but safety first, and the covers were in the room. So we dried off and hustled ourselves back to the room where the real fun started. We went back to making out for a bit, then I laid Orange on her back and told her it was her turn to feel good. She eagerly lay down - I started kissing and playing with her breasts, then kissed my way down her body until I reached her shaved kitty and dove in. I'm not sure if her initial moans were real or theatrical, but within a few minutes her reactions seemed all real and my chin was getting soaked. It took awhile to get her there, but when she started pushing her kitty into my face it was a real turn-on. Then she started bucking her hips so much that it was hard to keep my tongue on target - she finally gave a big moan and lay more quietly, then reached down to pull me up to lay next to her for a bit, before saying "Now your turn!" The next part is sort of a blur of events - there was a lot going on, including a bit of cat bath, some rimming, a fantastic BBBJ that included a truly impressive DT, not to mention licking my shaft while it was in her mouth. After several minutes she moved to my side, then said "You lick me too?" and swung over into a 69 that had us both moaning with pleasure after a few minutes. Finally she slid off and suggested we move on to the main event, with my whole-hearted approval. She put the cover on and gingerly slid on in CG. It took a few minutes and, at first, she only took the tip in because she is tiny. But even that felt great, and I was taking shallow strokes to keep from hurting her. Then she laid forward and put her arms around me while I moved my hands to her hips and was able to enter fully. Man - the tip felt good, but this felt great, and after she adjusted to the size she started moving and moaning, with the occasional quick DFK thrown in. She was still lying down on me, and the feeling of her firm young breasts against my chest while I was inside that tight little kitty (not to mention grabbing her firm young ass) pushed me over the edge - I popped hard in just a few minutes, and it sounded as though she came at about the same time. We just lay there for a minute, then she went for a hot towel to clean us both up. Afterwards we talked a bit - Orange speaks enough English to carry on a conversation. At one point she cupped her breasts in her hands and said "How you call these?" to which I replied "boobs or boobies." Then it was the singular versus plural ("One boob, two boobies") and she seemed happy to have learned a new word. A few minutes of this and we noticed it was time to get dressed - it was a shame to see that lovely body covered up, but that's life. Then, back to the door (where I saw a beautiful lady by the name of Rainbow), and back to reality.
positive I found her on one of the escort sites I liked her pictures.I made couple calls and we're set. We agreed on a time and place, easy to find hotel. I called her when I got there,she gave me the room number and up I went. She greeted me in bra and panties, all the time giving all her attention to me we talked a little had a drink, I gave her donation and stripped off our clothes,and she starts with one of the most amazing massages ever.Then the real fun began. Well worth the time with Stacey. I will repeat. Stacey is amazing always trying to please you to the ultimate climax. I'm eating her pussy while she is giving me the ultimate blowjob,we then switch to doggy style. We go at it like this till we about to collapse,after I say lets do 69,she loves to suck the cock while all the time licking my balls. we fall back gasping for air to take a breath. She then grabs my dick massaging it to go at it some more. She sits on top of me bouncing up and down on my cock. She screaming with extacy, her tits are bouncing up and down. What a ride ,she stops , goes to her knees and is sucking my cock again licking it up and down till I exploded and she is lapping every drop . Oh my god she is one hell of a woman. I would definately rest with her again.
positive Called her up and made plans to head that way. Got there and she texted me the room number. She's really cool and very beautiful. Of course I will repeat Got there, walk of shame past the front desk. She was staying in an extended stay. Get to her room and was let in by a smoking hot blond. In my opinion perfect body and like another reviewer said her tatoos make her even sexier. She seemed a little nervous at first but I made her forget about that as I start touching her everywhere. She starts striping so I followed her lead and joined her on the bed. I was all ready for her so she put the cover on the head and with her mouth covered the rest. Routine apparently. I asked her to get on top, she said she doesn't like to but I insisted she did for a little bit. Felt great. Then I proceeded to get her missionary or doggy, one of the two. We fucked for awhile the to prevent me from releasing I moved down and ate her out. Now obviously a bad previous review was inaccurate and she smelled and tasted good. She just a really hot young blond with a perfect ass. She's early 20s I believe and my new atf. Don't miss out guys she's my #1 of all time.
positive The initial communication via email and reference verified and setup time. Easy to find location. I will repeat. Once inside she welcome with a kiss and hug. She offered a glass of wine that is very nice. We were chatting little bit then moved to massage table. We both undressed same time and she left with panties. On the face down she gave a good massage and lot of body to body rub. Her nice tits massaged my back and all over. When she moved up and down and her hair touches my face and created hot atmosphere. On the flip, she got up the table and she rubs her tits directly on my boy. Her hands playing with my balls and slowly she stroking. I noticed she is full nude at this time and don't know when her panties came off. I got a good view her pussy and fingering inside. She started stroking and suddenly I felt warm then I realized my unit is in her mouth. She gave a very good BBBJ. Then her boy was in between her tits rubbing and I came. I asked her to exchange massage and she agreed, I was massaging her tits and pussy. Kissed her few times and she really enjoyed. The time was over and she cleaned in hot towel and left very happy.
positive There is a good reason why Noa receives so many good reviews; she is a professional and seems to enjoy her sessions as much as her customers. Hot body, very cute and sensual from the start. True GFE for the most part and she really knows how to make a man feel good about himself. Easy to set up, safe and realiable agency (and not far away so be respectful!). Have repeated once already. First time I saw her, I was very pleased. Young, asian spinner with a hot body. Definitely a very cute girl and with no make up as far as I could tell. I dont think she is mixed, she said she is Japanese. She was naked and sucking my dick within a few minutes after our greating. Start with LFK. I never got DFK which has me concerned about my breath or my facial hair, but I imagine she is different with each client. We still kissed a lot. I made doubly sure the breath was good second visit and no change. So i cant tell you to expect it, and I really dont think it was an issue with me because we really had a great time together. Maybe she holds back after BBBJ but I would not care, and I asked her about if I was ok with breath and facial hair; she said she was more concerned about hers and seemed to indicate why (previous clients). So now you know, DFK may or may not be on the table. Body is tight. Tits small but awesome. Pussy is absolutely beautiful, I could not stop diving in. Ass is great, and she really enjoys some attention there. I don't typically believe the orgasms and I can easily spot the fake ones intended to hurry up the session (i married young, my wife taught me well). She seams to have real orgasms and her clit is very sensitive. And very accessible! She has a wide thigh gap which is hot, but also makes pelvic contact very easy. I dont like to pound a woman, i am more of a sensual type with a soft touch and her pleasure is very important to me. Noa expresses her pleasure with sex from the very start and lets me know what she enjoys. She admired my penis and tight balls, of which I am very proud because the rest of me is aging :) She made me feel real good about myself; a real pro. BBBJ, DATY, Light rimming, sex with condom or female condome. She talks during the session about what she likes and how it feels. You definitely know when is feels good to her. Female condom was a dissappointment for me; it was still tight but a little wrinkled, felt like a thick condom and does not look sexy in use. Wont use it again. It was so tight, it came out still on me when we took a break. I had different expectations. I cant finish in a condom yet, but Noa is up for trying different things to help me finish and so far, two VERY big finishes. I am taking steps to fix my issues (so far so good) but if you are an older guy with a little trouble due to age or medication (or death grip syndrome), she is patient and will get you there! Worth every penny! Very GFE/PSE. And I cant wait to get her in a doubles session because she tells me she is really bi and enjoys company; a lot. If you can get an appointment, she is a really fun time. I told her I wish she was my girlfriend! Its probably not the right thing to say to an SP but she gave me the perfect answer. I will definitely be repeating.
positive I checked out Carmen's ads and reviews and decided she would be an interesting girl to meet. I sent her a text and she replied about 15 minutes later and said she was open at the agreed upon time. I sent another text and asked where I should go and the donation amount. I had some errands to run so I left home and made two stops. After I came out from my second stop she finally sent a reply text and asked if I could bring condoms and told me her incall was as far away as possible and still be in the city! This was going to make me at least 15 minutes late but I got the condom and headed her way. She gave me an address which was very hard to find on the GPS. When I found her complex, I looked for the address she gave me and noticed there was no such apartment number! When I went back outside, there was the number she gave me on a row of garages. I sent her a text and asked what the apartment number was, and waited for a reply. As I was sitting there on my Harley, a young girl came out and got in a car and left. I continued searching for an apartment number but still got no reply to my text. Finally she got back to me and said that she gave me the garage number - the apartment number was different and she would come right out. Five minutes later (now 45 minutes past my appointment time), two girls came out on the balcony three stories up, just as I was starting my bike to leave. The girl on the balcony was the same one that came out earlier and briefly drove away - checking me out I guess (must have bad eyesight). She waved for me to come up so I did. It was an OK time but she put me in a bad mood. I will not repeat. Carmen let me into a very nice apartment and I was struck by how pretty her face was. She's certainly no spinner - kind of chunky actually - but she's not a BBW. She never apologized for the run around she gave me. She indicated where I should leave the donation then we went back to a bedroom, only to find no bed - just a mattress on the floor (real classy). She told me to get comfortable and she undressed, revealing some very nice boobs. I moved in for a kiss and she turned her cheek. We got down on the mattress, touched each other then she gave me a nice BBBJ. I asked her to allow me to please her so we 69ed - much to her delight. After some DATY and DATO she retrieved my condom and put it on me. She rode CG then MISH, where she really got into it and started kissing. I held out for a long time then had her go back to 69ing and a HJ. She sat up in the 69 for some DATO and really ground her cute ass in my face and I exploded, got dressed and left fairly quickly. Carmen was never rude per se, but she has a long way to go for better customer service. After the way I was treated I will not go back - YMMV but be forewarned and plan on a difficult time connecting.
positive This review is a bit overdue, but better late than never. I seem to be procrastinating a lot recently. I saw Orange around mid-December. She greeted me with lots of dfk's despise it our first time meeting and was wearing quite a revealing top which was really easy to take off, and with just panties on the bottom. Very accurate picts, and she's very hot and playful in person. The apartment itself was easy to get to as well. I highly suggest anyone to visit her at least once, as she tries very very hard to please you. VIPs read on... We first started off with lots of DFK's even before the donation was given off. Placed the donation down then started to get comfortable while she went out with it. When she came back, we continued DFKing, she's really open to DFK, might be YMMV though? But in my session, there was lots of DFK's, probably the most amount of DFK's I've had in a single session so far. Went to get a standup shower which wasn't really anything special except the preview BBBJ which was awesome! I'd loved to have stayed there and just took my first pop but well, I weighed things over and asked her to just go to the room as I couldn't wait any longer. When we got to the room, there was a massage which was body to body. Nothing special to write home about to be honest, then she allowed me to straightup DATY her. She O'd once and allowed me to do FIV, after a minute or so, I asked for the cover and went straight to doing it MISH. Boy, was she tight, and flexible as hell. Her legs were right beside her face the whole time, then we switched positions to CG and finally finished it doggy where I popped my first. She wouldn't even let me get out until like 2 mins after. She then started cleaning me up and we talked a bit while recovering. She had decent english so it was fine. For the second pop, although it was cutting it a bit close to the 1 hour mark, we made it. She didn't even look at the time once and it was totally not rushed. I asked for a BBBJ on second pop and she gladly complied. She even did DT and BLS. After the second pop came the shower and off I was. They also let me see another girl named Candy who was really hot, might be paying a visit to her soon.
positive Vicky seems to enjoy herself. Her English, though nowhere near fluent, is better than most of the k-girls, and she doesn't have a heavy accent, so is fairly easy to understand. She welcomed me from behind the door with a light kiss, wearing a sort of cotton bra and a tiny cheerleader-type skirt with nothing underneath. She was all smiles, friendly, and complimentary. I recommend. Once in the bedroom, which was happily quite warm (welcome since it was chilly outside), her tongue was quickly down my throat. We DFKed for a couple of minutes, she helped my undress, asked for the donation (in my excitement I had forgot to give it to her, and left me standing there nude while she exited, presumable to count it. When she returned, I started undressing her, which finished for me, took me by the cock into the bathroom for the mouth rinse and shower. After a quick wash, I put one foot up on the side of the tub, and she took the hint with some vigorous rimming, but mostly on the surface, not penetration that I could sense. This was while she reached around for some handjob action. Then I turned around for BBBJ, on which she commented "delicious." Back in the bedroom, after a bit more DFK and nipple play, she was quickly down for more BBBJ, rimming, and BLS, then back to BBBJ. I managed to push her head down for some DT, which was pretty good, but only momentary. Either she couldn't or didn't want to stay all the way down. I tried to slow her down to some more gentle tongue action as I was getting close to cumming, because I was getting too sensitive, but couldn't make her understand and she finished me off with more vigorous action than I wanted. After that, I kissed my way down to her nipples and pussy, with one FIV, and she was pretty quick with what seemed like a genuine O, with clamping my head and a lot of jerking and shuddering from her. Then a decent massage until it was time for the farewell shower. Her enthusiasm seemed genuine and unforced, though being a guy who doesn't shave his pubes, balls, or ass area, it's hard to believe that she enjoys all the tongue action as much as she seemed to. Nonetheless, she delivered in a friendly and energetic way. She says she plans to stay for a good long while.
positive Something about her look kept drawing me to her ad. Price was good so I decided to take a shot. Everything was through text which i prefer. I was a bit nervous because the area is known for a few busts but the two/three star hitel she was at seemed ok. One more text for the room number and I was at her door. She answers in bra and panties and wow she is a short one, which i really like. Little heavier then the pics show but i found her cute and a fun time. Will repeat. After a hug and a bit if small talk she asks me to get comfortable and then take her bra off for her. Her tits are a bit small and pierced, off came the panties and she laid back on the bed and spread her legs showing off a wet, tight shaved pussy. Went in for a lick or two before moving to a 69 position. Pussy was nice and clean and her BBBJ was very good. After a bit we moved to the main course and let me say she is small and tight. Went miss and doggy before i asked to finish in her mouth. Some more BBBJ before she took me deep in her throat and i shot right down her throat. Fun time with a cute girl, I will repeat.
positive Couldn't resist the photos and despite some mixed reviews, I took the plunge. Visually, she is all you'd hope for, obviously not oiled up and quite as toned as the photos, but you'd expect that. Not everyone steps off the modeling shoot to meet you. As for the rest, VIPs read on, but we didn't quite click so I don't think I'll repeat... As others mentioned the language barrier is present, but not too much of a problem. It does add to a little of the distance I felt, but I think some of it is from her demeanor and attitude as well. She seems like a sweet girl, and the body is rocking, but she just didn't seem that into it. There wasn't any of the GFE feel, and I'm not an aggressive hobbyist, so I didn't push kissing or DATY, and just let her give me a CBJ for a few minutes. After a solid effort she climbed on reverse cowgirl and sounded like she enjoyed it, which actually surprised me. She is a hot little thing, so I popped pretty quickly and then we both cleaned up. She didn't seem to indicate seconds were available, and I wasn't really feeling it in my mood or hers, so I tried out my high school Spanish and we talked a little and then I headed out. Maybe your luck will be better with connecting with her, and her body makes it worth the attempt...
positive Had a great session with Koa, This girl is cute and loves to please. VIP'S read on Nice hotel up to the room meet this cute little spinner in a sexy dress, big hug and kiss and off to the shower. Came out she was laying on the bed ready for me. We start some LFK for about 10 minuets which was really nice, She then tells me roll over and starts licking me ears and works her way down to give me the best rim job ever! She really gets into it sucking kissing and licking. After about 10 minuets i flip over and she starts a great BBBJ her looking up at you with that cute face it a great sight. She then pushes my legs up and starts rimming again this girl just loves to please, she then put both my balls in her mouth pushed my legs down and sucked them for another 10 minutes. I was about to loose it and had her stop but could not help myself, I tightened up enough to keep my cum from coming out but basically shot my load. Koa keep at it sucking my nipples and going back to bbbj, I think she got upset when i was having trouble getting it up again she sucked licked and jerked me non stop. She speaks no English and was using her i phone translator to ask what was wrong. She would not give up until i came and she spent the next 20 minutes sucking and jerking and i finally popped. She ran to the bathroom and brushed her teeteh and came back and snuggled with me for a while before it was time to go She is a great girl and will see her again and again
positive Ashley usually works from her home, but house guests put her in an above average Oceanside hotel for Christmas season. She had a massage table set up and candles providing the light. A very nice atmosphere. Her personality equals the atmosphere just described -- one of the most pleasant I have encountered. She is welcoming above just being friendly. The massage was terrific and then she asked me to massage her for awhile. I highly recommend her. We had a fun chat and some cuddling as she invited me into her glowing den. And her personality glowed with it. Soon she asked me to mount the table and the relaxation began at the legs. As she approached my crotch, I lifted my butt a little and she soon was being warm and gentle on the boys. I then lifted a little more and she soothed the johnson. She uses a lot of oil, which I like, especial on the Mr. Christmas Tree now pointing straight down and soothed so gently, especial on its top, pointed ornament. At a couple of points it was suddenly warmed as a gentle sucking motion took place. After an eternity of this, she quickened the pace and I was soon worried if EMTs might be arriving because of all the moaning. She then offered herself as a target of massage. I gave that beautiful body lots of gentle care before proceeding to the more delicate parts. She then sighed as I sucked her nipples and continued to let me know how good this felt. So I oiled up my right hand and while mouthing a nipple and massaged my way down to her nude pussy. But I went to the outside of it next to legs first and then with one hand next to each leg in the crotch started putting pressure on the hairless opening. Her breath quickened and deepened and I put more pressure and approached the opening several times without entering. With her moaning a little, I then found the button and let her rip a good one. As she recovered she said "you sure made me horny". I think she might have had the better of it and that, next time, I should charge her. :-) If any females read this and are interested in barter....
positive I saw a posting and contacted her with some screening info. She checked things out and we set something up for a few days out. The initial plans got blown and we had to reschedule. She is very accommodating and we re-scheduled for a few days later. I got an email with location information the night before and texted when I got close. She is a hot, petite, insatiable spinner that will put you through your paces. Very nice time with an awesome woman. Went in and exchanged pleasantries. I went to freshen up and upon returning we headed off to her room. We kissed for a few minutes and then had to dispose with the clothes. The making out was a hot as it was with your high school girlfriend and her body is probably hotter than your high school girlfriend's was. After a prolonged make out session she moved to show me her oral skills. She is not afraid and knows exactly what she is doing. I let her go on for a while until I had to have my turn. She has a neat little hair cut down there...altogether an inspiring site. I spent as much time as she would let me "displaying" and getting her off. She rewards you handsomely for your efforts... Finally slipped on a cover and dove in. We started in mish, move on to a little doggie, scissored, lazy dog and back to mish. She will give you better than she gets. She is a dynamo. Eventually it was time for another oral display for each of us...I just loved tongue lashing her... We suited back up for another trip through several positions before finishing each other off. A very hot time...well worth spending an afternoon, or ten, with....
positive Was stood up by another provider and scheduled with Bella at the last minute. Don't regret it one bit. She has skills! Drove about 30 min to her incall and was greeted in a sexy club-dress exactly as I had asked. Wonderful 90 min - I'll repeat every time I am in the area. Bella is a very good-looking MILF. Her face and hairdo are exactly as I like. Her body structure is not the look I dig - the tits are a little too huge for my liking, but hey, for those of you who love big tits on a petite size, she's perfect! I'd requested for a role-play and Bella obliged. We started off by discussing the "rules" of engagement - suffice to say, included everything. Bella has the most amazing BBBJ technique - she really worshipped my cock. After about 20 min of a super-slow and exciting BJ, I couldn't take it any more and just had to get into her ass. Lubed up and in I went. She's nice and tight - not the tightest ass I've had, but tight enough. We rocked for some time where she allowed me to pound away hard without any restrictions. 1st round - done. After some small talk, I was ready for the next round. Similar lines - long and exciting BJ, followed by anal in various positions - this time we went through a variety - mish, standing doggie in front of the mirror, doggie on bed and finished in lazy dog. Time well spent. Guys, she is way under-priced and I told her so. Didn't seem fair so I tipped her enough to bring up to the level I would normally pay for a provider of similar calibre and services.
negative I saw Julianna on TER. I don't think she advertises anywhere, but she does have a web site with accurate pictures. Her reviews were incredible, so I thought I would give her a try. It was very easy to set up a time via e-mail, and I couldn't wait to meet her. I was met at the door by an adorable, very petite girl, with gigantic natural breasts. VIP only can get the details, but I would say this is a very special woman that I will see again. One of the best sessions I have ever had. After a kiss at the door, she offered me a glass of excellent red wine which I accepted. She gave me an incredibly DFK is welcome, which had me fully erect even before I could get out of my clothes. I was wondering if her breast could be real, since she is so petite, but once her teddy came off, the natural tits were there in all their glory. Big nipples were sticking out just begging to be sucked, so I delighted in sampling her tits. She grabbed her own breasts and demanded that I suck on them, squeezing them as I sucked on her nipples. Next, she said let me help you off with your clothes. My huge erection was evident, and she put some flavored lotion on my cock, and started deep throating me as I still stood there. I almost lost it at the first touch of her mouth, and I had to ask her to slow down to let me enjoy her mouth. Lots of great mouth action, not even needing her hands much, and she looked deep into my eyes as she was blowing me. I wanted to fuck her pussy before I came, so she climbed on top of me and buried my cock deep in her tight pussy. While she was riding me, she leaned down and asked me to suck on her breasts again, and she seemed to be getting close to climax. I either had to ask her to slow down, or let myself cum--she was way to hot to hold off. I came explosively in her, and I think she came too. I needed a few minuted to recover, so we talked. She is very smart, very sexy. This is just about the best provider you can imagine--hot, smart, and very warm. Round two didn't take long. This time I wasn't in danger of cuming right away, so I let her blow me for a while, enjoying her eyes on mine as she sucked my cock. She has beautiful, long black hair, and I took it in my hands and guided her head up and down on the shaft. As she was blowing me, I stuck two finger deep inside her pussy, and I could feel the juices running down her legs as she got wetter and wetter. This girl really loves sex? I had to sample that pussy again, so I turned her around, and rammed it into her. She talks dirty while I was fucking her, which also gets me totally turned on. More services are available, hence the 10 for performance, but she takes that on a case by case basis. Needless to say, I came again, falling on top of her as I exploded. I thought I was spent. There was still more time left, so I asked her for a massage. She has great strong hands, but even while doing the massage, she couldn't resist tempting me with another round. I don't usually go even two, so three cups would have been a stretch for me, but I felt myself getting erect again. I thought about diving into the amazing pussy again, but put it off. She cleaned me up, and sent me on my way, but as I was leaving, I could feel I still had an erection! Thank you, Juliana. You are truly amazing!
positive Called up and then texted reference to the provider on the phone, then made an a[[ointment and was directed to the midtown west apartment. An older woman greets you and it is a small apartment with several rooms/kitchen. She introduced me to Orange who matches the pictures and is attractive for her type. After exchanging the money she leads me to the room upstairs. Her attitude the whole time was very excellent and friendly and accommodating. Her english is not so good. She is energetic and definitely worth the money. She offered a drink. Hot girl esp if you like asians. A little round/small for my taste but matches the picture. She is very friendly. Nice body. Great bbbj. She even dt a little and I was able to grab her head and push her mouth all the way down. Also put her head off the edge of the bed and did the same. She didn't seem to like it much but let me do it. She is a very energetic sucker. Maybe a little too energetic. Pretty much willing to do anything, although she seemed kind of surprised when I cim & a little bit on her face and tits. Spits, relaxes, and repeats after wiping with a hot rag. Any position is basically on the menu afterwards. She has a sweet little pussy. She also wants to kiss and asked me to daty which I didn't want. After a while CIM a second time and this time she was ready for it. Showered, chatted, and left happy enough
positive Back and forth emails for few weeks since she is outcall only, which is usually not ideal but decided to go for it. And I am glad I did. Her pics are accurate and although no face pics she is very cute and sexy. Will see her again soon. VIP read on.......... Once you are verified she will call or text, which she did keep me informed the morning of the appointment. I went down and met her at the side door due to all the activity in the lobby. Very friendly and cool young lady, talked all the way upstairs and continued for a few minutes in the room to break the ice. Foreplay started slow and easy and escalated from there. Pretty good kisser FK to LFK. Slowly started losing the garments until all of hers were gone and most of mine. Went down below for DATY, very fresh and clean so I dined for a while which I think she really enjoyed. Laid back and she gave a very good BBBJ, slow and sensual just like I like. Couldn't wait anymore so covered up and started in Mish to Doggy then back to standing mish at the side of the bed. Couldn't hold it any longer and removed the cover and dropped it on her stomach. We then showered together and chatted for a while until she left. Very sweet girl and never checked the time as she was there almost 1.5 hours. Be nice to her and treat her right. will be seeing her again very soon.
positive Saw her ad on the usual website and, since she had a few nice reviews, I gave her a call and set it up. We met at one of the usual hotels in Springfield, albeit on of the better ones. Usual two (or perhaps three) text system. The hallway was filed with hotel staff, so I text from down the hall and asked her to crack open the door, which she did and I stepped in. She looks really great and was a lot of fun to be with. Although she smokes, I couldn't smell anything. After the donation, I got undressed first and she immediately followed. Although I will likely will repeat, the non-GFE aspects are significant, as discussed below. After some friendly introductions, we got naked and I started to touch her and play with her while we were both standing. We discussed the rules, which are significant. Not only does she adhere to the usual rules of no kissing and everything covered, but she also doesn't like sucking or kissing on her breasts. She will, however, permit sucking and kissing around and along the sides of her breasts. The no kissing on the lips or the breasts left me a little awkward for things to do, but I managed. She also engaged in a lot of touching of me and fairly quickly we went to the cover and she started a very nice CBJ. After a while of this, I got her on her back with me standing and entered her from that position. I spent a while in this position before moving her to doggie. A well placed mirror helped make this position a lot of fun. While in doggie, we discussed other options. She does anal for an extra 100, but I did not upgrade since I was happy with where I was at the moment. She said she also does a lot of S&M with her as the dom. All very interesting, but not what I was there for. We then switched to her on top and tried switching with her both forward and reverse. After a while, I decided to finish this way and came in the bag. I had a reasonable amount of time left and so I asked for a massage. She is very good at massages and demonstrated during the message why she is probably a very good dom. I eventually cleaned up in the bathroom, got dressed and returned to work. Becky said she returns to the area frequently and I will definitely consider her for the future.
positive Phx delivers again! They never fall short. Set up an appt to meet the new Jenesis Jade. Had her come to me and she was on time and a knock out! Amazing little blonde with sexy eyes. She came in we hugged and kissed, i let her climb the stairs first so I could watch that sexy little A and then after a quick tour she dropped her coat, freshened up and out came some sexy lingerie with thigh highs and high heels. Straight out of the movies!! Non-vip's I'm sure you did your homework and your ready to make a fun decision so have at it. Can't go wrong with the Phx team! 1st things FIRST. Laid back and watched her crawl up on the bed all sexy and wrestle the hog. BBBJ in full effect, spit and chocking all over the place. I let her work me for a bit then I moved her into position for a little 69. Had to work for it but the O was awesome. She's super sensitive afterwards. Took about minute to get her sensitivity down then we hit the positions. Cowgirl, reverse, misc, spoon with some DFK and doggie she loved!! I had to work hard not to blow the load cause she is so damn hot! She jumped on backwards for a little visual reverse cowgirl and I just couldn't take it so I threw in the towel and ended the game with a big finish. She didn't stop though, she kept working till she got her 2nd O and that was super hot! We covered every position and I think I'd like to sched a return visit with this beauty and a friend for the ultimate fantasy.
negative I love blondes, and I love Taylor. She's young, blonde, thin, and naturally shapely. She's also way too much fun for the faint of heart. Buckle up and enjoy that ride. Will repeat. She's got a couple girls she likes to work with in town. I booked a fair amount of time. She arrived at my room wearing jeans and a t-shirt. I told her to wear as casual of clothes as she could, so she showed up in a good outfit for that. She was really nice about it. She kinda looked like a hot tourist chick, despite being a total local. She was also really, really friendly and fun, which is something that I was looking for out of a girl. After a short conversation and a few laughs, we were able to get started. Started with some French kissing and very familiar exploration of each other's bodies. She has very soft lips and is passionate about using them. We lost the clothes and I did some serious DATY. She's either an oscar-worthy actress or I'm the best in the world at DATY, because she had multiple convincing orgasms. Best thing ever. Sexy moaning. She returned the favor with some BBBJTCIM action. She hungrily swallowed my cum and kept going to keep me up and hard. After recuperating I put on a condom and entered her. I went through missionary and then doggy style. She was very much into it - I like to think that we had great physical chemistry together. She has a great body that's built for sex. I'm kind of a foot guy, so I was kissing her feet a bit and she didn't seem to mind it one bit. I think we were both just really into it. Plus I'm a pretty respectful guy so she was probably put more at ease because of that. On top of all that... she's pretty exceptional at what she does. I only see top tier girls and this one is no exception. I finished a second time after a VERY long session and we chatted for a while. We split a bottle of champagne and she gave me one more blowjob. She kissed me on the way out and I was a happy man. That last blowjob really sold me. I will repeat VERY often.
negative I stumbled across Ivy's profile and boy am I ever glad I did! I had plans that brought me to NY early in the week. I noticed that Ivy generally isn't available early in the week but decided to reach out on the off chance something would work out. I was in luck, her schedule happened to be open. Screening was easy using a 3rd party site and we had a date set. Ivy's communication up to our date was smart and funny, I had really high hopes for our eventual meeting and Ivy did not disappoint. When we finally met our personalities seemed to mesh well. I would absolutely see Ivy again if I had the chance. Ivy walked in and I was stunned at her beauty. The pictures on her site are accurate, and she is even more attractive in person. We greeted with a gentle kiss as I welcomed her in. I had picked up a bottle of wine to share and she appreciated my selection. I made a humorous/sarcastic comment about my ability to read and Ivy returned the barb quickly, it was clear we were going to get along well. We spent some time getting to know each other. Ivy is very open and honest she really has an amazing personality. After some wine and conversation we began kissing, Ivy is a very good kisser. We helped each other out of our clothing and I was dying to get a taste of Ivy. I made my way down and began gently teasing her. Ivy was very responsive and her reactions made my desire for her grow. Ivy seems to have an endless capacity for pleasure. I could have stayed they the entire time, and I believe Ivy may have let me. I couldn't wait any longer, Ivy swung around and with expert skill began to return the favor. Ivy was amazing, bringing me close to the edge a number of times. Ivy continued to make eye contact and really let me know she was enjoying the session as much as I was. We were both ready to continue, Ivy grabbed a cover and slipped it on. She sat on me letting me slowly feel her warmth and tightness. Ivy felt incredible, she did an excellent job at controlling the pace for my maximum enjoyment. I don't often last long when the woman is on top, but Ivy did a great job and sensing me and adjusting to make it last. It was so good I didn't even want to try other positions. Finally I couldn't hold back any longer and had an intense finish in the bag. We cleaned up and spent some time recovering and talking some more. As I said earlier Ivy was very easy to talk to, she has a great personality. The session seemed to fly by and I was ready for a second round. Ivy did an expert job trying to get me over the finish line the second time, but the first round was so intense and amazing it just wasn't in the cards. I had a truly wonderful time with Ivy one I hope to be able to repeat.
positive I had wanted to meet Piper for awhile but our schedules never lined up. I was able to finally set something up with her on a Sunday morning. She works with a great scheduler and has a very nice incall that I have seen another great provider at. I rang the buzzer to be let in - bounded up the stairs - knocked on the door and was greeted by the pretty blonde in the picture with a hug and a lfk. Great start and it would only get better! As I was getting comfortable she carried on a great conversation that allowed me to relax and to get to know her better. After I was comfortable I headed to the massage table where the conversation continued and she started with a medium pressure massage on my back. She worked all areas - shoulders, arms, butt, and legs. After a good 20 minutes she climbed on the table and started rubbing her body on mine and this signaled a turn to the sensual part of the massage. As she slid her body on mine she would nibble my ear and kiss my neck. As she slid down she would reach under the table to reach my now rock hard cock. Finally as she slid up again and we tried to kiss she suggested we head to the bed so that we could have better access to each other. I readily agreed and once on the bed the LFK quickly turned to DFK and I worked my way down to her tits and sucked them to her delight and my pleasure. I made it to her pussy and spent a great deal of time pleasuring her. I loved her encouragement and she got very wet. I worked my way back up for more DFK and then used my fingers in her pussy as she worked her clit. She continued with the dirty talk and encouragement as she reached a great O. She kissed me deeply and slowly worked her way down - teasing me by rubbing her tits on my cock and finally taking my member in her mouth - smiling at me - and looked me in the eyes as she sucked my cock to a great orgasm. As I came she smiled and let some of my cum dribble out the side of her mouth. We both cleaned up and spent the rest of the time intertwined and carried on an easy and comfortable conversation. As I walked to the door she gave me one more hug and kiss and I was on my way a happy man with thoughts of returning soon.
positive Bananasplit is a good agency. Easy to set up. Attractive girls. Honey is one of the prettiest girl i've seen. she almost looks like an innocent teenager. A bit shy, but has very nice attitude and willing to please. Highly recommend Honey and the agency. Called Bill from the agency to set up a meeting with Honey. He gave me an address to the hotel. and had to wait about 10 min until I got the hotel room. Hotel is not the best but clean. Honey was waiting in a very casual clothes. She is pretty in the picture and prettier in real life. We deep kiss for awhile and tell her to suck on my dick. She gives BBBJ. She tries and it was good, but I've had better. Most of the time I am leading. I actually like when girls do all the work. but she is a little shy. Great tight toned body. Nice shaved very pretty pink pussy. Nice firm breast with tasty nipples. I regret only getting HH with her. Shouldve done 1 hour. I wanted to fuck her longer, but had to finish quick since someone called the phone and told her the time is up. I would repeat just for her looks. But I felt a little pressured to do a lot of work during sex whereas I actually like it when the girl takes charge and does all the work. It felt like i was fucking my GF and I was trying to pleasure her.
negative Words can't do justice to my experience with Ariana Marie. My hour with her was probably the best hour I've ever spent with a woman. She is perfect looking in every way and knows how to use her body. I was hard the moment Ariana walked into the room, and I didn't know my dick could get as hard as it was by the time she was undressing. We went pretty much straight to head after a little bit of kissing. Great eye contact, and oh my god was the feeling of her cool skin on my thighs a hell of a feeling as she worked me. After a bit we went for a condom and the fucking was insane. Doggy style was my favorite, as we worked our way to lying down. Her pussy was so tight and thrusting into her over and over made me thought I'd died and gone to heaven. We finished with an awesome shower, and seeing her body wet in the light made me wish I was a painter.
positive I ran into a few snags with my appointment. Once I got past that, I met a beautiful pale fit Latina in white lingerie who may have been of Asian descent but it's not obvious. It was a nice time but less memorable than sessions with other providers from this agency. I may repeat. Non-vips, if you like the pics of her, go for it, YMMV. VIPS... read on for more details. I setup an appointment immediately after learning she was coming into town. The day of the appointment, it was cancelled. She didn't travel. Sigh!!! However, I was able to reschedule for the last day she was in town. It was not my ideal choice for a first meet but I felt it was better then missing her. I arrived on time and waited 20 mins for the room #. Eventually I went up, door left open, entered and said hello. As advertised, she does not speak much English. It made things a bit challenging. She said I was late. I explained that was not the case and that I had waited. She made it seem like she was waiting for me. That sucked. Anyway, I just put it behind me. She is a petite, fit Latina beauty with lovely long dark hair. She did not appear Asian and was quite pale. Nevertheless, she is gorgeous, sexy and bubbly. She was wearing a long gown with her breasts out, panties and high heels. I washed my hands so that we could start the party. I received a quick peck on the lips and she sat me down on the bed. She turned on some music and began to dance then proceeded to give me a lap dance. It was nice and gave me a chance to feel all over her body. I took off her clothes, she removed mine and she gave a BBBJ. She sat on the bed and I kissed her neck and breasts. I got comfortable on the bed, she put on a cover and rode me, CG, ACG, and RCG. Switching to doggie, I banged away until she could take it no longer and began fanning her pussy. We finished the session conversing in mostly my broken attempt at Spanish. This is where I feel we connected the most as I learned more about her personality, likes, dislikes, and personal interests. It was a nice session In spite of the events, I believe I'd still consider setting up a new appointment.
positive I called her and within 15 minutes I was outside the hotel and after calling again she vast in a robe and panties non vies it was good and if your looking for a great time she is the one for you. So after I have her the donation we startedto get going I was only there for a bj but man was it great she let me stick my fingers in her pussy and she is really great at what she does and is worth every dime in my opinion she is also cool and hot so do not pass her up
positive Saw her ads on Eros and decided to call her up. Some back and forth setting things up over text and phone with some verification but once verified, she was more friendly and actually is a sweet girl who was fun to hang out with. She is the girl in the pics and it was worth the time. VIPs read on. I called her and set up our meeting for incall at her room in LA. There was a little back and forth over calls and texts to get everything squared away but after verification, she was much more friendly. Went to her incall and then called, got the floor, then room number. It was the girl in the pics who opened the door. The room was clean and comfortable. She was bubbly and friendly and after some chit chat, she asked to give me a massage. The massage was average but afterwards, she asked to get down to business. She started with some covered BJ and HJ, but it was pretty good and got me to attention. I then got her revved up by dining at the Y. Her body was nice, athletic and curvy with ample man mades. When we moved on, she seemed to get into it and had a playful moan and giggle that was actually cute in a way. But don't let that fool you, still pounded it doggy. She was wet and into it, we moved from missionary to standing doggy to RCG to CG to lying down doggy until I popped. We chit chatted some more until she started making a move again. Although I did not pop again, it felt great. Did not feel rushed at all. Sweet girl, great time, would repeat.
positive Had seen Juicy Redz had just posted and I wanted to see her. One call and two texts and I was at her door. She had open the door and give me a nice big hug, she was looking just like her pictures in the post, very sexy mature lady. What you see in her pictures are what you get. Her services is very pleasing and she knows how to work it because she worked it on me. I will repeat!!! VIP read the kinky details. I had call Ms Redz once I got outside the location she give me and she had told me come across the street. After entering her home she give me a nice big hug and she felt so soft and good. She has two big dogs she had told them to sit down and they did. She took me down stair to her basement which was set up like a love cave a nice king size bed full on pillows and 60 inch TV. and all kinds of oils and lotion, I'm talking a lot. I guess everything a babe can need... She had on this sexy bodysuit that showed off all her assets and curves and that big booty. Just looking at her walking was making me grow down there getting me so hard. We took care of the donation and we started taking our clothes off. I led down on the king size bed and she got between my legs and started a wet and sloppy bbbj... She told me to grab the top of her head and fuck her mouth good, and so I did just that, putting her mouth to work. That lasted about 10 minutes and I asked her can I tastes you pussy? She smiled and said Yes!!! She laid down on her back and I got between her long legs, Oh did I mention she is almost 6feet tall. I loved lifting those legs in the air and drove my face into her sweet berry, she had her clit pierced as I was eating her out I was playing with her big tits and they also are pierce. After that she put on a rubber and I begun to bang her doggie. I was riding her like she was a bronco and I was a cowboy, I would grab her hips and then her big butt cheeks, after that I told her to lay down so I can hit it mish. That lasted ten minutes then she sit down on me and started riding me cowgirl, she was pumping and grinding and fucking so good that she is the best provider I had do cowgirl. She was looking like a porn star. She was working my dick cowgirl Up-down-around and around grinding, she was working those hips and big ass. I told her I was almost there and I wanted to hit it doggie and nut all over her ass, and that is how it ended. I took the cover of and nutted all over that beautiful ass. She grabbed some wet wipes and I enjoyed cleaning off the mess I made on her. I think I lost about 5 pounds fucking Ms Juicy Redz. I got out of the bed walking a little funny, but she just laid there for a few minute. I will repeat ASAP
positive First, this is much better than the competition. No need to TOFTT at this place. No need to guess, try and be disappointed - it's a get what you expect place and no photo-shop. Easy set-up - quick background check (TER helps) and then quick texting to an address. I originally made plans for the West Side - first choice (Elsa) then became unavailable (personal issues)- so they switched me to the East side pretty fast to Orange. They are very accommodating. First, she is very cute - young looking and acts young as well. She is short, playful and cute. She is a great kisser. Orange answered the door wearing a sexy schoolgirl plaid skirt and white shirt outfit - took my shoes and my coat off - big tight hug, DFK, and up the stairs to a very clean and nice room - big bed. We continued the DFK for a while and thru undressing me pretty quick- non stop DFK until I was buck naked and then she dropped to her knees for a BBBJ. An amazing BBBJ - deep to the base. Pays attention to the balls with eyes up at you. She moved me to the bed where I sat down and she continued blowing me. Then she asked if I wanted something to drink (wine, beer, scotch, etc..). I opted for the wine - we drank together. We left for a shower together. It's a standing up shower with rotating mood lights - more BBBJ in the shower, and then back to the room. In the room it was back to DFK, and a back massage. Body to body. Massage was a light touch - but I'm not really there for that anyway, so who cares. She did some significant rimming - pretty damn exciting with the tongue working its way in. She flipped me over and we 69'd for a bit - she seems into being eaten - moaning and getting quite wet, all while keeping good suction on me. After a while I had to fuck her. She put on a cover. While I think you could go bare back, she seemed ready to at first trying to pull me in, I just wouldn't - not my thing. Missionary with her making dirty talk in my ear - very hot - did not last long and I came in the bag. While I have read this place is multiple pops - I was tired and did not try - my session had been 45 min already and I did not have it in me to try again, so we just hung out the last 15 min talking and having a hot towel rub down. She told me she likes 2 girl sessions - so consider that when you select her Paid at the end of the session - She's a definite repeat. FYI - I saw Rainbow during mys session - she is taller, darker hair, and more demure.
positive Felt like a king, literally. She was great, and is the person on the website pictures. Highly recommended, and will repeat. Notes: verification required. Two text system. Arrived and taken in immediately, offered a drink. Undressed by provider, then DFK and incredible/gentle DT BBBJ, then sensual shower with full body soapy massage and more BBBJ/DT in shower. Taken back to room. B2B massage very skilled and gave me goosebumps, then DATO on me, which was a surprisingly amazing feeling. DATY fresh and responsive. BBBJ gentle, but more rapid...caused me to come close to explosion several times, and then she would stop exactly at the right moment to see how long I would last. Then 69 with FIV. Put cover on, then experienced extremely tight but warm and slippery pussy in multiple positions. Exploded in bag, and she let me stay inside her until every possible drop came out. Then we talked, and I taught her some english words. Great time, never felt so well taken care of before--she even helped tie my shoes for me when I was leaving! My only complaint was that Orange kept pushing a 2 provider session, which I wasn't interested in for financial reasons.
positive Had tried to make an appt with Noa before, but that's when she was limited to just P411. She was open to new clients without P411 with references. Second attempt when I was in the area and was cleared to go. Was concerned because her pics are nice but don't show her face. Been burned by providers with fake pics. She's the real deal cute Asian girl with spinner body. Non VIPs I would repeat. So after getting cleared made appt for next day with Noa. She does mostly day appts so had to ditch work for a little to see her. As I stated above was a little concerned about pics but dove in and was very happy with results. Standard text system, texted when I was there, texted back a few minutes later with room number. Up to her room in the door and met an attractive Japanese girl. I'm Asian and have high standards for Asian girls and she fit the bill for my taste. Chatted for a bit and then got comfortable. She undressed first which made me feel overdressed and I quickly undressed. Joined her on bed and she starts playing with my dick. Soon it's in her mouth and rock hard. At some point she had to take out her tongue ring because she said my dick was so thick didn't want to hurt me on accident (or maybe she has a small sexy Asian mouth). Anyhow, bbbj, DATY, 69, then mish. She was so sexy and tight busted quickly in mish. She cleaned me off and we chatted for a bit before she was back down on my dick. She gave it a good college try, but I couldn't get it up because I came so hard the first time. She didn't rush me out and I was there for more than my allotted time. She's definitely a hottie and I will repeat when I have the time and in the area.
positive Pulled up to a nice apartment in LA and greeted by a hot asian girl in a nightie. DFK and off to the bedroom... it had been a few weeks for me so i just go right down to it - i pretty much ripped off her nightie and worked my way down to her rack while groping her ass. FYI, I know cup sizes pretty well, she's a ~33C, which is ample for me and she lets out a sexy moan if you grab her ass and pull her towards you. I sat down and told her to go down on me. Now, I've had BJs in the past but what was great was the fact that she pretty much did whatever I told her to do like 'look at me', 'put your hands here', etc...shes very submissive which is awesome. i actually blew my load pretty quick just from that alone and figured she may kick me out after that but she let me stay although YMMV. i threw her on the bed, and started eating her out. her moans are fuckin great. when i was done going downtown she put the condom on and we were in business. she does this thing in with her legs in mish where she REALLY opens her legs and points her toes while doing that...fuuuck man. so hot. i even did shit i saw in porn once with this girl...like i said, shes very submissive and willing to try. she even let me stick my finger in her ass! i love cumming inside so i blew my load again and just laid there for a bit massaging each other before hitting the shower. all in all, it was a great fucking time and worth a repeat.
positive Katty's a cute girl with a nice natural spinner body. She provided excellent service and I will repeat. Katty's the first girl that I saw after the new year. I'm glad I did as I had a great time with this cute Korean girl. She doesn't speak much English, but she's fun and provides excellent service. In the bedroom, we immediately started DFK (she's a great DFKer), then I laid her on her back so I could feast on her beautiful pussy. She seemed to really enjoy it and she gets vocal. After she O'd, she moved down to give me an excellent BBBJ. Probably one of the better deep throat BBBJ's I've had in awhile. I could of popped, but I wanted to bang her instead. She put on the condom and she rode me in CG/ACG. Warning: She loves to bang hard in this position. I thought she was going to break my dick. After she O'd, we switched positions. In mish, we DFK quite a bit and with her moaning and tight pussy, I finished. She cleaned me up and tried to get me going again, but I was tired and couldn't pop again. She got me some water, we took another shower, and off I went. Would repeat.
positive After having a rough go at lining up a provider for a lunchtime visit, i called holly and she was available. I have seen her multiple times previously, but i had been "slumming" with other providers for a few months. She was available and very accommodating to the time i needed for a visit. I arrived at her incall location at a nicer long term stay hotel, and she had the door ready for me to come in. Once i entered and saw her, I wondered why in the world have i been wasting money on other providers. She was dressed in beautiful red lingerie and black stockings. She kissed me and said "its been awhile". We started off to the candle lit bedroom and the fun started.... VIP's read on, Non-VIP's she is worth every penny, and then some. One of the best providers in the area. Holly has a knack for making you feel right at home and special, almost like you are the only thing that matters to her at that point in time. We talked a bit about some of the other providers i have seen, etc...some chit chat, catching up. Then we started the fun. I am a fan of "taking orders" from my provider and Holly plays along excellently. She told me to take off her bra, which i did. Next up was her panties, which i slowly removed exposing her awesome ass, and i surprised her with a gentle nibble on one of her ass cheeks. She turned around ( i was on my knees) and i eagerly kissed and licked her very tasty puss. She told me next to undress, which i did in a hurry. She laid down on the bed and told me to make her cum, so i started eating her out and sucking her clit, grabbing her ass with both hands while she laid there. She told me she wanted fingers in her too, which i obliged. After a bit of this, she flipped me over and proceeded to give me an excellent bbbj. She has excellent technique with her bj style and the way she looks up at you while doing it, is almost enough to make you explode. We proceeded to put a cover on and she started out in CG. Holly has some very nice perky breasts so i had to suck on both of them while she rode me. We switched over to mish for a bit, then to doggie and i finally blew one in the cover. After a minute or so of me giving her a gentle massage to her legs, arms, breasts, etc and lots of dfk, i pulled both of her legs up in the air and started rubbing her soaking wet puss. This almost instantly got me hard again, and we were ready for round 2. She gave me some more bbbj, just because. then proceeded to put another cover on me. I couldn't resist playing with her ass, and tickling her little asshole while i was fucking her in CG. The second session was a lot more intense and we never switched positions from cg. I eventually finished inside her and we were spent. I have seen a lot of greensboro providers and she blows them all away with her attention, personality, technique, and style. She absolutly feels like a girlfriend/lover...every time i have seen her, and there has been no decrease in the quality of her service. She gets better and better every time i see her. There is never a rush, and she takes her time...This last session was for an hour, and we ended up going over by at least 15 minutes.
positive Vicky met me at the door in a white nighty and heels. She flashed me a big smile and gave me a hug and kiss and led me to the bedroom..... Once in the bedroom we began to undress, kissed some more and she dropped to her knees to give me a preview BBBJ. Off to the showers, where she scrubbed me from head to toe. More DFK and she dropped to her knees again with more BBBJ. Once we dried off it was back to the bedroom with more DFK, she is a fantastic kisser, and groping of each others bodies. I laid her on the bed and began to DATY and after about 10 minutes she said it was my turn. We traded spots and she began another BBBJ, I pulled her up for more kissing with some p to p, she then worked her way back down to JR kissing my nipples on the way down. A bit more BBBJ, we covered up, she climbed on top and rode me CG, turned around for reverse CG to completion. We laid there for a bit and she removed the filled hat and sucked the tip of JR to clean him up. Another shower with some more BBBJ, but a second shot was not in the cards. Vicky doesn't speak much English, but does appear to have a fun personality. I will be back!!
positive She is hot and very sexy gorgeous - a must see - vip read on - Noa is wonderful. When I got to the room she smiled. A pretty girl petite next door type. We started kissing and she was soooo into it. We took our close off and I sucked those cheerleader tits and played with her kitty. She then tells me to lay back and she gives me an awesome PSE style bbbj as I am swelling and the pre cum is flowing she looks at me and says " mmmm pre cum I love it" she started talking about how much she loves my cock shape and so it was time for the cover. Noa hops on and rides like a girl who loves it ... I mean you can't act this stuff - guys she loves cock! I unload in the condom. Right after that she pulls the condom off I assume she is going to go and get the towel but instead she starts sucking my Cock this time really hard and she is moaning and huntching my leg playing with her tiny sexy pussy and she Looks at me and says " I want you to come on my mouth now" WTF - I was so blown away ! I let her suck but I was tired and only booked the 1/2 hour so we cuddled and talked. Run my friends ! Ymmv She does not like rude or demanding - go with her flow and she will blow you away.
positive Decided to reach out and try to set up a meeting with Orange on a cold New York afternoon. Setup was easy through the agency with my references. Reached out in the morning and had a meeting that afternoon. Usual two call system to get address and get buzzed in. Met at the door by a beautiful Asian girl in the photos. If you want someone to take care of you, go see her. Read on... Got back to the room and quickly began DFK and some wandering hands until it was time for the shower. She stripped both myself and her and went to the shower. Standard shower experience for all those who have experienced it before. Some nice teasing, soaping, and thorough cleaning. A very nice preview BBBJ which I enjoyed. After this, back to the room for showtime. As we returned, we started more DFK then she went down for more BBBJ. I was enjoying it so much I let her continue with BLS, BBBJ and eventually finished round 1 with CIM. She went to spit out and returned to join me. She encouraged me to lay down where she gave me a nice massage. Nothing crazy but enjoyable nonetheless. Included in the massage was some rimming which was great. She really went to town and got me ready for round 2. After more BBBJ round 2 was a blur of MISH, K9, CG. We were both clearly enjoying ourselves as she was moaning and leaning in for DFK. After a little while I finished with another CIM. She walked me to the shower again and said goodbye. Would definitely repeat again and maybe try doubles next time. Enjoy!
positive This review is long overdue as I visited her last month, but did not have the time to submit a review. Just to be clear, I don't often do reviews if my experience happens to be similar to other reviewers, but in this case I felt the need to do so because she is super sweet and I hope her client list grows so she will be around for a while :) She's super cute and like the GND, and pretty new to the industry but with an eagerness to learn and please. Add a petite body with curves to that mix and you've got yourself a winner. Non-VIP's, I will definitely be returning again, go see her! Very easy set up as my colleague referred me to the agency. Made the appointment and arrived at a nice hotel. Door opens, and as usual the provider is hiding behind the door. I braced myself for the worst since I've been through enough bait and switches, and to my relief there stood a really cute girl with a shy look on her face. I was so happy I gave her a big hug as we walked over to the bed. We got into some conversation while standing near the bed, giving small kisses and letting my hands inspect her body. She asked if I wanted to shower but I had done so prior to arrival, so she started giving me an amazing bbbj. A intense rimming session followed right after, it was so good I actually flipped my legs up like a jiujitsu fighter would. After about 10 minutes of this, on came the cover and she went into cowgirl. I am unfamiliar with kama sutra positions, but a myriad of positions involving her on top ensued, then I entered her mish for a while. Finally I switched to doggy and then flat on top of her while she was on her stomach, until I finished in the bag. She waited patiently as I did a nine-roper (I hadn't ejaculated in 2 weeks or so due to an overwhelming amount of work). After this, she went to clean up and came right back. We lied next to each other and talked for a while, mostly her asking questions about what I liked about this service and what she could to do to be better. What a totally positive attitude! Her willingness to pleasure me was such a refreshing turn on, and even though I wanted to go again, I decided to instead just lie next to her and converse about many topics until my time was over. As I left I promised to give her a review, but I do plan to visit her again very soon and am excited to see how she's improved even more since my last visit!
positive Contacted her scheduler via email and was sent additional pics. Wow. I thought she looked really hot. Verification was a breeze and I set a morning appointment, arrived at the spot in uptown area and was greeted by a bubbly hot girl with white teeth. She was in a little robe and offered me water as we made our way to the massage room. As I started to get undressed we embraced for a hug and light kiss. Felt a connection. Laid down and it began. She was all over me immediate. Whispering and kissing my ear. Blowing in my ear. I told her I loved that and she sucked my earlobe and tongues my ear . After moving around the table and touching me everywhere as we exchanged fm all Talk, she got on the table with me. This girl knows how to use her naked body. I felt her pussy on my leg and then my ass as she straddled me. I eventually rolled over and she straddled as she took me in her hands and and looked me in the eye and she stroked me yo an explosive orgasm. Live her!!! Going back soon
positive Preslee is a slightly older attractive woman with good skills all around. Good in all aspects although not quite great. A good go-to local. Cute petite girl who I would recommend especially if like me looking for a regular nearby who sint located in Tysons Corner or even further away like DC. Got to an extended stay in Chantilly and she opened the door for me without knocking. She is a cute little thing. Very spiiner-ish to me. She had her hair pinned up, we exchanged a few pleasantries and she told me i was overdressed for our encounter. I stripped down to my boxers and then slowly removed her clothes. She enjoyed the long DFK and remarked that she bet I was good at using my tongue. (btw, she is correct) After some light fondling all over, she let me know that she loved a good hard cock in her mouth. Who am i to refuse. She is, by her own admission, a cock-sucking loving kind of woman. We start with some bbbj, which leads to me returning the favor with some DATY and a little DATO which she responded to quite nicely. Daty made her cum twice and by her 2nd O, she was literally begging for me to fuck her. Suited up, and she got on top for CG, where she came again and then rolled her over for some K-9 where i pumped away until almost ready to explode. Flipped Preslee over where she finished me off with her mouth and she jerked me over her tits. Talked for a little while and while unable to get off for a 2nd round, she rode my face to another O and returned the favor with another bbbj, but I wasnt going to pop. She put in a good 2nd effort, but it was not in the cards that day. Preslee is cute, a little older than normal for me, but fun to have sex with. She admits to having a young girlfriend who she is doing doubles with and admits to love eating pussy as much as she does cock. I'd definitely repeat just to see that
positive was looking for some fun and saw some nic pics that I have wondered about, finally took the plunge and had a wonderful time. I will repeat Piper is attractive has a nice body and a fun personality. I am not a big fan of the location as there is too much traffic, cars and people. I'm probably a little paranoid but I don't being in such a populated area because of the possibility of running into someone that knows me. Piper asked me to get comfortable and she did as well. the visual was nice. we started on the massage table for an above average massage. she teased a little and playfully kissed my neck and ears. she asked me to flip and if I wanted to move over to the bed. we walked over to the bed and started a dfk session that was hot. a little massage here, a little fiv there some passionate dfk followed by some bbbj action. I didn't want to pop to early so I asked if we could switch spots. we talked about a person she shares her space with and how incredible of a time I had with that person telling Piper it was the only time I have been with a squirter. Piper piped up that she squirts but it is pretty rare. well I had to see if I could experience that again. a lot of dfk, breast worship and multiple fiv led to an explosive release. Not sure I'm a fan of squirting but it is an interesting experience. she then took matters into her hands and mouth leading me to a strong release of my own. we headed to the shower to clean up as we were both soaked. I think next time I will ask her to start in the shower as it would be a lot of fun
positive Katty is a new girl in LA and she is a cutie. Nice petite spinner type with a pretty face. She provided excellent service and I will repeat. Walked in and she was wearing a nice black nighty. What stood out to me was her natural looking breasts. She did have a bit smaller of an ass then I wanted but I was still ok with it. Started out with LFK at the door and went to bedroom. Typical routine with shower and a BJ. Got out of the shower and I laid on my back. Bj without condom was nice she had some good techniques. I really enjoyed the moans she made as she was going to down on me and that made is so much better. Her pussy was tight even by kgirl standards. Rode me for a bit but not too long. I guess she was a bit tired but I was fine with it. I had more then enough pent up energy from the build up to give her a good thrusting. Got on top and started fucking her as fast and hard as I could. As I was building up my tempo I put my thumb near her mouth and she knew exactly what I wanted. Started Sucking my thumb harder as I put more thrust and power into my hips. Her reaction to my tempo was awesome. Another thing that stood out was her face as I was fucking her. She just had the sexiest shy asian girl thing going and I really enjoyed it. Felt like I was deflowering a virgin as ridiculous as that sounds. After What seemed like an eternity I finally came in the condom. Had a great time and I will forsure repeat.
positive I saw Noa had some reviews on TER that looked really nice so I decided to meet her. Good call on my part, she is a lovely young lady and very talented. Details to VIPs. So I get to her nice incall hotel. The door is propped open, and when I enter I find a very pretty girl in bed reading a book. Conversation flows very easily, she has a nice personality and is fun to talk with. She invites me to get comfortable and join her in bed. She has a sort of lounge outfit on with sexy bra and panties and a minimal cover-up. Kissing is very nice and DFK is on offer (she has a tongue stud). She's out of her outfit very quickly. Very petite and very nice body with smaller but lovely natural breasts. I pay attention to those cute breasts and rub the kitty, she is enjoying it. She returns the favor and then moves in for a BBBJ, first paying some nice attention to the boys. The BJ is excellent. I decide to turn the tables for some DATY. She seems to enjoy it a lot. I move up for a little more DFK and she asks if I am ready. Yes indeed! So on with the cover and dive in for mish. It was lovely and I finish that way. We both need a minute to recover, and then she gets a warm, wet towel for cleanup. Time to leave, but I will see her again. Noa has a rare combination of physical beauty, great personality, and wonderful boudoir talents.
positive Not a big advertiser but found her through p411 and her blogspot. A true hidden gem. Arrange mostly through email. Very accommodating and she worked with my schedule. She does ask for provider ref check, but that was thankfully easy. We set a date and time for her to come over. She was prompt and discrete. I was very pleasant to find a young, fit spinner type with a very hip Brooklyn flair. I was very happy. She is super nice and friendly. her vibe is that of a college student. As mentioned, she has a hip brooklyn look to her, and she pulls it off well. we got friendly, chatted a bit, and then moved to some kissing. DFK was on the menu. Then off to the bedroom. She has a tight fit spinner body. I was very happy to see that she perky small perky breasts to match -- can't stand a spinner with fake DD's. And, as advertised, she is natural. that means hair where it's supposed to be. She is fair and not a hairy type, so its basically only under the arms and on her pussy. Not short stubbly and trimmed-- rather, long soft locks. Anyway, she liked laying back and letting me worship that heavenly body. Her small perky nipples are very responsive. Kisses down her belly got her moaning. Then came the DATY. If you are a bush man, you would be in heaven. Her bushy locks were soft and smelled so nice. They part nicely to reveal a wet and tasty treat. This went on for a while as I was enjoying myself. She enjoyed it to and gave verbal confirmation often. As we were taking a short break, I realized I had yet to inspect the backside goods. i was very happy to find a perfectly round firm apple bottom. DATO came next and I could feel her pussy get wet as I enjoyed the DATO. Then we switched. CBJ followed. She is a tiny girl, so don't expect a big mouth. But her eagerness and her excellent manual skills ably assisted. On comes the cover, then she climbs on top for some cowgirl. Then we follow with doggie. What a great view. I'm getting way too close, and I opted to got o mission so that I could finish while doing some more DFK. . great time. She stayed a while longer. We chatted about all sorts of stuff. Then my friendly hot hipster schoolgirl spinner left.
positive The previous night I enjoyed an all night 8 hour date with a milf from another agency, which was ok. I was going to do a late checkout and by 9 am was ready to see a more youthful spinner type girl. I called one of my favorite agencies, Musas Tj. After making a few calls Victor was able to set me up a date with Kassandra at 10:30 am. Great job. Musas goes out of their way to accommodate their clients. Non-Vips you will have a good time with Kassandra for sure. Petite little girl in her 18's or 19's walks in sharp at the last minute appointment time. Here face is cute, but not necessarily the prettiest girl in Musas line up. She is very friendly though. After the hugs and lfk's she excuses herself for a quick shower. We start our dfk's. Kassandra is a great kisser with a lot of tongue in her dfk's. Her slurpy and passionate bbbj's get me hot and horny in no time. My turn- I move down to her clean shaven pussy. I tease her and lick her pussy all over. She moans as I lick her clit and insert two fingers in vagina. I finger fuck her and lick her clit at the same time and in a few minutes she has a juicy wet and loud orgasm. We engage in a variety of positions for the next 30 minutes. She is a delight to fuck as she really enjoys sex and O's many times. I bang her hard in Mish and I can hold no longer. Overall a sexy fun time. I will repeat her again.
positive Had always wanted to try a NURU. Lori is the real deal when it comes to doing the B2B Nuru Massage. She is very personable. Very fun to be with. I will certainly go back. Atmosphere was excellent once you got inside. External environment made me a bit nervous and I went during the day time. She was very easy to find. She is well educated and she was fun to talk with. Two story apartment in South St. Louis near the Casino. When I went inside she was dressed very seductively. She offered me something to drink introduced me to her little dog. Since this was our first time she wanted to make sure we got to know each other. She took me upstairs we talked about her past and about me. We got undressed and she has a big bed set up for a nuru session. She poured the Nuru gel on me and her and got to business. There was a lot of what they call stripper slide going on. When it came time to finish the deed it was a combination of stripper slide and hand job. I was as hard as ever. There was no oral or intercourse. But I didn't come for that. Although I was hoping. She had me so hot I would have probably screwed her without a condom and that wouldn't sit well with me in the morning.
positive Tatiana is an attractive girl. Body is average but nice. She's friendly and affectionate. She provides a superior service level for the fee. Overall, a solid, fun performance that was satisfying. Tatiana is one of 3 sisters that work in the East Baltimore area. I've seen both of her sisters (Star and Sasha) and let her know that in advance to provide a comfort level. I've had fun with both her sisters so i was hoping Tatiana would be also. She was. I got to her no-tell motel location in White Marsh. it's a typical dump but pretty clean. I had to wait about 20 minutes for her to arrive but considering that it was day time and the nature of the place I wasn't uncomfortable. Finally, got the call to go up and Tatiana looked as her photos depict. There's a strong resemblance between her and Star. We didn't waste any time getting naked and she was receptive to DFK and was equally responsive. I worked my way down her body. Her pussy was fresh and clean so I gave her a tongue lashing. She was into it and had a convulsive, push away O which she said she appreciated. When i got up she saw that I had a strong boner and surprisingly went right for it and did a sensual BBJ. Star also gives me a BBJ so i wonder if they consulted beforehand knowing that I give a good tip to them. I was ready to fuck and she was an enthusiastic, energetic fuck like her sisters. She was happy to go through mish, CG and doggy. She does not like her butt played with. She was happy to finish me with a sexy HJTC. Once I nutted she was up immediately and indicated I could clean up. A little small talk post-coitus but I definitely got the impression she was ready to get on her way. Like her sisters, Tatiana provides superior service for the fee. BTW, her and Star do doubles but do not interact (thankfully) if you have a thing for sisters.
positive Saw that she was in town and rushed to make an appointment. Standard two call with the agency. The door opened and I went in and saw a wonderfully good looking woman with a big smile and was ready to go. I had seen (and reviewed) Lindsey at a different agency in Nova and was delighted to see that she was back in town. She is a really nice person and very good provider, so I the following as a compliment, not an insult. She is a complete stereotype -- bleached blonde, big hair, big white teeth smile, gorgeous (but probably fake) tan, gorgeous (and definitely fake) breasts. I don't often go for that type, but I do with her - the combination of blonde hair, and skin, the pink pastel lingerie she wears is all just right. She carries it off well. This is just to say, if that is your type, you will love her. if you dont want that type, she is probably not for you. She is a good kisser and gives good head (hard to object to head skills of anyone that does BBBJCIM, though!). She is a little passive -- seems to want you to take the lead. We went through DFK, then taking her lingerie off, her leaning back and me climbing on. I went down on her breasts and then DATY, which felt very good. I asked about FIV and she said it was not her preference, so I just skipped it -- there was alot else to do. She gave me a good BBBJ. We then moved into Russian -- which works well on her -- and then into a slide, which felt great. I suited up and we went into mish. At that point, everything stopped. Condoms can have that effect on me. So we removed it and went back to BBBJ and finished with CIM. No complaints, a wonderful session. Good to see her again.
positive New York City has many secrets and this agency is one of them. Hidden in midtown Manhattan where they look to serve and satisfy. Two calls gets you to the location and carol is a regular over there and she is there every day that are open New York City has many secrets and this agency is one of them. Hidden in midtown Manhattan where they look to serve and satisfy. Two calls gets you to the location and carol is a regular over there and she is there every day that are open. I have been in this place quite a few times and now I have decided to shre it here. Called and made an appointment for Carol and when I got there she was ready . She is not a super model but her attitude and services are super excellent specially if she knows you Every time we meet we go through few positions .Starting off with an excellent BBBJ and then move on to CG and then RCG where I can grab her nice ass in my palms and then we move to missionary and maybe some CBJ and ending off with DS . All the time she gives you the feeling that you are the center of her attention and she is there to make you happy . 2nd pops on the hour is allowed even though I haven't done that definitely worth the time and price highly recommended
positive Met up with koa for my second time with in a month. Had a another great time with her. Got to the room and undressed and washed up in the bathroom. Came back out and she started and massage that led to rimming and licking me all over. Rimming lasted about 30 minutes. Had me squirming te entire time. Occasionally jerk me off and suck my balls from behind. I got her to suck me while she laid on her back. Turned over to my back and she continued w a bbbj. Very slow and sensual. She eventually got on top and rode cfs. Finished up. Laid on my stomach again and she gave me another massage and continued to rim me until time was up.
positive Called Rene up last minute, and went her in call in Clearwater. Nice girl... Will repeat. Showed up at Rene's hotel , it was very nice clean and safe location. Set the donation down and sat down in bed. She sat next to me and I started playing with her massive boobs. We stripped down and she began a nice bbbj. I let work my cock for about 10 minutes, enjoying her warm mouth. She did a nice job. The she slid on the cover and climbed on top for som cg. She seemed very into it and broke into a sweat. I believe she came lol. I then flipped her Over to pound her thick ass doggystyle. Watching that ass jiggle , made me shoot my load. In the hat. She helped clean me up a gave me a hug and off I went. Rene works hard to make sure u enjoy yourself. I highly recommend if you like thick girls with big tits.
positive So I contacted Devin on the recommendation from a fellow hobbyist. Easy to reach and set up appt. and within hours I was at the door. Was met by an attractive woman with a charming personality. The only set back was the smell of smoke in the room. She did not smoke while I was there but it was very strong, just a heads up to those like me who don't smoke and may have issue with it. However, her personality and performance more than made up for that minor inconvenience. She is not the petite spinner type but is a hellcat, hang on to your hats gentlemen. She is not the petite tight spinner type, but a woman with curves, etc. She is very sexual and clearly loves what she does. Very smart and had a fantastic conversation to break the ice. Eventually got down to business and undressed and started kissing and exploring her body. Nice breasts and responsive nipples and she really enjoyed daty and got very very wet and very responsive vocally. The rest is a blur, dfk, daty, mish, doggie, mish, daty, lazy dog until I exploded spent with exhaustion. Again more conversation as she is well rounded on a variety of subjects while some light play as she was very sensitive and responsive to touch. I found myself suddenly aroused and in her mouth for round two as I went back in for more dining then she flipped me over for cowgirl, then mish again to finish with a big smile on my face. Enjoy gentlemen and be polite.
negative Communication and setup with Ivy was a breeze. Several emails to discuss plans and options for a long date. Ivy seemed very interested in planning the date and asked me to tell her about myself. We seemed to have much in common. Good omen so far. Went to meet her and texted my arrival. The door opens and I meet Ivy, who in person is more beautiful than the photos. I knew the evening was going to be fantastic. We spent the hours engaged in terrific conversation in between the other fun stuff. All the positive adjectives describe this little spitfire! I will see Ivy again! Ivy is a beautiful, petite redhead, who is also very well read and educated in many subjects. She was wearing a cute dress with stockings and garters. Ivy welcomed me with a huge smile and twinkle in her eyes. She helped me off with my jacket and sat with me for a little "get to know you". Knowing that I was flustered from running a bit late, Ivy started to gently run her hands over me and gave me some gentle kisses during our conversation, while I did the same. Ivy loves kissing and does it so well! She began to moan quietly as I touched her through her dress, and I found her panties already wet. We slowly undressed each other and continued into a slow, mutually arousing touch, feel and kiss all over until I could take no more and had to have her. A wonderful episode of CG, with Ivy's gorgeous eyes locked on mine,until we both exploded. Ivy loves to cuddle, and nuzzled close until it was time for dinner. After returning, the slow seduction began again and I was able to really appreciate Ivy's body. She is athletic and toned from her various hobbies such as dance. Besides her sweet-girl-next-door personality and smoldering sexuality, Ivy's best asset is her face. Her smile is both sweet and demure, but then sexy and devilish. Her sparkling eyes will look right inside you and promise extreme pleasure. Ivy also is very responsive to gentle touch and when stimulated begins softly moaning and quivering until she climaxes over and over. She even sweetly thanked me for being concerned about her pleasure as well as my own. We spent the remaining hours pleasuring each other in multiple ways and multiple positions, and I had a surprise for her which caused one of the most intense and incredible mish sessions I have had, with Ivy crying out in pleasure and her body clamped around me. She then looked directly into my eyes, smiled that amazing smile and said "thank you". Ivy truly knows how to take care of someone, and will give back what you give to her. Treat her like the amazing woman she is!
positive Had seen her ads online for awhile and saw she had a good review on here as well as another site I use. Decided to give her a try. Easy to schedule with. Saw her at a nice hotel in a good part of town. Standard 2 call system. It is 100% her in the pics. She is a very hot provider. Non VIP's I recommend. VIP's read on. I got to her room and she greeted me fully clothed. I gave her the donation and we sat on the bed and chatted for a few minutes getting comfortable with each other. We stripped down and laid on the bed and started making out, lots of dfk and hands rubbing each other. She asked me if I was ready to start and I said sure. She put a cover on and started a good cbj. Her other reviews say she does bbbj so I don't know if she's changed or if it was because she didn't know me. After about 5 minutes she asked how I wanted her. I said cg and she got on top of me and we went at it. It's always hard to tell if a provider is faking but she was grinding hard on my dick and was moaning and wrapped her arms around me and was kissing me with passion. She kept increasing the pace until she moaned that she was cumming. I was getting close and she said she was tired and wanted me on top. We went mish and then doggie. I asked her to finish me with her mouth. She went back down and was really sucking me hard and fast. I hit the point of no return and told her I was going to cum. She kept me in her mouth while I filled the cover. It felt great. After we both caught our breath she gave me wipe to clean up. My time was up so we both got dressed. She told me she enjoyed it and that she was impressed on how hot the sex was. She said I made her cum and that didn't happen all the time. I told her she was a really good fuck. Overall, Dakota is a relatively average looking provider with a nice body but she really was one of the best fucks I've had. She's nice, doesn't show any signs of drugs and seems fairly intelligent. I wouldn't say she's my ATF but she's definitely going to be on my short list of repeat providers.
positive Setting the appointment by phone was easy than I had expected, or experienced before. I needed a red head girl with perky boobs and this is what I got! After a quick shower she was on her bed waiting and asked me using a sexy voice to join her, I did not hesitate, I joined her and we started kissing as I sucked and softly bit her nipples, as i rubbed her clit and made her cum I kissed her all the way up to her neck biting her and I could feel her kiss my neck too. she started stroking my cock and i grabbed a condom I was ready, I raised her legs to my shoulders and slid my cock in her wet puss and started fucking her. I later turned her and she laid on her belly and spread her legs as I penetrated her pussy while pulling her hair, she mourned of both pain and pleasure as I slid my thick cock in her. We switched position for the second round and I let her on top of me and ride my cock while I was caressing her boobies, she did it with so much passion and professionalism this is a girl that loves her job.
positive Farrah is a hot spinner, came for a great outcall Easy set-up easy ID check Met at my hotel room OMG!!!! Came in under dressed in jeans, but changing in bathroom -amazing!!!! I would repeat Bright, sexy 20 something co-ed. Came to my hotel, easy set up thru email and on-time!!! Came to the door dressed in jeans and came out of a Victoria secret cover page model. Matching Bra, thong Grater set that showed curves and assists. We had a glass of wine, kissed and explored!!!!! She drop to her knees as she helped me out of clothes and gave a top bbbj with ball play and small fia tease!!! And great eye contact, You know she loves her job. Got naked and more dfk, bbbj / hj and ball play deep throat gagging and i had to pop into bbbjcim and spit, She first took every drop and jumped up to help me clean up chatted with massage a little more wine Round two bbbj moving into 69 and on to DATY/DATO with plenty of fia/fiv she was wishing for some anal But I was so excited, I'll keep that for next visit. She O'ed 2-3 times and liquid were running, sheet were soaked. We moved into a cover and had a great session between mish, cb, rcb, doggie with more juices flowing Her ass in perfect view in doggie And letting out #2 into the cover. We layed there and chatted, bright and smart I have to see her again
positive I had seen one of the belle de jour girls in the past so I checked their site and saw Angelina Nicole would be in my area. After reading some reviews I decided I should meet her. I texted the agency to set up the appointment 1 day in advance and it was totally painless and done completely through text message. The morning of the appointment I got a text asking me to confirm the appointment and got a chance to chat with Kim from Belle De Jour. She told me to be prepared for this high energy provider and then said she was sure I was going to love Angelina Nicole. She was 100 percent correct! This girl is as awesome as everything you have read in her reviews. I walk in and am greeted with a tongue being jammed down my throat by one of the hottest girls I've ever met. Her hands are all over me and she's licking me all over and telling me how bad she wants my cock. It's like having my own personal porn star! I jump in the shower to freshen up quickly and then back into the room with this hottie. The deepest dfk of my life starts off our session and to tell you the truth the rest is blur. Dfk, bbbj , extreme dirty talk, some playful spanking, ball licking, spitting on my cock and missionary are some of the things that go on. I also remember going down on her but cannot give you much more detail as this experience was so intense its hard to recall the exact order or duration of events. I can tell you it was incredibly hot and just about as much pleasure as I have ever had. I finish round one with a tremendous load on her belly. We talk for a bit while I recover and then I realize that this girl is as cool as she is hot. No bs about the weather here, just a regular conversation with a really nice girl. Round 2 was just as hot as round 1. Started with a very nice bbbj. Nice and slow with plenty of spit and ball play. She also made some great eye contact with her mouth stuffed full with my dick. What a turn on! I ended round 2 with a load in her ass crack (at her request) and she moaned and told me how great my load felt dripping down her. I head to shower to clean up and I am out of the room a little over an hour after walking in. All in all this was a fantastic time and was lacking nothing at all. I couldn't even think of anything that could have improved our time together. I highly recommend this incredible girl and agency as well.
positive Asian? Check. Petite? Check. Good reviews? Check. Count me in! It was easy-peasy to set up an appointment with Orange, partially since they know me at this great place. It was very much worth the visit. Orange was great. Came in to the place, with Orange greeting me. She's got a cute little button/kitty cat face - adorable, and eminently fuckable. Shoes came off, passed on the shower since I was only there for 30 min and needed to make a special delivery. Got the donation out of the way, and she goes to work, pulling down my pants and starting with a phenomenal BBBJ while she's on her knees and I'm standing. She has this flick thing she does that is incredible. I'm not sure how she does it, but it's amazing. Anyway, this was the preview that made me know how the movie was going to end. But since I was there, off came all the clothes, and she had me lie down and continued the incredible blow job. Yes - that little kitty kat face bobbing on my swollen knob was awesome. Anyway, then I knew I needed to pound that little body of hers before the explosion, so I fucked her missionary, doggy, and then lying down doggy, with her legs together. What a delightful site, banging that pussy from behind while pumelling her little ass, and hearing her moaning. Knew that it would be a short party though. Soon after, I pulled out, ripped off the cover, and she went to town while I pumped hot jazz into her tiny chinese mouth. It was awesome and exactly what I needed.
positive I was originally scheduled to meet with another provider that I had previously met before but a family emergency forced her to cancel the day of. I casually perused the ads and came across Nicolette and found her appealing enough to reach out and see if she could fit me in as a last minute reservation. Not all that hopeful I tried and to my surprise after a couple hours the administrative details and clearances were taken care of and she was knocking on my door. VIPs read on. Great lady, would definitely see her again. Funny thing, both of us were traveling and we're both from the same city, go figure... Nicolette is a gorgeous lady with an amazing body and phenomenal facial features. Great lips and eyes make her look like a cross between Megan Fox, a young Angelina Jolie and that buxom model in every lingerie magazine you think you'll never meet. I was impressed with the last minute reservation working out but was even more impressed at how personable and downright nice she is. I could have spent the whole time just talking with her and of course stare at her mesmerizing body. We started kissing lightly and then proceeded to touch and kiss each other all over. Her BBBJ was great and her hands know exactly what to do. Her breasts were big, soft and lovely, as I kissed and sucked on her nipples they stiffened up much like my cock did. I eased my way down to her nicely shaved pussy and proceeded to suck and lick for a while, I really enjoyed doing this, especially when we were in 69. Her ass is amazing, great shape and amazing to hold and rub. When the cover went on we started in missionary and then turned into doggy and to see and feel her ass shaking against my body I couldn't hold out and had to cum. We chatted a bit after and time was up. Great girl, would definitely recommend to anyone.
positive Really enjoyed my time with this woman. Great body, nice skin tone, great smile, and great attitude. Highly recommend. Text messages to get me there. Pretty smooth set up. Went to incall location and opened door. She was wearing a sexy piece of lingerie. I was pretty rushed in setting it up so I asked if we could shower. She joined me and it was fun (although we had to keep her hair from getting wet). No biggie. Many girls won't join you. Afterward we talked about what I wanted and she did everything I mentioned. Started with a BBBJ -- nice skills, thought about just letting her finish me off, but decided to fuck instead. Her body was too good and I wanted to see what it felt like to be inside of her. Turns out she was actually a little tight. She told me that I have an above average dick. Made my head big, but I guess she was telling the truth because when I was taking her from behind she mentioned that it was too intense due to my size (said it felt like my dick was way up high inside her). I think bottom line is she has a small pussy...which is not a bad thing--felt great. We tried a few different positions and then she finished me off with a handjob--my idea, not hers. She has a sweet touch. Was down for me coming on her too, just not on her face. Highly recommend her. Had a great time.
positive Tamara is part of a Hungarian crew in Astoria. Clean quiet location. Tamara is in tip top physical condition. I walked in and was led to the bedroom. Tamara gives me a soft kiss and smiles. I look into those beautiful brown eyes, and I know I am in for a good time. Tamara loves running her hands over your body and is very open minded. She is willing to do extras if she feels comfortable with you, and luckily she was feeling very comfortable with me! For non-VIPs, Tamara is highly recommended. Tight body (everywhere, you know where I mean) and very eager to please. She smells so good... She tell me to get on the bed... And at this point, I'm pretty excited already, being that I found a pretty fucking hot girl. Those photos are exactly her. Her breasts are enhanced, but she still reacts to sucking and biting as if they were all natural. Tamara kisses me and leads me to the bed. She undresses and has me do the same. She is petite and tight in all the right places. She smells great, her pussy is immaculate and nicely shaved. I chat with her, and she laughs at my jokes. We talk about how our weekends were, and what she likes to do. She answers earnestly and never rushes to the sex. I ask her if she does extras, and she tells me $50 extra for BBBJ and CIM. Unfortunately she does not indulge in Greek. I had showered already so felt comfortable enough for Tamara to jump right in, however she never offered a shower. She does however have Purell and babywipes which she uses on your hands and on your cock. After the prep, fun time starts. She does a slow lick on your cockhead that drives me wild. She flicks my cock back and forth with that sexy tongue...and then takes my head in her soft wet mouth... god, i love a good BBBJ. She sucks my head gently, getting right under the cap...licking it now and then. She puts so much love into sucking my cock... I feel like it's my girlfriend blowing me. She gets me at full staff and I can tell I am so excited that pre-cum is starting to flow. She keeps sucking and gives great eye contact. I almost fucking blow, so I had to pull her head off my cock, literally. And she has been sucking hard, she takes a nice deep breath to recover. She pulls out a condom and puts it on my hard cock. She climbs on top of me and fucks me CG... again with the eye contact... I can't help but smile while she fucks me because it feels THAT fucking good.... She rides the entire length of my cock, up and down while squatting... Tamara is such a spinner. I want her to fuck me RCG and she obliges, while I am still inside her. She continues to bounce up and down on my cock, and I can feel her pussy juices dripping down my shaft onto my balls. It gets me so hard thinking that she is enjoying herself because she moans like a winner. She's telling me to fuck her and I respond with thrusts of my own. I start feeling my cock and shaft twitching and I know it means I am getting close. I can tell Tamara enjoys sex because the sounds of her wet pussy is so hot... Most escorts need lube in order to fuck you this much, not Tamara....she is a fucking hot horny girl. If she likes you she wants to fuck you. I get her in missionary so that she can relax and cum for me. I put her legs over my shoulders and she raises her eyebrows at me. Apparently she likes this position. I thrust deep and fast into her tight little pussy. Pussy juice is just splashing everywhere, I can hear my balls slapping against her wet pussy lips. She moans for me to keep fucking her and I oblige. I can tell she is about to cum when she grabs my arms and starts to try to thrust back at me. Minutes later, I hear her almost scream as she cums on me and I feel her pussy squeeze the shit out of my cock... almost to the point where I fucking cum myself. But no, I had to hold on.... I know I have a CIM waiting. She is so grateful for her orgasm that she tells me to fuck her in my favorite position. At that moment, I wanted doggy. I started to pound her hard, and I know I probably did it a little too hard, especially because she just came and was probably sensitive. I didn't care then, I just wanted to give it to her. Her pussy was so tight and wet... I wanted to pull the cover off and fuck her, but that's just a fantasy. This went on for a few minutes and I could tell she was hurting from all that fucking because she put her hand on my abs a few times as I thrust hard. That feeling that a girl is sore gets me turned on a lot. I love it when she can't take anymore. So I pulled her close to the edge of the bed on her back, and pulled the rubber off and put my cock in her mouth. She eagerly put my hard cock inside any other hole other than her pussy. She started a great BBBJ, and I didn't last long after that. I told her I was going to cum and she went to town on the suction and I blew a nice load into her mouth. Tamara kept sucking and sucking, like a good girl. She then opened her mouth to show me how much I came and excused herself to the bathroom to spit/cleanup. She came back and cleaned me up and gave me a kiss. I was so light headed that day. Gave her a hug and told her I'd come back. And cum back I did.... Don't hesitate to give Tamara a visit. You won't be disappointed!
positive I was in the mood for a sexy pampering session. Positive reviews lead me to Orange... Hot time! I recommend. VIP's... I had no trouble setting up an appt to see Orange. I had never used this particular agency but I reached out from my car in the morning as I drove into the city. Later that afternoon I was standing before her. Orange is a cute Asian pixie. She led me to a private room and began to treat me like a king. As she helped me undress Orange slipped me her tongue as we kissed. When I was naked I lay on the bed as she massaged my legs and teased my balls and cock. It felt very relaxing and I thought we were gonna get straight to the sex but she had other plans. So off to the shower we went where Orange scrubbed me and gave me a nice bbbj preview. Towel dry after and back to the bedroom. I lay face down while she lightly grazed my back, legs and feet with her tiny titties. Next Orange treated me to a sexy rim job. Orange moaned here and there while licking my asshole. Nice touch... I rolled over and she took my phat cock in her tiny mouth. Heavenly! She likes daty apparently and asked to 69. I obliged and Orange O'd twice while deep throating me. I urged her to hop on for a sultry privates to privates stripper slide. Orange mounted me, carefully rubbed her tiny clit along my cock. A previous reviewer indicated he thought she would allow bbfs but I never got that sense. Regardless ...This got us both quite revved up so I asked for a condom. We had a laugh as Orange aborted her 1st attempt at applying a reg sized condom. She giggled and excused herself to go fetch a magnum. Orange returned quickly. Condom was applied and I took her missionary style. I knew throughout the session the intercourse wouldn't last long as I was ready to blow a few minutes into the session. So I fed her little pussy my big cock and exploded inside of her. Orange was sweet as she cleaned me up, gave me water and asked me to "Write a good review"! Good service to say the least.
positive Another reviewer described her as mousey, and that's pretty accurate. But, to be fair, when I saw her it was extremely cold outside, so it was understandable that her cap would do a number on her hair. She wears glasses, and with a little effort she could come across as a very sexy librarian or lab assistant. Although she's not very experienced, she's friendly and accommodating -- and she aims to please. If you're in the Dells / Baraboo area, she is worth a visit. She was only able to do outcall, so I found a low-end motel in Baraboo that I paid for (which was easier for her to get to than the Dells). It was unbelievably cold outside and inside the room when I saw her, so we got under the covers almost right away. She is pretty short and has an average body with relatively small tits. But, I have no complaints about her appearance. Started with some kissing (that she requested) and playing with her nipples. And, I don't think I've ever felt nipples get so hugely erect so quickly. Very pointy. It was a real turn-on. Then, I let my hand travel down to her pussy -- and was surprised to find it already unbelievably wet -- I mean dripping. Started stroking on her clit, and she had an orgasm in almost no time at all. She then began a very good bbbj and was able to completely swallow me. After I was nice and hard, I put on the cover, and we moved to some cowgirl. She said she wasn't going to be very good at, but I thought she was just fine. And, holy crap, prepare yourself for how she screams with pleasure. She went nuts, yelling loud enough for the whole hotel to hear, "I love how big your dick is. Fuck me!" Her pussy is very tight, and it took a while to fully penetrate her. But, it was all worth the wait. Stayed at this for a while and then switched to doggie, which was also nice. After several more minutes, I got some lube (that I had brought) -- and used it to start fingering her ass. Stayed at this for a few minutes, trying to get her loosened up, and then attempted some anal. She was a gamer and gave it a good effort. But, it was obvious that she just wasn't going to become very comfortable. So, I pulled out, took off the cover, and she gave me some more bbbj, until I exploded in her mouth. And, she stayed there, swallowing every drop I had to give her. I wish the trip to the greek isles had worked out better, but all in all I had a good time with Violet. I would recommend her.
positive Called made an appointment. Got address through text. Arrived at a lower end motel near the airport. She was outside waiting for me. Once inside did a LEO check and talked a bit. Good looking and nice. Non VIP I would repeat but there are better selections in the area. Placed donation On the dresser. We got undressed and on to the bed. She got the guy read and in with the hat. She proceeded to give a de net blow job. After a few minutes I was ready for the main act. I wanted her to ride me cowgirl but she wanted to do doggy or missionary. So missionary it was. I proceed to beat her kitty up for awhile and she started asking for it harder and faster. I obliged and she started calling me Daddy. That was all it took. I filled the hat. She got me a wash cloth to clean up. We said our goodbyes and off I went. I would repeat but there are others I want to sample first.
negative Dumpy area - dumpy building. Much nicer inside. Greeted by an expressionless Asian at the door. Completely lackluster experience. Never go back. Stripped - got on the table. She took off her clothes like it was just another day at the office. I noticed several word documents pasted to the walls but didn't really read them. Her massage consisted of complaining about previous customers while lightly rubbing her hands up and down the back and legs. On the flip, I saw she had at least 10 rules posted about what was not allowed, what she would not do, and what she was not. Kinda took whatever fun to be had away. I was almost afraid to touch her but I did touch her tits and she got me off - largely by pretending to fuck by straddling me and using her hand to simulate her pussy. However, you're acutely aware it's a hand....not what you really want. The last guy claims he got a bj from her. Really hard to believe. She needs to find another line of work.
positive Two call system. Met me at the door in a black t shirt and nothing else. I was hoping for lingerie but she was so cute it didn't matter. Checked my Id and collected donation. Very sweet girl. Her voice alone turned me on. on Guys this girl is TINY with a huge rack! She started with a cbj and when I was ready asked how I wanted her! She got on her knees and moaned as I took her doggy style. Could have tried other positions but she was too beautiful and tight! I exploded quickly! I will definitely repeat!
negative I was joined my brother for the convention last week and decided to stay an extra day by myself for some extra fun! Boy am I glad that I did! I got a nice room on the strip and I wasn't about to NOT have it shared with anyone else! Taylor York is a tall, leggy, busty, all-natural blonde who is a totally fun girl and goes out of her way to please you. She takes a lot of pride in doing a good job and is worth every penny! I had a bit of a hard time connecting with her, but she responds really fast if you fill out the form on her site, then she's all over you. Will probably repeat with one of her friends. She got to my place wearing a sexy but still discrete cocktail dress. Love the way these party girls in Vegas dress. A tight dress is classy enough but still shows enough to let you know she's in good shape and ready for action. We chatted for a while. She's very sociable and friendly. Then we got to kissing. She was really sexy about it. I was really excited to be in session with her. I had heard good things. She took off her clothes and she revealed her thin, busty, perfect body. She takes great care of herself and she is always perfectly put together when she shows up! I started moving things along and we were doing LFK and DFK. We kept going and we started moving toward the bed. Before I knew it we were naked together and I was fingering her on the bed. We went into 69 position and I was eating that tasty pussy. She was sucking my cock with lots of passion. I put on a cover and entered her via doggy. It was wonderful and I couldn't BELIEVE how tight she was! She has the cutest moaning and I nearly came too fast so I had to pull out and just kinda take a break for a minute with lots of kissing. I re-entered via missionary and thought of cold thoughts for a minute before I brought myself under control. We went through other positions and I finally came after a long session. We chatted for a while and ran over. she was really cool about it.
positive Nora is a great girl who is personable, attractive and goes the extra mile to make you happy. Saw Nora's listing and liked the pleasantness of her face. Called her and followed the standard two call system which led me to a nice hotel in midtown. She opened the hotel door and was in a nice outfit since I request her not be wearing anything that was slutty or be naked. Nora is over six feet and and is a large girl overall which is fine by me. I got a hug and a quick kiss, put the gift on the table and we moved fully clothed to the bed . She is very interesting to talk to and is good at putting you at ease. Eventually, we started kissing and disrobing each other. She started going down on me, and I really wanted her to feel good so we did a lot of 69. She has a small cock which gets quite hard. She is basically a bottom who at this point I was going to fuck. I layed her on her back, threw her legs over my shoulders and entered her tight ass. After loosening her up we got a nice fuck going. When I was getting ready to come. I put her on all fours and fucked her doggy style until I blew into the condom. Then we lounged on the bed together while we chatted as I stroked her cock. She did not come but she appreciated it. If you are looking for a large asian girl , you can not do better than Nora. I will repeat.
positive gave her a phone call the night before and texted the next morning to see her. she was staying at a nice boutique hotel. called when i arrived and she running a few minutes late but it wasn't a big deal. she is a fun girl I arrive in the room and we chat a bit and i make my way to the shower finish up and get out real quick cuz i cant wait to start. start making out on the bed and she is rubbing my cock as we are talking. it was quite enjoyable. she finally tells me she wants to put it in my her mouth so she gets the cover and goes at it. she lets me know if i can go multiple times then lets go for it, so i was excited to hear that. gave me a great bj and finished in the cover. clean up and chat some more. i wanted to go round two so new cover and go doggy. literally finish so fast but felt great. she is quite loud which is sexy. so after the finish start chatting and sucking on her nipples which get really hard. i know my time is coming to an end so i try to get round 3 in. cg didnt quite work, so she gave me a bj and then i watched her finger herself as i just jerked off and finished for round 3 just in time. cleaned up in the shower and had our last convos before saying good bye. a fun experience.
positive Typical 2 system text. You provide them screening and info and they text you the address. Overall it was a pretty okay time, but will not repeat. So I arrive in her condo like complex and the room is dark. She has a full robe on. I use the restroom quickly and don't take a shower because I took one before. She undresses me and she takes off her robe. Her boobs are perky and not too big. They're a natural C. She tells me to lay down and starts licking my nipples and body. Then, she goes down on me and starts sucking me off. I thought the bbbj was a bit to forced. She has a lot of saliva drooping down. Then, I ask her if I could go down on her and she says yes. I start to eat her out and I think she was enjoying it. After like 7 minutes, she puts a hat on and we do mish. After about 10 minutes I finish. I go wash up and she soaps me and washes me gently. Then, she dries me off with a towel. I lay down expecting round 2, but she doesn't do multiple pops so she gives me back $50 because I paid for 1 hr service, but it turned out to be 30 minutes with no multiple pops. Then I get dressed, she gives me a hug and a light kiss and I leave. Overall, it was an okay first K-girl experience. Definitely expected a lot more like DFK and 2nd round. I probably won't repeat.
positive It was easy to set up I was screened quickly saw her later that day, and I had a great time will recommend her. Once inside I was greet with a lfk as she led me to her bedroom we quickly got undress. After we headed to the bathroom where she gave a great preview bbbj. Once we were cleaned up we headed to the bedroom where the real fun began in mish with lots of dfk than we rolled around all over the bed switching position. I finished the first load in her mouth. After she sucked it all out she left too the bathroom to spit it out. We laid in bed for a fee minutes before we started round two time wasn't on my side so I made sure to make out quick I didn't want to go over our timeto much. Overall I had a great time with her and I will be coming back for more.
positive Jaden is a cute young lady, very sweet, and demure. She's open, easy to talk to, and eager to please. If you're looking for a high energy session, Jaden might not be your girl. That said, I'd have no problem seeing her again in a pinch. Sir C Arrived at the nice, clean, agency apartment and was met by a very cute Jaden. Her pics are very accurate and I was not disappointed. She was dressed casually which was a nice change every once in a while. Talked a bit then headed back for the fun. I freshened up and when I came back into the room, she was down to a bra and panties. She's got a cute little body...good curves, thick legs, round juicy ass. Flat-chested but works for her and certainly not a problem for me HA! Joined her on bed and started kissing. Removed her bra to pay attention to her chest as she moaned her approval. Jaden expressed her love of giving head and so I laid back to enjoy one of her favorite hobbies. Her passion was obvious as she delivered a solid BBBJ that had me hard as wood in no time. Flipped her over and helped remove her panties then slowly kissed my way down to her sweet spot. She's a quiet moaner but I could tell my efforts were working as she got wetter and more turned on which resulted in the first of many Jaden O's. Applied the cap and started in MISH. Felt great and continued till her next O. Moved on to CG and then behind that juicy ass for some standing doggie. After another O from her, I told her that I was close to cumming. She excitedly got back to working me with her mouth saying she wanted to taste my cum. She got her wish I pumped shot after shot of cock goo into her eager mouth. She got up to spit, came back into the room and said playfully, 'I don't think I could have swallowed all your cum even if I wanted to! That was a big load!' Ah, feels good to be recognized for your work... Sir Cumalot
positive I had been discussing meeting Nicolette with her asst since November. She didn't come down to Houston back then (only Dallas). So when I found out she was coming to Houston I made arrangements to finally meet her. I kind of developed a repore with her asst and decided to double check with her if I was making a good choice......... She confirmed that that Nicolette was a beauty and fun to talk to as well............. Well, she was right (those pouty lips and green eyes are intoxicating)............. Once we confirmed a date, Nicolette and I exchanged emails and discussed possible dress attire....... Details in VIP. Well we got off to a funny start. I parked and texted her and she told me she would have to meet me downstairs b/c you had to have a key to go up the elevators. So, she texted me when she was coming down to get me and I waited next to the elevators. She came down in jeans and a form fitting sweater w/ no bra....... Not bad, but it ruined the element of surprise that I was expecting upon entering the room. We hugged and joked about it riding the elevator up to the room. I could immediately tell she was a sweet young lady with a bubbly fun personality.... and oh yeah, she hot! We make some small talk, each went to restroom to get ready........ When she came back she was wearing a tight dress with a zipper front for easy access (her words!)... She asked me to get more comfortable and she got me down to my boxers and we got on the bed and she she started talking more....... I told her, wait I am almost naked, your turn! She happily obliged and I unzipped the top of the dress and her fabulous D soft, pillow like breast popped out. They are incredible. We began lightly kissing and I then removed the rest of her dress. I laid her on her back and worked my way down to DATY. She tasted sweet and said that she is sensitive down there... She made incredible light moaning sounds and after a few minutes we flipped and she gave me a BBBJ with a HJ... Very nice.... Then we 69'd for a few minutes. I had to have and hold her ass in my face. Finally she covered me up and she did CG for a minute or two. I didn't want to cum that way and had to flip her and go MISH. We fit well together in this position and blew my load. We laid down and I told her I didn't want to cum that fast. She told me we may have time to go again... That was what I wanted to hear........ We talked about a lot of things and then I had to get going again... As we talked more, she was getting more comfortable and into it and DFK was on at the point and I got rock hard quickly, again. She commented that she liked the way I kissed her and with her pouty lips and perfect smile, of course I was liking the way she kissed me! She covered me up again and wanted to go at it MISH a 2nd time, but I asked for K9... Watching her from behind and hearing her moan was incredible. I then pushed her flat with her legs closed and continued pumping her from behind. I didn't last long and we laid down and finished in spoon and laid there and talk some more. I was past my time and needed to go....... But she told me she'll be back......... Oh, and yeah, I plan on seeing this lady again!
positive I had contacted Gizelle through a social network after viewing her awesome pictures. We set up a meeting at my hotel and when she arrived she was better in real life than her pictures. After she removed her coat we started to kiss and I knew I had made a good decision to spend some time with her . She is very pretty and very sweet. I had an amazing time with her to the point that I forgot it was a service. That has not happened for me in a long while with this hobby....VIP's read on for the sexy details and non-VIP's, you need to see her...I will repeat! After our first LFK kiss she started to reach under my shorts to touch and eventually bring Junior out for a BBBJ, which was awesome! I let her suck and slurp on him for a bit but I wanted her out of her clothes. We both started to remove each other's clothing which was fun. Finally got her bra off to expose some beautiful dark-nippled 'girls', and I immediately started to enjoy sucking on them. Sweet!! BTW, there was much DFK'ing taking place while items of clothing was being removed, which is huge turn-on for me and I think for her as well. Some more BBBJ , then I lifted her up, placed her on her back, on the bed and started my favorite thing, DATY. She really enjoyed this as she O'd multiple times. We decided it was time junior to be in her so we started with MISH, went to DOGGIE, then back to MISH where I released into the bag. Super!! We cleaned up and layed together and talked about life. I had an awesome time with her and I am looking forward to our next visit. Guys, she is a sweetheart, treat her well and you will be rewarded.
positive lyn is fairly new to the scene and i noticed her awesome pics. did my research and made the move to set up an appointment. well worth the time and money. go see her, you won't be diappointed..... it was a very easy setup, gave my references through emails and got approved. the first appt, i ran into some issues so i had to reschedule for the next day and she was super cool about it. i arrived at her incall and she is definitely the girl in her pics. she offered some water and i accepted and we chatted for a few minutes and then i hit the shower. i came out and she was waiting for me on the bed. we did some light lfk to dfk and then she began a great bbbj. that went on for about 10 minutes and i couldn't control myself and i blew my load in her mouth. since i had 1.5 hours scheduled we laid in bed together and conversed andgot to know one another better. her conversational skills are great and we talked about a variety of subjects for probably 40 minutes. she started to play with my cock and got me hard again and started another round of bbbj which she prefaced by saying how she wanted me to come for her. alas, i'm usually just a one trick pony but she made a concerted effort to get me off again. a few more minutes of bbbj and then we put a condom on. i turned her around and fucked her doggy for a bit but i stopped because it wasn't gonna happen for me again and our time was winding down. i jumped back in the shower and left with a quick kiss goodbye. i definitely recommend her to everyone. your huckleberry
positive I saw Sammi multiple times. She was my go to girl for a quick meeting. I could text her and see her quickly. She was in a couple of different hotels. Easy to talk to and always had a good time. Met me at the door and was good looking and kind of pudgy. Non VIPs, Sammi was always easy to get ahold of for a last minute meeting. I saw Sammi 3-4 times and our visits were always consistent. We would both get naked and she would dance around me grinding her wet pussy on my leg. She the put s cover on and he me stand up while she laid on the bed blowing men for a couple of minutes. We the fucked either doggy or missionary until I cummed. She always seemed to enjoy it. For the price and ease of seeing her, I repeated until she left town.
positive I read her reviews and emailed her right away. Drove to her studio location, very nice and clean. She had a cute little robe on and when I began taking my clothes off the robe fell to the floor... exposing a very nice body with voluptuous breasts. Piper is a very attractive blonde and more into pleasing a man sexually than offering a casual back rub. She did rub my back and sat with her naked pussy on my ass and I she left her juices on me she got wet! I turn around and DFK and then FIV. So fucking wet oh fs would've been so nice! Anyway I get my finger out of her she does p2p and my cock can't handle it anymore. She engulfs my engorged cock into her mouth swallowing her own juices and gives me one of the best bj's a man could enjoy. Really awesome and she lets me pop in her mouth. Goes into the bathrub and gives me a shoulder massage until session ends. You can't tell much from her pics but I give you this: she is attractive and does a hell of a job, mouth and all
positive Scheduled a session with Lolita but after a booking mix-up ended up with Stasy. The door opened and i was impressed ...so thought...what the hell. havent had some blonde fun in a while... Stasy has super tight little body. nice pretty face and a perfect ass! she wasnt wearing much make up but she still looked ok. i would have preferred a little more presentation but she still looked good... a fun session with a nice hot russian spinner. non vips, shes worth a visit. She asked if i wanted a shower and i did. she waited on bed until i returned. once back we bagan with a nice make out session, lite touching her pussy and a great BJ. I asked her to stand while I removed her sexy black panties from behind to reveal a lovely bald pink pussy....took a nice long taste and it was sweet... her ass cheeks a nice and firm and feel great in your hands. finished the eat session and it was back on the be for some grinding. started her off in cowgirl and her tight spinner body griding up and down looked great! flipped her over for some doggie and pounded her tight little ass like a champ! watching my stiff cock fill that pink pussy was a sight to remember. Fucked her in every position we could find, even back to the bathroom for some dogie action in frotn of mirror. Back in bedroom with her legs wrapped around my shoulders while I slammed her twat hard...T-Chops was in good form today ;) i asked for CIM finish but she didnt seem to keen. she asked me to wash little T and so i did. She sucked for a while and I really wanted to unload in her mouth....and so I did with no warning....doooh!! she wasnt impressed haha! she flew off the bed and into the bathroom gagging in the sink...I guess she dont like white sauce... the session ended a little awkward but we patched it up...all in all fun time but little disappointed i didn't get Lolita. Stasy is worth fucking once...not sure i would repeat.
negative Carli's face and eyes are beautiful. That's always nice to find out because you can never really tell based on the blurred out photos. Her body is beautiful too, the photos accurately capture that. Intelligence, sensuous passion, feminine allure- these are some more qualities I would use to describe Carli. And her performance is outstanding. I recommend her highly. Carli greeted me at the hotel wearing exactly the kind of outfit I find most attractive on women- a tight fitting dress that falls relatively high on the leg at the mid thigh level. Other reviews of her don't mention her wearing this kind of outfit so it seems a wonderful coincidence, though my own reviews of other providers do mention my desires in this area. I'm not sure if she knew based on reading those. Anyway, she looked hot as fuck. She is intelligent, artistic, and an easygoing conversationalist. Her eyes are dark, beautiful, and mysterious. They're her best feature. Second best is her smile. Very lovely with white and well ordered teeth and healthy, youthful lips. Our encounter involved DFK, DATY with FIV, BBBJ, CIM. She exudes strong, uninhibited sexual passion. Clearly, a top notch provider. I highly recommend her and plan on seeing her more in the future.
positive Payton is a MILF spinner with a body that looks half her age. Shes probably close to 50, but with a 25 year old body! About 5 ft 1. Ample B maybe, small C-cups but with big, gorgeous nips and areolae. Hourglass figure. No stretch marks and no belly bulge. Her face is mature but pretty. Her clothes came off immediately upon my arrival, revealing those classic pin-up girl type knockers---and thenoh! The rest is only for VIPs! We had to fuck on the couch in a room which was EXCEEEDINGLY cluttered. Not a big deal, though, as I was not there for the dcor, and I did indeed get exactly what I came for. It worked well for mish and CG, but we skipped doggy because she is so small and I could not get good positioning for doggy on that couch. She has a TIGHT little twat, but with big meaty cuntflaps! Delicious! After some DATY and G-spot massage, she wanted to return the favor. So she gave me a shitty BBBJ, which REALLY sucked. (Too much teeth, and FAR too rough!). So I put her in CG for the finale and came deep inside her. At that point we were running up against the half hour limit, so when she sort of gently hinted that we needed to finish, I had her ride me to completion and pulled her down for some nice, DEEP DFK as I finished. She was not really very GFE, though, and kissing was meager except during the main event. Shes definitely more of a PSE type than a GFE. Had the kissing been more freely given and more passionate, I would have given her a 9 in performance, as I'm not really much of a blow job guy, so I really did not deduct any points for that "uneccessary roughness" during the blow job. But if your primary pleasure is oral, unless you like BBBJs that are so violent as to be potentially injurious, you might want to look elsewhere! And she did make up for much of the lack of GFE with some nice, nasty PSE banter while we were in each other's faces while we fucking! Will I repeat? Yup! She is fucking HOT! But as I said, a mature but pretty face (even w/o make-up). And she is honest, from what I could determine, and she indeed delivered, without cajoling and without upsell, all that she had promised. I had thought, when I looked at the ad pictures which hide her tits, that she would be an A-cupper. But she's not! The tits are ample, proportional to her sexy little petit spinner frame, but NOT small--those tits are fucking youthful and gorgeous and certainly her best features! I will surely have to fuck them next time! : )
positive Typical 2 call system. This is my 2nd time seeing her at a Hotel in Downers Grove. Not a rundown place so it was clean. She answered door in bra and panties. For basic members I won't repeat. She answered door in bra and panties as she did last time I saw her. Cute little Latina very spunky early 20's. Very friendly and cautious. Donation was placed and she began to unbutton my pants. My hands roamed. She does have a flabby stomach which is not anything I'm used to but she was friendly with a nice attitude so I usually overlook that. She then had me lay on the bed where she joined me and started a nice BBBJ with lots of spit. My hands roamed to her ass when I asked her about anal and she said not into it. She got me nice and hard and sat up and reached for the condom as she sat there with her legs spread. I pulled off her panties and was going to go in for the lick when all of a sudden I was hit with a bad odor. This is a first with her and I didnt say anything so I thought I would just rush and get this done. I started in doggie and went at it for about 15-20 minutes. I asked her where I can finish and she said to cum on her tits. So she laid down and started blowing me again. Mind you the smell was starting to overwhelm me. So I blocked it out and she continued blowing me and playing my my balls until I came on her tits and also her chin. She does have a tight pussy but she needs to clean it out because it is enough to kill the mood.
negative I first saw Arianas ads pop up and thought, no way, this cant be for real. But when I contacted her assistant through P411, reality began to set-in. Ariana's assistant is a pleasure to work with and we set up an appointment for a little more than one month out. That appointment ended up taking place on the exact day and time requested without a hitch. Top notch service. Ariana and I met in the lobby of my hotel and chatted on the way to my sweet. She wore a leather/suede American Indian looking dress with laced up boots above her knees with a white shawl. She is stunningly beautiful. When we got to the sweet, we talked for a bit on the couch and then made our way to the bedroom. And then... (I think you know where this is going) We began to shed our clothes and at first I had to just take in how unbelievably perfect she is; her hair, skin, face, eyes, mouth, and my god...that body! Her legs go on forever. We moved to the bed and I kissed on her a bit before we positioned for DATY, which was heavenly. She was instructive and vocal and we had a blast. We then slithered to the edge of the bed for standing doggy, where I was able to both take in the view and begin to fathom the reality of what was taking place. I think, if it had been the last day of my life, it would be what I'd have chosen. Yes, that good. Then we propped back up for doggie and when she turned back to look at me, I knew it couldn't get any better than this. I maneuvered Ariana down to the foot of the bed and had her on her knees on the Ottoman for standing doggie. We repositioned to several variations of doggie and I believe we were in a good groove as I felt the point of no return looming close. I pulled out and asked if we could finish with a BJ. Off came the cover and I wiped myself down with a warm, wet cloth to remove the latex and offered Ariana a pillow for the floor which she accepted--and she proceeded to provide a mind blowing BBBJ, looking up at me with those eyes and that face, whispering soft little words of encouragement. I signaled that I would like to give her a pearl necklace and she was cool with that, but the first rope of cum had some thrust behind it and got her squarely on the chin and cheek. It was all good. We caught our breath and she asked if I wanted to take a shower with her...uhhh...sure! That was almost as much fun as initially getting to meet her and the perfect way to wind down the perfect date. I wish I could afford to spend a day with her. Ariana is so fucking hot and perfect in every way, I am not sure you need me to say much more...Suffice to say, "Hurricane Ariana" swept through my hotel room and life and it was an incredible experience. The most beautiful, sexy, sensual, amazing girl in the world. Period.
positive Found her ads and contacted her via email. We went back and forth flirting for about a week via email until the big day came. She emailed me her address before I left that morning to head over to her incall location. Easy to find in a nice townhouse community. Easy to find her incall and parking was no problem either. Bella Knight met me outside with a big hug and kiss before leading me inside and upstairs to her bedroom. She does have 2 dogs and a cat that I saw, but none were in the room during our session. She is even better looking than her pictures look, and her chest is amazing especially on her 5'1" frame. More details below for the VIPs, but I would highly recommend seeing her to anyone, especially those who love big breasts! After getting into her bedroom, we both sat down on the bed and chatted and kissed a few times to break the ice. Then some heavier kissing and dfk before the clothes started to come off. Shirts and bra first, and my jaw hit the floor when the bra did. Big, firm breasts with delicious nipples that I had to taste and give some attention to. More groping from both of us lead to the rest of the clothes coming off. From there, more dfk and exploring before she laid on her back, grabbed the oil and poured a little between those big breasts and had me straddle her for some russian. One of the best russian sessions I've ever had, and mixed in some wonderful bbbj until I popped leaving a nice pearl necklace. She didn't even miss a beat there, kept up some hand, bbbj, and russian to resurrect me, then proceeded to give an even better bbbj session to finish bringing me back to life. I stopped her and slid down for a nice long oral session. She has a sweet tasting little kitty that is clean shaven, and managed to bring her to several O's before I couldn't take it anymore and had to be inside her. Started with Mish, and she was plenty tight and responsive. Spent a good amount of time there, then moved to cowgirl. Loved watching her ride me, with her big tits bouncing above me. She had a couple more O's during all of that and we worked up a pretty good sweat, but a second pop just wasn't in the cards for me. Definitely not due to any lack of trying on either of our part! Bella's a lot of fun, her her breasts alone are worth the price of admission. Not a clock watcher at all, as we went well past the planned time. I would highly recommend her to anyone that's interested.
positive When I met Katy, I was a little nervous but she made me feel right at home, took a quick shower, she joined me and the action started then. This girl is a must see, kissing, tastes awesome great bbbj, super tight , loves to kiss. We started with a preview bbbj in the shower and I can tell you this girl really gets into that, I was holding her back she was so good. Once soaped off sand rinsed we headed to the bedroom for some more action. I laid her down and it was my turn, i kissed down her body until i reached her beautiful box. I teased her and licked her to her first O and right after she shot up and said My turn. she went down on me with a furry like an old high school lover gone wild. she easily took me all in and speed upend back. I wants to get a good view so I stopped her and directed her to the floor and me on the edge of the bed I held her head while she bobbed back and forth... I was in heaven... after a minute or two I knew I could not hold back much longer so I pushed her head deep and let it fly. After we cuddled until I was ready for round two. I put on a cover and tried all positions I could think of with this beautiful lady. I ended in miss with a kiss. definite repeat
positive Second time seeing Barbie and her look changed a little. Super tall but fun to be with a tall woman once in a while. Non VIPs would repeat. Saw Barbie the first time towards the end of the summer. Had fun with her so figured I would repeat. She was in Japan for a visit between my visits and she had informed me she was going back when I first saw her. I asked her a little about her trip and then we got down to business. We started DFK on the bed with her on top. Then She flipped around and gave me a bbbj, while sticking her huge ass in my face. She has smaller tits but her ass is nice and big, especially for a white chick who is tall. After I was hard she got on top RCG and it wasn't long before I blew in bag for round one. I went to the bathroom to clean up and then she started more BBBJ. This time I let her go for a long time before asking her to put on another condom. We then went missionary, followed by doggy on bed followed by RCG, CG and then RCG when I finished in the bag for round 2. I washed up and we had about 15 minutes left but I decided to forgo round 3, cause I knew I wouldn't finish in time. We talked a little before the 5 minutes knock and I then got dressed and left. Super cute and nice girl and she's good if your in the mood for a tall chick every now and again.
negative Carli is a super attractive, bright, and fun provider. I was lucky enough to meet her recently while she visited SF, where she routinely tours. I can't recommend her enough, but be prepared to come energized. She's a keeper. I met Carli for the first time in a typical SF conference-style hotel near Union Square. Being a corner room suite, however, it was a tremendous space and had great natural light! When Carli met me at the door in a short dress and tall black heels, I was ready to get down to business immediately. Placed my donation conspicuously on the desk and showered to freshen up a bit. She met me on the bed afterwards, where we commenced kissing, fondling, and exploring each other's bodies. I took care of her first with some daty, before getting an amazing deep throat bbbj as a reward! Rd 1 was an amazing Greek romp in doggie with a fantastic view of Carli and the city in the background. After she came hard, she asked me to cum on her stomach and chest. She's super tight and willing to please in this respect. Rd 2 was doggie (though not Greek -- my choice). We made each other sweat and ended up collapsing in a heap of arms and legs in no time. Carli's a great conversationalist, and genuinely gets into the fun while you're with her. Her naughty laugh, beautiful eyes and aliabaster skin (as mentioned in previous reviews) are two of her most memorable features. I also have a thing for shorter hair, so this was another unexpected but welcome surprise! Will definitely repeat.
negative Stay away. Completely different girl. Total rip-off. We agree on the money. She asked me to go get ice and I caught her at the elevator taking off. No juicy details. Total scam. This is a "service" not an independent. I should have known better. Learn from my mistakes. Feel like a total idiot. She came in , took off her top asked me to get ice after we agree on the amount and then she took off. I caught her at the elevator as I was walking back to the room. She told me she was going to her car to get her toys because she didn't want to only have intercourse. I told her to give me half of the money back and just leave. She refused and started to make a little bit of a scene so I just walked back to the room and let her go.
positive Was in the WLA are and got an immediate text back with a line-up. Picked McC based on photos and previous reviews. Waited in the car at a familiar place and got the text with info to get in, right on time. The door clicked open as I stood waiting for a moment. When I walked in, I was pleased with the way she looked. I knew to expect an older provider based on previous reviews. She had a great milky-vibe to her. I like the attitude of a more experienced provider that is somewhat missing from a much younger provider - it seems a little less contrived and more real sometimes, which makes the experience more enjoyable. She was wearing a cotton top with no bra - she let me feels her body through her top as I kissed her. The feeling of her natural breasts over her cotton top was memorable. I don't think they're droopy at all - just natural. I understand though because so many girls with implants that seem to defy physics. We showered together and then began to kiss as we dried up and made out standing next to the bed. She seemed to know the pace I preferred - nice and easy without fake noises. She then moved on to BBBJ and then to a body rub that got me ready to get the cover on. We went in multiple positions, CG, RCG, Doggy Mish and finish on her chest. I was exhausted and crumpled to rest a bit before the shower and exit. I would consider seeing her again, but after catching up on a long list of other experiences to be had....
positive First time with this agency, set up by text. Was told Orange was going away, so I had to give her a try. One of my best decisions. VIP read on... I text when I arrived at the east side location and after a few minutes I was given the address and apt #. Up I went, no doorman building and knocked on the door. I was met by Orange, petite Asian spinner. We DFK immediately and she is amazing at this, soft lips and great tongue. I take my shoes off and she leads me to her room, I undress and we continue DFK. She then gives me a short bbbj, then leads me to the shower where she thoroughly cleans me. In the shower she gives me another preview bbbj. I'm surprised I held out here bc I usually pop quick on first shot, I'm usually at least a 2 shot guy. We go back to the room where we DFK more then she has me lay on my stomach, she gives me a cat bath then a through rimming. This is followed by a bj where I thought I'd lose it, I didn't and then I go for a taste. DATY which lasted at least 10 min, when I was done I had her juices running down her leg. Amazing experience. Then it was time for the main event. She jumped on top of me, again commenting on my size (she did this throughout the session). With all the teasing and I didn't hold out long, plus she's super tight. I came hard after a few minutes and so did she, she continued to ride me after that saying she wanted to feel all of me. It was really sexy. We then layer down for a little bit and she gave me a hot towel. Helped me dress, then I finally gave donation with a nice tip. Will repeat, maybe next time with second provider and longer session.
negative What can I say about Farrah that has not been said already? Plenty!! But I won't share to much, as I want to think my experiences with this amazing woman are exclusive to me only. I would love to keep her to myself, but in the end I have to face reality. See this woman and know you run the risk that she can ruin your ability to be happy with anyone else. I know this is the juicy details section and those must be written. I don't like writing them, but I will throw some in as I verbally worship this goddess as she so deserves. I have experienced this exquisite creature on multiple occasions. Each meeting leaving me in wonder and awe as I think I am the luckiest person to ever walk this planet. This is what she does. Reminding myself what our time together really is, can be an impossible obstacle to overcome. I've experienced her body in ways I have never experienced any other. To say she excels at mish, cg, doggy etc, is an understatement. My favorite thing is oral and there is no chart that can measure her abilities here. I doubt there is a woman out there with half of Farrah's fellatio skills. I could write a book praising her ability to take me to levels of insanity with her mouth. I'm not into Greek not have I ever been interested in it until I met Farrah. She found a way to entice me to try. I wish I could say how I destroyed that perfect ass of hers but it's just not in my cards, one day...... The talent I find as amazing as her sexual prowess is her GFE. My god, what this lady can do to both my mind and body is unexplainable. This is her most dangerous ability. Don't be fooled, if your not under her spell, it is only because she does not think you can handle it. How I am able to function I still don't know. Farrah is a goddess that only a few will get to experience. To put the experience in mortal terms, she is a lady in the streets and a freak in the sheets. She is a classy lady who deserves only the highest respect. I wish her nothing but the best as I return myself to reality. I will always wonder what life would be like in another time or another world. Thank you Farrah for the time of my life.
positive Tina pictures are spot on, screening was pretty much easy did it day before on my lunch quick screen . She looked damn good she wore that same fishnet outfit . Happy with the Love Connection Nice place, Pretty hottie . I was pleased Called next day just before to see if still on, yes got the details by phone and off I went I arrived pre showered , but Tina wanted to be sure of it so went thru the vip proceedings Mutual bath: very nice Good front and back wash after little small talk she knew I was pre showered so was pretty much a quick rinse and onto making out in shower for pre warm up . She loves to make out and it's my secret pleasure of its a pretty one I like to make out she is pretty just like her pictures time can fly I wish I would have went for hour .Didnt have enough to time out of the house Good massage with pat dry to make sure I'm all nice and dry while laying flat on my tummy. Nice slow and teasing back rub to nice HJ and grabbing the balls and massaging I easily could have squirted all over but turned over just in time as it was getting pretty close all the pre fun had me ready to pre cum. Turned around and dfk laid her on her back and dined on her daty and dato fiv is ok and she gets naturally wet and ready and horny . 69 play and face sitting rubbing her punani al over my face I love with hottie smothers my face with her kitty ,Greatest feeling ever!! Love connection was there ! She was pretty interesting next time next week or this weekend I'll come back and visit her for longer . Got covered up and played in cg to k9 to mish with pecks and kisses and she smelled so good pulled out just in time and we just clicked she knew how to cover it with her mouth just in time where I wanted to finish . Kept it there for me to see. Very vivid memory , it's nice to let go with a hottie once in awhile to let go of past daily demands . Got the quick fix and she was all I needed to get by a lonely week. Just what I needed to get me back in focus .
positive Had several back and forth text with Rachael trying to work out our schedules. The day arrived and she stayed in touch. She is outcall only so timing things with my schedule was a little hectic but she was patient. Rachael is a a very sweet student and has a down to earth personality. Very real. Enjoyed our time when she arrived. Rachael arrived on time. Very attractive and casual as to not draw attention in public. Once inside after our hello's she leaned in for a very soft sensual kiss. We lingered there for some time. I do enjoy those soft kisses. Excused myself for a quick shower. When I returned she was in a very sexy bra. I unsnapped her bra and a very soft set of breast was awaiting attention. We lay back on the bed and I continued to give her all the attention she deserved. Moving down to DATY slow and deliberate. Soon a finger inside helped her reach one of several O's. She was clean and tasted great. I moved up on the bed and she reached down to pull me in. Soon her lips were wrapped around my cock. She moved slow and deliberate just as I had while DATY. I soon stood up an she lay her head back on the edge of the bed as I face fucked her slowly. She had no problem taking it all the way to CIM. Our time was almost gone at this point. A tribute to her as she took things slow and drained me completely. We have only just begun. I will be back to see her often and continue to explore with Rachael.
positive I have booked several times with the agency, so set up was a breeze completed through email. This agency never fails to impress with the girls they bring and Yumi was no exception. I got a text with the room number and up I went. The door was ajar, a entered the room and found a amazing looking girl wearing black lingerie. We hugged I took care of donation and excused my self to the bathroom. When I came out the lingerie was gone and the fun began. Non-vips, if you ever find her on RT make sure you see this girl. So I got out of the bathroom waiting only i t-shirt and my boxers. She asked me to come to bed to which i complied, and we talked for a few minutes. She's very easy to talk to if you can speak Spanish. I think she's not very fluent in English, but believe when I say she more than makes up for it! We laughed for a while and then we began kissing. It started out as LFK, I started caressing her whole body and the kisses became more intense. She laid on the bed and started to kiss her from her neck down her body. Spent some time in those beautiful breast. She has implants but they are very nicely done. After spending some time with the melons I started to go down to have some fun at the Y. By then, she was moaning already from my kissing her body. I could tell she was really into it. I kissed her inner tights and slowly worked my way down to her pussy. It was fresh and delicious and very wet. Knowing that she was that much into it I made it my mission to make sure she enjoyed my time down at the Y as much as I was enjoying it, and from her wetness, moans and hip grinding against my mouth I believed I accomplished my mission. Then it was my turn. She gave a a very good BBBJ for a while, but I was ready to be inside her. She got on top and began riding. This woman is a sight to see on the street. Seeing her on top of me grinding and moaning was just glorious. We kissed while she rode me this time the kisses were really DFK. We then turned it around, and went down on her for a few minutes again and went to miss. Here we kissed some more while she expressed in Spanish how much she was enjoying herself. I believe she came a couple of times or she fakes it real well! Then it was time for doggy. I went inside her from behind and her ass looked magnificent. I could not hold it for long with that view and ended up taking it out and finished off in her mouth. It was an amazing time with Yumi. We spoke for a while . We had some more fun fingering and oral and then I cleaned up and left a very very happy man.
positive I sent her a text message that I was interested in seeing her she sent responded to me promptly. She able to see me the next day. We made arrangements of time and place by text. When I got to her place I was greeted by a sexy blond Russian girl wearing a sexy black pencil dress. She has a lovely Russian accent and I loved the way that she said "Champagne?". She told me that I would not be needing my clothes. I told her what I was interested in and she started with a striptease where she was just barely out of my reach and the fun proceeded from there. She asked me why I chose her and I stammered nuru. She pulled the sheets off of the bed to reveal a rubber mattress and she prepared the nuru. She asked me to lay down on my stomach and she applied the nuru to my back and ass crack. She laid down on top of me sliding her naked body against me holding my hands. She felt so good! She pressed her leg into my ass as she was sliding against me and also ran the nuru through my ass crack with her hand. She teased me for quite some time this way before she asked me to turn over. She slid herself against me for little bit more getting more worked up as she jacked me off a little. She asked me if I wanted her to fuck me and I emphatically said Yeah! She put a condom on me and rode me. I did not last long form her fucking and she made me cum quickly in a wonderful orgasm. We cleaned off the nuru and then we rested in the bed together a little bit. She asked me if I wanted a prostate massage and I said yeah. She said she was going to be my nurse and put on a latex glove with some lube. She was very good at fingering my asshole and getting me to relax which led to an intense experience of making me cum that way. I'm getting excited thinking about it right now. We ended up fucking again which led to another wonderfully intense prostate massage with her gentle fingering. She asked me if I could cum again and i told her no you drained me to which she quipped that she stole all of my cum. We hug and chatted for a little bit. She was even nice enough to get me something for my hangover from my excessive drinking from the night before. She is a lovely girl that I would highly recommend.
positive Been to Asian Sensation one other time and had a nice time with Candy and have been meaning to try another. Orange was available so I thought I would give it a shot. No disappointments here Arrived and Orange opened the door and immediately gave me a huge hub. She sat me down and removed my shoes. Said hi to the other girls there as we were walking up to the room. All the girls here are very nice and really aim to please. They may try a little too hard at times. When we get to the room she start to DFK and slowly starts to take my close off all while giggling with a dirty smile. She unzips my pants and starts a preview BBBJ which she is really good at. We remove the rest of our close and every so often goes back for a little more BBBJ. Off to the shower where we pass our friends again, me in a towel and her completely naked. Shower is nice with more touching and BBBJ with the start of a little rimming. Back to the room and we get into a serious DFK while standing and I pick her up to the bed and start DATY. Very nice and responsive but she wants a 69. We do multiple 69 positions and she keeps asking me in broken english to kick her pussy because she loves it. On goes the cover and we start in CG and stay there for a bit but she wants to go to misc and that is where we stay for the rest of the time. Passionate DFK while going at various speeds. She seems to really love it and keep complimenting me along the way. Finish on her tits and we head off to the shower again, say hi to the girls again as well. Very nice time with a great girl.
positive Did not know what to expect but decided to plunge based on the images on the web site. Well - the pictures were close but not spot on - reality was wonderful - no regrets whatsoever. She is a wonderful girl or should I say young woman and the encounter was one of the best I remember - will repeat when back in Toronto. I set the appointment couple days ahead. I was looking for the young yet mature and physically beautiful young lady - this is exactly what I got. She made a special appointment to see me and we fine tuned the time over the course of the day. Do not let her glasses deceive you as she has a beautiful face and a a sharp intelligent mind behind it and wears them (as I suspect) for disguise or decoration. Her physique is above that all - slender, fit and willing. We talked for a while and I enjoyed that seeking a partner more than just a relief. When we finally got serious - she revealed to me her body - youthful and firm. Her breasts were perfect - hardly B's more like BB's or C's - natural, round and full yet perky. She is a riding expert with this wonderful ease of motion when balancing on top of you. At some moment I was close to loose it - I asked her to stop - she did - however squeezing me with her Kegals while staring at me with her innocent eyes - naughty girl.... Very good experience and a wonderful person. One thing I did not enjoy - her alarm when the time was closing to the end. Otherwise an unrushed and beautiful encounter.
positive Really pretty girl. Definitely the same person in the pictures. Her English isn't great but she has a cool and friendly personality. I thought her face was her best attribute. Also her overall performance during the fun part. I've seen her twice already, both times several months apart and her performance was great and consistent. Will Repeat! Normal routine when walking in. Mouth wash and shower. We had some light conversation in the shower and next thing you know shes blowing me. Her skills and enthusiasm was awesome. Great moaning, licking, slurping. All of that good stuff. After getting out of the shower I let her blow me for another 20 min I think. I lost track of time cause I was in freakin heaven She has a real pretty face to make things better. She definitely has a nice body on her but not anything to write home about. Ended up just saying F*** it and decided to go for a CIM. She was all for it and didn't skip a beat with the head bopping and sucking while I was exploding in her mouth. My toes curled so damn hard I almost broke my feet. Amazing finisher. Some girls really suck at CIM, not her though. After a while, she gave me an average massage, we talked a bit. Than back to bbbj. When I couldn't blow she jerked me with some lube, all the while licking the head. It felt so damn amazing. When I started cumming she gulped down my guy and took it like a pro just like the first time. Will Repeat!
positive I hadnt seen anyone new in quite some time, and the ladies I see regularly are all from out of town. So Ive been looking for a good year or so for someone new, and someone local. I noticed Ivy, and even though there were just few reviews I took a chance because I really liked what I saw. Well -- I can stop looking. It was a beautiful experience that I hope to replay often. Ivy is gorgeous, erudite, and a whole lot of fun. Highly recommend. I coaxed her down on the bed. I think I could have kept kissing her for hours. Once she was lying down my kisses worked their way down. Shes not big on top, which I like, but her nipples are large and very erect and I spent a lot of time there before moving lower. Once I finally got between her legs, I could tell she thoroughly enjoyed my tongue. Each time right before she came I could feel her entire body quiver. It was an incredible feeling. I alternated between DATY and DATO which Ivy also loved. After fifteen minutes or so I turned her on her knees and continued from behind, alternating my tongue and fingers. She really enjoyed FIV and FIA. I probably spent a good half hour eating her pussy and ass. She then moved to take me in her mouth, and it was incredible. Im not small and she took me entirely and whatever she was doing it felt so amazing I had to ask her to stop before I lost it. I told her I wanted to be insider her and she smiled and covered me up quickly. We started with her on top where she came twice. Then we switched to mish with her legs on my shoulders. She is Ivy met me at a nice hotel wearing a robe over very pretty bra and panties. She knelt on the foot of the bed where I was standing and we began with nice LFK. Normally I really like DFK, but this was so gentle and erotic, I was getting light headed with excitement. We must have continued for at least five minutes before unbelievably athletic. Finally turned her over and took her from behind and thats when I came. By now we had been going for about an hour and it was incredible, and best of all, the look of approval on her face made me melt. We chatted for a while before we started round two. This time she took me in her mouth and we moved to a 69 position with her on top. There was no way I was going to let her stop this time. When I came she swallowed it all and when she finally stopped sucking on me she had the most amazing smile. I hope to see her often, and if have a chance to meet her I hope your experience is as good as mine. This girl is an angel, and I cant wait to book her again. By the way  her pictures dont do her justice. She is cute as ever!
positive First time using this agency. The screening and set up were easy and efficient. The only problem was that, when I arrived at Antonella's location, I couldn't get anyone on the phone for about 10-15 minutes (it wasn't counted against me, but you know how panic can set in when that happens). I had a very nice time with Antonella, who is a sweet and attractive woman, but it wasn't quite what I expected based on previous reviews. Not a bad experience at all, hence the good grades from theolperfesser, and I would recommend Antonella, I just had imagined something different. After reading Antonella's reviews, I was imagining a romp with a hot Colombian babe. This was more like an enjoyable hour in the sack with a sexy MILF -- not that there's anything wrong with that! When I arrived, Antonella had just returned from running an errand. She was dressed in jeans and a black leotard. Maybe she wasn't quite ready for me. We chatted for a bit, and she is very pleasant and down to earth. Yes, she is Colombian, but has been in the U.S. long enough to be Americanized. Her most attractive features are her eyes and, of course, her bust. I have no complaints about our session. Antonella was very accommodating, and we did pretty much anything I wanted, although I did not venture into anal play. First round had the usual anagrams, including lfk, bbbj, daty (via somf), cg and mish. After my first O, Antonella cleaned me up with a warm towel. We talked more about our lives and had a nice conversation. She was willing to initiate a second round. I really appreciated that, as well as her patience in getting the little captain back to attention with touching and stroking (usually more effective on me) rather than going straight for the bbbj. I couldn't achieve a second pop, alas, but that's par for the course these days. A quick shower, a quick hug and kiss, and I was on my way. The only downside of the session was that it seemed to lack that divine spark of passion and lust that I was looking for, and which I hoped to attain based on the Colombian connection. I don't think Antonella was disinterested, but I don't think she got off either (of course, one never knows for sure, but I didn't sense any of the telltale signs). But lest you think theolperfesser is just giving an A for a lay, Antonella is a very sweet woman and well worth your time. Our chemistry took us in a different direction than I had anticipated, that's all.
positive Been to this infall place before, very easy to set up appointment. When I entered the room, a petite Chinese girl greeted me with kiss and helped me took off my shoes. We then walk into the private room, it is a fun experience. We hugged and passionately kissed each other. She undressed me slowly with teasing. I immediately got hard. She continue using hand and mouse to touch my crotch without taking off my underwear. Then she whispered to me do you want to take a shower and I said yes. It is standard shower procedure with some BJ, then we went back to the room. She gave me a message first, slowly and gently but very erotical. Using her boobs, hands and tongue, she touched from your neck to the feet. And followed by rimming which I enjoyed the most. Then she flipped me over gave a very nice BBBJ, her technical is really good. I would say one of the best BJ I had recently. I could not hold any longer, then I asked for protection then we started some cowgirl, then missionary. Her pussy is very tight that I can feel that I would burst anytime. So We change to doggie and I finally cum. She helped me clean up and we talked a little bit. Then I decided to took my leave. Overal very pleasant experience.
positive First timers must do a bit of normal pre screening, and typical 2 call system. Incall is low key, and very comfortable. Won't get into may details here, but Noa is a lively, and fun girl that treats her customers with warmth, and goes above and beyond to make sure you are taken care of. Highly recommend. There are enough reviews to get the gist of this girl's talents, and I witnessed them first hand for myself this afternoon. I can say that her "non Japanese'ness" threw me for a second, but maybe she has a parent that is Japanese. I dunno, but I do know that she is a sexy little fire cracker that loves to fuck, and please her partner. Started out with us just laying on the bed, chatting, and her playing with my weiner for a bit before her starting a slow and sexy bbbj. That soon turned into by far the best 69 I have had in a while. She is shaven, clean, and I would wear her ass and vagina around as a ski mask all day if I could....shit was nice. After that, she climbs on top, and rides me reverse cg and grinds on me while watching herself in the bedside mirror...shit was nice. I don't know if she was faking, but if she was she deserves an Oscar if she was. She said I "fucked her good", so maybe she wasn't faking. I dunno, I don't care...her moans were sexy as fuck. Bent her over the bed, and went to town doggie for a while, then mish, and then daty again until she took a tv time out to regroup, and give her vagina a rest....I had some pent up shit to get out of my system. She follows with a nice bbbj again while paying attention to the boys until I blew a load on the ceiling...literally(well, almost). Took a shower, shot the shit for a few mintues, and then went on my way to finish my day. Noa is inviting, warm, friendly, and makes her customer feel at ease from the start to finish. The price might be a bit more than others you are searching, but I doubt the others have the package that this girl is offering.
negative Arianna Marie was right on time and is a dream come true. I had scheduled a different girl who had come to Denver to meet up with her sister. But, at the last minute, something happened with the sister. The agency called with their apology to me. No problem for me, but I couldn't reschedule with her in Denver as I was leaving for LA with a day or so. This agency then offered a replacement to me. Arianna Marie. What?????? I have researched for Arianna Marie for over a year without any success. Suddenly my dream, (or one of them is dropped into my lap?) Who would have thought? I said absolutely yes. I flew into LA to see this girl. I was not disappointed with Arianna Marie. She met me in the Starbucks on the ground floor of the hotel. We moved upstairs after a bit of chit chat. We sat on the bed and chatted just a bit. She didn't bother to look in then envelope for her gift. Nice touch. This review is a bit late as she was not advertising at the time. She told me she might begin, but I got her before the rush. Arianna Marie did a scene where she came home with her boyfriend, but then since they had no condom she went off with his roommate. For whatever reason, I found that scene very erotic. I watched it many times and yearned for that girl Arianna Marie. If she did this before, she was UTR, thus, the late review of her. We got to the room and I laid the donation in the bathroom and she ignored it, that is always a nice touch. I began to take off her clothes and as I could not wait to see those perfect tits. Her tits are perfect and I spent significant time kissing and massaging them. I alternated between licking her nipples and sucking on her tounge. I continued kissing and fondling them with gusto. I removed the rest of her clothes and my own. Now I began to kiss her mouth and move from her tits to her neck to her mouth. Her kissing was incredible, I got rock hard. She grabbed my hardness and then began to slide down and lightly kissed the head of my dick. Next thing I knew my dick vanished inside her mouth. She would alternate between my dick and my lips, this was great. I wanted to see her beautiful face while she engulfed my dick, what a view that was. I ask her to move her pussy to my mouth while she continued to suck me. This was incredible. After getting a significant bbbj, she sat up and I receive the PSE from her. Now her big, beautiful squishy, tits bounced as my dick vanished into and then out and then into her pussy. At some points we did it slowly enjoying each inch as I slowly penetrated her, and then we would go quickly. After enjoying the view with my hand on her tits and then her ass and then back to her tits, I pulled her face down to my mouth and we kissed passionately. All the while she rubbed her nipples onto my chest while I grabbed her ass with my hands. The she would move up and she would grind her pussy onto my dick as deeply as we could. I pushed her down to her side without ending the delicious connection of my dick in her pussy. With both of us on our sides I could kiss her constantly, while continuing to alternate squeezing her tits and then her ass all the while my slippery dick slid in and out of her very tight and very wet pussy. Finally, I put her on her back push her legs together and went to town. All the while managing my orgasm and delaying it, she begged me to not stop, and I continued pump her pussy with my slippery dick and her now very wet pussy. She was soaking from the pounding she was taking. Finally, our time was up and we had not stopped for over the entire hour. I stopped and slowly slid my cum soaked dick out of her pussy, but I continued to kiss this incredible beauty. I knew our time was over and I glanced at the clock and we were beyond our time. She asked to stay longer, but, I did not want to overstay my welcome and beg for one more time with her. (I want to see her again, and don't want her to hesitate to see me because I take advantage of her time.) Even then, she continued to kiss me and her tongue was in my mouth or mine in hers until we went out the door. This is very passionate fucking and I want to see this girl again. It seems now that she may be independent and at a slightly lower rate than what I had. If so, I will see her again and again.
positive Decided to try another place then the usual and got a recommendation for thai spicy girls. Was given the phone number and website and checked it out. They approved me right away cause of being a regular at many places I guess. Found out the girl available is Miss Paris. I believe I saw her ad at another place awhile back so anyone who was waiting to see her again , this is where she is now. Got the text and location , got buzzed up and behind the door a really tall thai beauty. Im not a tall guy so I usually go for the tiny petite but this girl was hot and a nice figure so I was excited for a little change. I will say im glad I saw Paris and I recommend and will see her again. So I kind of knew from website and pics she may be taller than the usual but you never know. But when I walked in I see infront of me a tall but gorgeous young thai woman with great curves and I immediately smiled and got close for a hug and kiss and she gave me a warm welcome. with those heels yeah she a bit taller then me but nice long legs and great figure so I knew would be fun. She took me by the hand and led me to the bedroom. And this place really is decked out like a love nest so definitely sets the mood. I lay down the donation and shetook it from the room and returned with a big smile and bttled water . I took her by the hand closer to me ad I think she realized may be a bit awkward and she slipped off her heels we kissed a little while she began undressing me. I ran my hands up her nighty and grab those nice round tits and felt her nipples harden up. She asked me to shower and followed her in to the tub and she soaped and lathered me up with extra attention on my cock and balls ad I really a little stiffened up to attention. I then lathered up her up a little and feels great sliding my hands all over her silky smooth skin. We rinse off and then I kiss her on neck and lips and make out a bit and she starts stroking me so run my hands over her clit rub and bit and now things getting a bit steamy. She finally gets down while still stroking me and looks up and smiles then puts her luscious lips around my hard cock for a couple minutes of preview and is feelin great. We dry off ad on to the bed where she wants to give me a little massage so i let her but not long as im really hot and bothered at this point. She massages my back briefly and does feel good but I just had to flip and pulled her close for some lfk then dfk and she then proceeded to kiss my nipples and down to my cock and balls. some nice warm kisses and licks on msac then up my shaft then her full mouth and gave me a nice long bbj and occasionally looking up at me and felt fantastic. I was getting close so I pu;led her up and had her straddle my face and dined , licking her clit then thrust my tongue deep and she moaned and tastes sweet. She then went for the cover and , lubed up and gently lowered herself on my cock and started to grind and moan and then I got her to squat for some acg and feelin great. but I had to spin her around for my favorite racg and love to see her ass come down on my cock and I push her down extra deep, almost lost it right there. Fom there took a little break making out ad then back at it in mish and had her legs up over my shoulders and and started out slow but then thrusted faster and deeper. I wanted to try out more positions but thought why not come again. So I continued to pound away and she moaned louder and I finally couldn't hold it any longer and I pulled oud took the cover off and asked her to suck me, and sometimes not sure if the girls will but she got her mouth o my cock and fucked her face and finally unloaded I her mouth and she kept sucking til I was dry. She excused herself and cleaned up. I decided to go shower since I really broke out in a sweat and needed to cool off. She the gave me a soft massage and time was up. I told her I will definitely see her again soon .
positive This was the first time I was using this service. I was already screened so set up was quick. I got the address and finding the place was easy. Knocked on the door and a bombshell wearing black lingerie answered the door. Joy is a great girl, very easy to talk to, loves what she does. After a kiss at the door Joy led me by hand to the room where we undressed. As she helped me with my pants, she gave me a sexy look as she looked at my already rock hard privates. She makes this kind of "pishh" noise whenever she likes something that is pretty sexy. She does this throughout the session. We did the normal cheers session of mouthwash and she readys the shower. She gives a BBBJ during the shower which was great. She paid attention to my balls and everything. After we were finished showering we went to the bed where she continued the BBBJ. I told her that I needed a break and started to DATY. She was moaning and moving her hips like she was about to cum then she asked me to finger her hard until she came. I was then ready so I had her put on the cover and took her to the edge of the bed. I was already so excited so I switched to CG and let her ride me until I finished. Afterward, there was still time left so Joy laid with me in bed and we were talking until the end of my time. Great session. Would definitely repeat.
positive Saw Tina's (used to be Katty) ad and I am happy to learn she came back to OC. Call to make appointment right away. Strongly recommend. VIPs read on. Katty is my ATF. If you are a veteran, you know YMMV on each escort. Review could provide you a good idea on the service level, but the chemistry is what makes the different. In this case, Katty & I were a perfect match. It has been a while since I found another ATF. She welcomed me with a big smile on her face, we both know we are going to have a good time. Follow with a crazy DFK at the door for a few minutes. I told her let's get inside and she gladly comply. More foreplay in the bed room and by the time we get to the bath room, my Jr. got so hard and I released by first pop in her mouth. Dry up and we lay on the bed for a little talk. I love playing with her all natural boobs, it is so soft and perky and her nipple are so sensitive. She had me lay down and give me a tongue bath then more BBBJ and I return the favor and eat her out. It took a while to get her cum but I think it is totally worth it. We can't wait to fuck each other so she put the plastic on me and start riding on top. I had her stand in front of the mirror and pound her with standing doggy. When I felt the urge, I had her lay down on the bed and fuck her MISH because I want to watch her beautiful face. She's my ATF for now and i will keep repeating before she left. Strongly recommend.
positive In her youth, the actress Blair Brown was sometimes described as "the thinking man's bombshell. That is a perfect description of Ivy Rose. I had an extraordinary time with her. The combination of her physical charms and her truly being present in our session made for an absolutely amazing date. Setting up our initial meeting was easy and straightforward. There was the standard screening (I provided references)  and it was not a big deal. Communication by email was prompt and easy. VIPs read on. Non-VIPs, suffice it to say that I will repeat early and often. Ivy Rose has the kind of natural beauty that I love. This is not a woman who hides behind a ton of makeup and artifice. She had gorgeous porcelain skin and a dancer's slim and tight physique. If you have a pulse, her slim supple curves will drive you wild as they did me. There is a warmth and genuineness to Ivy Rose. She is bright and articulate and fully aware of her feminine power and jusy how sexy she is. But she expresses that sexuality with kindness and playfulness. There is nothing arrogant or jaded about her. We talked easily for a few minutes after I arrived. As we talked, we started to caress one another, which led to some delicious making out (a favorite of mine). After nuzzling her through her sexy bra and panties, I peeled them off her. I feasted on her gorgeous breasts (a lovely handful) I could have done thst all day. I loved how responsive she was to breast play. Her response was a turn-on in and of itself. As for the rest of our session? I hate getting into too much detail because (a) there is something crude and mechanical about that and (b) YMMV. On the other hand, when the review process works best, it helps ensure that there are no nasty surprises or disappointments  for the provider or the client. Sooo. For me, the chemistry was just there. We laughed, we talked, We made out some more. Man, did we make out. She is a wonderful and enthusiastic kisser. She was delicious to go down on and very, very responsive. Her oral skills were first class. It took no shortage of will power to keep myself from going over the brink. I had to have more. I covered up and we made love in the classic missionary style. I had every intention of going through a few more positions and acronyms, but I just couldnt let go of her. I loved the full body to body contact, and watching her breasts and hips sway with our rhythm. I loved being deep inside her while looking into her eyes. She felt incredible. She arched her back and moved her hips to meet my thrusts. Eventually, she wrapped her long sexy legs around me. Heaven! When I could take no more, I exploded in the bag. We lay in one anothers arms for a while totally and happily relaxed Ivy Rose's time in this little demi-monde of ours may be limited. I dont think you can do this work indefinitely and truly remain as open to connecting with people as Ivy Rose is. I hope, for my own sake that I am wrong and that i will have the pleasure of her company for a long time to come. My advice to you, fellow pilgrims, is to take advantage of Ivy Rose's time in our hobby. Treat her with kindness and respect and you will have the time of your life.
positive I saw the agency had some new girls and read some of the reviews. I was looking for a totally relaxing experience and Koa seemed like the best bet from her reviews. You can tell her background is from the massage palors as she really excels in this department. Shes tiny and looks thinner than her pictures on the website. She goes out of her way to make sure you have a pleasant experience. I will see her again. VIPs read on Really, theres only two things you need to know about Koa: 1. Nice massage -and- . 2. Rimming. And not necessarily in that ranking order. She does both but shes really into the latter. I mean REALLY into it. Like she was the Korean champion and left to conquer another country in rimming! Having read some of her reviews before making an appointment with the agency, I had some idea of what to expect. I didnt recall reading how tint she is but that was fine with me as I like small women. Her face is nice and I honestly cant tell her age. Like many of the ladies from this agency she could pass as mid twenties to mid forties. Im guessing shes late twenties to early thirties. After entering the room, she gave me a hug and light kiss. She helped me to undress and then turned on the shower for me. Somewhere along the way was a quick rinse of mouthwash she had poured and instructed me to use. Once out of the shower and robed in nothing but a towel, she instructed me to lay on a the bed face down that had a towel laid out. She disrobed, turned on the music, and proceeded to massage my back. During the massage there was some light kissing all the way down my back and thighs. Then she came back up with some light kissing and licking around my butt. Then her kissing and licking became more intense rimming. Kind of like a proctologist rimming. I mean like "your tongue is REALLY up my ass right now" rimming. Somehow I ended up on my back and there was some more light massaging and then some BBBJing, and thenyou guessed it- rimming. At this point Im thinking that this girl is enjoying this more than I am. Eventually she got a cover and rode me CG. She is the definition of a spinner so shes very light and small on you. We switched to missionary where I rode to completion. She asked me if I wanted some more massage and I said yes. She proceeded to give me another massage that was very relaxing through the end of our time together. After a quick exit shower she helped me to get dressed and with a nice hug I was off. She is a really petite and nice girl. She also seems to really enjoy putting her tongue way up your butt for extended periods of time.
positive I wanted some actions in the evening and texted Katty's booker. Katty was available and we sealed the deal. Address is at the familiar apartment complex on a major street. Parking was a bit of pain however managed to find one on the street. Upon arrival, the booker and I exchanged texts for the code and apartment number. Katty opened after I made a quiet knock to the door. For non vips, Katty is cute however there are better performers outhere. Katty has a cute face however she is not very toned at all. Probably needs to lose about 15 pounds. Personally I like slim girls therefore some guys may like Katty's body. No special greetings from her. Just a weak "hi" and "please take shoes off" instruction. Katty led me to the room and we undressed soon afterwards. I fondled Katty's tits to start the mood and we did some light kissings also. We took the initial shower together in which a preview bj wasn't offered. We did some more mutual caressings and kissings to continue the mood. I kept thinking Katty would be much hotter if she had a thinner body. Anyhow, we got dried after the shower and went back to the room. Katty did not really take the lead so I held her hand then we went to the bed. I laid down on my back then Katty proceeded to bbbj. Katty was nothing special here. Not much enthusiasm from her and mediocre skills. Katty then sucked my nipples to continue the foreplay. We then moved to dfk as I got somewhat arroused. At this point, I realized that Katty wasn't doing more foreplays. However, I wanted to play more with Katty so I started to do lick her pussy. Katty did not make much reactions. I felt she was getting bored so I made the gestured to start the main event. Katty installed the cover and we started from the cowgirl position. We then moved to the missionary in which I finally was done. Katty and I took the wrap up shower then we made a light kiss for the goodbye.
positive Preslee is one of the best providers you will ever find. She has a great attitude and is very professional and friendly. I saw her ad on eros several times and read her reviews before finally deciding to meet her. Typical two call system, met her at her location and she greeted me with a LFK and a hug. We chatted for a bit as she made me feel at ease before we got to the fun. The experience was definitely worth it. Preslee is amazing to look at and her personality is addictive. The session was one of the best I've ever had, definitely worth the wait. If you meet her, make sure you treat her right, she will reward you luxuriously. VIPs read on. After a LFK at the door, Preslee asked me to get comfortable. We chatted a bit while I undressed. I was relaxed, but she remained playful as she laid on the bed and watched me unclothed. I walked over to her and asked for a BBBJ and without objection she took me into her mouth. Preslee 's method is knee buckling. Not the best I ever had but certainly a close second. She moaned as she engulfed my cock and applied just the right amount of slobber to get it nice and wet. She took her time too, alternating between fast and slow strokes. She didn't mind when I grabbed her head and began to thrust it into her mouth, in fact she seemed to get more turned on by it. It was getting so good that I felt myself gearing up, so I slowed down and asked for DATY. She looked up at me and smiled as if to say "thought you'd never ask." She got onto her knees and removed her bra to reveal her amazing tits. Preslee's nipples are small and her tits are ripe and perky. I concentrated on them for a moment while she was getting into position on her back. They felt great in my mouth. She then laid on her back and spread her legs wide. I dove right in, tasting every bit of here beautiful, shaved, pussy. It was incredible, I normally don't DATY, but hers is so gorgeous that you are just drawn to do it. After I got her going it was on to some mish. She put a condom on my dick. As I slipped in, her eyes rolled into the back of her head like she was in ecstasy. As I got going I asked if she liked it and she said it feels so good. So I started stroking her with a slow tempo. But it's hard to do with a pussy so wet and tight as Preslee's. I couldn't help but get harder and harder with each moan she let out. I thought at one point she was faking but the look in her eyes let me know that she was really enjoying herself. She pulled me close for some DFK while we were doing it, I loved the feeling of her tongue in my mouth. We switched to doggy and I managed to hold off my first pop for a bit to enjoy it. I started out pumping and enjoying the view. Preslee's got a nice ass. Suddenly she start moving on my cock and i think I grew another inch because of it. I stopped pumping and let her do her thing and before I knew it she had me clinching tight as I popped inside the condom. Afterward she cleaned me up and we chatted a bit more. I wished I could have held on for some CG which I read is excellent. So I gathered my items as we talked. But that's another thing, she never asked me about the time or tried to rush me along. Everything was relaxed and fun. We said out goodbyes and she sent me off with a LFK. YMMV but I would definitely repeat.
positive I was intrigued by the reviews here on TER and decided to see for myself all the rage on her special talents. I contacted her by text. She immediately answered and we discussed a few options which worked for us both. The entire time communicating she was prompt and professional, very easy going, polite. Confirmed on day of session and was given location. Contacted at location and was immediately invited up to her. Upon arrival I was greeted like a special friend, totally warm, inviting and set the mood immediately. She is as attractive as her pics and her face is model level for sure. Soft blond hair and a great smile. Crystal is a sweet treat and I will for sure repeat. This girl is a squirt machine! if this is your thing then try to see her. I think she is low volume, so perhaps be persistent and provide as much info when you communicate. She is a gem. Her looks are very girl next store type, blonde, hot little body and very sexy. Upon arrival she greeted me with a nice DFK and we embraced a nice tight hug. I excused myself to a shower to freshenup some from the day, she seemed to really appreciate that. I exited the shower to find her in lingerie, on the bed. I immediately went to join her and LFK to DFK, soft touches and laying kisses all over her body. I removed rest of her clothes then mine and went straight to DATY. Very clean and smooth, FIV welcomed and starting working her. First highly then to her G-Spot, she warned me of her squirts and asked me if it was ok to drench me. at first I thought this may be some exhaggerated speak on her part... not so! With some warning she bucked, contracted her pussy so hard it pushed my fingers out and bam, drench a roma!. What a sight, I took a small break as she was coming down from her O and then started right back in. Asked her how many she could do? She answered as many as you can take! Kinky and sexy, she moved a little on bed and I continued to work her to a 2nd O, same result, fire hose fire hose. We switched to a 69 and she applied a cover for a nice CBJ. During mutual oral she asked when I was going to fuck her? Not wanting to disappoint I initiated a switch and called the audible, right to doggy and inserted and pounded her... trying to hold myself back long enough to see her get off again we reached O at about the same time...first me and then she had another strong O with another gush #3 for those keeping track. we collapsed to the bed and held each other for a few minutes, chatted etc.. commenting on her special talents we laughed some about it, the hobby, etc.. She is so cool, like having a girl bud of sorts, so so cool to be with. I admitted my fetish to her and we agreed we could get along so nice, her filling my fetish with her talents...like a good hobby match for sure. I shared with her one of my fantasies, and she obliged. I had her straddle my face while I was laying on my back on bed, she grinding my face to an O and squirting all over my face and chest. She asked if I was ready to get drowned? I said I had an invisible snorkel and ability to navigate the waters, so go for it. She laughed and jumped up and stuck her pussy in my face, "like this? this how you like it?" talking to me so hot and kinky, it was so so hot. She worked me first slow then in a rythm until she explode, most yet #4. She squirted so much she had a puddle on my chest. The feeling of the warm sensation of her cum was so sexy, I vowed to go broke seeing her. This session was one that was fun. She seemed to have fun as much as I did. I showered and cleaned up, thanked her for a very nice time and we agreed to meet once again in the future. Will repeat...
positive Standard two call, went up and had a good time. Orange was hot and very eager to please. Will definitely repeat... Have you seen her photo's? She looks just like them only even cuter. What you can't see is attractive and smiley face. We had a nice getting to know each other kiss and cuddle - Orange kissing starts slowly but soon builds into the DFK that I enjoy as much as anything in a session. After undressing each other we moved to the bed for more of the same, but with the intensity increasing until Orange took me in her mouth for some glorious OWO. This turned to 69, which was so incredibly sensual that I had no choice but to come in her mouth. Not until I had quite finished did Orange move away, leaving me a very happy boy. A few minutes of chatting (always a pleasure with a naked girl in my arms) before having to get ready to face the real world again. Orange is a cute and charismatic girl who has that rare ability to make the time you are with her feel intimate rather than a purely commercial transaction.
positive I saw Jenny's ad and since I have a passion for beautiful Asian women I decided to take the plunge. Gorgeous girl with a great body that is very friendly and super sexy. I was craving some Asian cuisine and saw Jenny's ad. I had previous referrals so getting verified was as simple as filling out a form. I typically always try to book my sessions in the AM as early as possible. First off that's when I am at my horniest and second I like to be the girl's first bang of the day. Not into sloppy seconds or in this case most likely sloppy fifths. So I had to take an afternoon session as my schedule did not allow for an early meet. I received Jenny's text 5 minutes prior to my appointment and once I confirmed I was at the hotel she texted me the room #. When I knocked on the door I was greeted by a beautiful Thai girl. I didn't expect her to be so pretty but she was stunning with a superb body to match. She greeted me in a teddy and red high heel combo that got my blood pumping. She was very talkative from the start. Left my donation on the dresser and made my way to the shower. All the while she kept watching me and talking to me. Once out of the shower we started caressing each others bodies. She has a great set of breasts. Seemed very real to me and they were extremely soft and firm. Nice size nipples that she loved being licked. Thankfully. Don't know how many other providers have sensitive nipples. We started a little LFK to DFK and I could smell a hint of BO most likely from the previous dude's visit. I have an uncanny sense of smell almost that of a bloodhound and yes it is a curse. So really didn't pursue the DFK even though I love to and require it to set me int he right mood with any girl. I made my way down south and started my session like all others with a lengthy DATY. Her pussy smelled of her scented lotion so it didn't smell bad and made my time down there enjoyable for both. After she proceeded to give me a decent BBBJ but nothing earth shattering. Wasn't able to DT which was disappointing. Started our fuck session in Mish. She wears fake grey contacts that really makes her look incredibly gorgeous and the site of her while pumping away looked amazing. There was a mirror right across from the bed that helped intensify the session. DS was next which was an incredible sight to behold. She admitted herself: "not bad for an Asian girl" It was spectacular for an Asian girl. WOW! Stayed there a good long time taking it all in. Finally she continued sucking my dick with the cover on and then ripped it off and continued sucking without the cover. Started giving me a HJ but I had to use my own hand to get myself to blow. While she lay next to me and continued sucking on those beautiful breasts of hers. I asked her how much time we had left and she told me 7 minutes even though we did have a little more. We showered together and got cleaned up and she told me she was going out for lunch. So most likely she was hungry and wanted to finish up a little early. Regardless, I had a great time with a beautiful lady. I would definitely repeat if she returns to NJ.
positive Saw Samantha's reviews and checked out her ad pictures, she is really cute with a nice figure. Sent her a text and we set up a date at her incall, I arrived and she gave me the room number. She was looking hot and sexy just like her pictures...................... We hugged and LFK, leading to DFK kissing as we were standing inside the door. I stripped off her clothes and lifted her on to the bed, she was sitting on the bed facing me and I was standing in front of her we were DFK kissing as I laid her back so I could suck her nipples and finger her pussy, as I went to DATY on her honey sweet pussy until she had an "O". Laid back on the bed and she gave me a nice long BBBJ, with some ball licking, we flipped around to 69. Grabbed a cover and we fucked in Mish with her legs over my shoulders, on her side, and cg, rcg, then doggie with my thumb in her ass, as we lubed it up for some hot Doggie Greek and Lazy Doggie Greek. Until we ripped off the cover and she kneeled in front of me and BBBJ sucked my cock and balls until I came in her mouth and she went to spit. Samantha is a really cool young lady and a lot of fun to spend time with.
positive I finally took a chance on Natalie. I had a good time . VIP read on I gave Natalie the directions to my place she got turn around a little bit but she eventually found it. She came to the door and I opened it to fine a young petite female standing before me. She is a cute female. I led to the bedroom and had her freshen up a bit then we got the business part out the way. She proceeded to give me a cbj which was pretty good then I layed on her back and pounded her for a good while then I turned over and we doggy until I took off the cover and let loose on her butt. She got up washed off and on to round 2. I was already ready go so we got the hat and I had her ride on top until I finish again this time in the cover. She got dress and we said our goodbyes. All in all was pretty good experience.
positive Had the pleasure of meeting Brooke on a couple of occasions. The first time was at my office since she was only offering outcall ... I was a nervous wreck since the cleaning people were late and I did not know if they would show up at any minute. Brooke was a total sweetie during the entire time. She was completely calm and performed beyond expectations under the circumstances. This was all the proof I needed to seek a second rendezvous when she returned to town a couple weeks later. The second time around was even better since she was offering incall and I did not have to worry about cleaning people showing up. Brooke is smoking hot and very easy going. I will repeat any time she comes to town. VIPs keep reading. Brooke has the body of a goddess ... oh what an ass she has on her!!! Although she is not GFE, her skills are amazing. Her CBJ was as good as any BBBJ I have ever had. During our first encounter, we were all over the conference room and explored every conceivable position. She definitely has great stamina!!! Our second rendezvous occurred at her nice incall hotel where she met me by the elevators. It was a little chilly out and Brooke was dressed accordingly. After we entered the room and she peeled off some layers of clothes, I got an instant hard-on!!! We caught up as we both proceeded to get naked. Next, it was go time and Brooke kicked things off with her amazing BJ. I followed that up with some DATY in mish and from behind ... she smelled and tasted like fresh fruit!!! Finally, the main course was started and finished doggy style. After we cleaned up, Brooke walked me to the door and gave me a big hug and peck goodbye.
positive Samantha is a pretty girl. She has a 1990s Jennifer Connelly look. I have seen her a few times. We set up via text for a reasonable price. I typically arrive on time and she is ready on time. She is always fresh from the shower and is clean and greats me with a nice kiss. She had a baby about a year ago and her midsection has never quite snapped back. A little odd - visible, but not hideous. Something to be aware. Obviously I have repeated. She is a nice girl and once she gets to know you - she becomes quite a bit of fun. Samantha is a sweet girl with a few demons in her life that she is far from having worked out. She is naive, nineteen, and it shows. She likes anything "cozy" so gifts in the category are welcome. Her room typically smells like a smoky dungeon. If I'm going to be seeing a girl several times - I'll give her tobacco outlet stores' "smoke odor eliminator." Since then she has used it for me before I arrive and it helps a lot - a small sign of respect on her part. I am not sure if she uses it more generally. Samantha has a great body - cute soft ass, soft soft breasts and a sweet face. Her belly is a little baffling. As mentioned - its like it has never snapped back after pregnancy. I'm not sure she cares too much - she has other more pressing struggles. She always greets me with a kiss and then strips to her panties and strips me to my boxers and we hop under the covers for kissing and cuddling. She loves cuddling and light kissing - any time I push with the deeper kissing, I don't get any response. I don't press it - she will do almost anything, but it is not my thing to push too hard. She provides a bbbj with attention to the boys. her skills are okay - no deep throat, CIM is possible. Her vagina is crazy tight, small, with tiny labia. I always bring lube and she commented to me that sex often hurts - she does not get very wet naturally, she claims the lube helps a lot. I then found out she had none of her own and often has painful sex without lubricant. She seems to shop little. I left her a bottle which received out-sized thanks considering how minor the gift. While she is accommodating with almost any form of sex - she is naive about how to make it the most enjoyable for herself and her partner. She takes instruction well, but absolutely needs instruction. Samantha is a passive and submissive person. She does little for herself beyond the minimum of shelter, being clean, and taking care of basic needs. She is apparently a little too giving to others in her life and her possessions are few. Any show of kindness is hugely appreciated. She is the same way with sex. Most anything is allowed, but she will not initiate or offer. She is a quite lover which requires careful attention to her breathing. Her favorite is vanilla sex in the missionary position with light kissing (we've all had girlfriends like this). We have done most other normal positions together, but if I let her lead - that is the position where we end up. Orgasms seem to be rare for her, but careful attention will get her there with much appreciation from her. At the end of the day, Samantha is a nice girl with reasonable prices. She will meet most guys' reasonable requests. I've never done it but Greek is available. DIY has always always been clean and enjoyable - though I don't think I've ever made her cum from oral alone. If you can comfortably take the lead - you will have a good time. If you prefer to relax and have a girl service you without instruction, you may want to look elsewhere.
positive Crystal is one of the hidden gems of Minnesota. She has a small clientele and intends to keep it that way. I have been seeing her for a couple months but she did not want any new reviews. After the third visit, I asked if I could share my view of her. Crystal is a truly beautiful, charming spinner who is relatively new to our community. She is fit, clean and outdoorsy. She is passionate and playful. Interesting to talk too. As she gets more experienced, she is screening more carefully (although not intrusively). Her emails are professional--do not play her. She is not a clock watcher. She is especially interested in finding new regulars. Because of her low volume and interest in developing regulars, new callers should not expect to succeed on short notice. She should have no problem finding devotees. Be nice; you will want to repeat. I am; I do and I will. Each time, I am greeted by a lovely clean woman in a sexy nightgown who gives me a warm embrace and a deep French open mouth kiss. She likes her coffee black. And that, dear reader is all that I can tell the public. Read on. Suffice to say, I am seeing her again and again. She is so beautiful that she brings out the best in those she sees. After we embrace and share some deep french kisses, we spend some time talking and drinking coffee. Cleanliness is next to godliness--it seems only fair to return the goddesses' favor. Although freshly showered and shaven, I slip off to clean up a bit. The clothes fall off as we undress each other and we fall on the bed. We know each other now. But each time we find new ways to play. I do not know the full extent of her menu. She is a wonderful kisser--long deep french kisses. She is responsive when I DATY. She and I both enjoying her response as we have become more and more comfortable with each other. She chats as we enjoy each other--meeting with Crystal is not the silent workout of some encounters. She likes to receive and give massages but she is not a professional masseuse. But she loves to give and receive petting all over. I only accept CBJ and I do not believe she offers BBBJ. but she has spectacular oral skills. She speaks Russian too. We have sex. Mish, side to side, top to side, pretty much any position that bendable bodies can enjoy until we were both utterly spent and completely happy. She is high on the Multi-O Richter Scale. She is vocal with a remarkable vocabulary for such a pretty young thing. ;-) Afterwards, we cuddle up under the sheets and chat until the time is gone. Next time, I think we will try some erotica. She is a good reader. More kisses and I was on my way, a lovely time. She has a good friend in this community--she is definitely open to doubles. Crystal is a wonder. She is so low volume and UTR that she will never be a must see. Those who get to meet her will be the fortunate few.
positive Chose Jackie for a noon visit for two reasons: 1.) Reportedly big boobs, 2.) Reportedly good performance. The upshot: 1.) Boobs are very nicely implanted. Could be large C but look big on her very skinny figure, so Ill say Ds; nice nipples, too. (No where near the DDD claimed in her ads, though) 2.) Performance was perhaps average for an AMP; no better, no worse. Assessment of her looks has to take into account her relatively nice breasts, but her facial features can be described as pleasant a best, late 30s perhaps. Also, she has a very skinny, almost bony physique. When I told her I hadnt been to this AMP before, she told me what her fee was, and I pointed to where I had set it on the table. After MS collected the house fee and brought me a soda, I sat on the bed and waited for almost twenty minutes before Jackie came in. Maybe she was tired from the night before. She wore a bra and panties and gave me a light hug and lighter kiss. She asked if I wanted a shower and didnt understand when I said I was up for one. Instead, she laid on the bed, so I followed and began light kissing. The high point was probably the BBBJ that was a step or two above average; the sort I could go over the edge on if not careful. When she stopped to move on to the main event, she said shed forgotten to bring in a condom and asked if I wanted her to leave the room to get one. I indicated either way, so in it went. Shes very tight and not used to servicing those on the larger side, so it was a bit of a struggle. She was game, though, and let me switch to CG and DS. Back in mish, I could see she was having a bit of a hard time of it, so I let myself go, whereupon she wanted me out pretty quickly. We did some small talk and I accepted her offer of a table shower, which was mediocre at best. When she was done with me, I dried myself off while she douched herself with the shower massage for a full minute, at least. The next guy thats into DATY shouldnt have too much to worry about. On leaving, I didnt know if she was asking me to come back again or not. Maybe it was to come back again but choose someone else.
positive Linsdsey was my first provider with AME. So I had no real expectations as to what I was getting myself into. Jaimee was very helpful through the booking process and I made it to the hotel. I originally wanted to see another provider but she was out for the day. So she suggested Lindsey. I agreed, her pictures looked intriguing. I highly recommend. VIP's read on... So I got tot the room and Lindsey came to open it and greeted me with pecker on the lips. Shen is the girl on the pictures. She was wearing a white pink lingerie top. I went for a quick shower and when I came out she began talking to get to know each other. I started to make my way down as I was eager to eat her pussy out, She tasted delicious and spent quite sometime down there, gave her a little rimming. After 10mins or so I moved up on top of her and directed my dick towards her mouth. It wasnt the greatest BJ ever, but it felt real good. She did a teeth grinding, but nothing to cry about. She later expressed she wants to get better at it. All I could say was that practice makes perfect. So I exploded in her mouth and she got up and went to S&W. We cuddled a bit and chatted a little more, she went back to another BBBJ to get my boy up and she did. I asked for the cover she did CG. we also did some doggy and scissors. It was a great session. She provided great value. I highly recommend. Treat her well.
positive Jenny was in Raleigh to start the New Year, so I sent email and set-up appt. Easy to set-up. She was staying in a nice hotel near NCSU. She had to meet at the elevator and took me up. She is BEAUTIFUL. Non-vips, see her if you can. When Jenny met me at the elevator, I was stunned. She is an absolutely gorgeous Asian. When we got inside, I went to shower and upon coming out saw that she was in a tiny bra and panty set. Her body is amazing. It is lithe and firm. We chatted a bit. She is from Thailand. After that we kissed and she removed her bra and panties. She has very nice tits for her small frame. They are natural and shapely. She likes to have them sucked. She asked if a wanted to see her play with herself and I said yes. She pulled out a vibrator and played with her pussy while I also played with her. While she was doing this she also started sucking my cock and moved closer to her face and started fucking her mouth. After that we moved to her being on top and riding me. Her tits looked great and she leaned over for me to suck them while she rode me. We changed positions to doggy style. She came while we were in this position and her cream oozed out on me. Very sexy. Then we switched again to her riding me and me sucking her tits. She finished me by leaning over my cock sucking it while I played with her bent-over pussy. A great time. I am not sure, but Jenny reminded me very much of Mia Lee that used to work for the Provocative Playmate Agency.
positive CALLED SARAH AFTER 2 AM, SHE ARRIVED IN 20 MINUTES. I WAS IMPRESSIVE TO OPEN THE DOOR AND SEE A VERY YOUNG AND SEXY GIRL, BETTER THAN THE PICTURES. VERY SEXY VOICE AND GREAT ATTITUDE. ONE OF THE BEST SERVICES I EVER HAD. when she arrived i offered her a beer,we talked for for about 5 min. then I toke care of the payment; when she felt safe, she called the driver to make sure everything was OK . she grabbed my hand and put inside her panties. then i realized i got a good one. as soon as i got my pants down, she started playing with my dick, she said she doesn't do BBBJ in her first time but even with a condom it was great, she kept saying how nice my dick looks and kept licking my balls pretty good. we got on the bed i was sucking on her boobs and fingering her tight pink pussy. i tried a little kiss, she said she wouldn't kiss or have her pussy licked. i understood, in fact i was over excited with her looks. we tried a missy for about 10 min before the driver called to check on her. she answered the phone told him everything was ok. the we move to doggy; by the way, what a great ass. i pounded her hard, she screamed loud for a few minutes. then i got her on my favorite position, the cowgirl. she was riding me wile i was sucking her boob. we went on for about 5 minutes till i came. she cleaned my dick and we enjoyed another beer together, till that stupid driver called again I ENJOYED MY TIME SPENT WITH SARAH, SHE HAS PERKY BREASTS, WITH PUFFY NIPPLES. A SEXY BIG ASS AND A TIGHT SHAVED PUSSY.WE TRIED A FEW POSITIONS. SHE IS NOT RUSHED, BUT THE DRIVER CALLED TO CHECK ON HER 3 TIMES. SHE SAID IT WAS BECAUSE I WAS A FIRST TIMER, AND SHE HAD A BAD EXPERIENCE THE WEEK BEFORE. LOOKING FOWARD TO SEE HER AGAIN
positive Recently Ive been contemplating retiring from the hobby. It was great medicine during a very difficult year. Just the other day I thought I had made the decision to finally step away, until my encounter with Cindy that is. Its encounters like these that make it so difficult to quit. I mean, the great thing about this hobby, is that you can fall in love for an hour, walk out the door, and life returns to normal. No pining after the woman, no need for all that romantic shit. You just check out of the session and youre done. How great is that!? Well Ill tell you, not so great if you want to quit... So, let me tell you about Cindy She is very Sexy, plain and simple. And theres this look in her eyes that says Fuck me with a capital F. This woman is truly a sexual being. She loves to be touched, everywhere. My finger tips and her nipples had an absolute love affair! Not kidding! Her skin you ask? OMG! Exquisite! She has beautifully soft skin covering her entire body. Its flawless. Okay, she does carry a few extra pounds, but she wears it very well. I can say that she has very nicely shaped, large breasts that defy gravity. Yes, theyre natural. And her scent Not the one emanating from between her legs, but that pheromone thing. Hers is uhthe kind of scent that you know is there, but you just cant quite get your hands on it. Just when you think its within your reach, its gone again. Very elusive, very teasing in nature. But its there, and its real, and its amazing, and it lit me up! Activities We began with dfk. After getting me excited with that, she proceeded down to give me an amazing cbj. She really knows how to do this wonderfully- the right amount attention to the boys, great with spit, and tremendous sucking and licking. This was too much for me to handle so it was sog1. After cleaning me up and a few minutes of chitchat, she started getting me ready for round two. It takes work to get me ready, but she was into doing it. After I was at attention, we began in missionary. She growns beautifully. After that we switched to cowgirl, followed by doggie (my favorite) during which I lost control. The site of it all from that angle :). Really great. So much for quitting I guess...
positive Had her on my radar for a few months. Finally pulled the trigger and texted her. After a bit of screening we set a date for the next afternoon. I arrived at a decent mid-range hotel in RTP and was sent the room number. She is a sweet young woman who clearly enjoys what she does. Book with confidence. If you're into asian spinners, this is a slam dunk. I walked into the room and was greeted with a warm hug from Noa. Took care of the donation and removed my clothes. (I like to do that since it puts the provider at ease) She started with a bbbj that was very slow and sensual. She told me that she's akways thinking about sex, even on her days off. Then we started doing cowgirl and DFK. I was going real slow and really trying to make the moment last. I could feel her quiver as she came the first time. She then suggested a change of positions and we moved to lazy doggy. (My all time favorite) where the woman lays on her stomach. It was wonderful and we both achieved orgasm after several minutes. I told her thank you for such an awesome experience and she replied, No, no, no thank YOU! Definitely gave me a lot of mojofor weeks after that. Treat her well guys and you'll have a fantastic experience like I did.
positive I have seen Devin's reviews before but I wasn't sure if she was what I normally would go after, read her ad though and she says FF so thought it would be worth a try. Texted her and very responsive but cautious about new people which I understand, sent her some references so we could talk a little more freely which she did and made an arrangement to meet. Devin is better than her pics and definitely a naughty MILF that loves everything about what she is doing. Met at a hotel near the mall in Kennesaw, typical two call but had a girl friend come down and let me in the side door when it was time to come up. She stayed outside and didn't enter the room, Devin is trying to keep the traffic down from the lobby entrance. She met me at the door with a warm smile, dressed really sexy and gave me DLFK with that tongue piercing. I have already made plans to see this Gem again, well worth the price and she loves to please. I had already pre arranged a fetish session, Devin will not discuss specifics in text so I gave her references to make her more comfortable as I want my sessions to be good for both of us. I generally only see Greek providers and Devin lists Fetish Friendly in her ad. She assured me we could do Greek although its been a while we agreed on terms prior to the appointment. She met me with LDFK at the door as I grabbed two handfuls of the perky bubble butt and squeezed, she moaned as we were lip locked. Devin has really big tits as I moved from ass cheeks to those big huge fun bags. Devin loves to kiss and has lots of tongue action, very excellent kissing as my big head is thinking about the oral assault on my cock that's about to happen. We chatted a bit and I asked about using my own condoms, she checked for no latex, she has latex issues, mine weren't and she showed me hers all Poly and top shelf. Devin is a MILF, a very dirty MILF with signs of CB but nothing that distracted me from the rest of her from head to toe kept me hard even before she laid a hand on me. She helped strip me down which I find very sexy as she sat on the bed and began putting my semi hard cock BBBJ in her mouth. Devin really has fantastic skills with her hands, mouth, and tongue. Lots of ball play and ball sucking, using her hands with slow twisting motion, flicking my cock head with her tongue stud, tons of eye contact looking up as she made slurping sounds and took my cock deep in her throat only to slowly withdraw it circling the head of cock with her tongue. She was getting me ready to pop so I had to have her stop and put on the cover, I always ask the girls to do it, seems really sexy to me which she did, applying lube before and after putting it on. She got up on all fours on the bed while I still stood on the floor, Devin has a really nice pussy. Not super tight but she can contract it anytime she wants and make it grip like a vice and then release which I prefer if I don't want to pop too soon. I was starring at her rosebud the whole time while fucking her and lubed it a little, put a finger in it, tight like ass virgin tight. She kind of winced a little and said its been a while, I asked how long is a little while? She replied years, but its ok she really likes it just no one really asks for it. I withdrew my finger and cock from her holes and got on the bed as I wanted her to ride me with those huge tits in my face. None to disappoint as she climbed on and guided me in her really wet pussy, she got a rhythm going and was grinding her clit on my pubic bone as she rocked on my cock. She likes the contact and well it felt good as she would convulse with pleasure her pussy would tighten up around my cock, felt fantastic as she was milking my cock every time she moaned. This was getting to be too much and wanted to look at that papow ass so she spun around and rode me RCG. Dam this girl can move. I was watching that fantastic ass shake as she was making circular and figure 8 motions alternating on my cock as she was riding the full length of my shaft, never once letting it pop out of her. If it wasn't for the fact I wanted in her ass I would have been in heaven blowing my load right then and there. I had have her stop and asked her to get back on all fours while I stood again so I could get in the right position to fuck that re virginized ass. I lubed her up from behind and put my cockhead right at her little opening, I pushed forward and as it started to relent her head went down and she clenched the sheets with a death grip, I heard a muffled "easy". At this point I didn't want to hurt her so I said I'll stay still and you back up on it at your comfort level, she nodded and let the sheets go a little and started rocking on my cock. It took a few minutes of this as she slowly worked my more than average cock in her asshole. As it went deeper she would gasp a little and grip the sheets but she seemed to enjoy this pleasure/pain. I kept going a little deeper and deeper as time went by about half of my fat prick was in her ass and god is it fucking tight, I could feel myself starting to boil in my nuts and asked her if it was ok if I rubbed my cock on her ass and blow on her starfish. She said yes as I pulled out and off with the cover I starting slapping her ass crack and asshole with my cock and it was slewing spunk all over her back, and ass crack. Shit did it feel good, I worked her ass over good and think she needs some more ass fucking which I'm quite willing to oblige. Devin has a rocking body, mad skills, more than accommodating services, extremely friendly and loves to talk if you like that. Fantastic hygiene and personality of a girl next door, I will be seeing this Gem over and over again.
positive Saw her ad pop up and called right away. Told her what I was looking for and I was off to her incall. Good at what she does for the price. May repeat when in need for something down and dirty.. got to her apartment complex and called her. Took her over 10 min to get back in touch with me. Gave me her apt. number, went in and she gave me the fake "high there big boy" small talk. Put the donation down and I got undressed as did she. I was just there for a blow an go and she did not disappoint in that category. I chose to sit on the couch she sat next to me and started rubbing my cock as I roamed her tight little body with my hand squeezing her ass and fingering her pussy. Started a BBJ and it was pretty good as she could deep throat and knew what she was doing. Grabbed her head and pushed myself in deep and she was good with it. Face funked her till I let a big load stream down her throat. She can take it and seems to like it. Got dressed, she said to make sure I call again, and left.
positive Was not able to see her as she was taking a day off, but was able to connect later that week. PO is awesome, quick text reply, no verification as I'm repeat customer, clear direction. Nice clean incall. Greeted at the door by a pretty and super friendly girl. Clean apt, started with DFK with lots of tongue. Stripped, and went for a shower together. Cleaned me well. Got treated to her famous shower routine - rimming, and HJ from behind. Once on bed, more rimming, BBBJ, BLS, and awesome DT. Had to stop her, and started with a quick DATY. Cover on, and CD, RCG, and finished with MISH. Short massage, and nice conversation - she is easy to talk to, and have great bubbly personality! Offered a second pop, but I have enough for the night. Off to a second shower, and walk out happy. Will definitely repeat.
positive I have wanted to see Piper since she first came on TER. After a couple of times where our schedule didn't mesh, I finally got a hour appointment. Scheduling was easy through her scheduler who does the usually checks. Gave me the time and address. When I got there a beautiful blonde opened the door. I was greeted with a long wet kiss. I will repeat. Already set up. We went into the room where there was a massage table and a bed. I have been there before with another provider so I was familiar. She took off her top which just left a pair of black panties. I started to undress but she came over and started some great DFK. Wonderful way to start. I finally laid on the table and she started a very nice massage with her boobs dragging across my back. I had my hands rubbing and feeling her body. Rubbed her pussy through the panties and, boom, off they come, She is now on the table doig a great massage ad body to body. She gets off and stands next to my head so I decide a little DATY is in order. I get my fingers in and she says, lets move to the bed. once on the bed, I continue DATY and she really sounds like she is havig fun. I get my fingers back in ad start some more DFK. One thing about her pussy. It is not a cave. It is fleshy o the inside which I foud really exciting. She rolls over and I am working my fingers. Then, she squirts all over my leg, crotch, stomach. I really love squirters and she really gushed. We continued to kiss and then she started down my body. Sucked my nipples and gave them a few little bites. Down my body and the started a great BBBJ. I really wanted to last but with everything that had happened, I just blew. Sometimes after I cum, a woman will be a little too aggressive but Piper had a nice slow tender sucking that felt great. She got up and spit it out into the waste basket and came back with some warm towels. We laid together for a while and talked. We talked a lot through the session which really made it seem like a GFE. I looked at the clock and still had a half hour so she finished with a great massage which was nice since I was on my way to work from there. All in all, I had a great time. I've already set uo an appointment with her and another provider.
positive Meet at a building located at a fairly popular intersection in uptown Minneapolis. Location was discreet and very clean. Was meet by an attractive blonde girl dressed in a robe.Knew instantly that this session would be fun! Was offered a drink before the start, and then we were off to the races. Piper is an amazing girl with amazing qualities that I look for in a massage. She was friendly, talkative ( not overly talkative), and did not rush. At the beginning of the session she started by wearing only her panties. These would come off as the session progressed. She started with a great massage on my back and legs. This put me at ease right away. There was some teasing which is a plus. She asked if there were any areas that needed attention, so I mentioned my upper back. She spent most of her time on that section. About 30 minutes in the fun began. She started on my chest and quickly moved to my private area. At this point the panties were off and the b2b began. A few times I thought I may slip in. I then began to put a fiv which she throughly enjoyed. She got off to that a few times. She thanked me by giving a bbbj. This was the most amazing thing every. She then asked if I wanted to move to the bed. Of course I obliged. That's when she took my balls in her mouth and continued to give a hj. I finished by cim. This was my atf! Treat her right and enjoy guys!!
positive Booked through Talia who is great. Cindy Jane is beautiful and looks exactly like pics. Really pretty face and killer body. She's very very shy, at least with me she was. So it was awkward in the beginning. BUT once we got started... different story. I would repeat. She was very nice, but no eye contact and I had to drive the conversation and get things started, it was awkward for sure... But then we got naked and things just got better and better. She's a good kisser, LFK with a little DFK. She definitely wants to please and is very attentive. She has a great body and I spent some time kissing and touching her that led to DATY, she's nice down there, and it certainly seemed like she got off (or fooled me but either way it was fun) Then she went down on me and was solid there. Working shaft and boys nicely. At this point there was not enough time left for multi shots on goal so I pulled her up and she got on top of me. The sex was great. Multiple positions, mostly versions of cowgirl, doggie and some scissors (I think... kind of a blur). Finished with her on top. She didn't cum but was into it. I would have already repeated, but this is all new to me so I'm kind of seeing what's out there. She's top 3 for me out of 10 or so since starting in the hobby. Next time I'd probably just skip the awkward chit chat and get to where she is more comfortable expressing herself. Something very sweet about this girl despite the shyness.
positive Needed a break and Leya looked like she could help me out. I will repeat. VIPS's read on Leya is sexy. I told her it was something about her gap between her teeth. Arrived at a mid level hotel. Be warned that that the security looked like LE but they are over dressed security. Her room was right out the elevator. Could be a good thing or bad. Today it was good. When began talking for a while as i got comfortable. We discussed her open mind and I made a slight adjustment to the business end of things. Off to the races. We began in the 69. She let me know this wasn't her favorite position but I changed her mind for our time together. She is one of the wettest girls I have seen and her videos don't lie. She has very pretty and soft feet. I noticed this while her long legs were placed on my shoulders. She can take what you give and give it right back. Once she was primed I turned on the faucet. Missionary, to doggy, then back to missionary. I finished during the faucet play, the slip and slide was way to much to handle at this point. Very good experience with a sweet heart. As I said I will repeat again.
positive Saw Ariana earlier this month when work took me to Vegas. I had briefly read up her reviews on other boards, so I knew what to expect. Made an appointment for her to visit me at my hotel on the strip. She was professional throughout the set up process and arrived at my door sharp on time. I was amazed at her beauty - she looks far better in person than what I had come to expect from her pictures! VIPs - read on As soon as I closed the door after letting her in, she locked lips and began an amazing kissing session - not much DFK, more LFK, but she touched me at the right places. I knew I was in for a treat. Never mentioned donation through the entire session - that is a class act in my opinion. Excused herself, and cam back out after a few minutes in an incredible negligee. She has a smoking hot body for sure, fit and tight. I grabbed her ass and thrust her on the bed toward me. She leaned in and another groping and kissing session started. She took her time, didn't rush the session at all. Gradually working her way down, junior was ready for action. She engulfed me in her mouth, great technique, slurping, and overall technique. Didn't ignore the boys either. She probably spent a good 10 minutes there, I ain't kidding! I am a one-pop guy so I didn't want it to end there. Pulled her up grabbing her amazing ass - man, it's amazing feeling her on top of you naked, with your hands on her ass, and her hair falling on your face. Started cowgirl, switched to reverse cowgirl, and eventually lazy dog. That's when I couldn't hold it any longer and blew my load. She is tight and knows how to work your member when inside her. Cleaned up and lay by my side, caressing my chest and talking about life in Vegas. She is young, but has a mature mind. Great at holding conversations. I had somewhere to be so I asked her to leave before time was up, otherwise she would've stayed longer. Next time I'm in Vegas, I will probably book a longer dinner date with her. You definitely want to be seen with her in public!
positive I was in the mood so i try to find some gems so i really find one. read the reviews and send a text she respond fast i got verified and give her a call she answer we set the time and i was on my way. She looks way better than her pics 100% recommended. he place was 1h away from be but she really worth the drive. she was in ok hotel when i arrive she leave the door open and she greet me. i set in the bed and we start DFK like lovers. put the donation on the table and she even didn't count it or hide it. I know i was going to have a good time. we take the close off really fast and we start with some more DFK then she work her way down to kiss junior. i love her how she do it specially when she start using her piercing in her tongue. i had to stop her before i blew i touch her kitty and she was really wet so she get a condom and she rode me. i don't know if she was acting or not but she was trusting really hard and making pleasure noises until she relax and touch down there again and is wetter than before so i think she came. i was my turn after CG we move to MISH where i get my first pop. we talk a little and more DFK this time was sideways scissors while we DFK and touching her big boobs. i think she like that position because she don't let me stop so i give my second pop we start see each other and LFK like we are lovers and she put her ass close to junior and start moving so he was up in no time and we try for third cup but i was tired already really weird for me but i guess i was we so much stress for work so i release two time a lot but ether way we try and was past my time so i dress give last DFK and was on my way. i really recommend her and i will repeat i just hope she move closer to perimeter or down town because 1h driving is a lot and with Atlanta traffic even worse. treat her well she deserve it.
positive Hey i called Kacey told her where i was staying. There was a knock at the door she came in and i thought to myself cute. Her skills are great i would definitely repeat So here a the details. Her head game is on point. She suck the dick so good i didnt even realize the condom was on. Pussy is tight and wet. She smelled good looked even better than her pics. At one point in the session i got a cramp and went limp she didnt rush me. She let me get myself together. She started sucking the dick got it up again and we continued. This girl is great i will definitely be seeing her again soon.
positive Had a business trip planned to Minnesota. Did some research and figured that I needed to see Crystal. I was so glad that I picjked her. She is demure, but so sexy. She does some light screening so be prepared. Once I was cleared, we set a date with an approximate time, that would depend on my business schedule. She was very flexible and accommodating. When I was in town and knew my schedule we set a time. When I arrived at her nice incall location I was pleasantly surprised with how good she looked and how spunky she was. We hit it off from the get go. After getting acquainted for a few minutes, we began to DFK and clothes began to hit the floor. Non VIP guys, run to see her if you can pass her screening. Do not delay! This one is way woprth your time! VIP guys get details below: OK - so clothes flew everywhere and soon I was down on her sweet love box munching away. She loves DATY and gets wet pretty quickly. I had read about the rain showers and she does not disappoint. It only took about 10 minutes of furious tongue lashing to get her to her first O. She almost drowned me! What a way to go, if one is going to drown! As soon as she got her breath, we DFK some more and then she began to reciprocate with a nice CBJ. She is way flexible and before long we were romping in a number of different positions. She started with a good cowgirl ride. Looking up at her bouncing up and down on my cock really got me going. CG morphed the RCG then to doggy. I pinned her flat on the bed for some nice tight prone doggy before lifting her hips and pounding away, while she voiced her approval and encouraged me to go harder. Before long, we had both built up to another crescendo and as soon as she squirted again, I could no longer hold out and I ripped off the condom and dropped a major load on her ass crack and back. She smiled coyly and commented how nasty we had been. Yea - it was fun I told her. We laughed when the subject of Santa's naughty list came up! She is one in a million and very much worth the effort! Hot Hot Hot ... run to see her if you can get in, but don't be an ass! She is a sweetie!
negative Taylor is a great girl. Very beautiful. Natural blonde hair, blue eyes, etc. She's incredibly fun and loves to party. Easy to book if you fill out the form on her site. She is well put together and smells wonderful. Everything you'd expect out of a provider with this good of a reputation. I will be repeating next time I'm in Las Vegas. Taylor showed up wearing a form fitting dress that showed off her epic tits and ass while keeping it understated enough to not call too much attention to herself. I was excited to see her. She excused herself to the bathroom to take care of business and came back out wearing her lingerie, as requested. We immediately went to each other with some great LFK, then DFK. Very passionate. She is a great kisser with soft lips. After taking off our clothes we moved to the bed. We kept up with the passionate kissing and touching. I had to slow myself down a couple times, as I was starting to hyperventilate from excitement. I caught my own breath and kept going, sucking her perfect tits and grabbing her ass, fingering her. She was really responsive to all the foreplay. I went down on her and she tasted perfect. I was not ready for her BBBJ skills. They don't get brought up often enough in her reviews. I think I let out a "nyeaaaahhh" when she was doing it. I came in her mouth and she eagerly swallowed every drop, looking up at me longingly with those huge blue eyes of hers. I had taken 150mg of Viagra before the appointment (HOLY FUCK, BY THE WAY) and I was able to stay hard and put on a condom. She was helpful in putting it on. She had an eager look on her face, like she couldn't wait to fuck. Can't say I blame her. I put it inside her and she let out the sexiest moan I've ever heard. She was gyrating her hips and moving around all sexy. I flipped her over to doggy style and she kept coming, multiple times. It was really, really hot. I finally finished a second cup. Spilling it, I mean. I cleaned myself up and we chatted for a bit. Like I said. Will repeat.
negative Saw on P411 that Ariana is visiting and read her TER reviews and WOW! They are all true. She is amazing. I knew I had to see her and was definitely not disappointed. Contacted via email and her terrific assistant responded quickly. She screens carefully but honestly that makes me feel more comfortable. Its worth the effort! It was the typical two call system to get to her place and then Ariana had to come downstairs to let me up to her hotel room. VIPs read on. Ariana looks exactly like in her photos, but she is even more beautiful in person, and her photos (and even films) dont reflect her intelligence and her wonderful, friendly, enthusiastic personality! She is such a warm and bubbly person. Everything that previous reviewers wrote is true in spades: Ariana is the holy grail. This girl really pays attention to all details! Amazing outfit, beautiful lingerie, perfectly made up and clean--everywhere LOL. It was really lovely talking with her about her experiences and career. Arianas physique is outstanding! Lovely ass, long legs, flat tummy, suckable boobs! Her face and dark hair are truly beautiful: lovely, warm, deep eyes, beautiful nose, lips, cheeks, and everything else. We started with LFK and then made out for quite a long time exploring each others bodies. Her butt is amazingly tight, and her pussy delicious! I went down for DATY and enjoyed it immensely. Tasted her ass as well, it was beautiful. Sucked her tits for what seemed like hours, and was in heaven!! She then gave me a wonderful, sensual BBBJ. I almost popped, and asked her instead to put on the hat and we went at it missionary. It was wonderful to be close to her and look in her beautiful eyes while we kissed. After doing that for a while, I realized it would be best to go back to the BBBJ/HJand it was amazing coming in her pretty hands. After that we snuggled and cuddled for a while and talked about a lot of things. From what others have written I know she may do other stuff, positions, etc. But Im not into all of the acronyms. Just some, haha. And, needless to say, with Ariana you get a genuine PSE. But to me what really counts the most is being intimate with a beautiful and fun young lady, which she is. Gentlemen, please treat her well.
negative easy to arrange. email, with prompt response. screening easy, showed up exactly on time which is a huge plus for me. she fits the college coed look to a t. definitely what I was looking for. if you want that type of girl she is a perfect fit. met me at a downtown hotel right on schedule. entered room nice kiss and some small talk. then she changed into a teddy and looked great. started with a bbbj which lasted until cim. it was heaven. tight pretty blonde right off a college campus just engulfing my member was just what the dr ordered. she is very compliant. she was willing to to do whatever I asked. but I am not complicated and did not ask for anything unusual. the usual, on her knees, me sitting in chair, me lying down, boy can she give a great blow job. good attention to the boys. great daty and dato. missionary, cowgirl, reverse cowgirl and doggie. asked for anal and she was reluctant but did not refuse. she is tight and i was able to gently enter that tight booty. but no thrusting was allowed because of her discomfort. what a site my member in her tight ass. all told she got me off three times. all cim. would repeat in a minute.
positive Saw Leya's post, got turned on by her face and squirting video, called got location, great looking girl with great skills. Will repeat Saw her squirting video, got turned on by it so I gave her a call. She picked up, sounded so sexy over the phone, discussed rates and her location, I live in VA she was in MD but since she was willing do CIM I had to make that trip. Drove to her location called when I got to the lot, made my way up knocked on the door she opened the door and WOW ! She is drop dead gorgeous. In all honesty when I saw her the first thing I thought was she looks like she can take a pounding and fellas let me tell you indeed she did. Went inside the room took care of donation, cloths came off and she applied the condom, decent blow job some eye contact. From there I bent her over for doggy , I was amazed how well she took the pounding, she allowed me to grab her shoulders so I can go harder and faster. She has the sexiest moan ever. Unfortunately I got mines off before she did. I didn't get to CIM but I left happy. I will definitely repeat but next time I plan on fulfilling finishing in her pretty face
positive As it is the first time for me with this agency, verification took some time. But wasn't that difficult. Once verified, I asked for Joy and fortunately she was available. They texted me the address and I went there 10 mins early. It was a very upscale apartment community. the door was left opened and when I entered, she was hiding behind the door. Wow !! she was very cute and was wearing just bra and panties. Her skin was so soft and her ass is to die for. Non-members, she is definitely a try. She gave a nice LFk, as we walked towards the bedroom. She was rubbing my pants an d I already had an hard on. As we unclothed, she offered to take a bath and rinse the mouth. As she was washing my front and back, she gave an amazing BBBJ. She licked the balls and I was almost there. After the shower we jumped into the bed and she continued BBBJ. Then I shifted to DATY. She smelled so good and also tasted very sweet. I couldn't hold off, and hence started missionary. Within 10 mins, I came and removed the condom and wiped me clean. She then gave an amazing Thai Massage for 20 mins. Now then she gave kisses and played with my junior. I wasn't ready for the second round and it almost was an hour. Finally she gave a kiss and I walked out. I would definitely repeat.
positive BDJ seems to visit Long Island in spurts -- sometimes, there's week-after-week; other times it seems like months between visits. When Kim told me Angelina was coming -- coupled with the recommendation of a friend -- I headed out to meet her. To say Angelina is fit would be an understatement. She's amazingly fit. I don't believe there's any fat on her. Her definition is insane. I like the woman to be the initiator, and Angelina was more than up to the task. She actually enjoyed being "in charge." She was dressed in a cute outfit (the room was dark, but it looked like 'camouflage" bra and panties. I lay back on the bed, after undressing; and she started with an enthusiastic BBBJ -- licking, sucking, spitting -- she certainly seems to enjoy it. Eventually, I was ready (perhaps beyond ready) and she got on top, grinding away. I didn't want to finish in that position (although I easily could've), so we moved to doggie for the finale. A second cup wasn't in the cards for me that day ... but she absolutely was up for the challenge. Nevertheless, it was ultimately a no-go.
positive Have used this agency for years always deliver. Use text to communicate always do well. Joy is a pure gem never let really had a bad experience with any of them. Great location, great service Non-VIPs run there. VIPs read on As I said have used them for years so real simple to work with agency. The routine is very well scripted walk up the door auto opens to reveal your prize. This time it is Joy dressed in a bra and panties that looked like they were sprayed on. Beautiful face great kiss then off to the shower with a shot of mouthwash. Got in great scrub and playing loved it. Got out head,Ed to the bed for some very playful touching kissing and BBBJ. SHe performed it well. After the wonderful bj I went down on that great looking clam man was it tasty guess she appreciated my effort by throwing a great fuck into me. Man am I a lucky guy. Will repeat
positive Saw Devin's reviews, and though pictures were scarce, decided to take a chance based on great reviews. Quick responses to texts, especially after she verified me on TER. Devin is a pretty adventurous MILF-type who's lots of fun and enjoys herself. Asked her to wear heels for me and she did - and she agreed they looked really sexy up in the air - almost as if she were surprised by it! LOL Good visit. Non-VIPs - recommended. VIPs - read on. I read a great review of Devin taking a cock in her ass, so I asked if that was available. She said yes, though she's new to it. I was thinking about it all night the night before.... Got the the hotel about the same time as she did. She quickly dressed in tank top and thong and heels, but then quickly lost the thong and tank top. Grabbed hold of her and grabbed two handfuls of nice soft ass cheeks and did a little DFK, which she is very good at. Kissed down to her big tits and slid a finger in her already wet pussy, then pushed her down on the bed and put her legs in the air and dove in for some DATY. She loved it and kept getting wetter. Ran my tongue down to her asshole, and she enjoyed that too. Slid a finger in and it was tiiiiiiiiiiiiiight and she squirmed. Couldn't get my finger in more than and inch or two. Left my finger in to try to loosen her up while I worked on her clit with my tongue and slid two fingers in her pussy to work her G-spot. Continued to eat her for 15 minutes or so with her pulling her heels to her shoulders (I think she liked that view almost as much as I did), until she came and her clit got sensitive. Gave her a break for a minute then started licking her taint and she lovvvvved that, especially when I also worked her clit with my finger, and slipped a fingertip in her ass again a bit. This brought another orgasm pretty quickly. I had her suck my cock a bit and enjoyed seeing her curled up on the bed with her heels on slurping on my cock while I told her what a good girl she was. Then I asked if she thought my cock would fit in her ass. She said "no" but said we could try. So I lubed her up well, and slipped on a poly condom (she's allergic to latex) and lubed my cock and pushed the head against her tight little asshole with her on her back and her heels in the air again. That asshole was still super tight. My cock wasn't going anywhere. Pushed a little harder and the head popped in and she gasped. I pushed a little harder and got a little more of my shaft in her ass and tried pumping a bit, but her asshole was just too tight and I couldn't keep it in her ass. However, Devin tried like a champ, so I have no complaints. I washed up, changed condoms, and entered her pussy in the same position - her on her back, heels in the air. Pumped her tight cunt hard and fast, which she seemed to like a lot, as she was vocal as her big tits bounced while I pounded her until I started to feel ready to cum. I wanted to cum in her tongue-studded mouth, so I pulled off the condom and laid back and let her suck me to a finish. I told her not to stop sucking while I was cumming and I blasted a big load in her mouth and she dutifully took it all. She got up to spit into the sink - took her a while to spit it all out LOL. I asked to use the shower, and she got me a clean towel and washcloth, and she had men's body wash in the shower, which was nice. Cleaned up, chatted while I got dressed, got a nice hug and kiss, and off I went, satisfied for the day. Nice girl, and worth repeating.
positive I texted her but she was busy. Tried again a couple of days later and she responded right away. It was easy to arrange a time at a hotel in Boston. No problems finding it or getting to the room, just a call once I got near. Met her at the room, a nice and friendly girl. Definitely as advertised by the photos. I was anxious (new to the scene) but she made me feel comfortable. Fun, I would happily repeat. Non-VIPs I would recommend. She's not rail thin but she has great boobs and a great attitude. Started with a lap dance, then a condom on BJ. Very good--deep throats easily and for a long time. Made me pop right away. I licked her for a bit, which she seemed to love. Very responsive. We went through a bunch of positions--doggy, missionary, on-top, on back, and standing. Pretty athletic sex. Some kissing and earlobe sucking while in the act. Near the end of the session she gave me a second intense BJ. Great girl and a lot of fun!
positive Ive seen Leonie several times in the past, and ill just say that shes amazing to be with. Beautiful, intelligent, sexy and has a great sense of humor. She stimulates your mind along with your other body parts! Shes definitely the woman in the pictures ,huge boobs and a perfect ass. Setting up appointments with Leonie is very easy through MB agency. I went up to her hotel room, she opened the door and there was my vision of ebony heaven, dressed to kill in a black baby-doll, that nicely showed off her big tits. Just the way i love it. Since our last date i realized that something has changed on her, she lost a lot of pounds. She told me she works out every day. Her body is tighter and looks more organized. She still looks stunning. We greeted each other with a nice hug and some DFK, tongues probing wildly. Leonie is great kisser, and that is one of my favorite parts of a session with her. My hands roamed freely, exploring her body and feeling up that nice ass. I quickly went for a shower and when i returned we continued everything where we stopped before. This was enough to get me going, and she responded by stroking my already hard cock through the towel that i wrapped around myself. We were sitting on the bed next to each other and having discussion about travel, business and lives. She is a great conversationalist on just about everything, and is so easy to talk to. Of course, sitting next to this hotly-dressed beauty, with our continuous flirting and touching, made my cock harder and harder. She dropped to her knees as i sat on the edge of the bed. She slowly removed the towel and finally she pulled me out all the way and began a fantastic, sensual BBBJ, licking my shaft up and down, and teasing my cock with her tongue. It's not easy to control yourself when she looks at you with your cock in her mouth, but somehow i managed to keep myself calm. Then i removed her baby-doll, i laid her down on the bed and tit fucked her. She wrapped my cock tightly between her big boobs, it felt great to ramrod her boobs. I wasn't able to hold myself so i released everything on her tits. We cleaned up, rested for a while and got ready to start again. It doesnt take much to get me hard with Leonie in the room, and when she saw me at full attention again, she knew it was time to start second round. We started off with a hot 69, and her pussy tasted warm, wet, and delicious as always. I could have done that for a long time, but we both wanted to move on. She covered me up and mounted me CG. I could feel her hot pussy gripping my stick like a vice as she rode my cock hard, bouncing up and down. We went from CG to RCG, then Mish, where i spent some time sucking her nipples. What a great boobs she has. Then we changed to doggie. What i like about her is the fact that she is not afraid to vocalize her feelings. Wonderfully sexy with a bit of nasty talk. Its definitely a workout fucking her. I was almost about to end second round so i pushed her down to flat doggie. My cock really penetrated her deep in this position, and she absolutely loved it. She even asked me to do it deeper and harder. I could feel her pussy tighten, and i knew she had nice wet O all over my cock. It felt so good to hump her round curvy ass during flat doggie. Finally blew my load deep inside her pussy. We both collapsed with pure exhaustion and satisfaction. After a bit of time to recover, i showered, cleaned up, and was on my way with one final hug and kiss at the door. I can't wait for our next date.
positive Took a few tries to reach Angelica but finally we were able to nail down a good time and met in the afternoon at her place. She put me at ease right away with her down to earth personality and friendliness. She looked about what i expected at first sight, but I didn't expect her to be so sexy and fun. Wasn't sure she was my type initially but is definitely one of my "go to" providers . Non VIPs... if you like voluptuous women (even if you don't and are open minded), then Angelica is definitely worth trying. I have and will repeat. Met with angelica in the afternoon at her house. she came out to greet me and i followed her back to her room. Was a little nervous about roommates and such but she assured me we were alone and i didn't see any signs of anyone else. Upon first sight of Angelica, I wasn't sure if she was my type. she's a bit curvier than i generally am attracted to, but she has a very pretty face, and i really did need a massage, so i decided to roll with it and see what happened. Let me tell you, I'm definitely glad i did. She put me at ease right away with a hug and an attitude like we had known each other for a while. She smiles a lot and is chatty and very open about herself. On the table, right of the bat, i was impressed with her skills, even think she might have some professional training. As the massage progressed so did her sensual nature and i found myself becoming aroused but relaxed. She is definitely comfortable with her body and mine, and knows how to use them. By the time the massage portion concluded i was practically jelly. She moved me from the massage table to the bed and broke the ice with a long hug that did what i think it intended and made a smooth transition to a more sexual and satisfying conclusion. At her request, i am not going to disclose the intimate details blow by blow, since apparently, levels of intimacy are often based on the chemistry she feels that is warranted, but needless to say, she defiantly allows mutual touch, is open to requests and is quite likely, no most defiantly the best oral I've ever had. In my life. And she is so so sexy while doing it. I walked away feeling like a million bucks and even tipped her $100 for the experience. the total visit was about an hour and 20 mins and unhurried. She even cleaned me up and pampered me to the end. And you wouldn't believe the HOT things she does with those amazing breasts. HAve already repeated and will again. if you like voluptuous women, like i said, she's definitely worth a try.
positive Scheduled through Em, so very easy. I was looking forward to seeing Piper and she didn't disappoint. She is not a super hot looking lady. She has a few extra pounds. But definitely worth seeing and experiencing. I was bused in the location and up the stairs I went. Knock on the door and it opens to a blonde wearing a robe and knee high socks. As I come in she lets the robe flow freely and I get my first glimpse of her body and she is wearing a red panty. She offers drink quick I ask for water. We then move over to the massage area. We embrace and kiss. I begin to explore. First caressing her ass. Then moving my had to rub over her panty and pussy. She moans and I know then that this is going to be a lot of fun. I the reach my hand into Pipers panty and begin to rub her clit. She loves it and let's me know. We kiss and I continue to work her smooth pussy. FIV and really working her clit. Her response is great and she soon squirts drenching my hand her panty, socks and the floor. She grabs a towel and cleans up quickly. Then she asks if I want massage or straight to bed. I choose bed. She scampered over and jumped in bed and told me to hurry and get undressed and join her. I wish she would have helped me undress but that was only disappointment of our time together. I joined her in bed and started working her pussy again. She was so wet. Her moans and I think she orgasmed again but no squirt this time. Then it was all about me. She proceeded to give bbbj off and on for rest of our time. She would lay in my arms and let's us both rest for a few minutes. Then right back after it. Needless to say there was more than one pop. Piper was a lot of fun and I will repeat.
negative My first contact with Juliana was very professional and organized. Shes a thorough screener and punctual with time. My first meeting with Juliana was stress free and she truly is a real girl friend experience. Id recommend her to anyone that appreciates good conversation, cuddling and a really fun/passionate time! I was excited to meet her when I turned up at the hotel the day of our first meeting. I stood outside her hotel room door anxiously waiting for it to open I wondered... will she really be as sexy and beautiful as I hoped.... well the door opened and I was greeted by beautiful Julianas wonderful smile and amazing body ... we embraced and kissed passionately and I knew I was in for a very enjoyable visit. We began our evening with some wonderful conversation while we waited for room service to arrive. Juliana is extremely intelligent, fluently bilingual, has a vibrant personality, and excellent etiquette. Dinner was delicious but as my eyes explored her unbelievable body I just couldnt help but to lean over and kiss her. This lady knows how to kiss and enjoys it. As we kissed we helped each other remove our clothes and lay back on the bed. We continued to kiss and chat as my hands moved over her body and my fingers entered her wet and welcoming pussy. As I personally. very much enjoy DATY Juliana had to be convinced as she wanted my cock in her mouth... this lady tastes even better than she looks and she is a knockout. After listening for a while as she moaned as my tongue explored her it was time for her to return the favor which she did eagerly and fantastically. My subsequent visits with this sexy lady have all exceeded my expectations which i have to say have remained extremely high. If you ever have the opportunity to meet Juliana I would strongly encourage you to do so. I can assure you that you will not be disappointed.
positive I contacted Lina via e-mail well in advance of my upcoming trip to Vegas, she was prompt with her replies and her communication skills were excellent. She represents herself honestly and accurately on her website. Lina and I first met in public and my first impression was she was much prettier than I had imagined her to be. She was dressed sexy but very appropriately for the setting we were meeting in. Over cocktails we shared conversation that confirmed her to be the bright, intelligent, charming woman, I was expecting her to be. I personally found Lina to be the perfect companion to spend time with in public and behind closed doors. She is, Beautiful, smart, sexy, sweet, honest, trustworthy and fun. I felt she he had a genuine desire to be all I wished her to be and she was just that. Gentlemen, I can not imagine a better companion to have on my arm in public or in my arms behind closed doors. The Rest of the Story: I first noticed Lina's showcase on another well known review from there I went to her website and was so impressed with how she represented herself, I immediately knew she would be a excellent choice to live out my Vegas fantasy with. I contacted Lina via a introductory e-mail describing exactly who I was and I provided her the information so she could screen me to insure her safety. My trip to Vegas was about a month away so we exchanged several e-mails. Lina was wonderful by promptly replying to my e-mails.Early on in our communication before Christmas I gifted her a Victoria Secret gift card. She was very appreciative and asked for ideas of what I would like her to purchase with it. I explained that was not my intent that it truly was for her to get whatever she wanted to get with it. Flash forward I only mentioned the gift card to let you all know she is appreciative of attempts to spoil her.. So I am on my way to Vegas and when I arrive we confirm everything is still as planned. I chose to meet Lina in public at first for a couple drinks, Lina was on time and my first thoughts upon seeing her for the first time was she was even prettier than I imagined she would be. I had let her know before hand that I would place her donation in the bottom of a gift bag along with a gift I had brought her. Everything unfolded flawlessly and extremely discreet in the casino and after a couple drinks and some wonderful getting to know each other type conversation I asked her if she would like to go upstairs to my room. We proceeded up to my room and as soon as we entered Lina was ready to play, I love giving massages and we started with that and from there we went through all the activities listed. Lina's behind doors skills are awesome and she is determined to make sure you have been completely satisfied. She is definetly not a clock watcher. She makes it obvious by her responsiveness to touch she loves sex and loves seeing a man find pleasure in being with her. After some cuddles and pillow talk I asked her if I could see her again before I was to leave Vegas. I was fortunate she was available the next night and we agreed to meet again . The next night pretty much unfolded like our first night together, and as awesome as Lina had made our first time together the second nights conversation and behind closed door time went to a even more awesome level. TER requires a detail blow by blow description of one sexual act to approve a review, which I think is crazy. But they write the rules so here goes. After I came while having covered full service sex in the missionary position. I went back down on Lina because I wanted another taste of how delicious she was down there. Licking her, I inserted a finger and she began to moan to acknowledge the pleasure she was feeling.asking for a second finger and harder which I was more than happy to oblige. I continued to finger fuck and lick until Lina screamed and writhed in the pleasure oh her orgasm. Withdrawing my fingers I gave Lina's sweet kitty a final goodbye kiss then moved up beside her for some cuddles before our time together was over. Gentlemen, Lina is a gift, you will not be disappointed if you choose to see her. Please, be respectful of any boundaries she sets, be generous to her and most importantly be kind to her. True, caring, fun, drama free, professional providers like her are such a rarity To Lina, thank you for two awesome nights of memories, I hope to be back in Vegas to see you again soon
positive Booked Orange for 2 hours. I arrived at the area and did the standard 2 call system. Arrived at the apartment, and found Orange in a schoolgirl outfit. It was a good time, but I probably wouldn't repeat. She greeted me with a DFK and played with junior to get him going. She had me undress then we went to take a shower. She really helped me to get clean and gave me a preview BJ inside the shower. We dry up then head back to the room where she begins to give me a nice BBBJ. It wasn't amazing but it was pretty good! I proceeded to DATY and she was eager to keep me down on her which was very hot to me. I can't really keep it up in a condom so I had her just give me a HJ/BBBJ until I popped in her mouth. She milked every last drop until I was drained. I paid for 2 hours but she had me start dressing and had me out the door after a little more than 90 minutes. I only had one pop too. I had heard mainly good things about this agency and the reviews seemed pretty decent so I was really surprised and a little disappointed by that. Won't hold any grudges though. Overall it was a good time and she is definitely the girl in her pictures. Probably won't repeat though. Would probably try another girl or go to an agency that I know won't short me on the time I pay for.
positive I had thought about seeing Holly after a recommendation online and then reading her reviews. But I was not sure since there was not much more info out there. But run don't walk to see Holly. Easy to make arrangements in upscale locatios. And she is much hotter than her pics which are real but she's being discrete. Within 60 seconds of walking in, I knew it was going to be a great visit - she has a winning personality and enjoys what she does. Worth it and I will repeat.Highly recommended. The door in the upscale location opened and I was pleasantly surprised to see a tall, beautiful woman with an incredible body, super sexy lingerie and a nice greeting as I came in. Nice hug, we chatted and I immediately could tell she wsa intelligent, sexy as hell and just fun to be around. We moved into the bedroom of the suite she was staying in. Candles were lit everywhere, music was playing. Pretty damn perfect. And even extra accommodating to my allergies. And a non-smoking provider in a non-smoking room. Harder than you think in GSO. Hugging, kissing, nice kissing, losing clothes. Exploring that body that puts a lot of twenty somethings to shame. She mentioned playing sports and that was very clear. Soon I was naked lying back on the bed and she took care of me better than any woman has ever, her hands and tongue all over me, my chest, nipples, stomach, balls, under my balls, long my shaft. If you don't have control, you won't last with her - she said it happened all the time with clients - bam and they're done. She knows a man and quickly tunes in your vibe. Mutual nibbles, caress soon led to all sorts of foreplay and BBBJ teasing. She asked me probing questions and it did not take long until I was on all fours while she spanked my ass hard, stroking my cock and talking really dirty to each other. So hot. I could have walked out then satisfied. I did not have as long session as wanted to turned over my stinging but happy ass and asked her to suck my cock and then ride me. She did but in a slow sensual delicious way. She rode we CG first, every few minutes changing how she was doing it. Talking nasty, eye contact, asking me how it felt. Then reverse CG, again keeping it interesting until I was fucking her so hard bed shook and she said she came. Even if it was fake, it was hot. We finished with her fingers up my ass and her begging me to cum because she like to seem men explode. She does. Watched it like a hawk. Cleaned me up with warm wash cloth, showered, talked about longer kinkier sessions. Highly recommended guys.
positive I have seen Cindy a couple of times now and each time has been fantastic. She is that burning man/alt/arty type of girl. She has enough tattoos that if you aren't into that she may not be the girl for you. She was shy my first visit but once you know what she likes it comes easier. Gentleman i would certainly recommend, VIPS read on. First time I saw her was for an hour at my house. She called at the time she was supposed to be there to let me know she was running late and would be there in an hour... she showed up 90 minutes later. She showed up in giant black heels and a tight black outfit that made her look delicious. She was shorter then i realized, in the shoes it was hard to tell but once she got out of those I got all kinds of ideas :) We sat down on the couch and talked for a bit about art and burning man and then she leaned in and gave me a DFK. We spent the next 10 minutes locking in DFK and stripping. Her body is curvy. Her boobs are incredible though. She has a little landing strip. Once she was naked we moved to the bedroom. great BBBJ skills with good attention to the boys and great attempts at DT. I am large and she gave it all she had. I think I messed up her eye makeup... I spun her around and DATY. She dyes her little pubic patch different colors so a little interesting there but she was fresh in smell and taste and seemed to enjoy it pushing my face deeper. The next 30 minutes is a blur of positions Mish, CG, RCG, Doggie, Standing Doggie, and maybe some more it was all a blur. Came in the bag. We talked for a bit and she left well over our 60 minutes were up. I saw her later at her incall. She has a few dogs so keep that in mind. Her place was a little messy but pretty much exactly what you would expect from her look. We chatted on her bed and started making out. Very similar breakdown to before except this time I took some photos. I love a provider that is up for that. She posed with my dick deep in her throat and seemed to really get into the photos. I saw her toy collection which includes lots of butt plugs and anal beads so I wonder if a trip to the islands could be on the menu... I have also since seen her post adds with other girls. Seems like after more meetings more could be available...
positive Standard 2/3 call system. Smart gal plays different low cost motels in many jurisdictions. Some phone issues but if she's not busy, communication is quite good. She is the gal in picture and has a nice, soft carefree disposition especially once she gets to know you. I like her a lot. Newbies need to play the LE game. There is the cigarette smoke issue, if you are a non-smoker, you are going to leave with a slight hint of smokiness. But then comes the non-VIP verification, yes, I will and have repeated. I have enjoyed my sessions with her as much as my ATF's in FL. Kacey doesn't waste time, that's for sure. The faster you get naked, the faster she gets to business. I've found northeast girls use the clothes coming off as a sort of LEO check and she's no different. In the South and West, ladies seem more willing to make undressing part of the sex, which is very enjoyable. But once the clothes are off, it's right to business with lots of attention to the bat and balls. Very nice skills and a soft, moist mouth. The old latex cover always cuts down the pleasure but better to be safe than sorry. In her style with me, she has always been on her knees parallel with me while working the boys. That puts her butt and honey pot within reach. I haven't ventured into a pure 69 yet (call me chicken), but she definitely allows me play time touching and dipping my fingers. On my signal, we have twice transferred to intercourse. The first time she said she was a bit tired and asked if I would go mish. Oh sure, twist my arm! I was having a great time and comfortably enjoying her heat. But she seemed to be tiring of my motion so I asked if doggy was available. She smiled and said "love to". Yes, she did! It wasn't long for me to join the fun and popped. On my second visit, as I said why don't we switch, she swung right over in cowgirl and rode me to finish. That was one lovely ride! Excellent skills. This is my first woman in a long time in the hobby who actually acted as if she liked our session. I haven't written a review in a long time because there have been so very few women worthy of review. Since negative reviews aren't allowed or at least are contested and fought, I kind of live by the rule if you can't say anything nice, don't say anything at all!
positive I saw some reviews on Mandy aka tiny Mandy. I was really interested in meeting a very petite lady. The set up was very easy a call and a few texts and our short date was set up for early evening. I met her at her incall and was very happy to see a pretty and very petiite young women at the door. When exchanged a shirt kiss and of course a donation and the fun began. Non VIPs I would repeat. After we exchaned pleasentries at the front door Mandy escorted me into the bedroom. I only scheduled a 1/2 hour visit so I was glad to see she wanted to get right down to business. Although I prefer deep kissing she only seemed allow for light kissing but she definately made up for it in other ways. I am a massive fan of bbbjs and she is very skilled at this. She gives a great slow almost gental bbbj. Almost like your girlfriend giving you a bj. Although I wanted to just have her keep going I really wanted to feel my self inside her. I let her know I wanted to to go for some doggy and she was more than willing to provide me with a great view of her ass right after she put on the cap. I slid inside and she was surprisingly tight. Im not a huge guy or anything but she definatley a nice snug fit. The view from behind is very nice indeed. I was very tempted to see if she would let me play with her asshole but decided against it. Atleast not on the first meeting we had. Maybe the next meeting I will try to see if she is ok with it. I was only able to last for about 10 minutes because she felt so good plus she started to moan like she meant it and that was all she wrote. I filled the cap and had to be careful I didn't collapse on her. I didn't want to crush that delicate little body. We cleaned up and I was on my way. I think I will try the hour service next time and see what can happen.
positive Easy set up in a pleasant, convenient Ft Lauderdale motel. Honey is clean & cute with a smokin' hot bod. Very easy to talk to (and in perfect English, sometimes a challenge in the Miami/Ft. Laud area), genuine and super accommodating. Maybe a bit laid back for someone who wants an aggressive woman to pounce right on you. I would highly recommend and repeat. VIP members, please read on... Honey is very relaxed but will do her best to make you happy. She seemed a bit shy so we talked for a while. Probably how a genuinely good GFE should start in real life, LOL. We started with some LFK and then she headed south and used her hands & mouth to get me hard. She proceeded to give me a great, attentive BBBJ which required me to use much willpower holding off & not exploding. Next it was time to return the oral favors & for me to do some DATY. She was bare, clean & super responsive, moaning & playing with her breasts while I ate away. She had a super sensitive clit so I had to back off a bit. We moved to a 69 which again required much self control for me as the quality of her BJ technique is excellent. Next it was on with the cover and, feeling lazy, I had her mount me in CG. She rode me well (with a lot more forward & back motion than up & down---though I'm sure she would take whatever direction you wanted to give her) until I just couldn't hold back any longer, shooting a load into the cover. Highly recommend Honey though you need to realize she's quite relaxed & you'll need to give her some direction...but you will be well rewarded and will finish happy. Definitely worth repeating.
positive This was the second time I've seen Juicy Redz. Had seen her months before and when I got to her place I immediately noticed her new hair style. Instead of being up in a huge afro - was braided in very long corn rows. I sort of preferred the afro - but the corn rows were impressive! This is one funky lady and the atmosphere of her place is equally funky. But if you can look past that - and your a T&A man who loves ebony ladies who like to get they're freak on - you'll have a blast with Juicy Redz. VIPs read on . . . All of the usual things that I really like in a provider were still on the menu with this visit. Soon after we disrobed I oiled up that big booty with some baby oil she had handy and immediately put her on the bed - first on hands and knees, then on her back - for an extended DATY session. She came at least twice. Then I had her get on her knees so she could show off her oral skills. She hadn't lost anything in this department - lots of DT, eye contact, spit and she allows you to really get aggressive which I like. Then it was time for the main event: we did doggie, mish and doggie again . . . I went for quite awhile and she was dirty talking the whole time. I wanted to finish in her mouth which she happily agreed to. I straddled her huge tits and jerked a nice load right onto her outstretched tongue. She swallowed it all and then got some baby wipes to clean me off with. Will probably repeat if I find myself in D.C. again. She's not everyone's type but if she is your type then you should definitely give Juicy Redz a try.
positive First time exploring this hobby in Montreal and its like a wonderland up here. Unbelievable as to how good the locals have it! So many choices at very reasonable rates! Had trouble deciding but Im really glad I chose Amanda. The agency wasnt the best at scheduling the appointment and had to wait almost 20 minutes in the lobby before she was ready. Almost walked out but Im glad I didnt. She is young, willing and is unbelievably hot. Read on Finally got the room number and an impossibly hot, tall and young lady opened the door. She was stunning in her matching bra and thong! Dark hair, dark skin and a models body with big fake tits and an ass to die for. Wow. I took a quick shower and joined her on the bed. Took her in my arms and LFK which removing her bra to unleash those fantastic tits! Moved my mouth down south the lick and suck on her nipples. Never really progressed to DFK but I was OK with that. Slide off her throng to admire her toned ass and delightfully shaved pussy. Took off my clothes and took my cock into her mouth for some BBBJ. Got it really hard but I wanted to indulge my tongue on her pussy so laid her on the bed and spread her legs. I licked her clit and FIV to orgasm. Switched to 69 so I could enjoy the view and get super hard again. Wow, her ass is legendary! Suited up and had her lay on her back and spread her legs for entry. Moved in real deep which she seemed to enjoy. Was getting really close to the promised land so I switched to doggie so I could pound that ass. Came shortly thereafter. She got a towel for cleanup and lounged on the bed. She told me about her background and hasnt been doing this very long. Shes young and still somewhat new to the business. She started to give me a massage and things started to heat up again. Started a BBBJ again but we had to end as time was up. Wish I had booked more time. And I wish I wouldve explored Anal with her as its on the menu. But the time I had was exceptional and would repeat everyday if I lived there!
positive Sabrina had been on my radar since her last romp thru DC. The other girls at the location have all been great so it was a no brainer that my little head would lead my big head. Couple of emails and I'm in the apartment for 30 minutes of activity. As with all the Latinas at this location, they do not speak English. My Spanish is okay, but do you really care what we talked about? When I first saw Sabrina, she did not look as I expected. I suppose I was anticipating a tall blonde model (or something), but when I spied her I was not disappointed at all. She is a Latina hottie without pretense. There was a level of comfort that we had from the moment I walked thru the door. She took my hand and led me to the room. Brief chat and smile, dropped the donation, and stepped into the shower to warm up. Came out of the shower to a sultry Argentine sex machine. 30 minutes is plenty of time for fun, but there is a pace that needs to be met. There was some kissing and then suddenly, Sabrina was all go with a face-first CBJ. Her technique was great and I knew that as soon as I got super-hard, she would take me to the the next phase, so I did my best to not get too hard too fast. I probably bought myself about 20 seconds because there was no way my meat was going to stay down with her mouth pulling on me. After that it was spin-the-wheel on positions. Sabrina was very enthusiastic and provided everything with passion. Obligatory MISH to get the juices flowing, then on to CG, and doggie. The best part was when Sabrina got on top of me CG and rode my shaft up and down with total force. She made the usual comment on the width of my dong which I shrugged off, but the way she was slamming my pole was too hot and despite not wanting to blast, my rocket shot a glorious load. Took a moment to come down from the ride as we casually got organized. Brief chit-chat about life in Argentina and it was a smile and a kiss at the door. Overall great safe service. TER rating is low because of rules, but go with enthusiasm. Sabrina is another winner at a well run location.
positive I met Violet closer to her home in Baraboo, she ended up being about 45 mins behind schedule. Once she arrived I secured a room, and she came to the room. This girl loves sex, and loves to kiss; she has exquisite, perky tits, and really great nipples(if you like hard eraser like nips), which I DO. The room was quite cool, so we got under the covers and undressed each other, it didn't take long for things to warm up. Non vips, definitely worth the ride, Vips read on..... Once we were undressed we spent a good amount of time just kissing, exploring each others mouths with our tongues. I wirked my way down to her perky, hard nipples (did I say hard) snd licked and sucked on them. She is very vocal, moaning with pleasure throughout the session. Others have said how wet she gets, and she really does; i stroked her clit with the tip of my cock, barely unable to control myself. Then proceeded to suck on my dick, she is Quite exceptional. This girl LOVES SEX. We switched up and got into a hot 69, I could have dined all day, veryy tasty, wet, and sweet. After we sucked each other, we got into miss position, I put myhands under her Ass, and pounded her with all I had; after some time doing thst we switched to k9, me standing on the floor while Iwatched my dick go in and out with her lips tightly wrapped around my cock, then back to miss. I could have Cum, but asked her if i could Cum in her mouth, withiut any hesitation she obliged(did I say she likes Sex). She sucked the head of my cock and massaged my balls, causing me to pop off in her mouth. I'll definitely see Violet again, and do recommend her
positive One hot tamale!! What a sweet, hot affectionate, sexual dynamo MLIF!! I spent several months getting to know and learn about this lady. That facial picture on her P411 (though old) did it for me! Once I started communicating with her and learning about her I knew I had to see her. Arranged for a two hour rendezvous at a nice hotel and when I finally met her I knew I had really made an excellent choice. Because of how long we had been communicating we really knew each other very well and what we both wanted out of our get together. We shared some beverages and somewhere along the way what ever little she had on was gone. We started kissing so passionately I just was in romantic heaven....she truly gave of herself to me to partake as I pleased and what followed was one of the best fuck fest in my entire 10 plus years of hobbying! The best memory I have is how at one point i had both my arms under her bottom while I was giving it to her in MISH and the entire bed was socking wet!! She really did respond to our love making in a thunderous way...just as I expected. Amber has the tightest pussy I have encountered in all providers...and her boobs her extremely responsive! Activities included DFK,BBBJ, MISH, Cowgirl, DOGGY. I had an extremely enjoyable evening with Tess and I highly recommended her.
negative Holly's pics are real, me she is as sexy on the phone and in the pictures as you would expect. She was willing to come visit me in Winston-Salem at my hotel. It was one of the hottest nights I've ever had, and I think we both blew each other's minds when everything is said and done. Holly is one of my all time favorites and I hope to see her again next time work takes me to her area. Holly showed up on time and dressed casually but still looked very sexy in her sporty outfit. We started with some wine and conversation, and moved on to me giving her a massage. She really enjoyed it and it was a good way for us to warm up to each other. I moved on to oral. She tasted very clean and delicious, and I either got her to orgasm or at least put her on the brink. We hit a point when she needed me inside her, so I gladly obliged. We started slow, butI was so turned on at this point that I came pretty quickly, but the atmosphere was so sensual and passionate that I was ready to keep going. I gradually picked up the pace and she loved it. Soon I was pounding as quickly and hard as I could, and Holly couldn't get enough. I couldn't manage a second pop but still spent minutes filling her up until we both collapsed from exhaustion. We cuddled for a bit until she cleaned up and went on her way. I could tell she enjoyed our night as much as I did. Holly is incredible and a true pleaser. She is not a clock watcher and is someone I would enjoy just being with. She's a fine lady and a gem. Have fun with her and give her the attention and gratitude she deserves. I'll see her again every time I visit NC!
positive A pair of texts/calls brought me to the door where I was greeted by a warm and friendly Tamara who is definitely the girl in her pictures. Had a great 1/2 hour which I wish I had budgeted for more time. Would repeat... First time seeing Tamara after reading some nice reviews so I booked for only 30 minutes which I regretted the moment I slipped the cover on and entered her tight vagina. I could've humped away for a long time in that tight user-friendly orifice. I busted pretty quickly, after having been primed by an excellent and spirited, albeit covered BJ. Tamara was warm and friendly and I'll definitely be back with more time to spare.
positive I saw her ad and sent her an email, she responds very quickly. after a few emails we agreed to meet later that day. She gave me her number and I texted her when I was on her way. When I arrived I sent her a text and she came outside and met me. First thing I noticed were the size of those tits. She looks good. We went inside and made our way upstairs. She doesn't talk too much but she is very nice and does everything to accommodate you. Definitely recommend. VIP read on... She has a roommate who I didn't see and who left a few minutes after I arrived along with 2 dogs and a cat I believe. We made our way upstairs to the bedroom and she asked me to get comfortable. I got undressed and laid on the bed and she took her clothes off and joined me. Her tits are fake but they're huge! We started kissing for a bit as I felt around. She is a decent kisser but doesn't seem to get into it too much. After a while she made her way down and started giving me a damn good bbbj pausing to suck on my balls. I didn't want to pop without fucking her so I asked her to get the condom on and I got behind her and started fucking her doggy. She was tight and it felt good, she had her head in the pillow and was moaning. I then asked her to get on top and she rode me cowgirl for a little as I played with her tits. I couldn't get over how big they were lol. I like to finish missionary so we switched to that and fucked for a little until I popped. We just laid there for a little until we caught our breath, then got cleaned up and dressed. We talked for a little and I gave her the donation. She didn't ask for it the entire time and isn't a clock watcher. I recommend, she is kind of under the radar right now.
positive Samantha was easy to communicate with and was good on text messages to set up the appointment. She really has a sweet girl next door look in the photos and is even better in person. She was going to come to my hotel and asked if I could pick her up. I didn't have a car so we agreed that Id meet at her motel. She answered the door wearing a tee shirt and yoga pants. We layed on the bed and started with conversation and light touching. Family Guy was playing on the TV and I felt like I was hanging out with a college GF in her dorm. It was very relaxed and non rushed. She has beautiful eyes and a very cute face. I went to take off her shirt and she let me know that mine had to come off too. It was the same rules for the rest of her clothes. We messed around and then she started with a BBBJ. On went the cover and we started with cowgirl followed by me on top. Finished in the cover and she got dressed. Didn't rush me at all and it was a good experience. I'll see her when back in town for sure.
negative Was on a trip to NYC and saw Alisa's ad on TER. Was captivated by her looks, reviews and the fact that she offered Nuru massage, which I had never tried but was curious about! Setting up the appointment was easy and done by email. Sadly, she was in the process of moving apartments and so Incall was not available but she did let me know that she could still do the Nuru massage in my hotel room. All I had to do was get some spare towels to lay on the bed and she would come prepared! I'm usually leary about Outcall to my hotel, as the corridors are crawling with colleagues and I worry that I may find myself in an awkward predicament, if one of them sees her coming into or going out of my room! But the offer was too good to refuse and I decided to go for it.When the day arrived, I was giddy with anticipation! I had already showered, so as to not waste precious time with her. I had also procured the extra towels! She was a few minutes late, as it was raining and the traffic was bad. No worries! She kept me updated with frequent texts, and built up my expectation! Then there was a soft knock on the door..... She looked like a blond version of Audrey Hepburn, in Breakfast at Tiffany's! She is very pretty and looks a lot younger than her pics. Lovely figure. Smallish breasts and a lovely derriere! At the end of our time, She told me that she really wants me to meet her friend, Melissa Swan, who just left town to visit her family in Russia. She said that Melissa is very beautiful and more experienced and would she love to see me with her! Sadly, she is away till March. She is an extremely sensual lady, as you will see in my "details" below! Non-VIPs, she is a MUST SEE! She asked me to get comfortable, while she gets the Nuru gel warmed up. She disrobed completely. Then she had me take off my bathrobe and stroked my penis which was rapidly getting engorged! She complemented my size and girth, and laughingly said that she was not sure she would be able to manage a trip the Isles, (which was something she did offer on her menu). I said no worries, we'll just take it as it comes and go with the flow. Then began the Nuru massage. She poured the gel over my back and legs, climbed astride me and started an amazingly sensual body-to-body slip and slide! I could feel her erect nipples as was gliding up and down my back and legs. When she would reach the top of my body, she would kiss, lick and suck my earlobes and nape of my neck. After a while she had me turn over and laughed as she saw my raging cock, with some pre-cum emerging from it. Without using her hands, she bent over and licked it off my cock. Mmmmmmmm.....! Then she started the sliding up and down my chest, stomach, cock and thighs, mixing it in with some DFK. I reached over and massaged her slippery, gel covered butt, sliding my fingers between her cheeks, to play with her anus and pussy. She murmured appreciatively. My erect cock was trapped between our stomachs as she kept the forwards and backwards sliding movement going. Not wanting to miss out on the main event, I indicated that we should move on! She then cleaned the Nuru off with a warm wet towel and we were off to the races! She started off by giving me a soft, and deep BBBJ, taking me as deep as she could (I'm on the thick side, so DT was not possible!), licked and sucked my scrotum and taint, while stroking me with her hands. I didn't want to come too quickly, since I was already do turned on by the Nuru massage! I disengaged and switched positions, so that I could go down on her. Moved her to the edge of the bed and slowly kissed my way down her body, before I settled down to her labia. I licked all around her labia and her taint area. All smooth and sweet! I then started flicking my tongue on her clit increasing the frequency, as I inserted first one and then two fingers into her pussy. She was tight! Then I inserted my thumb into her anus and after she got used to it, started an in and out motion. Now I had 2 fingers of one hand in her pussy, playing with her G spot, the thumb of the other hand in her anus doing a gentle in-and-out motion, all while licking her clitoris in a rapid fire, up and down motion. Her hips were moving with a life of their own and she was gasping and playing with my hair. My final move was to engulf her clit with my mouth, suck on it while rapidly flicking my tongue on it. That did it! Her hips started thrashing around as her pussy and anus clamped down on my fingers, she came with a thunderous orgasm! It was time to suit up, so I pulled out the Magnums that I had bought (in case she did not have them). She helped me put it on and I asked her which position she would like to start in. She wanted to try mish, so I climbed aboard and slowly entered her. What a sight it was, seeing my thick cock slowly make its way into her small shaved pussy. I wanted to take it slow, so that she could get used to me. I think it was too slow for her because, she wrapped her legs around me, grabbed my ass and pulled me in deep, all the way the hilt, as her eyes widened and she gave an open mouth gasp. I started moving slowly and she used the back of her heels to push me in deep, at the end of every thrust. At one point, she propped herself up on her elbows, so she could watch my cock going in and out of her and told me that she loved the sight of her pussy being spread like that! Wow! What a firecracker! We built up a steady tempo, and then she started moving me faster. I was concerned that I would come, and I did want to try Greek, given how beautiful her pert ass was. So I pulled out and she moaned in disappointment! I told her that I wanted to try doggie and then move to Greek. She was game! I had positioned a sofa chair in front of the closet mirror, to get a good view. I am a very visual person and that was a sight to behold in the mirror! Her pussy was more used to me now so I could glide in and out in DG quite easily. She pulled out my cock from her pussy and started guiding it into her ass. She was very tight and I was a little too thick, so I could not really enter her :-( ! After many tries, we gave up! She was very apologetic! We changed covers and I resumed DG. Now I was going for the finish. She started furiously stroking her clit, with one hand while the other held on to the back of the chair. She asked me to go hard and fast. I complied and then I felt her pussy tighten in a vice like grip as she wailed and started coming. I really deep thrust into her as I had a huge orgasm! Round 2: She starts another pretty deep BBBJ, till I get rock hard again, and then put on the cover and starts CG. After a while, I tell her that I want to go back to DG. She dismounts and moves back to the chair in front of the mirror, assumes the position and tells me to slowly enter, since she wants to watch my cock enter in the mirror! I comply. Then the fun begins!After my usual slow start, I start going faster and faster, working her pussy into a froth. I am nowhere near coming and she is in a frenzied state of coming, every 20 seconds! It's like watching a piston being bathed in whipped juices! She comes repeatedly, her pussy is furiously clamping down on me with every orgasm! After quite a while, I reach an earth shattering orgasm of my own, burying my cock deeeep into her. We both collapse on the bed and she cleans me up again. After a while, she asks me if I have a 3rd round in me! She does not seem to be concerned that we are well over the time allocation. Now I'm on the wrong side of 45 and getting 2 rounds is possible,but 3 would have been a miracle! She is like an Energizer Bunny! AMAZING WOMAN!!
positive I've seen her ads up for a while, the pictures look really nice and she's running a special so I took a shot. The pictures in the ad are real but she isn't in her 30's and more like her mid 40's. The price for the service is very reasonable and I'll probably repeat. I've seen her ads up for a while and I just had to take a shot after seeing those pictures. The pictures are real but someone did a great job with the lighting because it helps mask her age. Also the age isn't correct because she's definitely in her 40's based on her appearance... On to the session, I get there and right off the bat we are stripping each others clothes off. She gets down and starts giving me a bbj. It wasn't the best bbj I've experienced but it was decent and she gives you plenty of eye contact. I'm about to blow my load so I move her onto the bed for some dfk........ I'm running low on time so we just start fucking with some mission then doggy and I finished in reverse cg... She offered me 2 cups but I had about 5 minutes left so that wasn't happening... She's worth the price of admission and I'll probably repeat when I get the chance.
positive I have seen BDJ's girls before so setting up an app is super easy. I read some of the reviews that stated "Angelina was a wild one". So I ask for a wild intro. BDJ answered sure. I got to the hotel on time and went up to the room. I knocked on the door and.........VIPs read on... So I read on one of the reviews that stated "I walk in and am greeted with a tongue being jammed down my throat". I was hoping for a similar treatment. But what I got was: She open the door and said "get in here, and she slam the door shut behind me..loud and said "have you been a bad boy today?" I was a little taken back, I was trying to put the donation down and she grabbed me and gave me a long DFK. She had moved a chair like 8 feet to the door (facing the door) and she throw me down on the chair. I didn't even take off my coat yet LOL. She had some kind of towel and was wrapping it around my mouth. Now I am thinking "oh shit did she thought wild as in S&M wild?" She started taking off my coat (more like ripping it off) and unbuttoning my shirt and said " Can I rip them off " During this whole time she was literally shoving her tongue down my throat off and on. This is a definite first for me and I was really turn on. The next hour was a big blurr. We both got undress and she gave me a BBBJ. She then brought me next to a full length mirror and sat in front of it. She instructed me to stand on top of her and she arch up and gave me another BBBJ and she arch her whole body up towards me. she is in great shape!! She blew me while I bend down and kiss her belly and fondle her breast. This girl is amazing. We then move to the bed room and I started to daty and FIV. She has a very tight pussy and I was messaging her G spot (She O) and I asked for a cover. We tried miss, CG, and doggy. This girl loves sex and she is not shy at all. She is in great shape (not an ounce of fat on her) and she was pushing back on me as I pound her from behind and grab that tone round ass. I popped shortly after that. I was catching my breathe and we started talking. She is really a great down to earth girl next door but a definite freak in bed. Guys go see her if you have a chance to....you won't regret it!!
positive I've seen many girls from DA so setup was a breeze. It's been a while since I used DA since the talent has gone down. But Koa was a breath of fresh air and certainly a keeper. Was craving Asian cuisine today. My ATF was in Princeton so wasn't about to make the trip. Called DA to see if Koa was available and luckily for me she was and in my own neighborhood too. Read many great reviews about Koa and was really interested in giving her a try. I heard that rimming was her specialty and although I've only experienced rimming maybe once or twice in the past I was in the mood for something different. When I arrived at the hotel I called the agency and she called me back 10 minutes later with the room #. When Koa opened the door I was happily surprised to see a small pretty Korean girl inside. I was very happy with her appearance. She greeted me with multiple kisses both LFK and DFK as we caressed each others bodies. She had my cock in her hand before I could even disrobe or make my way to the shower. After the shower more DFK while I removed her remaining clothing. She has nice perky breasts. She definitely has implants and there are scars to show it. She also felt some discomfort when I would squeeze them. She dropped to her knees and began with a nice BBBJ with DT action. It felt great and she used minimal hands which I like. I then tossed her on the bed and started a DATY session that she loved. She would grab my head and push me deep into her pussy. Koa is submissive and dominant all in one. She loves when you choke her a bit with your cock and she loves pulling you hair and forcing her way on you as well. At this point Koa asked me to turn over and she started rubbing her naked body all over me while she licked me from ear to asshole. She does enjoy rimming and apparently more so than I do. It just doesn't do much for me but it was nice and different. Our CFS started with her on top with her on top sideways grinding all over me. Followed that up by an intense Mish session that had me sweating immensely. She kept a small towel handy and kept wiping me off. I guess it could be a little gross. She finally turned on the AC in room as it was 77 degrees in there. I ripped off my cover and stuck my cock in her mouth some more as I was loosing stamina and steam. Brought Jr. back to attention slipped on another cover and fucked her DS. Finally I lay on my back and asked her to give me a HJ. She continued to do so as she licked the tip of my cock and I finally blew into her mouth and she took it all while giving me the thumbs up. So CIM is on the menu but from previous reviews YMMV. Koa is great and I'm glad DA is starting to make a comeback. I would definitely repeat with Koa. Great girl and a great time.
positive Screening took about an hour and it was pretty easy with just some basic information needed with references. on time and fast responses. well i was excited to see from the pictures but some reviews were good and some weren't so i was scared too. i decided to go for it. want to hotel in bwi. i got the room number and went up. when she opened the door all i saw was her big booty and thighs. wow! her ass is very nice and has sexy thighs that go with it. its not a toned ass but its a big juicy one. her face isn't as great as i would like but it wasn't bad either. so i took a quick shower and came out and took her clothes off and her pussy smelled so good and was nice and bare so i decided to eat it. it tasted really good. then we did 69 for a bit. her bj skills were bad she kept hurting me with her teeth so i stopped it and decided to just penetrate those big ass cheeks. i put her on doggy and pounded her like crazy. wow i loved slapping that big ass lol. i and fun and i think you will too.
positive I'd seen MCC on my favorite booker's line-up a few times, and after looking at her ad, decided to take the plunge. A few quick txts later and I had my appointment booked in a familiar WLA location. NON-VIP's: MCC delivers. After walking through the magic door, I turn around and take MCC in: beautiful classic KGirl face, thin, fit, and wearing next to nothing apart from a big smile on her face. She looks most like her first picture in the ad, but has more of a GND look and demeanor. She leads me to the fun room where we undress and have some small-talk, then off to the shower for blue toast and a thorough shower with LFK and preview BBBJ. Back into the fun room, she starts on her back and we LFK while exploring each others bodies. It was a long day and I was looking for a more relaxing session, so she flipped me over for a nice back massage with lots of kissing and licking. Flip again and she starts an amazing BBBJ session with plenty of BLS, split, sound effects, you name it. Cover goes on and we cycle through my fav positions with lots of eye contact throughout, MCC has good energy and isn't afraid of taking control. I ask her to finish me with BBBJ and after a few moments I couldn't hold it any longer and released in her mouth while she kept licking and sucking. She leaves briefly to clean herself up, then comes back to the bed where we cuddle with a mix of LFK and DFK. She started to get me hard again, but it was getting towards the end of the session so I decided to get cleaned-up and plan for a longer session next time. Definitely will repeat.
positive I saw Holly's ad one morning and decided to contact her after reading her outstanding review on TER. I love a woman with a tight body and according to her pictures and other users she had one of the best in the area. I had seen Holly's ads before and had texted with her a bit about rates and the availability of a second girl a couple of weeks before deciding to contact her. We set up an appointment for later that morning at her high level hotel and when I got there she quickly let me know what room I would find her in. I went up to her room and found the door. I knocked gently and went inside and she called out to me from the bedroom area before coming out to introduce herself. Holly was wearing gorgeous lingerie with a black bra and black stockings and high heels and immediately made me feel comfortable with her and confident that I was about to have an amazing time. Non VIPs if you're looking for an unbelievable experience with a more mature provider I'd bet that there's not a better option in the state. Do yourself a favor and don't settle for anything less than an hour. You won't have a better, more rewarding experience on more than just a physical level with anyone else. After a bit of small talk Holly led me to her bed and sat me down and we began DFK with plenty of tongue which she is fantastic at. Holly took my shirt off of me before taking off her lingerie to show me more of her superbly tone body. As I took off my shoes and pants she slipped out of her heels and asked me to undo her bra for her while engaging in more DFK. Holly has some absolutely amazing breasts that put those of much younger women to shame. This woman must have found the fountain of youth because her frame, tits, torso and ass will absolutely blow your mind. I let her know that I wanted to do some DATY and Holly slipped out of her panties and laid down on the bed inviting me in between her gorgeous legs. Holly is a squirter and tried her best to coax me into making her gush, asking me to put a couple of fingers into her tight pussy. I went down on Holly for quite a while working hard for the reward of blast of her juices. Once I had finished going down on her Holly had me lay back on the bed as she gave me a toe curling BBBJ which started with her teasing my cock by draping her long hair along it from my balls to the tip which got me that much more excited. After giving me some great head Holly wrapped me up and climbed on top of me to ride me CG. Once she tired she invited me to get behind her which I was more than happy to do. Looking down at her gorgeous ass as I thrust deep into her had me close to exploding. I kept giving it to her canine until I could no longer and she had me lay down again and climbed on top for some reverse cowgirl. My time was almost up at this point and I still hadn't popped so Holly took the condom off and gave me a handjob until I finally released my load. Holly got up and grabbed a towel and cleaned me up as we talked more about ourselves and had a real conversation about aspects of our lives which really made me happy that I had come to see her. I was well past the time we had agreed to but Holly didn't begin to rush me to the door, instead she continued to talk to me as rubbed her legs. Eventually guilt for taking up so much of her time got the better of me and Holly walked me to the door and hugged and kissed me goodbye but not before giving me a bottle of water and letting me try a cookie she had in the room. The service that Holly provided me went far beyond physical satisfaction and it felt like she effortlessly wanted to make a genuine connection with me on an emotional level too. This lady puts the PRO in provider and I look forward to spending more time with her soon.
negative Easy to set up. Typical 2 call system. The hotel was okay. She was friendly and talkative. But she didn't look like the girl in the pics at all. My guessing is she is in her 30's. No tongue in kissing. And she kept mentioning how much time left. I wouldn't repeat. I got to the hotel and called her. She gave me the room number. Met her in the room. She was friendly and tried to keep on some talk. Placed the donation on the desk, then we got down to the business. She gave me a little lap dance and I found she didn't look like the girl in the pics at all. Her body has more weight now and her tits were so small... She told me those were C but they looked like A. Anyway, she put the wrap on and started giving me a CBJ with a lot of eye contact. I fingered her and her pussy was tight and juicy. Then I fucked her in mish and finished when she mentioned there was no time left. Such a turn off. I wouldn't repeat. It was not worth the money.
positive Was visiting Calgary and Emily was available. Light pre-screen a few days before our meeting, then confirmed via text the day of. Drove out to safe neighborhood and was greeted by her in a very safe, nice location. Showered up briefly and then the fun began. May repeat if I visit again. Emily has an extremely hot body, butter face. Not bad looking, just not quite what you may expect from the otherwise smoking hot body seen in her pictures. I kept my eyes elsewhere and had a banging time with this French Canadian native. As noted, it felt very safe with her, although not really sure what verification steps she took. There was one previous review here, plus found others on a local board in the Great White North. I think she does her homework (in more ways than one, as she's also a student most likely paying her way thanks to the hobby. Treat her well because she really is a nice girl. My brief time with her was sensual, and she certainly worked hard for 30 minutes. After I got out of the shower she stripped down to nothing and was standing there waiting for me. Not a big kisser, so I went to work on her perky tatas right away, sucking and massaging, getting her nipples erect and my cock throbbing. When she couldn't help but feel the stiffness on her belly, she dropped to her knees for a brief BBBJ session before we moved to the bed. Put on a hat and boy did she get drilled every which way that day. Went through a succession of hot positions, CG, mish, reverse, doggie, her straddling me while I held her up in the air, just kept taking it like a champ. I was up to the challenge but couldn't unload with the hat on, so we pulled it off and went back to a BBBJ till completion on her tits and both of us collapsed somewhat exhausted. She cleaned up, I showered up, gave her a nice hug, told her I had a great time, and walked off into the night to a local watering hole to cool down.
positive noticed Silk's ad a couple of places, looked like someone I would like to meet and I am really glad I did, I have repeated and both occasions will have me coming back for more as she is wonderful to me, Silk is beautiful and has a great personality. one of the ladies she shares a space with was standing outside the first time I was there and said Silk was waiting inside for me and was in a red dress. opened the door to find a stunning vision, she looked incredible in this tight, red dress. excused myself to clean up and just knew that I was going to enjoy myself. been to this place before and is probably one of the nicest most modern looking place. very warm and welcoming. we both got undressed with silk leaving her panties on, but not for long. laid down and she started with a good massage, some small talk and some teasing. some b2b with her nibbling on my neck and ears a little which made me want to flip right away. rolled over for some more teasing and b2b which led to more nibbling on her part. next thing I know we dfk, I could do that all day with her. my hands are free to roam and I am having a wonderful time with her breasts and fiv. we switch around and I am on top of her, dfk, playing with her breasts and eventually head down for some daty. absolutely enjoyed myself and wished it would never end. i played with her clit and was licking away at her pussy. brought myself closer to her for a great finish on her stomach as she was laying on her back. my second visit was just as enjoyable if not more because of how comfortable we are with each other. i will repeat. she said she was taking a few weeks off and haven't noticed ads lately. hopefully it won't be too long before i see her again.
positive Great agency, easy setup. All text. Got to the hotel and behind the door was this really hot curvy girl. Great ass, great tits. I can see her in porn she has that look and sexiness about her and the body helps too. I still think about them and they feel great. Excellent service and great attitude, can't go wrong here. She enjoys what she does and is sexual plus multi orgasmic. I didn't care for any small talk just wanted action and action is what I got. She gives a great blow job, just right not too hard not too soft; just great suctions. She has nice puffy lips made for dick sucking. Her tits looked and felt amazing and could not stop sucking on them. I think she had that black teddy that others mentioned but it came off quick after a rinse in the shower. I did not kiss too much but she is definitely a good kisser. I had everything covered including the BJ but it felt so good in her mouth. Her pussy was shaved and looked good, she let me finger her inside and out and she came off of that. I went for missionary in first round, her pussy is so good I was going to cum quick. I tried to go slow but after a few minutes I came a big load. She cleaned me up and I refreshed for a minute and I went back to the bed. She makes me feel like I'm with a porn star because of her looks and performance. I did not cum in her mouth because everything was covered by my request but was tempted to do so, don't know if she offers it I didn't ask but her attitude was really good I doubt she would have turned it down. Second round was intense, she came and I came hard too right after. I love the way her boobs bounce around, nice big hard nipples. I went one more time this time doggy and what a site. Big, round and firm no fat at all. I think she came again not sure I lost track. She is a turn on and we got along well. I still think about the session. I was really pleased and left very happy.
positive I have seen Lynn and three other occasions so Setting up was very quick. Location was very easy to find and I liked it because close to my location. She is a wonderful sweet girl which will get down and dirty with you when you're ready a must for anyone who's she will put 200% into pleasing you. She is one of my all-time favorites don't think twice just go see her.... Lynn always looks awesome especially with her naturally large breasts. This time I requested for her to wear Boots jeans and a sexy blouse.wow!!! She awesome I could not keep my hands off we proceeded to the bedroom where I slowly undressed her savoring every piece of article that came off. We had a two hour session she first devour me taking my dick all the way down her throat never really experienced someone with that talent, I explode she never swallows but she will open her mouth and let you see your juices inside her mouth an dripping down her chin and hands then goes and cleans up.Round two was screwing in every unbelievable position moving in front of the mirror I'm watching the beauty of her movements I finally finish up in the mish. I just love talking with her she is so sweet she lays with you as if you are her man which makes me feel awesome especially the way she gently touches you during conversation and nipples in different parts of your body. Dam I miss her :) round 3 was even better then the others the way she moves herself in the reverse cowgirl position leaning back with her hand on my chest and grinding me with all her emotions into it. Lynn is a pleaser she will do everything in her power to make sure you leave totally fulfilled and satisfied Beyond your belief. You must see here and she will become your favorite also. Love you Lyn !!!
positive My regular provider needed to cancel a scheduled session but I still needed a release. I reached out to a handful of providers whose ads and pictures (and TER reviews) appealed to me and Sarah was the first to respond. I enjoyed my time with this sexy and intelligent girl. After receiving a reply from Sarah we tentatively set an appointment. My references apparently checked out (I heard from one who told me she gave a thumbs up) and we confirmed the time and place in Boston at a hotel between the Back Bay and the South End. When I arrived she sent me her room number and instructions on navigating the lobby and I was at her door. After knocking, she opened the door from behind it and kissed me on the lips as soon as I stepped in. We had a little delay because she was waiting for a delivery that was late, which concerned me a little. Within minutes it arrived and it turned out to be a fifth of irish whiskey, so no more anxiety. She poured us each a drink, we toasted, and then started kissing again with her hands roaming to squeeze my already erect cock and get things started. She was dressed in an easy-off outfit and within a few minutes we were naked on the bed. Her tits are smallish but firm and very sensitive, especially her nipples. Nice skin and nice smell too. I knew from her reviews that it would be CBJ, so I wasn't surprised when she broke out a condom and put it on before taking my cock in her mouth. Even covered up, I loved the feel of her mouth and lips as she sucked me and massaged my balls. I told her that I hadn't cum in a while and that I was going to be quick with the first one. She told me not to worry, that we would have a round two, and then got on top in cowgirl. Her pussy was wet, hot and tight and we fucked enthusiastically for longer than I thought I would last until I shot a load that filled the condom. Her reacharound to my balls pushed me over the top. We had some recovery time and we had a discussion about topics that interested us both, including her graduate program. I was quite interested and I hope she appreciated the discussion as much as I did. Sitting there touching a naked sexy woman, my cock started to stiffen. Sarah noticed, used her hands to get me fully hard and put on a fresh cover and started sucking me again. I had the sense that 69 was off the table so I didn't try. She told me she needed me on top fucking her; she spread her legs and lips and I was inside. I found myself thrusting in time with the music she had on low in the background and it was a fast-paced fuck that got us both into a little bit of a sweat. We shifted to cowgirl at my request and finished with a bang, and another large load in the rubber. Sarah is sexy and very responsive. She wanted to please me and it felt good. I am glad that Sarah was available and that we could connect. I recommend her as highly as anyone who doesn't give BBBJ.
positive I saw Sabrina's posting and having had a good time with other girls in this group, I e-mailed Sabrina for a same day meeting. After several e-mails for screening, I got the apartment address. The apartment runs several ladies at a time, but I didn't feel uncomfortable. Sabrina's ass is smaller than the photos, but she is in great shape and has a tight pussy. I enjoyed my time and would likely repeat. Once I got to the apartment, an attractive Latina opened the door in a white teddy, which was a nice contrast to her dark latina skin. She kissed me on the lips as I did a quick cup of her ass and breast. She led me to the second bedroom in the apartment and I laid my gift on the dresser. Sabrina had a very erotic sense and we immediately locked lips and she shoved her tongue in my mouth. I rarely go for the full GFE, but Sabrina had me very relaxed and I soon took a more steering role. After a few minutes kissing, she put her hands on the wall and I let the teddy fall off of her shoulders. I kissed her neck, slid the teddy to the floor and cupped her breast. I slid on hand inside her panties as she ground her ass on my crotch. I pulled her panties off and as I explored her ass and pussy, she turned around and helped me disrobe. She tried asking what i had in mind, but my Spanish wasn't good enough and her English wasn't getting it done either. So she pushed me, with my raging member, on the bed and then started DFKing me. We made out for a few minutes and then she started kissing my chest, and worked her way down to my cock. She started a BBBJ for several minutes and slid a cover on while I was distracted by her lovely breast. They are implants, but still nice and soft. I wasn't ready to mount her and laid her on the bed. I went down on her pussy while teasing her g-spot with a couple of fingers. I explored her clit, pussy, and asshole with my tongue. After 4 or 5 minutes, she started to really enjoy the attention and I could sense she was building up to a nice, organic orgasm. After a few more minutes of teasing her clit with my tongue, she came hard; her pussy was dripping. I was starting to get soft and smacked my covered cock on her pussy and ass. Once I was solid again, I fucked her first in miss, then doggy, and with her top. She had good energy and fucked me till i came and by this point, we both had started to sweat. At this point, we were 30 minutes into the session and we had both had a nice orgasm and we collapsed on the bed. I grabbed a few paper towels and took the cover off and started hugging Sabrina. I have had enough experience to know when the lady is faking, but I know Sabrina had at least one orgasm on my visit. As I caught my breath, I continued to explore Sabrina's body. A few minutes later, she started jerking me till i hardened. She then said she wanted me to fuck her again. I was rock hard again and Sabrina slid on a cover. I fucked her in doggy and slapped her ass as I got going. I started rubbing her rosebud and she moaned loudly until i tried sliding a finger inside her ass. It was clear this wasn't the menu. The second pop was mainly my effort, but Sabrina moaned loudly as I fucked her and kept saying "si, si, si papi." I came in doggy while I was pulling her pony tail and slapping her ass, I was getting pretty aggressive at this point and while Sabrina wasn't getting excited, she tolerated my dirty talk and slapping her ass better than most. After I came, Sabrina asked if I wanted a shower. I took a few minutes to clean myself up and she helped me dress and walked me to the door, with another kiss on the lips, we said our goodbyes. I had a great time and am likely to repeat.
positive Made the appointment by email. Pretty easy. Made my way to a South Minneapolis location that is familiar. Got buzzed up and opened the door to an attractive MILF. A really nice time. Piper welcomed me with a kiss and hug, wearing a nice little bra and panty set. We chatted briefly and then we proceeded to lose our clothes. Piper has some motherhood marks, but she is beautiful - make no mistake about that. She's a really pretty blonde - someone that you'd notice in the coffee shop or across a restaurant. We made our way to the futon and after some nude massage, then started the real action. DFK and several minutes of mutual masturbation. Her moans are real and the action flows very naturally. Then Piper proceeded with an fantastic BBBJ. Lots of deep throating, just enough hand action and some nice eye contact. Then onto 69 where I licked her vigorously, paired it with fingering and swallowed a little squirting liquid. I couldn't hold back on the other end of the 69 any longer and blew my load into her mouth. After cumming in her mouth, we snuggled and chatted a bit. Piper started another BBBJ, but couldn't get me to cum a second time - no worries there. She's got great oral skills - I savored it all. Great lady, great time.
positive Second time to this establishment and overall as expected. Easy to set up visit. I would have to agree with the others in that face was a little older than expected. She was quite accommodating but not sure I would repeat with all the other options. Standard 2 call setup and easy to get to location. Once led to room i waited about 5 minutes before being introduced to Emma. Definitely hot body though face would lead me to believe older than looks in photos online. She was warm with her hug and smelled nice. We went to the shower which was standard stuff. Allowed roaming by my hands throughout. Back in the room about 10 minutes of light massage before the flip and onto main event. Lfk followed by cbj then cg and finally finishing in mish. I declined daty but it was on menu. Cleanup and light massage before out the door. It was a nice time but I would probably go with someone else next time due to all options at this place.
positive I went on a weekend to see Liz but she's not available. Went with Orange instead and no regrets. Her measurements from the website appeared to be slightly off, but she's attractive and I enjoyed myself tremendously. More details in VIP section. I was in the city during the weekend and called to see Liz. When I got there Liz was not available. I was offered Orange instead at a discounted rate of $260 (regular rate is $300). I went with Orange even though I find her too short (< 5 ft) and not my usual type. But she is quite pretty and friendly. She helped me removed my clothing while fondling my dick. I quickly got hard while DFK'ing her. I didn't want her to suck my dick as I wanted a shower first (was running around the city in the morning and smelled bad). She covered all my important parts well in the shower, and also BBBJ me. After shower we got back to the room and she started her routine while I'm lying face down. She was kissing me all over my back, and started licking/rimming me, while stroking my dick. I raised my butt to give her a better angle, and she went to town. I let her prolong the rimming/BJ session as it was too good. I came in her hands/mouth. After cleanup she started giving me a body sliding massage. Her skin is smooth/flawless so the body to body action felt great. I got hard and she flipped me over for some BJ. She moved her body so that her pussy is on top of me, and I went to town. Pussy is fully shaved and taste great. I started fingering her and she's wet. Moved my finger to finger her ass and she objected to that. Not a problem as we continue in 69 position. I asked her to fuck me CG style, and she gave me a vigorous fuck. She's tight but I couldn't come. After 10 minutes of vigorous action she moved to BJ. I finally came. After shower I saw Rainbow standing in the hallway. I find her prettier and will try her next. I may repeat with Orange but there are simply too many targets to try.
positive I was in town and found Jillian's ad. Reviews were pretty good. Gave her a call and she answered and was very nice on the phone and set up an incall appointment. She was very cautious but that is a good thing. It was a good visit and I may repeat. Her apartment is a little messy and she does have a small dog. Got to her place and she just got there a little earlier. She had to take her dog out and was a little scatterbrained. Once back in we proceeded to her room and talked a bit while getting undressed. She started with some kissing with tongue and then proceeded to a BBBJ. After a little while she covered me up and started on top. After a little while we switched to doggie and I finished in the cover. She was very good about cleaning me up. Kissed a little and I was on my way. Seconds were on the table but I was good with one. I may repeat. She is a nice girl.
positive Having used this agency before and read reviews on Koa, I wanted to take her for a test ride. Standard 2 calls to the door. She is a nice girl but her english needs work....but her attitude was great. Might repeat but many fish in the sea After reading how much she likes to lick ass, I wanted this girl. I like being rimmed and she did not disappoint. Entered to some lfk to dfk and then into the shower to clean up. Came out and we both got naked. She worked her tongue all over my body and got to my asshole and spent a good time there, and I loved it. she spent some time bbbj and then we covered up and went to town in her pussy. rcg, cg miss and doggie where i finished up in the cover. Cleaned up and she gave a decent massage trying to get me hard again. Cup 2 wasn't in the cards but it wasn't for lack of effort.
positive Any man owes to himself to meet Orange. Btw it was my first experience with asian girl and it was great. Easy to set up, by phone. Her experience left me speechless and i definitely know why she has a lot of good reviews already. You'll be happy with her... We exchange greetings and a hug. A very tight hug and I feel i know her long time. I can distinguish every curve through that lilac baby doll she's wearing. Her orange (red ) hair looks to erotic, I collapse on the sofa and expect to be wowed. She circles the sofa, comes behind me and kisses my neck whispering the sexiest thing in my ears. My secret sorry folks. She comes back to face me on her knees ready to feast on my cock. She says she is hungry for my cum and really works for it. I let go and take a bathroom break to wash my face. I come back to Orange is on the bed. She been naked. She looks great, very tempting! Hot is on I start missionary then invite her to be my cowgirl. I save the best for last. Doggie style, short but to the point and let my cum drip on her ass. I wipe her clean and she does me. Good byes and an even tighter hug. For that price she is the best. But going have new experience with different asian girl.
negative I was caught off guard by how stunningly beautiful she is, an air of confidence and sophistication surrounding her. As we chatted, the lines began to blur. Her wit and charm take over, her allure overwhelming It was a late night and I was exhausted. I wasnt feeling it. Weve all been there. As I pulled up to park, thoughts of my date began to flood my head. Would she be cool to just chill for awhile ?  Would I be able to get up for this ? I got out of my car and walked towards the lobby. I noticed the hotel was buzzing with activity (Super Bowl preparations), as I called in and was given the room number. I found the elevator and went right up. Upon knocking, I noticed the Do Not Disturb sign dangling from the door handle. I hear this sweet voice say coming and the door opens. All my negative thoughts were magically whisked away and my full attention was now focused on the beautiful woman whom stood in before me Carli had taken some professionally done photos for her P411 profile and I had requested that she wear the white dress that she had worn for her shoot. She looked amazing. As she came to greet me, I held her head in my hands and kissed her. Or perhaps it was the other way around. She has the fullest of lips and the passion she brings behind them will have your entire body go weak. At that moment I realized that she was so much more than the Woman I had imagined her to be. The way she carried herself, her perfect posture, the flow of our conversation, all of it points to a Woman of culture and intelligence. They say that refinement comes with age and experience. Id be challenged to find a Woman as young, passionate and refined as Carli. I excused myself to freshen up. When I returned, we continued our kiss. We made our way onto the bed. Her body is breath taking. I caressed her soft skin, taking in the moment, as she moved her way down my body. Her motions are slow, but deliberate. She uses every part of her body to entice and arouse you. She is well versed in the art of pleasure. We touched on variations of each position. As she knelt on the bed, Carli reached to the side table and put lube on her hand. Without any prompting from me, she placed the lube on my cock and guided me inIt was an unexpected, but enjoyable trip to Greece. We replaced the cover and I wanted to finish in mish. The feeling of her body pressed against mine was too much and I reached As Hobbyists, we speak to the importance of chemistry. There is no clear cut definition, but we know it when we see it. Her personality brings the experience to a different level. Carli is a Woman with whom you can feel at ease with, regardless of setting or venue. Shell tell you that shes having some ink being removed (per her ada tapestry of her past). Oh what a past it must have been ;-) I envy the people she holds close. The Hobbyists whom have reviewed her, almost to a man, mentioned that they would repeat. Should you fall for this one, be prepared for a hard landing. Although classically beautiful, its her imperfections that make her perfect
positive Used service before and had a last minute urge. Made the call for 2 hours later. Service is accomidating. Text when I got there, gave me room number and headed up in above average hotel. The door opened and I saw a knockout. She was super friendly, asking questions, got down to business. Vips read on for details. Non VIPS, she is fantastic.....run to her now. Got inside and wow. Obviously the girl in the poctures, but looked even better. Her poctures don't do her justice. Exchanged pleasentries, headed to shower to freshen up. I got out and she went in the bathroom for a minute and came out nude. She has the best body I have ever seen. Huge natural tots, amazing ass, and skinny for those big tits. She hopped on the bed and immediately dfk. Went for bbbj which was above average, but after about 45 seconds she went right to 69. Her puss is perfect, can't even describe how fantastic. About 5 min in, and on with cover, strict to Mish with legs up by her head. So flexible and she seemed to want this immediately. I can't even describe how many positions we did. Mish, k9, cowgirl, lazy, and some stuff not only have I never done.....I have no idea what to call them. She was so hot, so good, and basically begged to get fuck for as long as I could hold out. We basically fucked for 45 munutes. I have no doubt that MSOG, cim, and basically everything else is on the table, but had such a great time just went for 1 big load in the bag. She is my ATF at this point and will be scheduling again before she leaves. The best ever. The fact that she has no reviews as of yet is a travesty, the best from this service and all others by far. Treat her well, she is fantatstic.
positive Set up through Joey was easy. Carli came by my hotel and I was happily surprised. We decided to have a drink to get to know one another. Carli is very entertaining and a good conversationalist. We left the bar in search of more fun and Carli proposed a strip club. We had a had a bottle of champagne and got to know a pair of the dancers. Carli and the dancers really enjoyed one another as well as taking care of me. It was lots of fun at the club but then it was time to return to my hotel where the intimate fun really began. Clothes came off and soon we were both naked on the bed. Carli is a great kisser and enjoys DFK. Her breasts are fabulous and she enjoys having her nipples sucked and gently pinched. Her pussy is delightfully clean and shaven -- tastes great. With a couple of fingers inside her and my tongue on her clit, her body shuddered repeatedly. When Carli returned the favour she displayed remarkable oral skills and she can DT with the best of them. Love her OWO technique and she pays marvelous attention to my balls and nether regions. I went down on Carli again and played with her back door which really got her purring so I asked about anal and she responded with an enthusiastic thumbs up. Who am I to say, "no"? So, on with the cover and for round one I gently slid into her tight but accommodating backside. After she loosened up, I couldn't pound her hard enough -- this girl loves to ride and be ridden. Giddy up! After a shower and a bit of a rest, round two began with OWO from her and then some 69 with lots of anal play. Plenty of DFK between tasting her breasts, pussy and backside and her returning the favour on me. We tried vag sex in various positions from RCG, doggy, mish and CG before pulling off the condom and her again demonstrating her DT skills while she rubbed her own clit to climax. It was great fun to come in her mouth while she masturbated to climax, her body quivering while my load blasted into the back of her throat. Another clean up. More kisses and off she slid into what was left of the night.
positive Contacted Farrah by email a week or so in advance and set up evening outcall date. Text messaging back and forth on day of date to confirm and to give her hotel. As date time rolled around, she called to say she was having difficult finding my room. Not her fault, as I was staying in an Orlando resort and the building setup was confusing. Told her to find my building and then I went out and found her and we walked back to my room together. She was wearing a little black dress, that complemented her physical assets. I would definitely repeat and may when I next visit Orlando. Once in the room, I opened the wine and poured us each a glass and we sat on the couch getting to know each other. Then she slid over and began some serious DFK. She suddenly stopped and said she had an outfit to put on for me and excused herself to the bath. She came out wearing a sexy lingerie outfit and we stood for a while making out until I suggested we adjourn to the suite's bedroom There the clothes quickly came off and she began a sloppy BBBJ, followed by some DATY in 69. Due the the lateness of the hour and the fact that I had been traveling the better part of the day, it took awhile to full attention, but she was unwavering. After the soldier was ready for duty, on went the raincoat and she mounted CG, which soon became RCG. This gave me a delicious view of that delightful tush. She said she had been focusing on her butt during workouts and it certainly had paid off. K9 had to be next, as I slammed into that beautiful backside. A trip to the islands was attempted but with little success due to the travel fatigue and despite all her valiant efforts to make it possible. Told her I wanted CIM and she eagerly agreed. Great combination of mouth and HJ resulted in the first (and only) pop of the evening. She retreated to the bath and returned with a warm washcloth to clean me up. Chatted for a while about her background and other things related to the hobby and then she began to stroke me with DFK -- she's a terrific kisser and returned the compliment -- which evolved into BBBJ that brought the big guy back to attention. Was ready to suit up a second time but the moment was lost and we just laid together and talked for a bit. She then excused herself to the bath to clean up. When she emerged, we exchanged gifts -- her the donation, with a little something extra, and me a warm, soft kiss goodbye. She said she would love to get together again real soon and I would have if there had been more time during my visit. She is a sweet young lady, but not lacking in the skills of a more experienced provider. Fellows, she is a gem and don't miss her if you're ever in Orlando.
positive I have been MIA as of late but when I saw Samantha's pics I knew I had to give her a try. Met her at a budget motel on a just ok side of town. Guys, she is a keeper. She is young, friendly, gorgeous face, beautiful spinner body, and goes out of her way to please. She did everything I wanted and then some. She is a true gfe. Vip's can find out why... When I walked in the room I got a nice hug and was told to get comfortable. I lay the donation on the table and did as requested. She seemed a little shy at first as she climbed under the bed covers as soon as she undressed. She did however pat the bed beside her and invited me to join her. Didn't have to ask me twice. This is where I became a little concerned at first since I have been unable to date to read any juicy details. I like dfk and we did start off with soft kissing but I ask for some tongue and she said she really didn't like to do that. I thought to myself, here we go with everything covered and all the off the menu rules. Far from it! I told her dfk was a real turn on for me and would she consider with a tip. She agreed and the kisses were sensual an sweet. It only gets better form here... She gets down between my legs for a very spirited bbbj. It was great! I wanted to get a look at that beautiful ass and suggested a little 69. She agreed. She tasted and smelled wonderful. It got to a point where she asked for a condom. I told her I didn't bring any. I asked if I could cim and she said that was fine. She surprised me by saying I could bbfs if I wanted as well. Wow! My intention was to try a few positions and finish bbbj cim. Well, it didn't get that far. I started off mish nice and slow, watching her perfect b-cup tits bounce with every thrust as we dfk'd. I told her I had to stop because I was about to blow and she said go ahead if you want! I rarely do it but I could not hold back and I kept going and going and didn't think it was ever going to stop. It was incredible! I asked her if she wanted me to post that part of it in the review and she said go ahead but ymmv. I quickly dressed and after one last kiss I left but not before I gave her a well deserved tip. Guys its needless to say I strongly recommend and I can't wait to see Samantha again...
positive She was a great provider, go see her now! She makes you feel comfortable I went to see Joy after looking at her reviews online. I had a feeling she was going to be fun, for OC folks this is a solid agency to work with, never had any trouble with booking. I arrived there and got the go ahead to go to the apartment which is in a nice complex. I went up and a very cute Thai girl was waiting behind the door in green lingerie. We started with the shower clean up with a little preview which was awesome! We dried up and went to the bed, started with a nice long BJ, and than switched to 69 which was really nice . We than did every positivism imaginable and we went for close to an hour. We were getting close to the time ending so I pushed to finish, I liked that she didn't rush at all which makes you feel comfortable. All in all , great experience , go see her asap!!
positive Layla is the sweetest girl I have had the pleasure of meeting. I required a lot of extra effort on this particular day and she never hesitated. This girl will go the extra mile to please you. Layla has a missing tooth, which I could tell she is nervous about. I don't think it was related to that, but I did not respond to her at all at first. She was a trooper and we made out, touched each other, played with a toy and she sucked me bareback until she finally got me to attention. I went in with the intention of running through all the positions because I do find her attractive... but for whatever reason just didn't respond. Once she got me going, after all the needed effort, I just had her finish me off with a blow job. Seriously... a great girl who aims to please.
positive I had initially scheduled with another agency but due to scheduling error, I got bumped. Having seen another really hot provider from this agency, I called in hopes of seeing her again on short notice; no such luck but they recommended Tina. Tina is pretty but not the slender, spinner type that I prefer. With that being said, her performance was excellent however. VIPs can continue...... It is Tina in the pictures; however, her body is not as tight as depicted; tummy area is soft and she sports more of an athletic body, with tan lines and small, natural breasts. As mentioned, she does have a pretty face, great, innocent-like personality and totally aims to please. Not recalling any reviews about her, I only booked a half hour. Upon arrival, we quickly undressed and into the shower; fairly uneventful but I did get a brief preview BBBJ. Once in the bedroom, I got into position for some more BBBJ. As Tina went down on me, I gently but somewhat forcefully held her head and made her deep throat me; she took it. She even slid further down and gave me some light rimming. I'm sure that if you're into that, she would probably comply. Knowing that it was a brief session, I asked for the cover and I stood her up and got behind her for a standing rear entry. She even put her pumps on to give her more height for my initial penetration. After a few thrusts, I pushed her onto the bed and we eventually ended up in flat doggie where I reached around and fingered her clit. We got into a good rhythm and boy did she get wet! I think I got her close to cumming but don't think she O'd. I then got on my back and had her climb on top for some CG where I touched and sucked on her small, natural breasts. At one point, I reached around and gently probed her ass while she continued to ride my hard cock; since I was gentle, she seemed to be ok with half of my index finger in her ass.....nice! One thing to point out is that Tina has one of those condom-grabbing pussy's. I'm trying to be safe and I had to reach down a couple of times to pull the condom back as her pussy kept wanting to devour it. Our time was just about up so I shot a nice load into the cover and quickly reached in to grab it while I pulled out. Overal, no repeat for me due to body type, but you can't go wrong with her service! Not once did she even hint that time was almost up; Tina totally aims to please!
positive Very good provider, not always "there" but very sexy and gets into her work. Prices vary according to her finances that week... Would not go there after dark but daytime is ok. Would reccomend to try out. Have seen Layla several times. She has an outstanding toned body with a great ass. The first time was the best since she wore a sexy number and was really into it. She told me she really likes sex and it showed, we started off with a little kissing which lead to some long major DFK while we got naked. We were spot-on with the lip-locking! Layla makes sure to be as fresh as possible for her dates, something I like. She doesn't do any O's from oral but it's not from my lack of trying. Her BBBJs were first class, she told me later she spits but I never got that far. Did her from most positions, All being tight even when I put her legs almost over her head giving her a quick O and I wasn't far behind. I wanted to put her over the counter and went into the kitchen. She was reluctant and I found out why...I wouldn't want to eat anything from that kitchen!!! The second date she was distracted from family problems and it showed but she stilll took it like a champ. The third date was a major disapointment. We set the same date & time as before & she asked that I pick up food & drinks. When I was almost there Layla didn't answer the phone or text after repeated tries so I knocked on the apt door. Some dude answered who stated he was the "step-bro" & said Layla wasn't there!?! I tried to reach her that day with no luck. When I finally reached her several weeks later she gave me attitude for some reason. Due to her "personal problems" I'm not sure if she even remembered me or our date. But sex is good with her anyway.
positive First time using the agency so had to get verified which went well. Saw Sasha coming to my town set up an appointment and glad I did . Beautiful gal with nice attitude. Definite repeat. First time using the agency so had to get verified which went well. Saw Sasha coming to my town set up an appointment and glad I did . Beautiful gal with nice attitude. Definite repeat. My appointment got rescheduled as her flight was delayed. So that was a bummer but when I finally got there , wow she is a beauty. A quick kiss and introduction got business out of the way . Quick shower and the action started. We started feeling each other and the clothes were flying all over . She had beautiful breast and clean pussy which tasted good . Nice Bbbj and I was hard . She put the cover and we tried several positions before i could not take it and shot a big load. We chatted for few minutes before round 2 which started with Bbbj and I quickly got hard again. Went down for daty and spent some time there and she had a big O. Not it was her turn and I finally finished with Bbbj. Cleaned up and said goodbye. Well spent money with this hot women. Highly recommended.
positive Had seen MarVenus' adds for a while and they always intrigued me. She's better looking than her pix and has a nice little MILF body. Turns out she's an absolute gem! Very nice and friendly and no rush at all. So nice I will be repeating. VIPs read why.... MarVenus is so nice and down to earth. She greeted me in nothing but a sarong and seemed very happy to see me. We chatted a bit to break the ice and then she straddled me to get things started. I stroked her nice little body for a while and kissed her neck and she began to purr. She started at junior with her hands and soon was putting the hat on with her mouth. Some pretty nice CBJ followed. She jumped on me and straddled me again in CG. She rode like a champ and soon was on the verge of coming herself. I turned her over for some nice mish and stroked her good until she came. No faking here gents. It was very nice and soon I was popping myself deep in. Overall a very well spent half hour. I'll go back for a longer appointment next time. Something tells me the more you see MarVenus the more you're gonna get! Go without hesitation fellas. :)
positive Noa is a beautiful provider who enjoys her work. I have seen her twice and look forward to my third visit. Non-VIPs, she is real. VIPs, read on. Noa has a very friendly personality that resonates from the moment you enter her hotel room. She has a delicious, taut body that is a joy to behold. Our sessions begin with open mouth kissing that quickly lead to the bed. Her favorite position is 69, and she sucked my bareback cock while I voraciously licked her clit, rimmed her shaved pussy, and thrust my tongue inside of her. Both times we were together, I fucked her missionary style, probing her tight pussy deep with my long, hard cock. When she cums, she is vocal--a huge turn-on. Treat this provider well, and she will treat you well. She is very talented and capable of engaging you in conversation. I plan to visit her again.
positive Honey is a beautiful mix of asian/latina; I know what an incredible combination. She is lovely, eager to please, and the agency is top notch. I would highly recommend both. Bill for BSE has got to be the best of the local agencies in Ft. Lauderdale. I know they must get hundreds of phone calls, texts, messages; the girls flake out and don't show up, etc. I know it's a tough business but even in the midst of chaos, Bill gives you great customer service, replies promptly, and makes sure you are pleased in every way. I had seen Honey before with a previous agency and so glad when she popped back into the scene with BSE. It took several trips to SoFL but I finally was able to schedule with her again. Arrived and she recognized me but needed some more details to pin-point the exact meeting. We chatted and got caught up since our last encounter. My only criticism of Honey is she really likes to chat and get prepared before getting into the session. If you are too passive; you will waste precious time. I took my customary shower and made the move with DFK. It was a like a light switch that came on; she went from chit chat to full bore tigress. We kissed, I moved down her lovely breasts to DATY and she was delicious. I think a cookie was baked and she returned the favor. What a beautiful face as she engulfs your manhood. On with the cover and to be honest I didn't make it out of missionary. She was so beautiful and between her moaning in passion and legs wrapped around me so tightly, I couldn't stop and released in the cover. We cleaned up and talked more about family and she is really a sweet girl. I very much would like to see her again.
positive If you are a titty person, go see her now! Her pics on the web are bit low quality and there's a slight chance it's not her. But goodness those tits.... standard 2 call system at a business hotel. Overall good times I wish I could give her an 8 for a hot time, but my appointment was only 30 minutes. She greeted me in plain looking clothes, did a quick LE check and told me to get undressed. I insisted on undressing her first, then took her into the shower for some nice soapy play. DDD does not do her justice...they are literal basketballs. Full and heavy but somehow not very droopy. Perfect? We moved the action to the bed after about 10 mins in the shower. She sucked my dick for a few mins, nice and sloppy, slid the rubber on and started doggy. Her ass ain't bad either. I turned over mish so I can watch them tits bounce...what a heavenly sight. I was so mesmerized by the moving chesticles before I knew it I came in the rubber. I had about 10 mins left and when I expressed my disappoitment I didn't cum on her tits, she willingly gave me another nice bj/titjob until I came on her tits. Overall about 35 mins but she didn't complain. I would def see her again. TITTIES.
positive i had to see this chic because of her pictures. setup a appointment with the booker and went out to meet this hottie in tightass short shorts and a tight top. this girl is legit. great ass, nice tits, pretty face with a no rush personality. i walked into the apartment, which was clean, and leaned in with a DFK while grabbing her ass. she held my hand as we walked to the room, chit chatted for a bit and headed to the shower. when she undressed my jaw dropped, nice tan, perky ass, and a handful of tits. BBJ in the shower, groping, more DFK and headed to the room where the girl pushed me on the bed and started doing her thing. made her get on top of me and give a 69, laid her on her stomach and i had pushed the side of her face into the pillow as i gave it to her from behind. FUCKING HOT. this girl is a moaner to. had her in 2 more positions before i told her to blow me again, got her on the stool and had her spread her legs wide while i rammed her. we made a total mess of the stuff on her dresser haha! when i finished she cleaned me up in the shower while giving me kisses and talked a bit more. ill be definately be seeing her again. FUCKING GREAT TIME!
positive Comfortable Incall... Screening and booking were very quick through agency. Got to the room and went in she was dressed in a sexy bra and a g-string. Man, she has a nice rack and a beautiful ass... VIP read on, She let me in, gave me a nice warm kiss and hug, she smelled beautiful. Handed me a towel, and I went and showered. I wrapped a towel around my waist when I came out. We started DFK and slowly but surely the towel came off. She started rubbing my hard dick. Then she asked if I want to go to bed, yeah! Of course! Laid down, some more DFK then BBBJ which was really good I had to hold back. BTW she makes awesome moans and groans. Covers went on and then some mish and I let the load go. She cleaned me up real nice. Some pillow talk and then BBBJ and a great HJ for the second load. By that time I was done. We chatted about random things for a bit, went to get showered and after some LFK said goodbye. Had a really pleasant experience. See you a song sometime sweetly.
positive I will absolutely see Farrah again... as often as possible!!! Wow. She is a true professional who enjoys what she does. And she has a stunningly beautiful face. I contacted Farrah by e-mail. She responded in 2 hours, 15 minutes. Verification was easy. I asked for a 90 minute outcall to my place in Titusville, which is about a 40 minute drive from her place. She had no problem with the distance and even refused to accept something extra for her driving time. I told her that I am flexible with times and dates, so she gave me several days/times when she was available. I chose Wednesday at 8:30pm. She provided her phone number via e-mail. We e-mailed and texted quite a bit over the next several days... even joking with each other about a variety of things. She's very friendly, polite, and writes well. She's obviously a very intelligent lady. I asked her what she likes to drink and what she would like for snacks. She was very specific that she likes Moscato D'Asti (carbonated Moscato wine) and strawberries/raspberries. She arrived perfectly on-time. I really appreciate that. She was wearing a very nice black cocktail dress and high heels. She has a gorgeous face... definitely her best asset. I think she's a little taller than she advertises (her website says 5'2"). She's probably about 5'4" or 5'5". During our e-mail conversation, she asked me if I had a preference as to what she should wear. I half-jokingly told her to wear a catholic school girl uniform, complete with plaid skirt... and then I told her to just wear whatever she wanted. I must admit that I would have LOVED IT if she arrived wearing a plaid skirt and a white blouse... but she looked fantastic in the black cocktail dress. For the non-VIP's, I can only say this... she is eager to please... very, very eager. I actually felt like she was my girlfriend. That's a rare thing to find. VIP's... read on! When she arrived, she looked great in a black cocktail dress and high heels... and wow, what a beautiful face! I had placed a plate of strawberries, raspberries, and a sweet fruit dip on my dining table... and a plain white envelope next to the plate. I asked her if she would like some berries while I poured two glasses of wine. She happily ate some berries while I poured the wine... and she didn't touch or mention the envelope until she was ready to leave. I appreciate her professionalism. In my kitchen, I handed her a glass of wine and we clinked our glasses before taking a sip. Then we walked to my living room and sat on the couch. We sipped our wine and chatted. She is a very kind, intelligent, beautiful woman. After only a few minutes of conversation, she moved closer to me and started to kiss me. It is a pleasant surprise when a woman makes the first move! At first, we started with some light kissing and progressed to LFK. I gently guided her to a standing position so that we could continue kissing. We gradually progressed to DFK. Kissing is very important to me. It is the "spark" which "lights my fire." She's a good kisser (maybe a 7.5 on a 1-10 scale)... definitely enough to make Mr. Happy stand at attention! And then she surprised me!!! She turned around... with her back to me... her ass rubbing against my cock... and she leaned her head back so that I could continue kissing her! That was SOOOO sexy! We began to kiss deeper in this position as I instinctively reached around to caress her thigh and made my way up to massage her clit through her panties. She let out a little moan of appreciation. Then, she spun around again to face me... and helped me to remove my pants, dropped to her knees and began to vigorously suck my cock. I now understand what others were talking about when they mention her eyes... especially when she looks up at you with your cock in her mouth. Wow. She spent at least 10 minutes in that position, and she didn't mind when I put my hand on the back of her head and fucked her face. I enjoyed the glock-glock-glock sound as I pounded her face with my cock. Even when I forced my cock into her throat and HELD it there for a few seconds, there was no resistance from her. We moved to the bedroom with more of the same. This girl is a champ! After more time on her knees sucking my cock, I guided her to lie on her back on the edge of the bed, and proceeded to lick and suck her pussy. She keeps her kitty clean. It tastes and smells perfect. She is very vocal, but I doubt that her vocal responses are genuine. Hopefully, with time, she feels confident enough to guide me to help her to achieve a genuine orgasm. Nevertheless, I truly enjoyed my time with her. We moved on to "69", and I really loved the way that she licked and sucked my cock and balls... while I enjoyed licking and sucking her sweet pussy. Then, we moved to doggy-style. As I reached my climax, I told her that I wanted to cum in her mouth. She gladly accepted! I pulled off the condom while she got on her knees. She allowed me to fuck her face as I came. She swallowed every drop! This is a HUGE turn-on for me. She is a rare find. I was still hard after she swallowed my cum! So I put on another condom and positioned her on her back... fucking her while holding her legs up on my shoulders. Eventually, I lost my erection... Then, we moved back to the couch. We chatted for a while. As we spoke, she started to kiss me again... caressing my cock, and massaging my balls... getting me hard... sucking my cock... and back to the bedroom for more amazing sex. She rode me in CG and Asian CG. We went through several positions. She has an incredible ability (and desire) to please me. She initiated the foreplay, kissing, etc. every time during the encounter. Honestly, this woman is amazing. I will continue to see her every chance I get. At one point, I wanted to take a trip to Greece... and we tried, but I just couldn't manage to get inside her tight ass. We'll work on that more next time! So, then I lay on the bed while she sucked my cock. I asked her to suck my balls, and she did a great job at that while simultaneously stroking my cock. It felt fantastic. There is room for improvement in her oral technique. She sucks hard and fast, and while I enjoy that... it would be nice if she slowed down sometimes and moved her tongue around the bottom of my cock... and sometimes just licking and sucking the head. Now that I know that I can trust her, I will feel more comfortable to tell her exactly what I want during our next visit. I have no doubt that she will be happy to do whatever I ask. This woman is awesome. She's a keeper.
positive There is another profile for a Sasha on XO Companions' page but it is not for this Sasha, so I am opening up a new one. This Sasha has large, beautiful boobs. Guys, Sasha is gorgeous and loves to please. Go see her while you can. She will not be around long. I have seen other girls from XO, namely Tati Smirnoff. She is one of my ATF, so when I saw that there was a new blonde coming to town, I was eager to see her even though there were no reviews up yet. John & Jen at the agency are awesome and John told me that she is getting fantastic reviews but they just were not up yet so I made the appointment and sure glad I did. I got to the downtown Chicago hotel and was sent the room number. I went right up. The door opened and behind it was a beautiful blonde Russian lady in a tight sexy white dress. She introduced herself and offered her hand to shake. I was interested in a hug and a kiss so that is what we did. She helped me out of my jacket and hung it in the closet. I took a few minutes to admire her beauty and then we started DFKing while standing in front of the bed. She then offered a shower which I took her up on. I came out of the shower and she asked me to wait while she took a quick shower. I wish I would have known, I would have liked to shower together. So I waited patiently. I heard the water stop and then Sasha came out in tiny hand towel, wow, that was a nice site. She laid on the bed and threw the towel to the floor. She was ready for me. We started a wonderful make out session with rubbing and touching. She then licked her way down to my nipples and then further. She took my manhood into her mouth. I was so excited that I did not last very long. She took my first cup into her mouth and went to the bathroom to spit and clean up. Sasha came back out and I apologized for being so quick but told her that she is so beautiful & sexy with a great BBBJ technique. She smiled and was a little embarrassed. Sasha does have limited English skills. I had to repeat myself many times throughout our date. She then offered to give me a massage. I accepted and turned over. She gave me a very delicate massage that I barely felt. But then, she started rubbing her naked body all over me and she used her hair as well. It was a very nice sensation. After about ten minutes, I was ready to turn and start round two. She started again with a BBBJ to wake me up. This time I was able to appreciate her fantastic technique and wonderful eye contact. Her face is beautiful. I will forever have that picture in my head of her working by manhood, up and down the shaft, paying attention to the boys. She then reached for a cover and applied it. She got on top of me and rode me. Her amazing naturel Ds were bobbing up and down. I was in heaven. After about ten minutes, she ripped the cover off and began the most intense BBBJ that I ever had adding soft moans with every lick. It took a while but I lost round two in mouth as well. I was incredibly satisfied. She worked very hard to get that last cup and I was done. We talked for a few minutes and then I hit the shower one more time and left. I have one complaint and that is Sasha is a smoker, it was on her breath the whole time. It was not terrible but it did hamper our DFKing. I would see Sasha again in a heart-beat. Thank you XO for having such beauties available.
positive Well worth the visit, non VIP book with confidence, VIP read on. Normal two call set up, first call discussed rates, second was with address. Upom arriving, very beautiful woman. After some short small talk we were off to the races. She asked how I wanted it, I said from behind to start. She is very energetic. I popped before swapping positions. Only one pop allowed. Overall really good experience, provider is eager to please, and a very attractive woman who knows what to do! Book with confidence!
positive I had read about Piper and was intrigued to see her, since my ATF is harder to get ahold of lately. I emailed via a scheduler, and was verified quickly. Once I got the address, I recognized it as a location where I'd seen another provider in the past. The day of the appointment I parked and she buzzed me up to the loft. We chatted for a bit and then both got naked and I got on the massage table. The massage was nice, but she used a lot of oil, and although it was technically unscented, I could catch some kind of smell from it for a while. After about 25 minutes of massage, the real fun began.... On the flip she climbed on top of me and was grinding on my hard cock and kissing me all over. I was getting really worked up pretty fast, and she slid down and started sliding her oiled up tits around my cock. If she had kept that up much longer I would have come, but I think she sensed that and slowed down. Then she started licking and sucking my balls while gently stroking my cock. I was so turned on at this point I couldn't take it any more, and she slowly engulfed my cock, taking all into her mouth, and then deeper and deeper until I was in the back of her throat and she was giving me what I can say is the best blowjob I've ever had. I usually can't finish that way, but with her it only took a few minutes and I exploded in her mouth, and she kept sucking until I could take no more. She got up briefly to rinse her mouth, and then sucked my still sensitive cock back into her mouth. Amazing. I will definitely repeat, especially because I didn't get a chance to return the favor to her in the first meeting.
positive Saw Holly's ad decided to contact her. We set up an appointment for later that Afternoon at her high level hotel and when I got there she let me know what room she was in. I went up to her room and was quickly let in Holly was wearing lingerie with black stockings and high heels and I immediately new I was going to enjoy myself. Non VIPs if you're looking for a top notch experience with a beautiful mature provider Holly is the one. Holly was amazing she made me feel like a king, she took control and first started to work her way down to my cock, this lady know how to suck a cock she worked me to the point of cumming two or three time but did not push me over the edge. She was os hot I just had to lick her beautiful pussy and she really rode my face the she got on top and rode my cock for all it worth. I will she her again for sure.
positive Verification was completed on the agency website in less than 15 minutes. Setting up the appointment was entirely done by SMS, with my messages always being responded to in a matter of moments. I was directed to a convention hotel near the Loop, and I was texted the room number about 10 minutes prior to the scheduled time. I requested that Sasha greet me in dress and heels, and that's the way she was waiting for me behind the door as I entered the room. I would most likely repeat if Sasha returns to town, and I will probably continue to use this agency as a resource in the future. Prices are a bit higher than some of the fine local agencies in Chicago, but Sasha was definitely worth it. When I first laid eyes on Sasha it was obvious the website photos were real, but I also found that in person she looks younger than the photos suggest. Some light kissing by the door, and then Sasha hung up my coat and asked that I shower. Even at this point she was very attentive, making sure I had a fresh towel, etc. When I came back to the bedroom, Sasha took a quick shower of her own. When she came back to the bedroom, she was completely nude with a huge smile on her face. Normally I prefer to do some kissing and gradually unwrap the girl, but I definitely had no problem with this alternative. Sasha has a very sexy accent and English is obviously her second language. But we were able to communicate with no problem. As she talked a bit about her current tour and cities, she gradually positioned herself closer to me on the bed and we began kissing and touching. Mostly light kissing which was great considering the nice full lips she has, and occasionally some DFK. After a short time she began with BBJ. I enjoyed getting a closer look at all parts of her body while her attention was on the BJ. Every few moments she would reposition herself, giving me a different feel and more perspectives of her body. After about 10 minutes I was ready to pop and she was fine with CIM. She kept me inside until I gradually lifted her up. She went to the bathroom to rinse, but was only gone momentarily and when she returned she snuggled next to me. Sasha suggested I roll over and let her do a massage. Sasha does not use her hands a great deal during the massage. She swings her head around so her soft hair brushed back and forth against my back. Next she used her amazing breasts to do the same, starting with my back and moving all the way down. She had me flip and immediately went back to BBJ on her own initiative. I knew I probably wouldn't come again (which I didn't) but for at least 20 minutes she kept me inside her mouth and gave me a lot of pleasure. She suggested other positions but this was only a 1 hour appointment and generally I need more time than that to get my ducks in a row. So we stayed close, kissing and cuddling, and we went slightly over the time without Sasha mentioning it. I got up to get dressed and she even offered that I could stay and take another shower. I declined, knowing that I wanted to keep her wonderful scent on me as long as possible. I may not shower for a couple days, in fact, although married guys may not want to follow my lead here. We kissed goodbye a few times and I was off to the nearest sub shop for an italian BMT.
positive I had been seeing Laylani's ads for a while and decided to give her a shot. She answered immediately and gave light screening. She was a little apprehensive when I told her my race (Black) but she said I sounded nice enough and agreed to see me. I got to her location within a hhr and she came out of her room to get me. She looked just like her pics...small petite frame and cute smile. We walked back up the stairs and walked back into the room. She gave me a kiss and the magic began. Nice girl, awesome attitude, and I will be repeating again and again. Treat her right. We kissed for almost 5 mins with our tongues probing each others mouths. I cupped her cute little ass in my hands as I lifted her to the bed where we continued to make out. She is a good kisser. I had almost forgot about the gift at this and soon took care of it before undressing while she followed suit. She then began a nice & slow cbj which soon got stiff hard. I then told to lie down and I got on top for mish. She felt nice and snug as I entered her and she wrapped her arms and legs around me as I was grinding into her. After this I had her assume doggy, where I pounded away. She got into it and started creaming. I grabbed the back of her neck and turned her for a kiss as i slammed and exploded into her (covered). We kissed some more and then got cleaned up and dressed. I took my leave but not before kissing her one more time. I will definitely be seeing her again.
positive Saw Sasha's photos and wanted to see her. Booked the appointment through the agency. It was very easy to work with them. Got to the hotel and Sasha opened the door. I could not believe it. She is prettier in person than her photos! But her photos were already drop dead gorgeous! She is totally a killer. I was very very happy from that moment on... On the look, I would give Sasha a 9.5 if that is possible. The intro was friendly, not sexual. I was totally fine with that and I was still in awe of her beauty. I freshened myself and came out. Sasha was lying on the bed waiting for me, wearing a set of black lingerie. She has a sexy fit body, no tatoos or piercings, and natural Ds. Pretty face, light blue eyes, nice teeth and blonde hair. All the good stuffs. I immediately pulled her up and DFK with her. So hot. She is a great kisser. One thing to note is I did find out that she smokes while we are kissing. But it was very light and it did not bother me at all. Hot chicks like that often smoke. My hands roamed around Sasha's body. Then I lied on the bed. She took the lead kissed her way down my body and began an awesome BBBJ. My hands were wandering around her kitty during the BBBJ. Then it got wet. My fingers went in. It started to flow. Sasha's look was so hot when she was sucking my cock I just laid there enjoying the scene and let her suck me off however she liked. After a while I came in her mouth. It was a big load. She took it all and then went to spit. I thought I was done for the day but I was wrong. After clean up, We got back to the bed and quickly started kissing again. Then I tried to chat with her but her English is limited so that made it easy for the rest of our agenda--just fuck. With Sasha's great kissing I was able to quickly get hard again. I sucked on her Ds. It was great. We played a little bit of body sliding and kissing. Then Sasha put a cover on my cock and started riding me CG. The connection was great. Sasha's tits bouncing up and down in front of me. I pulled her down from time to time during CG for DFK, sucking the Ds, and intensifying my thrusts. Then we rolled over and switched to MISH. I fucked her in various variations of MISH for a while. Then I wanted to try fuck her from behind. We kissed some more and changed to K9. It felt amazing just as I thought it would be. Sasha's moaning louder and louder. I knew I was about to come. I pushed Sasha down on her stomach and pounded her sexy ass in lazy-k9 until I finished. I felt like my cock was totally drained after seeing Sasha. All my sex drive that day was absorbed by Sasha. I will repeat for sure. Treat her well. Stay hydrated, gentlemen.
positive Have had Darby on my radar for a while now, and finally decided to take the plunge. Like some people have said, she has a really pretty face and that is the biggest reason why I wanted to see her. Definitely was not disappointed by her face, and had an exceptionally good time. Will repeat. Looks: 9. Super pretty face. She reminds me of a Korean actress. Her smile is amazing, and she's always smiling. Her body is nothing special though. She does have a nice set on her. Super nice, couldn't stop playing with them. Performance: 9. Just want to start out by talking about her DFKs, which were just one of the many highlights of the evening. She kisses perfectly, just the way I like it. Her lips are wonderfully soft. Very sensual about it, and kisses back like she means it. As soon as I see her behind the door with a smile, I am blown away. Just what I was looking for. No preview straight away, but I don't care because I'm busy staring at her face. She leads me to the room, and I undress myself. Off to the bathroom, some blue toast and a shower. In the shower, I can't get over how gorgeous she is as she washes me down. She washes you in the rear, so I know some rimming is coming though I'm not so keen on that. She gives me a preview BBBJ right before I get out. Amazing. I'm excited for the bedroom, and she does not disappoint. She tells me to lay down face first on the bed, where she gives me the most amazing cat bath I've received thus far. I don't really care too much for it usually, but the way she kisses your body as she rubs her nipples all over you.. she eventually goes for some rimming Again, I'm not really about that life but I let her anyways. She flips me over, and does the same on the front. Before she gets to my cock however, she stops by the boys, and her BLS is top notch. My cock is throbbing by this point when she finally wraps her soft lips around my shaft. I'm in heaven. She takes nice long strokes with her lips up and down. I can't take it anymore, so I ask her to lay down for some DATY. Amazing here as well. If she's acting, she does it better than any girl to date. She really seemed to love it. Lots of realistic moaning and shuddering. She eventually pulls her legs up hinting she wants to be rimmed, and I happily oblige but don't spend much time there as I don't have much experience. I make it back to her kitty, and she is still responding magnificently. I get a finger in there as my tongue lashes away at her clit, and eventually a gigantic shuddering orgasm. By gigantic, I mean she laid there shuddering for a good while as I rubbed my fingertips up and down her body. Sexy, just absolutely sexy. She blows me a little more and slips on the cover. We start off in mish, where again she responds like she is enjoying herself. Some passionate DFKs here. Loved these DFKs, really got me going. I'm pounding away, and I think she has another O. Her contracting kegals get me to pop round 1 as well, and she squeezes every last drop out. She cleans me up, and we lay down to cuddle. She seems tired, so we just lay there for a bit and have a nice little chit chat. I can't stop staring at her face, and I'm trying to figure out which Korean actress she looks like. All the while, she keeps playfully biting and sucking on my pecs saying she likes em. Eventually, I can't control my hands and they wander around her body as I suck her beautiful tits. I gently play with her clit, and again she responds well. Finger bang her for a bit and some more DATY, and I think she had another O. She gets up to slip on cover again, and laughs saying she's dizzy from all the orgasms. Pop #2 happens in mish again, and she humps my cock while I'm cumming. OMG this felt absolutely incredible. We end with another extra passionate DFK, and it's off to the showers. Kicking myself for taking so long to see Darby. She is amazing, and might be tied for first on my ATF list. Treat her well.
positive I ran across Lyns profile and my interest was piqued. Shes a very attractive young woman who is committed to your satisfaction. Lyn may be relatively new, but in a few short months has figured out how to be successful. I looked forward to our meeting with anticipation. LD welcomed me into her abode and I knew I was in for an enjoyable evening. VIPS read on. Lyns a very pretty woman in her mid 20s with hypnotic eyes, kissable lips and a sexy tush. She was dressed in a hot LBD and heels and greeted me with a series of kisses that began as LFK and soon became DFK. Her comfortable apartment was decorated with candles and soft music played in the background. After minimal chit chat, Lyn urged me to get comfortable, so I did. LD changed into a hot bra and panty set that revealed her beautiful body. Lyn displayed her oral skills and her sexy BBBJ got my manhood excited in a hurry. We segued into some steamy 69 and Lyn seemed to enjoy it as much as I did as she got increasingly wet. I whispered in her ear and asked if we could have sex now. We began in CG as Lyn rode me and reached down for a kiss every now and then. We transitioned to doggy  her favorite  and it was hot watching us in a strategically placed mirror. Next up was RCG and Lyn advised me  you will really like this. We switched back to CG and cup 1 was served. I felt like a king and we chilled for a while as we got to know each other a bit better. Lyn is very smart, personable, and down to earth  a total GFE. She is open minded and we discussed our individual fantasies and fetishes. Lets just say theres some uncharted territory to be explored. Lyn gave me a relaxing massage and I was ready for round 2. She asked if I wanted to try some mish, but I had lost a bit of steam after round 1. No problem, Lyn came to the rescue with an off the charts BBBJ which left me totally drained. Lyn is a very sensual partner. She is intelligent and soft spoken, yet very confident about her sexuality. You would be proud to take her anywhere  shes a really cool chick. I am impressed with Lyn and I think you will feel the same way when you meet her.
positive Kayla is very easy going and I have see her a few times now same deal call first and meet her in a nice hotel, she always great you with a warm smile and good attitude. Sweet attractive Korean, nice massage and sensual touch. Left very happy and will return again.. Vip's read on.. She asks me to undress and prepares for a sensual massage. Give's a decent message not the greatest but works hard in getting you loose and untying those knots.. Message was no more than 10 minutes when she transitions to the sensual end. I was pretty turned on, so I flipped over. She took the hint, and went right for my joint. I was very hard in her hands, so she started to move the head towards me, but I stopped her and asked for a cover. She kind of shrugged, and then proceeded to give a nice CBJ. No deep throat, but it was good. Then I saddled up and entered her. Lots of moaning and thrusting. We moved to cg, and she seemed to cum again. Finally we switched to doggie, and I filled the bag. We cuddled for a few, then hit the showers to clean up. I went back into the cold with a smile on my face.
positive We met at an upscale hotel and hit it off immediately. She suggested we get a quick drink first, not on the clock, which was really awesome. Sarah is smart, interesting, passionate, creative beautiful and fun.She has an incredibly caring, nurturing sensuality to her. She is there to please you, to make you feel comfortable to explore and have an amazing experiences together. She is very smart and versatile and sexy and I think that one could have a totally different, but consistently great experience, with her each time. I will see her again, soon I hope, as soon as it is feasible. After drinks we went up to the room, talked some more and caressed and kissed. We talked about sex and fantasies and I felt very open with her, like I could explore anything. Told her I really loved oral and wanted to just have oral sex tonight, and be teased (edged"? I guess you could call it..) And to have a awesome orgasm in the mouth. And that she wanted to strip and dance for me and then take off all my clothes. She stripped down to her lingerie and gave me a really sexy lap dance while kissing me and undressing me. She's really all about pleasing you and communication, which I think is so sexy. I told her that I like to be talked to a lot during sex and to feel free to say anything she wanted. While she was giving me a lap dance she kissed my ear and whispered that she was really turned on, and that she hoped that we see you ciao there again so so we could fuck. And that she was very excited for me to come in mouth. It was really hot and I almost came in my pants. She dance stripped undressed me licked and kissed on between my legs and my balls, then put a cover on and did awesome deep throat. as i said I was really turned on, and felt like I was in high school because I wanted to cum so quick. we stopped for a second and I played with her naturally wet, beautiful, inviting.. And talked about how next time we should just have all out carnal sex (im looking fwd to that) I set up and she lovingly put my whole penis in her mouth and sucked until I came. I held her head pulling her to me and I had a very intense, indulgent, leg shaking, orgasm deep in her mouth. Cleared my head for a weekend and turns me on thinking about it now. Great sex, great girl, great time. what it should be. I haven't been able to get back to see her yet, but I will soon. She is incredibly cool as well as sensual and I am looking forward to hanging out and talking to her, as much as I am have sexing w her, in many different ways, for avery long time:)
positive This is a high energy, open minded, physically giving and responsive young woman. Fun to communicate with before, energizing to be with in person. Recommended. Was drawn to meet Sarah when my regular was out of town for the holidays. I liked her grad student status, well written site, and girl-next-door photos. I find women of her height/weight/paleness/confidence/brains irresistible. I asked Sarah if she would consider trying some tantra-style sex practices with me, and she was game. When I arrived at the agreed time, we spent a few minutes talking, since we had many things in common. Then we undressed and began our session. We focused on holding eye contact and matching our breathing while we slowly ramped up our sexual touching. Beginning with her hands on my cock and mine on her kitty, I was super turned on to discover how wet she was. We then moved to her on top, and with our breathing getting faster together, and eyes looking deep into one another's gaze, I came hard in the condom. I was ready again very quickly, and finished a second time in missionary - she was with me the whole time, amazingly intimate and present. When time was up, I excused myself, with one delay to get the names of the amazing music on her playlist. This was a hot experience, yes; but also a spiritual one, and I think Sarah is a fantastic partner for this kind of thing.
positive Saw great reviews in Farrah and was in Orlando for business and fun. I was able to setup an appointment with Farrah after screening. She arrived at my outcall location on time and when I opened the door I was greeted by an very nice looking women. We hugged and she was going to the bathroom to change, but she looked so hot in her normal clothes, I asked that she stayed that way. She agreed and the fun started. I would highly recommend and would repeat if I am in Orlando again. Great experience... After I requested that she stay in her normal clothes, she got clothes and we hugged and started LFK... She has beautiful eyes and I loved making out with her... I then spin her around so I could hold her from behind and we continued to make-out. I started to explore her body, first her tits through her clothes and then I put my hand down her pants, then inside her panties and then the outside of her pussy. After a bit, she spin around and as we were making out, she started undressing me. When she got to my pants, she dropped down to her knees for an awesome BBBJ. Lots of BLS, eye contact, tongue action, And DT... I could have cum quickly, but asked her to slow down... We both got undressed and I laid on the bed for more BBBJ... I asked her to shift so I could play with her tits and and she did so o played with her tit, rubbed her clit and FIV. I asked if we could shift positions and when we did I played with her tits, and her nipples... I worked my way down licking her belly and inner thighs. I then got to her very tasty pussy... She was a moaner and I could tell when I got her excited... She had a O, she was wet and senstive. Instead of stopping, I continued with the to Side of her slit and she seemed to like it. I told her I was very oral and she got the cue that it meant CIM. She went back to work for a great BBBJCIMSW... Totally awesome.. We had a nice conversation and I again, I love her eyes. She asked if I wanted a massage as she brought some oil with her... She went on to give me a very nice massage. We had more conversation before our session ended. Again, I highly recommend and I am glad I was able to meet her.
positive Contacted her through the scheduler who asked for two references. Quickly verified. Went to this cozy studio in the lakes area. A pretty blonde opened the door and greeted me with LFK. Have repeated and will do again. Piper is a pretty blonde with a few extra pounds. She is very friendly and loves kissing! Has a great no-rush attitude and doesn't ask for the donation until the end of the session. The massage was fantastic. One of the best I've ever received. I asked to return the favor and we proceeded onto the bed. I soon ended up kissing all over her body, sucking on her boobs and licking her pussy. Then I started rubbing on her clit. As things got hotter, she asked me to put in a finger, and then two. I happily obliged, massaging her spot and giving her a screaming, squirting orgasm. Her pussy juice was all over the sheets! Then she told me it was my time to relax. I laid on the bed and she started by sucking on my nipples and licking my balls. Then began the BBBJ. I couldn't hold long and exploded in her mouth. She took every drop of it. We continued by cuddling and DFK on the bed until the time was up. I'll definitely repeat.
positive Vicky had been on my TDL for a bit an finally made her way to the top. Easy to schedule with the PO and standard confirm prior to the late afternoon visit. Previous reviews are spot on and I'll repeat shortly. VIP read on... Vicky has a spunky personality - a bit of a fire cracker with an attitude. I loved it. She is very engaging and attentive to your needs and desires. PO was efficient and easy to deal with. Got the room # and went in. Vicky met me at the door and provided a welcoming kiss. Led me to the bedroom and we started a nice make out session. Finally broke our embrace and i dropped off the donation and started undressing. Standard blue toast and shower routine with a nice preview BBBJ. back to the bedroom and re-initiated our make out session. That had the desired effect and i was at full mast. She dropped to her knees and provided a great BBBJ with plenty of BLS. I was getting close so broke her off and moved to the bed. She continued with the BBBJ and it was great so i let her take me to completion with an excellent CIM. She cleaned me up and took are of her self and then immediately asked about a massage. Her massage was better than average and i was a bit surprised how good it was. Finally she asked me to flip and restarted another BBBJ. I guess i was in a lazy mood that day and it felt great so i just let her do her thing. Takes a bit longer on the 2nd pop but she was a trooper and after 10 minutes or so she got the 2nd cup out of me with another CIM. So nice. She provided another brief massage for a few minutes and then we had to head to shower #2 to wrap things up. All in all a great personality and excellent service. Nothing to not like about Vicky and i'll repeat shortly.
positive Easy set up via p411. Young hot Colombian and Brazilian. Very eager to please. Hot body, spinner type. Set up via p411. She showed on time and met me in the bar for a cocktail. She's super hot but braces on teeth scared me. Turned out to be no problem. She started with some body worship on me with a nice bbbj, bls, Hj. She likes to suck cock and balls for sure. We had some 69 followed by many positions, cg, rcg, k9, mish etc etc. she has an amazing little ass and body and works it like an energizer bunny. More bbbj then got on her knees and begged for my load, so I put in front of a full length mirror and had her go to work. Great eye contact and mirror looks. She gave a very long bbbj until I finally blew in her mouth, on her face and her chin. She just smiled and milked me dry then got a clean hot towel for me to clean up. If you like Latino spinners that are young and look 18 she is a winner for sure!
positive I was referred to her by another provider telling me that she was available so I gave it agreed. parking was on a street near by the entrance ,the location is great, I entered the code that was given, as I was standing in front of the door , it was magically opened and there she was an attractive lady.... As I walked inside she asked how was the day, before went into the shower room she gave mouth wash then cleaned me up in the shower . there was no preview of BBBJ. While on the bed she gave BBBJ and body to body massage, she uses a lot of saliva which made it some what a good BJ. after she put on the cap, we started with CG went on to missionary and many more. she's not really a kisser, we barely kissed, it didn't seem like she wants to kiss that much. while we were doing missionary I was trying to rub her private to make thing a little more excited, but she moved my hand away. after we finished she gave me a massage and helped me wiped away the sweat from the intense....
positive Lina was very responsive and easy to set up a meeting with. She is a tall very pretty blonde with a slender but curvy body. Lina is tasteful, discrete and a joy to converse with. During the non-verbal phase of our time she was a very open and energetic woman who was a very pleasurable to spend time with. Whether you are looking for someone to take out on the town or to just meet for one on one time she would make a great companion. Given what she charges and her level of service I would definitely be a regular if I lived in her area. Obviously I would repeat. I was still newish at the point I contacted Lina and nervous about the whole process. Still not being sure what to expect she showed up to my room wearing a long coat on a cold day. Lina is friendly and has a very beautiful face... so far so good. About a minute latter she removes her coat revealing a very tasteful form fitting dress covering her tall slender but curvy body. She has gorgeously long legs. Inside my mind I applaud and feel absolutely confident that I am about to have a great evening. I am still a little nervous and we talk for a while. She is smart, subtle and charming. Lina is gracefully sexy which motivates me to move things along. I go in for some LK soon after she gets naked except for the thigh highs I requested. She took a short pause to ask if I wanted a CBJ or BBBJ and then performed an outstanding bbbj which included DT. Eventually we took a second pause where she offered my choice of cover. She wrapped me up and we got to it. The elegant lady that showed up to my room transformed into a vigorous bundle of energy. Since I am new-ish and still figuring out the boundaries I let Lina take the lead. She got on top of me and grinded away which I absolutely loved. Lina has large beautiful natural breasts and watching her in this position was spectacular. We then switched to DS where she encouraged me to be more vigorous then moved on to Mish. She finished me off with another outstanding session of BBBJ afterwards she produced a warm towel and cleaned me off... a nice touch. As she prepared to leave she explained some useful things to know about the standard procedures for meeting with escorts. Laying back and watching her beautiful backside and long legs as she fixed her hair in the mirror was a nice final note before she left. Lina is a lovely woman and you should treat her well.
positive Noa is an amazing provider! She puts your right at ease and makes you feel like you're the only person in the world! I do not want to really share her at all but I am telling you right now run to see her as fast as you can!! Non-VIP's- Go see her now!! VIP's- See the juicy details below. Our session started off with some great DFK'ing! She is a great kisser and really enjoys kissing and then we move onto the bed and we are both fully undressed by now. Her body is just simply amazing and her ass is to die for guys. So I start to kiss her body from her feet up leg to her pussy to her breasts and then more DFK'ing. By now I am rock hard so I'm on my knees on the bed and she slides down and takes my cock into her mouth and damn does she love to suck cock and she is amazing! So while she is sucking my cock she is turned sideways so that I can play with her pussy! I start with one finger in her pretty little pussy then move to two fingers and I am really fingering her to the point she is moving all around and thriving in pleasure and tells me that I'm bad! So then she looks and says your are ready so fuck me, who am I to deny her of that request. So I throw on the cover and we start off in MISH and being inside her tight little pussy is amazing! I am just fucking her like crazy and she is loving it pulling her legs up so I can penetrate deeper and deeper! Then I tell her to jump on my COWGIRL and let me tell you this beautiful young woman can ride a cock masterfully! So needless to say this went on for a bit and I blow in the cover. She takes it off and licks the rest off my cock. We are sitting there talking and hanging it she is great to be around and easy to talk to so time for round 2 we start off in 69 as I love love love to eat pussy and hers tastes amazing and I can make her cum and squirm all over the bed while she's sucking my cock! Even to the point that she cannot even concentrate on sucking my cock sometimes while I'm eating that sweet wet tight little pussy! So then I throw another cover on and start off DOGGIE and her ass is amazing to look at while fucking her doggie! So that goes on for awhile and looks like cup 2 is not happening ughhh! So I challenge her to make me cum sucking my cock and she accepts and wow did she really go at and suck that cock great! Then she switched to a geisha style with both hands but it just wasn't in the cards for this session. Thank you Noa for being a great provider and for a great time! I will repeat over and over as long as she is around PERIOD!!!
positive I liked Darby's pictures so I made the call. Nice young woman! Here is my fantasy with Darby: Shes beautiful imo: nice smile, good personality, nice body, soft light skin. After she led me in, there was dfk and we undressed. Blue toast and dfk. The we showered together, finishing with a preview bbbj. In the bedroom, there was dfk and mutual nipple sucking. Then excellent bbbj. Then I lay her down for p2p, followed by cfs with pop in bag. We had a shower together and we dressed.
positive I called Sarah in the early afternoon looking for an evening session, we agreed on 9:00pm. The only peculiar aspect was there was no screening so I was on my guard even after she invited me in. But after being greeted with a hug and kiss and a little groping I was convinced she was legit. What followed was an intense and wonderful time. For non VIPs I don't think you'll have anything to complain about and you can do a lot worse. Once we went into the bedroom and started disrobing, I set the donation ($200) on the dresser. She tells me (I'm sure she tells this to all the boys) that she doesn't do bbbj, but would for me if I could leave her a tip. One of my pet peeves is up sales, but at what I consider a low price point I didn't have a problem dropping $60 more on top of the 2 c notes. She asked what I like and I said slow and sloppy. Sarah is very sensual, we lay in bed and wrap our arms and legs around each other and dfk for awhile and she slowly works her way down to Jr., now at full attention. She says "I just love to suck dick!" and goes to it, bbbj with bls. Sarah then swings around and says "You can play with my pussy" After a time I suggest she swing a leg over for some 69. She then sits up and smiles at me, this is a sight I'll always remember, and she is soaked from her nose to chin and both cheeks with spit and pre cum from her wonderful work down south! She then leans forward for more dfk. She then positions herself on top for some 69. I gotta tell ya, Sarah sucks a mean dick- lotsa spit and she don't forget the boys, either. Finally, she puts the rain coat on with her mouth and rides me cow girl slow and deliberate. We're running over the hour and she doesn't seem to care. We up the tempo until I eventually bust when she leans forward and we wrap our arms around each other and start dfk'ing. As we were getting dressed, she let me know that Greek was available for an additional $100.00, if I was interested in that at a future meeting. All in all, a wonderful time and I wouldn't hesitate to call on her again.
positive Provider is with agency, easy to get approved over email. Appointment set up easy and directions given shortly before visit. Located in nice area of North County in an apartment complex. Upon entering, I was greeted by a very sweet and sexy Thai girl that gave me a big kiss and hug before taking me into the room. She was wearing cute little red lingerie that outlined her tight body perfect and gave me the best view of her very nice and round ass. We took a quick shower and cleaned up before the real fun began... non-VIPs, Pure is one of the best and cannot be missed, definitely repeating! Pure was even better looking than her pictures suggested and I was instantly turned on by her looks and attitude. After showering we began tp dfk and she took me over to the bed and sat me down on the edge so she could go to work on my member. She definitely knows what to do, grasping the bottom of my dick with one hand and slowly sliding her lips down my shaft, licking the base to the tip and sucking my balls, I was in heaven. She made it even sexier by looking up at me most of the time with her beautiful big eyes. I honestly could have blown my load there, but I pulled her onto the bed and dfk some more before going down on her and licking her sweet, fresh pussy. She seemed to enjoy it as she was moaning and starting to get really wet. She threw on a hat down below before hopping on to me. She ground me with fierce intensity giving me a great view of her nice body, before crouching in the air and sliding up and down my dick. It wasn't long in this position that I was close to blowing my load already, then she switched to RCG, giving me a dream view of her perfectly round ass bouncing on my dick. I couldn't hold it any longer and slowly blew my load, where Pure hopped off and started licking cum off my dick before spitting it out. WOW, Pure was amazing and gave me one of my best experiences, she is an extreme professional and knows how to please, would definitely repeat!
positive I was familiar with the agency so it was easy setting up an appointment. I got there on time and as soon as I opened the door she greeted me with a smile. I knew then I would have a good time. As soon as I opened the door I saw a stunning girl in red tight dress and I could see her melons popping out of the dress, which was an immediate turn-on. She greeted me and smiled and led me into the room. She was really cute kept smiling at me and it started to rub off on me and I couldn't help but smile back. We started with light conversation about our ethnicity then I put the donation down on the dresser and she helped me undress. We jumped in the shower she started washing my front. I was watching her and was just amazed how she was curvy in all the right places with slim waist. She got nice racks AND nice ass. Just staring at her got me hard. She then washed my back and afterwards came light action. She got down on her knees and started bbbj with good suction. We dried up and went over to the bed. I lied down and she licked my nipples and after some tongue action around the groin area got more bbbj. She knew what she was doing. I've been with a good number of this agency's escorts and it's safe to say that she is the most skilled so far. I almost popped it during bbbj but was able to hold it in and gain control. I told her to go on top. She put both her feet on my thigh and was bouncing up and down on my dick. Watching her perfect round big tits bouncing got me really horny and hard. I almost came second time but I held it in. At first we were going at a steady pace nice and easy. Then I started thrusting up harder and she started moaning. I could begin to feel the warmth from her body. I made her cum twice in that position Then I got on top made her cum twice more in mish. At the very end I knew she was gonna cum so I sprinted to the finish line going harder and faster as she was moaning louder and louder, and we both came at the same time. She kept moaning throughout, which I thought was really hot. I had an amazing time and I know she enjoyed it too which is always a plus. I got her blood flowing all over the place her neck and back and bottom were all light pink and she was very sensitive to touch you know what that means. Overall it was hot time as half hour just went by I would definitely repeat and do one hour maybe try doggy next time
positive I recently saw Paige and was glad I made the call. She is a hot stripper type girl. Nice rack and ass. Will repeat after I try others. Paige met me at the door wearing a sexy little lingerie outfit. I was immediately impressed with her body. She has really hot toned legs, a round ass, and nice tits. We got Leo out of the way and got to work. We began with a bbbj, followed by some daty. She tasted amazing and clean. From there she mounted me in cowgirl then moved to reverse and finished me as I was playing with her ass. Round 2 starts with some more bbbj and the I fuck her from behind. Her ass is amazing and her pussy felt tighter this way. I got close stopped and licked her pussy from behind. Moved to mish and I blew in the cover. Will repeat
positive Scheduled the visit with the agency and vent to the hotel to find a stunning blonde standing behind the door with a beautiful light blue eyes and a great smile. Great experience and will definitely repeat next time she is back in town. After the formalities and quick shower, she greeted me with a kiss and took off the towel. While we were kissing she started stroking me with her hand, then slowly moved down and started incredibly good Blow job. We moved on the bed, she position her self so i can finger her while she continued with the bj. I asked to mount me, she put a condom and obliged. It was a great view when she started to move up and down. While i was enjoying the view , i had to take control of the action and i turned her on her back so i can go to work. Her moans were soft and sexy as she is gently moving in the rhythm. I was ready to blow and asked her if she can take me in her mouth. She smiled and nodded in approval. I turned on my back and let her what she does best. She kept sucking me until I popped in her mouth. What a great relive. She is a great turn on and i think we got along well, was really pleased and left very happy. Cant wait until she comes back.
positive Saw her post and found some good reviews so thought of contacting her. Easy setup but she is very cautious so she needs an extensive background check. She was staying in a hotel. I reached the place before time so had to wait little bit. I am glad I met her. She is slim and athletic with some good flesh at the right places. If you are looking for a nice companion to spend time with Cece is the one for you. She makes you feel comfortable and likes to talk. She is a great kisser and enjoys herself too. VIPs read on.... Entered the room and saw a nice friendly lady. She was wearing just normal clothes since she is very cautious. Exchanged greetings and I excused myself to the bathroom. Placed the gift in the bathroom as instructed by her. We talked little bit. She wet to the bathroom and came out wearing a nice bra and panty. She has a smooth skin and very soft and fleshy butt which I loved squeezing. We moved to the bed and started kissing. I was pleasantly surprised that she also likes kissing. It was some long DFK session and we were kissing all the time. Her boobs are small but natural which I sucked and swallowed to my satisfaction. She liked it too. I love giving Oral so I went down on her for some DATY. I enjoyed eating her clean shaved pussy. I then made her sit on my face and made her cum in that position. She was exhausted and throbbing. I let her cool down and then pulled her again on me. It was her turn to return the favor the she did a very good Job. I continuously touched her and squeezed her ass. Then I asked her to come on top and we both enjoyed some heavy pounding while I sucked and swallowed her small tits. She was exhausted so we went to missionary and I pounded her again for some time. I came heavily inside the cover and just rested for a while on top of her which she didn't mind. We cleaned up and then we again talked for a while about different stuff. We said good byes and parted ways. I will definitely repeat.
positive Koas multiple reviews encouraged me as she seemed like a GND that pleases and likes to be pleased. That was the case but it took about fifteen minutes for her to settle in and accept my attention, but she eventually got into her stride and the session. Shes so petite and Gumby-like that we wound up in some pretzel-like positions in the hour which only can be categorized as all fun and I would repeat if presented the circumstances to do so. Koa met me in a postage stamp black thong and matching bikini top which accentuated her natural C cups and upper ass with glass slippers showing off her expertly manicured toes. Her nice feet should welcome some good moisturizing which is odd because her skin is magnificent and well hydrated. We kissed with some feeling but not a lot of tongue at the very outset. I had to scrunch down to meet her height and grab her ass from there as she is petite and we held each other for a bit before I suggested the obligatory shower. Koa was in no rush and the undressing was slow paced with Koa hanging up each piece in between our kissing and hugging until the next layer was removed. It was a leisurely yet sensual beginning to our session. The solo rinse saw Koa pass along some mouthwash to me in the shower and when done I returned to some nice music where we came together again quickly sitting on the edge of the bed, she in my arms and then backed into Junior before falling back together. Koa was up for the foreplay that included lots and lots of kissing but mostly LFK, superior grinding of our body parts and plenty of time for massaging of her splendid body, all superbly sensuous and sexually stimulating for me. It was nearly incomprehensible to me that Koa told me how she was when asked. I would not have guessed anywhere near that since even her face is youthful, although she probably uses more makeup than necessary, so less I think would be better for her and she would likely look even younger. Her English is limited but we managed some good laughs in the session and when convenient a couple of times Koa used a translator to make certain points so we both understood each other. Junior found his way in between her butt cheeks, thighs, calves, and even her pretty feet, all of which got me hornier before flipping her over to enjoy her breasts and kitty. Her nipples were a little reactive and Koas deeper inhaling and exhaling told me that I was applying the correct consideration to them. The only quirk I found was later when the possibility of getting her hair sprayed with my rewards she semi-freaked and such caution was duly noted and I assured her that it would not happen. Elevated breathing for her continued with DATY. She possesses such a fine, appealing kitty, neatly trimmed, which encouraged extra tongue treatment being a pleasure to provide. Koa was a trooper, raring to get into position, raring to go and totally into DATY. When she seemingly hit paydirt, she cleaned my wet face with her hands in appreciation, took a few deep breaths, kissed me and proceeded to reciprocate. Nipple work and massaging me everywhere with her hands and thighs and feet and breasts in a measured whirlwind was had before a BBBJ where Koa found her comfort zone and stayed there for an extended period, ball licking and sucking and some pop pops of my jewels in her mouth. Her stroking and oral, combination hand and mouth, made it all very sensuous and satisfying but my mind told me this day that the oral edge was elusive so eventually we got to cover. Mish was the default to start and Koa took me right in. A good snug fit it was and we went deep doing the Sunday drive with occasional super deep thrusts. CG followed and Koa was moving for her own maximum enjoyment as she slowed down a bit we moved to sitting and with my feet off the end of the bed we got into a really decent gallop with Koa so easy to lift and maneuver in the process. Maybe it was the cover holding me back so a change was in order and back to BBBJ with some HJ combo from Koa who did an extensive run determined to win a prize for me. She is so tiny that the positions we found ourselves in were also sexual and pleasing giving me the opportunity to massage her everywhere but especially her natural breasts, hands and feet. Koa did all that I could have asked for and even more as far as I was concerned to bring me to eruption and I plan to return as we hit it off pretty good resulting in a lighthearted, relaxing and enjoyable session. I know this is one of those situations that a second run up the flagpole will be even better. There was just the right amount of everything for me and I love that GND look with a petite toned hydrated body. And the right touch of Geisha.
positive Seen cherry before there was the initial review. I've seen her multiple times. At least 5x. Two call set up. On the second call she immediately picked up and gave the room number. Her body is music video quality! All natural. Tremendous ass on her. Attitude and environment are always amazing. The service is top notch. No gfe, but I'm only in it for the thrill! Opened the door in a robe. Left the provisions on the dresser. She unrobes, n hopes on bed on all 4's. I follow. She puts it on me like a pro. I prepare myself. I'm then n the game. The ass does wonders to me! A qv has always been enough for me when dealing with her. Shes magic! I never attempted a kiss nor do I care for the gfe. That's just me. Ymmv. I recommend her to all. She's knows how to talk, touch and embrace a man. This is all woman here! Enjoy her fellas.
positive If you read my reviews, you know that I'm a fan of big, nice tits. If they're natural, I like them even more. I couldn't resist Ashley's ad anymore. I had to try her massage and I'm so glad I did. I had a lot of fun and I think she enjoys it too. I'll be back. After showing me to the table after a little chatting, I felt oddly comfortable. There's something about her that welcomes you. She's extremely hot, especially if you like older (than me) women. The milf-type describers her perfectly. She seems to be comfortable in her own skin too which always adds a nice confidence to the whole thing. Anyway, I stripped down and got onto the table and she actually got naked right away too. I loved what I could see. Her tits are absolutely show-stoppers. They positively massive and real too. They somehow aren't really droopy either. She lets you touch them and even suck on them if you like. I did plenty of both on the flip. She doused my equipment with oil and went to work with her hands. She keeps her face close too which makes it feel like she might even be going bj but oh my god, when I finally let go, it felt so amazing. She let me shoot onto those massive tits and I couldn't have been happier. The price was nice too and if I lived a little closer, I would be there all the time. I'll try to get back asap anyway.
positive In Tampa for a business trip, skating through TER I found Rene. The reviews were good, I called and she was some distance from me. She was willing to do an outcall but had no transportation. I sent uber she gladly accepted. She arrived wearing a very nice blue dress that she filled out very well. We had a drink and got down to business...Non Vips, I will definitely repeat, if you enjoy a mature, curvy woman you can't go wrong with Rene! After a couple of drinks and some conversation, we began undressing each other. Her tits are big, soft, and natural. Her pussy is soft and grips what ever is inserted. We began with BBBJ she was enthusiastic and good at it! I reciprocated with DATY and it didn't take long before she bucked up against my face with a shuddering orgasm. I then put on a hat and started in mish, she talks during sex - very exciting without being completely slutty. I flipped her over and finished doggy. We rested for a few minutes and I got a second pop in that tight hot pussy. MMMMMmmmmm, I will be back for more, I promise!!!!!!
positive This one is a bit confusing as it's not her in the pics, but the person behind the door looks better. Typical two-call system to a decent hotel, called when I was there and got the floor. Another call while I was on the floor, did not like that but it was ok. Her rack more than made up for it, and the face is better than the person in the pics. Also, her ass is underrated, very nice. Once is enough, will not repeat. As I said, the kicker here is that this person pulls pics from a boob model on the web, it's definitely not her but she looks better. Curiously enough, I believe she is also on another site posting as herself with accurate pics, but could not confirm that. I get to the hotel and she has me call when on her floor. Cameras are everywhere so I wasn't a fan of that, but luckily her room was right by the elevator. I get inside and she's a knockout. Some friendly talk and I place the gift by the TV and start undressing. 150 for the half which is steep for what you get. She is down to her bra and sexy underwear as she starts a spirited and great covered BJ. Shakes her ass as she's performing which had a good effect and I was ready for the main act. She climbs on top, cowgirl and I get a view of her great ass. Lots of bounce, and then she asks me if I'm ready to fuck her. Of course, and we go into doggy. Decent moaning, a great view of her ass again and her tits bouncing in her bra. They were gigantic, not common on a smaller woman. When I asked her to remove her bra, she gave a hint of attitude which I found comical as that's what she was advertising as her main asset. I wanted to finish in missionary to see them bounce, and she gave more attitude. I see them flop a little, she tried her best to hold them firm with her leg bent on one boob and her arm holding the other. At this point I just want to finish in the bag and get out of here. I have a problem with paying this much for half assed service. I put on my clothes and I'm out the door, never to return. She laughably advertised getting her friend in on the action next time. Would not recommend unless you have to see the assets.
positive :New pics of her are definitely her. Tall, thin, nice top and pretty. Swexy model legs and smooth butt. Under 30--I would say mid twenties. She seemed a little aloof and her English is not good so it was hard to communicate. If you want to fulfill model fantasy, she fits but she won't warm up to you right away. I think she would pay off after a couple of visits and I didn't do the gfe option. YMMV This is a bit conflicting for me. She is very good looking with an exceptional body but her mind was not in it. Got the feeling like she was in this line of work because she was truly desperate for money. I felt bad for her and ended up giving her a massage which she really appreciated and told me I had a good heart in her broken English. Anyway. Stand up shower and washed all over. Great body and lockable legs and ass. I tried to lick her asshole and was no go. Did daty on her for a few minutes. Very clean and tasty. Covered bj that was OK but had better cvbj. She climbed on top and rode me for a while. Great view of her pussy pounding down on my cock. Flipped over for mish. Great right bod. She had her eyes closed for most of the time but nice face and complexion. Put her on her side and smashed away holding her lovely legs up. Finished in doggy twice by mistake. 2 squirts in the bag and held back, recovered and completed a few minutes later. She gave me a massage and I returned the favor. Small chit chat and another shower. Dressed and candy out the door. Peanut MMS and she handed me another. Not sure if I would repeat but she is hot and didn't pull any hurry up crap on me.
positive Leonie is smoking hot. If you like a tall drink of water with big bouncy breasts, then she is the girl for you. Came to my hotel dressed in a sheer top that showed off her ample assets. Greeted me with a kiss with a promise, and I knew we were in for a good time. VIPS read on.. Leonie is so sultry in every way. Likes to kiss and caress. She is a tall drink of water with the most beautiful, bouncy breast I have ever seen. They are man made, but they sure feel real. Started a long DFK session right off the bat. She went down for a BBBJ. Covered up and she got on top for a some real cowgirl time. Watching those DDs bounce up and down made me blow fast. After a little cuddling and kissing, things heated up again and we covered up for round 2. More of the same with CG, RCG and doggy, with some dirty talk which really turned me on. Will definitely repeat.
positive Another last minute cancellation within two hours of a session planned a few days back resulted in a scramble to fill the void. Fortunately there existed a few familiar agencies that had options, and luckily even the option with Chelsea who was on my short list. It worked out fine for my circumstances although I did have to wait a bit for her first availability with me calling on short notice. Not that bad of a wait. I enjoyed my time with Chelsea but have no specific plans to repeat. Chelsea greeted me warmly at the main door and we briefly kissed and hugged as she reached for my hand to walk me to the upstairs bedroom. Once inside we came together again, it heated up a bit, we are oblivious to the surroundings until Chelsea realized the door is still open and reached out to close it. She is attractive and has a nice silhouette, is toned which I like and therefore appropriately appealing. Facially she looks Japanese with Western hints but she is full Chinese stock and unfortunately possesses no English skills other than just repeating some words that you might say here and there. No worries for me as we grooved on each other in exploration mode. Some DFK was had early on but that seemed to take a back seat in the session to LFK, but not so much of that and as we progressed and any of the kissing we had was precipitated mostly by me. Maybe she recognized the word shower when I suggested it and we slowly moved to that end. Chelsea removed her top and bottom lingerie, it was white and fluffy around the edges and she looked good in it complimented by her glistening FM pumps. Chelsea has a bubbliness about her that seemed genuine in the early stages but reflecting back it seemed unnatural at times and she seemed to ebb and flow in and out of the session. When she was into it, it was very nice as her contributions and attentiveness were very welcomed and enjoyed. The shower was pretty uneventful but we emerged fresh and clean. There was some flirting and LFK and some scrumptious massaging of her nice body. Her boobs are nice for being augmented and her tush is a perfect two handfuls, one hand for each cheek. We dried each other and returned to the room, nicely appointed and good sized, also probably the nicest room in the apartment which overall could use an upgrade IMO. But honestly not being there for the dcor we settled in back where we left off, in each others arms. Shes so short that she interrupted to put her sexy heels back on providing a better kissing and grooving height making Junior a lot happier nestled between her thighs and as I swing her back into me Junior also liked the feel nestled between her cheeks. Pleasing Chelsea pleased me and massaging her was a treat in conjunction with our stimulating foreplay. I enjoyed her attractive and toned body and she liked the massage and the attention, and I threw in some long body tongue licks and even some DATO because she positioned her ass cheeks slightly raised and the view was both tempting and appealing. I was sure to flip her over for some frontal attention including her nice boobs with semi responsive nipples. They felt pretty decent for being augmented. DATY followed and it probably got the job done but it was difficult to say. It was during DATY that Chelseas acting took off. She became so increasingly vocal that I saw right through her acting endeavors that frankly it became somewhat annoying after a while being so over the top. Really I do not mind some vocal encouragement but I could not recall the last time that someone tried that hard with her vocal antics and the result was a major turn off. It was time to move to my pleasure and there was nothing at all negative about Chelseas BBBJ, more average is a good characterization and because BLS and massaging the jewels appeals to me, I encouraged ball play and that happened for just a bit before it ceased with Chelsea focusing on the oral part. Nice that we were positioned such that my hands were on her ass as much as possible during the BBBJ. She really has nice smooth skin, plus Im really an ass man. At this juncture I was pretty horned up and we moved to cover and we just defaulted to Mish which turned out to be the only position in the session but it was working for me and by the climax I was enveloped in sweat and happy to be there. I really do love the Geisha treatment from the Asian providers and Chelsea filled that bill right down to putting my socks on after the rinse and dry before leaving. Some of the customary menu items never surfaced like rimming and more forthcoming kissing throughout the hour so my post session analysis points to more of a semi-GFE event as compared to other agencies at this price point. That may very well be how that all just worked out for my session and cannot say otherwise so YMMV. Make no mistake that in the end I had a good time with Chelsea and while I do not specifically plan a repeat encounter with her, it would not be out of the question if she was one of a couple of potential available playmates on any given day that I was looking.
positive Set up time with Sarah at a mid-range hotel. Had a drink at the bar with her first. For non-vips I will repeat when possible. Went into the room and dropped the envelope off and went to wash hands. Came back to the bed where Sarah was and I have to say that she is just gorgeous. We kissed for a bit, and she is a great kisser. Off came the clothes and she gave me a great blowjob. The perfect amount of spit and suction. Seeing her staring up at me with my cock in her mouth was just about enough to make me cum. I had to make her stop and she came up to me and we kissed some more while I played with her pussy and sucked on her tits. I wanted to fuck her so much, so she went and got a cap. Seeing her get up was great, I got a view of her ass which is spectacular!!! She capped me and then rode me for all I was worth. It was an amazing time. Will definitely repeat.
positive Loved Mari's pictures on cityvibe and called the booker for an appointment which was set up for a few hours later. I arrived at a familiar mid Wilshire location and was buzzed up. Upon the door magically opening on its own, I was thrilled to see that Mari looked like her pics but in person, everything seemed better. Took off the shoes and was guided to the bedroom. VIPs read on... After she took off her shoes, she's about 5'5 with a great thin body and a nice set of bolt ons. She looked to be in great shape and was smiling and giggling from the get go. After some LFK, I unclothed and we went to the shower where she scrubbed me down thoroughly and gave a great preview BBBJ. Once we're back in the bedroom, we start DFKing, she gives me another BBBJ with plenty of attention to the boys. I got pretty hard fast and on went the condom. She rode me for a bit and as I was about to explode, we switched it up to mish where i blew into the sack. I was pretty spent and after she cleaned me up, she started a nice massage whereupon I started getting hard again. She started BBBJing again but I took over with my hands while she was licking the boys. I blew again and headed to the showers spent. Her enthusiasm and pleasant demeanor was refreshing and I plan to repeat.
positive I was looking for a new adventure in 2016 and stumbled across pics of Farrah. I set up an appointment thru email. Few hours later, I was verified and set up an outcall date at my hotel. When I opened the door, I was amazed. She had this tiny black dress on that she looked fabulous in. She was on time and very professional. I will definitely check her out again. After she used the bathroom to freshen up .... She came out in matching panties and bra with high heels. Wow It was like my own Victoria Secret Model. We had a DFK that moved us to the bed. She eagerly pleased me with great oral skills. Nothing more amazing than her looking up at me with those beautiful green eyes. Junior was ready so she slipped on the cover and started riding me reverse cowgirl. Amazing view and loved the way her asshole puckered up. So I had to rub it, which she was really enjoying. Then I spun her around and in one motion lifted her up. We were engaged in a DFK and started going at it standing up and me holding her with her legs wrapped around my waist. She was really working it with that body of hers. Then I had to go missionary to get real deep. Couldnt hold back no more and busted a nut with her. I came really hard and had to roar. Cleaned up a little and she got me excited in no time, while rubbing each other on the bed. Once hard again, I knew I had to have that ass. Got some lube and put her in doggy face down. As I slowly entered she was purring. She is very talented and got me off again. Definitely cannot wait til next time. We kissed and said our goodbyes.
positive Called her and set up a time. She's pretty busy but she can be hard to reach as she doesn't answer phones during sessions. Nice on the phone, two call system to a hotel. Very pleasant to look at but isn't the girl in the picture. Similar build. Super busty is very accurate with a nice round rear. She slides the condom on with her mouth and gives a nice BJ, she'll try any position you like. She's generally very accommodating and has a very nice rear as well. Smells good. She prefers reverse cowgirl but she does cowgirl very well with her big floppy tits bouncing up and down. She let me cum on her tits while finishing off and allowed me to tit fuck her. She's easy to talk to and to get along with.
positive Was in LA for the week. Tried multiple days trying to hook up with an LA provider no luck. Very frustrating even providing references. Pretty much all texts were left unanswered. Had to make a trip to the OC so planned on a session with a provider there. Upon my search I came across Tina. I have always wanted to hook up with her. Noticed that she was with the agency that I had used once before. Now the key would they remember me. Texted the agency and the stars were aligned and they remembered so got an appointment. BTW agency is great to deal with and very friendly. Got to a new apartment complex in the Irvine area. There is parking across the street at retail if none can be found on the premise Got little lost in the complex as the signs were off so lesson follow instructions given not the signs. Anyway knocked on the door and the door opened and walked in and there before me was the beautiful and sexy Tina. After along day what a sight. She was dressed in a bustier thong and heels. She is very very pretty. VIPS read on... As I approached Tina behind the door I brought her close to me by reaching around by her ass and felt her smooth tight ass. Im not a big ass person and too me Tina was the ass for me :-). We embraced and introduced each other and shared some kisses. She led me into the room and she undressed me and then herself. No preview here but watching her undress and seeing her naked body did get me very excited. As we got to the bathroom the normal toast and washing in the shower occurred. In the shower embracing occurred with DFK and LFK and a nice BBBJ preview. We dried off and then made our way to the bed. As we got to the bedroom if my dick wasn't hard enough I notice she came in with her heels. Being a leg and heel man that was such a turn on for me. As we were standing by the bed more embracing and kissing occurred then she dropped to her knees and gave a nice wet bbbj. After that I brought her up for some more kissing and caressing of her body. I then began to lick and fondle her breast till her nipples were as erect as my cock. I then dropped to my knees and licked her from toe to head and then turned her around and did the same across her beautiful ass and back and neck. I placed her down by the side of the bed where I started a kneeling DATY session. Through out that I can feel and taste her sweet juices and hear her slight sexy moans. She tasted so good. After that I got on the bed and guided her to sit and place her sweet wet pussy on my face and she continued gyrating her pussy across my tongue and mouth. This continued for some time and then she positioned herself for some 69. Once I got up for air she knew it was time and got a cover on me and spread her long sexy legs as I got on top of her she guided my cock into her beautiful wet pussy for some mish then i moved one of her legs to the same side of the other leg for some side entry mish and that is when I came. Tina cleaned me up and we cuddled for awhile where we had conversation. Tina is a little limited in the language but she does try and carry out a conversation plus in my book. I could never have close to a conversation in Korea. As we were lying down the the other thing I appreciate very much was that Tina was checking my cock by fondling it to see if I could go another round she did this more than a couple of times. I knew I was spent after along day of work and traveling and regretting it as I type this review. As the session came to a close got back in the shower and bid Tina farewell. I really enjoyed my time with Tina and the thing I will remember is her beautiful face and her sexy moans. I hope to see her again.
positive This was my first experience with Hush Girls. They were professional, thorough and timely throughout the entire process. I had no problems booking an appointment with Antonella and we were able to meet in a convenient upscale hotel. When I entered the room, I was greeted by a tall (with heels) sexy brunette wearing a short, tight fitting sexy dress. I had a great time and would definitely repeat. I was greeted by a tall sexy brunette in a tight fitting dress which showed just enough of Antonellas assets to remind me what a good time we had in store for each other. Good conversation to begin with, appropriate touching a little LFK and DFK and we were both slowing getting in the mood. I quickly took a shower and returned to the room and Antonella quickly turned around and asked me to unzip the back of her sexy dress, which I gladly did. WOW.what a body and with great sensitive tits. Good music to put us both in the mood. After removing her dress we positioned ourselves in front of the mirror and Antonella got down on her knees with her heels still on and proceeded to give a great BBBJ with plenty of attention to the boys. Watching and feeling this had the desired affect and in no time I was ready for action. However given my passion for oral, I had to taste Antonella and she tasted great. Started in CG which was great for me and slowly switched to DOGGIE and finally MISH where I could not hold out any longer and filled the bag. We then layed around and I showered before heading back to work. What a lovely way to spend lunch.I am looking forward to my next visit with Antonella.
positive After reading the review, I wanted to give her a shot so booked through the agency and usual 2 call system. I am looking forward to repeat. When I got to the room she was hiding behind the door as usual. It was a little odd since no one in the agency has asked other than her but asked for the donation which i placed on the table which i usually do. Take a quick shower and she was standing next to the bed and asked me to lie face down. She give a sensual full body message nude and she works herself down and full out rimming starts. I enjoy rimming so i bend over to give her better access and her hands are on my ball and dick and hj starts. Im about to lose it so i ask her for a bj. nice senusal bbbj to CIM. After a little talking i am ready for round 2.. she starts with another massage and some rimming and bbbj. She flips me over and came on the cover for some cg, rcg, a lot of doggie and finished on mish. Definitely would repeat
positive Sent her a text late morning to setup for the early afternoon. She said she needed to shower so we agreed to meet at noon. Very easy to setup and her communication was spot on. Met at her place. Walked in and wow! She is gorgeous. Very easy to talk to and a lot of fun to hang with. Treat this girl good. She is worth it. You will not be disappointed. We started the session out with some cuddling and DFK. Almost like we were long lost lovers. Definitely GFE. She took off her bra to reveal some amazing tits. Wow, is all I can say. They are amazing!! I made my way down for some DATY and she was very fresh and tasted great. She grabbed a cover and began to give me an eye CBJ. Had to interrupt her...I didn't want to blow to early. So, she climbed on top and began to ride me like a champ. It was such a great site to see those beautiful titties bouncing as she worked. We moved to mish where I finished. We laid there and talked for a bit before we started in on number two. I ended up sliding my dick between her D's and finished on those beautiful tits. Ended up talking for a bit and kissed her and I was on my way. She never looked at the clock and seemed to enjoy our time together. She makes you feel like your her man. I will definitely repeat if I get a chance. I'm not from the Lexington area, but if I can ever make it that way she will definitely be seeing me.
positive Standard 2 call. Midtown spot go into room undress. She walks in looks good smiles helps me undress. To table shower... Young sexy very thin if that's your type will not be disappointed. Nice table shower smile and get in the mood. Decent massage and then down to business. More or less standard service for this type of place -- covered bj to on top to missionary to finish doggy slapping tight ass... By the book but that being said vey nice body and attitude so would repeat. Ymmv.
positive Sent her a text and she responded after a bit. Set-up time to meet at her incall. Nice hotel for incall but took a while to get in due to key card doors and since there were cameras, she did not want to come down to open the door. So had to wait until other people were coming out. That took an additional 30min. She said she didn't realize this when she booked. But it was all good and made me feel safer anyways. As others have stated the pics are not her but a fair representation. She has a great attitude which goes a long way. Worth a visit... When I got to the room we chatted a little. She looks like the gamer geek type girl. She was in fishnet stockings with a Star Wars shirt on. She can hold a conversation and seems educated. Very easy going. We stripped down and to fun began. She does a very good bbbj. That went on for a bit and I asked to switch it up. She said that she normally don't for a hh service and only for full hour. I asked if full included multiples and she said no. But then she said since I had to deal with the door situation she would make an exception. We went on to mish till finish. We cleaned up and talked for a bit after before I left. She was in no hurry to get me out. It was an overall good experience and her attitude again was excellent.
positive Contacted Bella via email, she asks for a reference and responded in a day that we could schedule. After a couple of missed connections, we finally got together. She was easy to meet with at her incall and met me dressed casually. Attractive MILF - I was very pleased with her and the service she provides - non-VIPs I would recommend, VIPs read on... Bella's definitely got an Italian/NJ type vibe - very friendly and easy to talk with. She has a good body and you can tell she exercises to keep her form. I let her know what service I was looking for and she was accommodating. We started with her on her knees giving a great BBBJ with some BS and even a little rimming. Once I was warmed up she applied the cover and we went at it in doggie for a while - I played with her little starfish while fucking her and warmed her up for the main course - a nice greek trip. Some lube and I was in like Flynn - pounded her tight ass for most of the session and she took it like a champ. Blew in the cover up her ass and cleaned up and said our goodbyes - I would definitely recommend her and I will be repeating!
positive I looked at the website and saw that Pure was back in town. Having missed her the first time and reading her great reviews I decided to see her. All I can say is WOW. run to go see her! Texted the scheduler tell him I was at the complex. He quickly gave me the go ahead, and Pure opened the door. Behind the door was this petite Thai beauty who gave me a great kiss and led me to the bedroom. Her ass was big and bubbly! I grabbed her ass when she kissed me and led me to the shower. She washed me and she jumped on the bed. I stood before her while she kissed and playfully bit my nipples. It was hot. She then laid down and told me to get on top. My dick rubbed against her pussy and we kissed passionately. She held me down by crossing her feet behind my back and gyrated her hops and made my dick super hard. She then turned around and I dry humped her ass and kissed her body. She then asked me to lie down and she began a wet and slurpy bbbj. I was getting excited watching her suck my dick looking at me with her beautiful eyes. The reflection of the mirror of her lips and tongue on my dick made me so hard, I had to tell her to slow down so I wouldn't come. She jumped on top mom me, rubbing her pussy on my dick and I couldn't stand it anymore. She put on the condom and I fucked her hard, her screams of pleasure filled the room. I blew my load and kept pumping until I was drained and she collapsed on top of me. We relaxed and then she asked me to turn over to give me a great massage. She then asked me to turn around and began sucking me until I blew a load in her mouth! We took a shower and promised her I would see her again soon!
positive I have been a fan of Bill and the great ladies that he takes care of. The weekend was slow and I called Bill and he highly recommended Honey. I took his suggestion and the date was arranged. He sent me the info for the incall and I arrived and knocked on the door. The door swung open, I walked in and behind the door was a cute Latina with a beautiful smile and a wicked body. NonVIPs she is fun and a great girl. Beautiful Latina. VIPs read on. Honey is a beautiful petite and fun Latina. She invited me in and gave me a warm hug and a kiss. She asked me to get comfortable and if I wanted to freshen up. I took her up on it and took a quick shower even though I had just showered a few hours earlier. This is a small price to pay to make these ladies feel comfortable. Once I came out, Honey was in her cute bra and panties set on the bed. I got on the bed and we began to chat about movies, favorite places to eat and she talked about her love of animals. Once we were more comfortable, we began LFK and then I took her beautiful natural breasts in my hand. I explored this, we continued with DATY and she had her first cup. She then reciprocated with a terrific BBBJ which would have gone on forever if I had the chance. Fortunately, we had other things on the agenda and she soon produced a cover and began CG. Honey is a hot spinner and this proved very fun, along with RCG. We tried K9 and then finished in mish. Honey offered a massage and helped tidy up as well. She is a great girl and a nice GFE.
positive Texted her, set up a meeting quick. Went to the hotel she provided. Standard 2 call system. She texted room number, I went up knocked. She opened the door in a robe. And man oh man. The pics provided showed a great shape and boy was it present. Gorgeous young lady. Service was good and I will continue. When she open the door I was floored. Nice thick body. Gorgeous face. When I was inside we went over details. Just wanted a massage and some quick action. She was provided a great atmosphere during the massage. Body looked great naked. She had such a sweet smell that i loved. Hands were so soft, the massage was great. After I had her bend over at the knees while I caressed her amazing body. Then we got to business. She grabbed my dick and jacked me a bit to get me hard. Only had time for a quick visit so i only fucked from the back. It was a good experience would definitely repeat.
positive I had Mcc on my radar for a while. I was trying to see someone else, but couldn't work the time with the booker. He told me who else was available, and I was happy to see Mcc on that list. She is very sexy and with her very good English, makes you feel at ease. I went to see Mcc after a long day at work. We started hugging and feeling each other up as soon as we hit the bedroom. She is not into much more than LFK which is a bummer. We both undressed and continued the rubbing. She then went down to her knees and started with a really solid BBBJ. She did that for a few minutes and then I requested a shower. I showered by myself. We went back to the bedroom after and picked up where we started. She gives a great BBBJ. She did that for a few minutes in multiple different positions. We started doing a little doggie P2P. That was fun. Then she slipped on the cover and I started with real Doggie. It was hot and she was really moving. We moved on to lazy dog which I liked a lot. Then for some good old fashion CG. It was a really good time. It seemed a bit rushed, but maybe it is just her aggressive style. I would see her again.
positive I've used this agency many times. They predominantly have Thai providers. Easy to work with and get appointments. I saw Pure's photos and I was instantly attracted. Standard 2 call/text system. Met her at an upscale apartment in Sorrento Valley. She opened the door and I was greeted by a very attractive young Thai girl. She was very intelligent, giving and I just had a wonderful time. She's great to talk with, and playful. Would definitely recommend. Pure has a really exotic and beautiful face. She could pass as Northern Indian, Indonesian and of course Thai. Her ass was surprisingly round and full for a Thai girl. I'm not really that much of a large ass guy (typically prefer smaller asses), but damn, her ass was beautifully proportioned and I couldn't stop looking at it - and playing with it. We took a shower where she carefully washed me, did our mouthwash thing, etc. then headed into the bedroom. I did some DATY and DATO which she loved. She doesn't do FIV which is fine but she loves DATY and had her first O. She has really powerful, quaking O's. Then she gave me a phenomenal BBBJ - those beautiful eyes looking at me the whole time. It was hot. We ended up fucking in all sorts of positions. She came really hard in mish. The first time I pulled out and CIM - she took it all in patiently and then spit it out. She then proceeded to give me a fantastic, slow and very good massage. I've paid for massages that weren't that good. Then, back to action for round 2. BBBJ, doggy, ACG and finally miss again. We ended up coming together which was awesome. We chatted about all sorts of things. She is such a smart, cute girl. Definitely a great GFE. I was ready for one more round and we finished in lazy dog where be both came again. Damn, she was so hot! I've seen better looking girls before who had better, tighter bodies. This is nothing against her, she is so cute and exotically attractive and her full figure (not fat mind you - very little belly fat - just a very serious ass). But, in terms of the entire experience she was about as good as I've ever had. She's very caring and giving and it was just a great time. I would strongly recommend seeing her before she leaves. Treat her right. She deserves it.
positive In Las Vegas, there are many escorts, but very few true courtesans. Lina Lin is a true courtesan. If you dont understand the difference, read through Lina Lins website to get a better idea of the type of experience you will have and the wonderful person that she is. After much research on TER, I found Linas profile. She doesnt yet have a lot of reviews, so I was a little skeptical. But, as I began to go through her website, I was intrigued. I sent her an email about a week before my visit to Las Vegas and began a great series of exchanges. She responds promptly and sincerely. We set up a 2 hour date (highly recommended) and decided to meet at the hotel lobby bar. As I anxiously waited for arrival, in walks this tall, blond, long legged beautiful woman that I recognized immediately. Lina is a mature woman - all woman - and not a 20-something youth. She owns and revels in being a real woman with a ton of life experiences. She sat down, we had a drink, began to talk, and after awhile headed up to my room for more fun. Once we got up to my room, Lina and I continued a great conversation that we started at the bar. Lina makes great eye contact and is truly interested in what you have to say. I felt like we could have talked for hours. Even though we had just met, and I know this is a cliche, it felt like we had known each other for a long time. We just had this instant connection. Members read on. Non-members - would I repeat? In a heartbeat. In Las Vegas, there are a lot of choices, but this is one woman worth seeing again and again and again. In my room, we continued to talk. I was getting excited just looking at her great figure and beautiful face. I began rubbing her calf and then her thighs, higher and higher up her leg. I could tell she was getting distracted from our conversation so I leaned in and we began kissing. Lina is a very passionate and vocal woman. She has a gorgeous body with all natural perfect sized breasts and eraser size nipples. Her kitty is shaved, clean, and tasty. She has dancer legs. A perfect body. I kissed her from her lips down to her breasts to her thighs, and then to her wonderful kitty. She really seemed to enjoy the DATY. We took a break and she then masterbated herself to orgasm. My turn. She gave a wonderful and enthusiastic blow job, paying attention to the both the boys and my dick. End of round one. We talked some more and then I couldnt get enough of her kitty, so I went down again for another DATY session. Again she was very vocal and seemed to enjoy my technique. We laid next to each other for awhile, cuddling, and then began kissing some more. Lina is a great kisser with soft lips and has a delicate french kissing technique that is totally sensuous. This had both of us going, so she slipped on a cover and began to ride me first slowly and then more and more vigorously until we both came in a wondrous crescendo of grunts, moans, and screams. She collapsed on the bed next to me and we rested for awhile. After a few moments, she cleaned up, got dressed, and kissed me goodbye. I had a great time with Lina and she will be my go to person in Vegas the next time Im in town.
positive used this agency previously. After you pass the screen, the appointment is easy to make by email. Book a same day app. Came to the familiar complex, door opened, greet by a thailand girl, almost naked. Her body looks great. come up with light kiss, hold hand lead me to the bedroom where the fun begin. I can't wait to see here again. VIPs read on. She asked me if I need a shower. I said Yes although I just had one before I came and ask here to join the shower. I asked both of us had the month wash before the game start. She help me to clean up my body, and down she give me a previous of BBBJ. wow that feel great. we both dried, went into bedroom. I lay down, she rush to give the BBBJ, I enjoy as long as possible before I pop. I stop it and stand up, doing the DFK to calm down a little bit, then, move to in front of a mirror, continue the BBBJ, I want to see my dick into and out her mouth; Pull it out, rest on her face, her toughie continues work around it. Men, it feels great. I am ready, here the cap on, I did MISH, dogie, side way, 69. I see her beautiful ass up and down, forward and back, and we keep kissing when we can. Back to dogie, do it hard for 10 min. She asked for more, morning, "fuck me hard" or "Baby, give it to me",.... I am not sure if she really cum. But, this girl is a fucking machine. I cannot hold anymore, then I pause for a moment, asking CIM, she hesitate a bit, But allowed. Cap off, into the beautiful month, like heaven, all gone deep inside. She come up to the bathroom to clean up. I take another shower. we kissed and time for good bye. I will see her again for sure. Man, treat this girl good, you will rewarded. Best BBBJ if she is into it.
positive Have been to his agency many times. Hit or miss but this one was a hit. Took a quick shower washed up real good on the backside in anticipation for later events. She also get a massage which was very good and thorough overall I really enjoyed. I saw Koa this week. First time with her, many times with the agency. Pictures on the website are not her. Appearance: definitely in her late 20s. She is short and tight with tan skin. Fake B cups that are well proportioned to her. Skin super smooth. Pretty face. Her English was limited. Her stomach is flat and her ass is perfectly round, not the typical flat ones you find here. She was very accommodating and extremely polite. She had her routine and I let her stick to it. Out of the shower she told me to lay down on the bed stomach facing down. Music played in the background and she began lightly touching my ass cheeks and legs. She kissed her way in to my ass and then proceeded to give me what I finally understand to be a rim job. I mean full force entire face wedged into my ass, tongue all over. It was incredible something I've never experienced. She toggled between the asshole and my taint and balls. Every once in a while she would lick the tip of my cock and stroke it. I found myself slowly lifting my hips up to give her better access. It was a position I had never been in in my entire life. It was awkward at first but it felt so good we just kept at it. This went on for maybe 10 minutes. Slight deviations of all of the above, coupled with me slowly continuing to lift my hips up until I was almost on all fours. Just amazing. At some point I flipped over and she started to give me a more proper BBBJ. This was the only negative of the entire session, because she could barely fit me in her mouth. It was also the only reason I did not cum right there. She then grabbed quite a bit of lube and applied it to my cock and her pussy. She straddled me in what Looked like She was going to go in uncovered but instead began humoing my cock and grinding it against her pussy. A little too much contact for me. I asked for the cover. She got on in CG first and took it easy. I was expecting her to be super tight but she handled my size really well. She slowly turned to reverse CG and then got up on her feet and was bobbing up and down for a bit. What a beautiful view of her tan tight ass on my cock. If I recall correctly I put her in K9 with me standing off the bed. Did this until cup 1. Took a nice long break and received a very thorough legitimate massage. Strong hands and good technique. I loved it. She initiated round two With more rimming and moaning. More BBBJ which was not very good. Then she grabbed again quite a bit of lube and greased up my cock, taint, balls and ass and basically massaged me while also rimming. Really nice. She got the cover at my request and we went through CG, RCG, mish, K9 and lazy dog. All The while she took a decent pounding and seem to really like it. The highlight was cup 2 when, while stomach down and ass up in lazy dog, she proceeded to turn her neck and make full eye contact with me while arching her back. I grabbed her shoulders and came hard. What a great time. Definitely repeat. She is a real cutie and a pleaser.
positive I arrange a date with Cassandra using musastj.net, they have a great variety of girls and I decided to try out kassandra. She had a few reviews so I wanted to see for my self. The date was schedule at 9 and she got there exactly at 9, very punctual. Over all she gave me an unforgettable experience. She will definitely see me again. VIP read on... When she arrived she looked stunning with her really short drrss. She is very friendly, always trying to make you laugh and make y222ou feel comfortable. She first took a sexy shower in front of me, teasing me before starting the action. When she was done we went straight to the bed and started making out really passionately. Then I started sucking her pierced toys while I fingered her. I started kissing her whole body all the way to her pussy then started giving her some oral from my part, then she said it was her turn and she layed me on the bed and started blowing my dick in the most amazing way I have ever experienced. She has amazing oral skills. Then I told her if we could do the 69 position so it would be fun for both. The view of her pussy and her ass on my face was incredible and on top of that she was deepthroating my cock. Then I turned her around and we started off with a missionary position, made her moan like a bitch. After that she positioned her self in the doggy position and told me to fuck her hard
positive Haven't used this reliable source for a while and it is time to renew relationship. Contact was smooth and was set up despite last minute notice. Got there late due to confusion about the venue. Was led to believe the location had changed but actually not. Anyway arrived to find a beautiful girl with the young girl next door look (imagine living in Chiangmai). washed up and did the mouthwash and onto one if the best GFE experiences I've had. YMMV but we just clicked I guess. Once on the bed she gave me a genuine tight hug to warm me up. Her mouth found mine for a kiss. Tentative at first but soon broke into an all out lusty kiss with true passion. She then worked her way down and stopped on my chest to tongie the nipples - I was in heaven. She took her time to let it build up until my cock was ROCK HARD. She read my mind as to what I wanted and followed with a Bbbj so good I almost passed out. The without warning capped me and mounted me and within seconds ride me to a shaking orgasm, this girl likes to fuck. Switched to mish and finally blow a load in her eager mouth with expert coaxing from her hands. She knows how to tease a cock. She cleaned up and came back stroking my inner thigh and looked at me with deep eye contact with my penis in front of her face. It was a sexy sight and Lo and behold my dick nodded to attention she giggles at such an unbecoming reaction from an older man and without being asked proceeded with another blow job and this time she smear the cum over her nipple with the tip of my tool. It was a natural fantastic act that really touched me inside. It was hard to say goodbye. Pure pleasure.
negative Taylor York has a very sexy body and is a friendly, responsive girl. She was on time and wearing a sexy outfit for me upon arrival at my hotel. She was really nice to me and was very affectionate. She was worth every penny and is very much an ATF of mine in Vegas. She was wearing a black club dress and red heels. Looked like a movie star out of the 1950s noir era. I half-expected there to be drums and whatnot as she walked across the room to me. She was very beautiful to look at. We talked briefly because I was a bit nervous, but she was able to calm my nerves. We started kissing and she was really affectionate in a genuine way. I loved the way her skin felt and how fit her body was. I removed her dress and she took off my pants. She started with a very enthusiastic and passionate BBBJ while looking up at me with those perfect blue eyes of hers. I have a thing for blondes so this experience was surreal for me. She was very passionate and loved my cock. I then returned the favor with some DATY because if she went much longer, I Was going to blow my load in her mouth. She said she swallowed and didn't mind, but I told her that I wanted to save my cup because I've been having a hard time coming twice in a short period of time recently. I put on a rubber and entered her slowly. Holy FUCK this girl is tight! That pussy is freaking magical. We went through all the positions, tried Greek briefly but had to stop because my cock is huge, apparently. Still, she took it and I finished on her face. Loved seeing my cum on such a beautiful face. Will repeat often.
positive Got to the apartment complex and the door opened right as I walked by. Highly recommend. Went inside... She was waiting behind the door with a soft lfk... Proceeded to the bedroom where we both stripped down... Made out as she trapped my tongue into her luscious mouth... Kissed her softly from her lips, breast, torso, thighs, lips, clit, calves... Responsive the whole time... Then she proceeded to lick my head, dribbling her tongue up and down... Down the shaft and back up gently... Went up on top... Used her hips to undulate back and forth... Swirled... Touched her face with my hand and started to lick my finger... Breathe heavily in my ear, licking, sucking... Began sucking my nipple, tongue pressing, gentle nibble... When I couldn't control it any longer she rode harder... Grabbed tighter, until total release. And that was just the first third of our time...
positive Paige is amazing. I visited her twice but she travels along the east coast and was gone before I could visit her again. I called her after reading the first two reviews and was a bit iffy, but she blew me away and shall we say, improved on all the comments made prior. YMMV but it was amazing for me both times. When she opened the door after a typical two call system, I knew I was in for a treat. The girl was almost 6', college age, youthful, and nice. Her body was so hot. After a quick LE check, we embraced and kissed deeply. I laid her on the bed and we must have made out for 10 min. Then I proceeded to kiss her body all over and did a bit DATY. It was fresh and smelled so good. We then made out again and she went down, put the hat on and give me a good CBJ. I could not wait to have her at that point and had her get on top of me. After a while we flipped and did mish and I could no longer take it and blew in the cover. The second time I did an hour. We did all of the above and then round two, although I couldn't finish the second time around. We just cuddled and spooned for the last 15 minutes and talked about life. She is def one of my all time favorites, please treat her well.
positive Guys, this is our Tampa treat. Many of the girls show up high or timid. Jessica is a nice girl from the moment she meets you. She definitely is a low volume provider and truly loves what she does. She is so easy to talk with, and she seemed to be more interested in meeting me than treating me as a client. Non VIPs, well worth it. VIPs... it gets so much better... Called her and asked if she would do an outcall. I was 30 mins from her, so she asked for 250 instead of 200 for a non rushed 60 min with MSOG. I agreed. The girl is very pretty and doesn't show any of the mileage we tend to see in this hobby. She doesn't sound like a cracked out disappointment. She speaks to you in a sweet voice and feels very comfortable with you. She showed up at my hotel room and we did a quick LEO check. She didn't even acknowledge the donation on the table. We talked for a bit on the couch and she smiled. She said I had a nice cock and could she see it again. I said sure, she then asked if she could suck on it. Duh! She's very talented with her oral skills. Long strokes and moaning as she took it as far as she could. After a few minutes she asked if we could go to the bed. Cover on and she presented herself to me. We fucked doggy for a long while, and she was into it. Mish after that with her moaning and saying very sexy things. I asked her to ride me and she squirted at that point. I have no idea how many orgasms she had, but her legs were shaking after I went back to mish and put her legs up (awesome legs btw!) She told me to cum on her stomach, so when I was ready, off with the cover and I came all over her. Afterwards we talked for a while and we had about 15 mins left. I asked if she wanted to suck on my cock some more, she smiled and said, I'd rather fuck you again. We fucked again, this time she let me take to the cover off when I was close and she gave me head, asking politely if I didn't CIM. Getting off by her mouth was awesome. She can tell when you're close then really performs. All in all a wonderful provider. Treat her well boys.
positive Guys if you're looking for an asian goddess, Lyn is your girl. To be honest, she's the first asian provider I've been with and I literally don't want to be with anyone else. Oh that perfect body and her fragrance, mind-blowing. For an asian, she doesn't hold back and participates fully. VIPs read on. To begin with she is absolutely gorgeous, natural breasts, flat stomach with great legs and ass. I was really pleased to see her. Her pictures are a bit dark but she's smoothly fair in person. We made out, while getting to know each other better. She is a great kisser. I kissed those beautiful tits all over and started FIV. She started giving me a great BBBJ, with great eye contact. I'm not usually a big DATY type guy, but man o man, her pussy is just beautiful. It had this sweet scent that just wanted me to keep eating her forever. Her juices rolled down my mouth and it tasted great. I was hard for a while and just wanted to let go. I asked her to put her legs on my shoulder and I rubbed my rod on her clit that made her moan quite a bit. I really couldn't fuck her for long, I was already at the edge with all the oral action. I blew in the cover and it felt like I hadn't cum in a long time. I cleaned myself up and asked her to take shower with me. I went for another serving of DATY under hot running water and made her O. Just felt great. She wanted to give me another round but my cock was still throbbing. Guys I recommend that you relieve yourselves before seeing her. I would definitely see her again.
positive Had a very good time with Koa. The girl is a freak and she is very sweet. She also gives a good massage. Would reccomend giving her a try. Took a quick shower and then we started kissing near the bed. Nice dfk for a few minutes. Then she had me lay down and she proceeded to lick my nipples and made her way down town. Boy van this girl suck a dick. Very nice bbbj with lots of attention to the boys. She really took it all with nice dt. She then rim me. Man she really enjoys this. Had my legs in the air then even turned me around and really dug in. She then gave a little more bbbj and I was read for rhe cover. We started in cg which was nice but then I proceeded to edge of the bed miss. Had her legs up then to the side. Had her turn over for doggy where I soon couldn't hold back. I layed down for a nice massage as she walked on my back. Very relaxing. We then proceeded to round 2. I would definitely repeat.
positive Paige is a very young pretty college girl who loves to kiss. she has a tight little body and is very friendly. Will repeat and have. Paige met me at the door wearing a towel, which quickly came off as she prepared the shower for me. As I jumped in she followed where we enjoyed some deep french kissing as she yanked on my joystick. She enjoyed my fingers rubbing and entering her pussy. Her pussy has a lot of meat hanging out, which made me want to daty, but I didnt. We moved to the bed where she covered my cock to suck it while I fingered her, which she enjoyed until climax. I then took her from behind for a while. As she continues to moan, I flipped her around until I finished. Overall a fun time and will repeat.
positive Have seen her ads, figured I would try her out as she has decent reviews. Kacey is young and eager she is the girl in the picture. It is a good time alot of fun, I hope that things work out for her, treat her well guys. I may repeat not sure yet. VIP read on Okay she is your basic PROVIDER you go in give donation get naked and get ready to fuck! All i can say the girl can suck a basketball threw a garden house if she gave a bbbj you would not be able to handle it, I have had blowjobs but this girl is a shop vac with spit, ball playing and jerking with a twist. Her pussy is small and tight, I was gonna ask to eat it but she was already about to slide my dick in her pussy before I could ask. She did a few minutes reverse cowgirl then spun around and went to cowgirl she has nice little tits, some scretch marks I think from having a child but she really gets into it good moans. I did not last long and blew in the bag in her. She cleaned me up we got dressed said our goodbye's as she walked me to the front door. Guys she is a good girl a little young and I think she may party at time's, I don't do that stuff and really do not want to be around it so reason why I may or may not repeat. The blowjob alone is worth the visit!
positive I saw the great reviews, stared at the pictures for about eight seconds, and texted the agency to arrange something. Okay, I think the first, and maybe the last, thing to be said about Pure is that she's sweet, genuinely sweet. She appreciates tenderness and gentleness and, if my experience is any indication, rewards it beautifully. She is just delightful and any man lucky enough to be with her will, I hope, treat her with the respect that should be happily offered to a beautiful woman who's going to make him VERY happy. I don't know for sure, but I imagine that if you're offering less than that, she would follow your lead. And that would be your loss. She is a keeper. She met me at the door wearing a skimpy red lacy thing, looking provocative. A brief kiss and she led me to her room. Her English is far more proficient than most and that allows for meandering conversation. Oh, that's another thing: she's fun. She has a sincere exuberance and wants to have a good time and wants you to have a good time. She can make that happen. She has youthful energy and her naked body is exciting to look at. After a nice soapy shower, made all the more enjoyable in the ways she lathers, we toasted shots of mouthwash and adjourned to the bed. While I was considering where to start, we started with exploratory tongues. Soon she found her way to my stiffening friend, murmuring a bit, before engulfing him with her open mouth. Then it was sort of a dance for awhile, very slow and tender, watching her lips move up and down the shaft. Lovely. That went on for awhile. I have no idea how long except that I couldn't stand it anymore and asked her to lie on her back. Her very pretty and feminine features smiling back at me, nesting softly on the pillow, took me back to college days and pretty, young coeds, losing our collective virginities (a falsehood). Looking at her face on the pillow, I thought how easy it would be to fall in love with that, to see these pretty features twinkling back. I simply stared for a time, enjoying the view, her darker skin soft, her dark nipples cresting her lovely little breasts. Then I began kissing her neck, her shoulders, her breasts, and her stomach, ending at the short, thin hair of her pubis, into which I slowly slipped my gently circling tongue. She enjoyed that. I had her roll over and lift her very curvaceous ass, which I continued exploring with my tongue. Then, I think because she wanted to climax, she rolled to her back again and I increased the speed of my tongue's circles and their penetration until she rewarded me with a gush of warm orgasmic fluid. It was wonderful. This activity made me rock hard so we took advantage of that with some satisfying missionary and doggy but then I wanted to be in her mouth again, so she swung her leg over me for 69, where we continued. Here she alternated between her hands and mouth, asking me to let her know when I was going to come. I assumed this meant that for some reason she wanted me to not come in her mouth but to the contrary, when I told her I was going to come, she plunged my erection deep into her mouth and waited for my explosion, moving rhythmically. After the ebb, she rolled back to spit into a kleenex and laughed. Then she scampered off to the washroom to freshen up. When she returned, we continued the conversation that really hadn't stopped since our first kiss. She is such a nice person. I certainly wish her well and look forward to her return.
positive I've been wanting to see Pure since her last visit to San Diego. I was happy that she returned. While her butt is much bigger than I usually like, her pictures and reviews but her high on my list of girls to see. When I entered the apartment, I was pleased to see her - GND cute and she greeted me with a big smile. Her service was great and the massage afterwards reminded me of why I enjoyed my trip to Thailand years ago so much. Two thumbs up! We immediately stripped and headed to the bathroom. After the mouthwash toast, Pure enthusiastically began DFKs as my hands roamed over her body. A quick shower where she washed me thoroughly, then back to the bedroom for more DFKs before I laid her on the bed , sucking and licking her petite breast, then moving down to her fresh kitty. She's very sensitive below and it didn't take long for her to orgasm twice. More DFKs as we transitioned to me on my back, where she gave me an excellent BBBJ - watching her pretty face as her lips surrounded my shaft was a huge turn-on. Sensing I was getting to excited and would blow soon, she applied the cover, climbed on and inserted me into her. First rode me in Asian CG with her feet flat on the bed, then dropped into CG to grind her pelvis back and forth against me. Since we only had 40 minutes, I didn't try to delay too long before releasing my load in her. She cleaned me up and offered a massage, which I gladly accepted. I declined a follow-up shower, wanting the massage to go on as long as possible before I dressed to leave. Pure was a great way to spend the lunch hour!
positive Heard about Noa thru another provider, I have a thing for Asian girls and I had to see.. Pics are real a Very pretty sexy girl full of energy. She has light screening which was easy for me. She is a excellent provider and a must see.. I show up for the hour service, I am so glad I did..... She was sexy hot and ready to please. We talked a little bit and she asked what I liked and the fun began. She started by kissing my cock and rubbing it and said how do girls not like sucking cock cause I love it, Oh how it must be true because the gave an amazing BBBJ with a lot of tongue and deep throat. She has definitely got some skills there. She asked if I like licking pussy I said yes so she 69 me and what a Sexy Sexy pussy Bald and clean. We did that for a while and I could feel her pause a few times as I know she was enjoying it as her sexy smooth body was shaking a little. After she pumped me hard she put on a cover and climbed on top sliding every inch in man she was tight. She rode me like a champ until she was tired, They hen she aske me to do mish and who am I to say no. We did that for some time, She told me she came which she may have but if it was fake or not she was awesome at it. Then she whispered in my ear, How do you want to Cum ? So I layed on my back and she took the cover off and grabbed it and went to town. She was great at it, Unlike some girls they just rush and speed up to get it over with, She said again how she like sucking cock, She seemed to really take her time and enjoy it, Not fast just steady amazing BBBJ I blew so hard it almost hurt, Wow what an experience. She is the real deal. After she went to the bathroom and came back and cleaned me off not just clean and dash she took her time and gently cleaned all areas was really nice, then we layed there she put her leg over mine and we cuddled for a while. Never once did she act like there was a timer or clock watch. Was refreshing..... We talked like a couple would after not just business....... I didn't want to leave because I enjoyed her company so much. I will definitely definitely repeat. It has been a few days now and I am still thinking about her. Awesome awesome time.....
positive Like most reviewers, standard 2 call process. Set up appointment a week in advance via text. Arrived at the incall, which is a mid-range hotel in the Chantilly area. No parking issues. When arrived, texted and given the room number. Arrived at her room and opened the door to a GND type. Cuter than the pictures. Overall, the experience was great, superb, and awesome! I would highly recommend seeing her. VIPs see below for more details. After opening the door, I was greeted by a little sexy thang. Cute and clothed. I used the bathroom to freshen up after completing the business transaction. When I got back, she was in the bed only wearing the matching neon yellow bra and panty set. After greeting her with DFK (for a while) she rips off my shorts and attacks junior with a vengeance! Now that is some greeting!! She jumped on junior with a fierce BBBJ as if she needed to do it for her survival. Needless to say, I had to slow her down, although I could live with just the BBBJ and be happy. I returned the favor and DATY with FIV until she could not take it any more. The rest, is history. Completed the alphabet soup and finished CG with her perky tits in my face. After finishing, she helped me clean up and we chatted until time ran out. Overall, great experience as most reviews have said about Preslee. I highly recommend seeing her if you are in the NoVA area.
positive Saw her ad. Her ad is also found on CV. This is my typical agency to go find attractive Kgirl. I saw her pics and thought she was cute. Called the agency for time and they gave access to location. Nice location of recently built apartment. Rang the bell and pretty girl in high heels opened the door. Nice body and experience but probably not repeat. Came into the room with the usual shower. She joined me in the shower and she gave me a preview BBBJ. At the same time, tried to grab her breasts in the shower to see if they were real or not. Yeah, they were real and larger than average. After the shower, went straight to bed and she started BBBJ again. Asked for 69 and she complied. Probably didn't like much of 69 since she wasn't a spinner type. Went to mish and started DFK (just little tongue). However, I wanted to FIV and felt warn and wet inside. I guess she wasn't mind and kept FIV for a minute or two. Went mish again and pop this time. She cleaned up and went to take another shower. The experience is good/average. Overall she was attractive but probably not my type.
positive Melissa has been on my list for a while. Her pictures are amazing. They do not do her justice. She is beautiful with a short pixie style hair, green eyes and a dancers body-fit with strong legs that wont quit. After the screening process, two call system, I was at her upscale location. Went to her room and opened the door and there was a vision. When I looked down all I could see were those legs and all I could think about was having them wrapped around me. VIPs get the details. Walked into the room, which was neat, no smoke, and Melissa made me comfortable right away. Shes young, extremely fit, eat your Wheaties beforehand, and has a beautiful face with amazing green eyes. She was relaxed and friendly and made me feel at ease. We got down to business when she got on her knees and started with a BBBJ. Her mouth was soft and wet and her tongue smooth and playful. When she looked up at me with those big eyes it as amazing. I had to stop after a while as I didnt want to blow right there. We moved to the bed and we undressed. We kissed and made out for a long time like teenagers really going at it and working up some heat. Eventually, I made my way down between her legs and returned the favor with DATY until she had an amazing orgasm. Then she got a cover out and put it on and climbed on top for some rollicking cowgirl. Watching her slim, fit body go up and down was amazing and she was really getting into it. But what I really wanted was to feel those toned legs wrapped around me so we flipped to Mish where I could glide my hands up and down those legs. It didnt take long before I hit the wall and couldnt hold it back and finished in the bag. We talked some after that and playfully touched each other until I was ready for round two. She helped with another BBBJ paying attention to the boys until I was rock hard again. On with the cover again and this time we switched to doggie. I have to confess this was even better. Her ass was the perfect hour-glass shape and I held on to her hips while I gave it to her from behind. Her pussy was tight and I stroked her for a while and it was really good. I pushed her down to lazy doggie until I couldnt hold back for my MSOG. It was incredible. An amazing time! Guys, be good to this one. ATF. I have not written reviews before but I had to for this one. She is sweet, accommodating, and beautiful with an incredible body. Quality provider.
positive Saw her ads for awhile. Decided to take the plunge. Arrived at her apartment and found a very thin, attractive, nice girl. I waited in her living room while she got ready. Finally went back into her room and the fun began... She was still half dressed when I went back in her room. I had requested a short skirt, thong, and heels. She was in her bra and thong and looking through her closet and drawers for a skimpy skirt. As she bent over searching through her drawers, I took the opportunity to feel her up and rubbed her pussy. We finally settled on a black see through skirt which looked hot on her. She ended up wearing it through the whole session. I had her stand in front of a mirror and watch me finger fuck her pussy. Then dropped her down to her knees and fucked her mouth, still in front of the mirror while we both watched. I was finally ready for her pretty pink cunt so I told her to slip a cover on me. She had to search again, this time for a condom throughout her drawers and closet for a condom, and FINALLY found one (you might want to bring one just in case). Bent her over doggie and fucked her gently while pulling back on her hair. She is really tight and you can't be too rough. Her moans and pants will guide you with how rough you can be. At one point I plunged too hard and she jerked forward and said she needed a break. So I continued to fuck her mouth until she was ready again. Did missionary while we tongue flicked each other. Also went from pussy to mouth a few times. Back to standing doggie. I am a leg man and she has the hottest thin legs. She also has a very pretty face. Finally had to cum and so had her get in sub position kneeling on the floor looking up at the ceiling with her mouth open while I stroked my cock until I came all over her pretty face and mouth. She got up to clean up. Said, "hell of a way to meet someone" in gest. After washing up, we chatted for quite a bit. Even talked about physics which was interesting to her. Way cool girl, hot thin body frame which I like, and took it like a champ. A win in my book. Will see her again.
positive Had to go through an agency and get screened, but her pictures were so good that I figured it was worth it. Got an appt the next day at noon. Easy to get to and park near her complex. Greeted me in a beautiful teddy with a warm smile and open arms. This is more than I usually spend, but when you combine beautiful pics, great reviews and also asian, I had to try her. You should too.... This was a great find. As I said above, I don't usually spend this much, but I had some extra cash and it was well spent. Pure was pure pleasure. I was barely in the door when we started kissing. She led me to the shower and we both got in. I was thinking about just staying there with her. Not only was she washing me so erotically, she ended with a bbbj that was sensational. If I were younger I would have asked to pop there and then go for another. Finally in bed she was all over me. We settled in a 69 where I got a great view of that ass and soft pussy. She tasted great and I could have done that for an hour but then she starts with the dirty talk (another of my favorites) and tells me that she wants to fuck and fuck now. Who am I to argue. We did several positions until I finally pulled out, took off the cover and shot all over her back. I would visit her again in a hearbeat, but the cash is the problem. If you got some, go see her. I know I will make it work somehow.
positive Was in town and found the agency on TER. Verification was solid but easy. They have a live chat on their site so it was super easy. Has Sasha available, although I was not very attracted to her picture, she was gorgeous in person. Her english is pretty good and I had a great time. Will return if I can find her again. The website had the option to request her wardrobe and I requested for her to come in a pencil skirt which she did, and looked stunning. That skirt accentuated her slender and curvy figure and I was amazed when she showed up. Her face was blurred out on the website but it definitely was her best feature. She's beautiful. We had some wine and chatted briefly before we started making out. We both took a shower (separately) but I came out of the shower with her laying naked in bed looking hot as hell. I started kissing her all over with dine at the Y, which she enjoyed and she grabbed me and started giving one of the best BJ from a provider, ever. It was so good I wanted to pop in her mouth, but I held back. She threw on the hat and we did it missionary. After about 10 minutes of hot drilling, I asked if she can finish me off with head. She pulled off the jimmy and finished me off brilliantly in her mouth, never missing a beat. I would consider next time just having her giving me long slow sloppy BJ, if I can track her down again before she goes back to Russia. Beautiful girl, wonderful time.
positive I saw Tiffany was in the Philadelphia area around the holidays and thought the pics looked nice. I called, she picked up and we made arrangements to meet shortly. I had a really great time and think quite highly of her. She could easily be more upscale if she applied herself to it and offered more of a GFE. Regardless, I think she's hot, cool and a great fuck. I will say it's a bit of a head scratcher that the pics are not her, but definitely representative of what to expect. She's probably even more attractive than the girl whose pics she's using. So I arrived at the hotel and got the room number, went up and saw her peaking out of the door of her room, very cute. I entered and immediately felt very comfortable with her, cool chick to chill with. I brought some wine so we chatted and enjoyed that for a bit until we agreed it was time to get more comfortable. So I stripped down to my skivvies while she did the same. She has a great body, smooth sexy skin, so I really enjoyed just watching the preview. We fondled each other on the bed, her stroking my cock through the underwear while I gently fondled her lovely, full natural chest. She's got a perfect rack, and I am a breast connoisseur. She mentioned later that she was considering getting a breast reduction, which I hope she doesn't, at least not too soon because those are the main attraction and they are truly impressive. Anyway, once I'm hard she applies the cover and starts a CBJ - I'm not a fan but she's got the skills to make up for it, and I was kind of expecting that BBBJ would not be on the menu, I was right. So the head was really great and we mixed in plenty of tittyfucking until I ejaculated in her mouth after a while. She was impressed with the size of the load in the bag, it would have been a mess with no cover. Too bad. So she cleaned me off and we hung out for a bit and enjoyed some more wine and chatted until it was time for Round #2. We started out the same as before but after a good long BJ I realized I really wanted to fuck this beauty so I asked her how she wanted it. We both prefer doggy so that was good. Her ass is beautiful and I really was feeling good vibes so I wanted to fuck her badly. I entered her and she started to get really into it, moaning with pleasure and bucking back into my thrusts. After a while I felt the climax building up and she seemed to be getting close so I did my best to hold off until we could cum simultaneously, which we did. Well done, Mr. Monkey. We collapsed panting and sipped our wine until I started to get myself back together since time was almost up. I had a great time with Tiffany. She's got a great chest, smile, ass, laugh and personality. She's got it all going for her and her donations are reasonable. I would recommend and will repeat, if given the opportunity.
positive I read some reviews beforehand, and they all seemed to say she looks better in person, and boy were they right. Beautiful face, amazing tits, slim waist, and cute butt. And a fun personality to go with it. She made a point to find out what activities and positions I liked. I met Adriannah for the first time. I read some reviews beforehand, and they all seemed to say she looks better in person, and boy were they right. Beautiful face, amazing tits, slim waist, and cute butt. And a fun personality to go with it. We chit chatted for a bit and she asked about what activities and positions I liked. She started with a BBBJ and DT that was amazing. Then she put a cover on, climbed on top and rode me, sometimes fast, sometimes slow, sometimes grinding, which I asked for. I finished that way and it was great. I'll have to visit again. :-)
positive Been away from the hobby for several months for personal reasons, Farrah's ad caught my eye and I figured I'd follow my instincts. Easy, friendly communications through email, easy to schedule (one week ahead), was given location the day before, room # one hour before, very nice hotel on I-drive. Knocked door and was warmly greeted by a smiling, scantily clad beautiful young woman. I was a little nervous but she poured some wine, knew how to make easy small talk, and made me feel relaxed right away. After a few minutes she encouraged me to come a little closer, and things heated up intensely very quickly... Yes, I would repeat! Hot and heavy kissing and petting elevated the erotic mood very quickly, as soon as Farrah felt me getting hard my pants went down and she masterfully proceeded to devour my penis. My God she was all over that thing, sucking it so good, so deep, and so lovingly, giving lots to attention to everyone down there. I really wanted to make full use of my stay and instantly knew if this went on my session would be very, very short, so very reluctantly I literally popped her away from my dick and we laid on the bed, where all kinds of kissing, petting, rubbing, yanking, sucking went on as things heated up even more. I reached for her clean-shaven pussy and her clit was hard... while kissing her my finger was rubbing down there and searching for her hole, but it was so tight it almost felt I would hurt her if I pushed it in. I kept gently rubbing her until I was able to work about 1 inch of my finger into the tightest pussy ever, and by that time I was so turned on I just had to do her. She reached over for the Trojan and moaned like a virgin as I worked my way in while kissing her neck and sucking on her tits... Undoubtedly the tightest pussy in memory. We got into the rhythm of things and it was very passionate, every stroke felt like it was going in for the first time and her moans matched it. This was just too good. We fucked for a while with me on top and then switched to doggie, where I got a good look at her tiny pink pussy, what a sight watching it swallow my friend. Unfortunately this was too good to last and after a few minutes I exploded. We laid in bed embracing and chatting for the remainder of the time, I rarely do this, but this young woman made me want to. My two hours flew by, I excused myself to shower, we said good by, and I was on my way. It's great to be back...
positive I arrived on time to a familiar location in Uptown and was buzzed up. Knocked on the foor and was greeted by an attractive woman in lingerie. Was given a soft kiss and a hug. By the was dhe kissed I knew this was going to be fun. Massage was very relaxing, other activities were very exciting. Planning on revisiting soon. When Piper answered the door, her lingerie was see through. Her pictures are of her, sexy lips but as other reviewers mentioned, the angles were taken to avoid her less attractive parts. She used her tounge when we kissed and I almost opted to forego the massage part. I AM GLAD I DIDN'T! With other providers, the massage is a pathetic attempt to push on your back. This is not the case with Piper, she uses real pressure, found the points where I was sore and stiff and really worked them while intermittently allowing me to play with her uncovered breasts and touch her peach through her panties. After about 25 minutes she lost the panties and invited me over to the bed. We kissed and I kissed down her body to taste her. After DATY and FIV, she came all over my hands and face. She showed her apprecation by giving a BBJ with incredible eye contact and smiles. Really made you feel like a king. I was getting close to finishing and I had some time left so I asked her to 69 so we could finish together. Great techniques and her moaning made me CIM. She got up, cleaned me up, I showered hugged and left. Perfect time for a 60 min appointment. I'm planning on a 4 hand with TL and Piper in the near future.
positive I've used this agency a couple of times so setting up an appointment was a breeze. Typical two call/txt system. Saw the amazing pics and read the excellent reviews for Pure and knew I had to give her a try. I'm so glad I did! Arrived right on schedule and the door opened without knocking, behind it was the most beautiful women in a skimpy two-piece outfit and sexy high heels. Greeted with a nice sensual kiss, and we instantly clicked. By far the best GFE ever!! I highly recommend and will definitely repeat as often as I can. VIP's read on... After the warm greeting, which included a sensual kiss, big hug and gorgeous smile, she squeezed my hand and led me to the bedroom. The sight of her amazing ass, which has been praised on this site numerous times, took my breath away. She joked and chatted with me as she took the donation and undressed me. Her English is excellent and she made me feel totally at ease. Some more sensual DFK and we where off to the showers. She was very playful and cleaned me thoroughly. As she bent down to wash me she rinsed off my junk and gave me a nice preview BBBJ. She put hot water in her mouth and took me in which felt great. She dried me off and brought me to the bedroom where things heated up. She started kissing me softly on the chest and gently bit my nipples. So hot! She slowly kissed her way down south which turned me on and made me rock hard. She gave me the best BBBJ I've ever had. Great technique, starting out slowly with a great combination of tong, lips, teeth and hands and gradually built up the pressure and speed. Lot's of spit and she kept eye contact with those big sexy eyes the whole time. I was ready to cum, but I asked her if I could go down on her. She asked me to lick her softly and she responded with moans and gyrations. She came hard and said she needed to suck my cock. We switched to 69 and she had another violent shiver. She said she needed me inside her. She quickly put the cover on and jump on top for some vigorous CG then the most amazing RCG. The sight of her booty bouncing up and down was almost more than I could handle. But I asked her for mish so we could DFK as I game. I pumped her hard and fast and she asked me to not stop. We came together and she screamed into the pillow. What a wild woman in bed. She cleaned me up and gave me an excellent massage for quite a long time. We laughed and she told me her interesting life story. I almost forgot this was a service, totally GFE. Then she asked me to roll over and to cum in her mouth for round 2. She worked her magic once again and I exploded in her mouth. She took every drop in and squeezed me dry. She got up to spit and came back with a warm towel. She offer a shower which I accepted and sent me on my merry way. She begged me to return which I gladly will often. She's just the sweetest, most gorgeous and accommodating provider I've ever been with. I'd love to keep her to myself. If you haven't seen her yet, I highly recommend.
positive Farrah showed up at my upscale hotel room exactly on time. She went in to the bathroom to changed in to the outfit I had requested, came out, and started kissing me with the passion of a lover who was trying to make up for lost time. She is my new favorite. Farrah was wearing a very nice, matching garter-belt, stockings and pantie set, which I had barely time to admire because our embrace and kissing were so passionate. Our sensual combustion was instant; and was full of lust and a sexual fire that was burning most brightly. We kissed our way to the bed, and paused long enough to settle comfortably on it. I realized I was embraced with a pretty girl who was kissing me with incredible intensity that promised many great things to cum. My hands roamed about her ass, and finally made their way to her lacy panties, which covered her quim. I loved the texture of her panties, and before I knew it, my fingers had slipped inside her pussy, which was already hot, wet and juicy. We paused long enough for her to remove my clothes. She started kissing, licking and nibbling my nipples. Then she worked her way down to my dick, which was throbbing with anticipation. Soon I beheld her lovely lips locked around my cock. She sucked hard and bobbed up and down on my member, all the while looking at me with her lovely green eyes. I moaned in ecstasy, which inspired her to give me even more pleasure. I ripped off her bra and panties and admired the crack of her ass and cunt. Knowing it is good to give as well as receive, I soon made my way to her pussy, and started licking her clit. She moaned and and sighed, and after a while, I was rewarded with hearing her cum. Then we went 69, and she sucked my dick with incredible skill while I licked her juicy pussy. It was great. Finally she put a rubber on my cock, and I started fucking her juicy pussy. Somehow I remembered she had a lovely alabaster ass, pulled my cock out, and smacked her bum, telling her she was a sinful girl. Then she slid my cock back in her pussy, and I proceeded to fuck her very hard. With passion and pleasure mounting, I pounded her pussy with increasing intensity until I blew my wad, bellowing like an animal. After I recovered from a galactic orgasm, we chatted and cuddled until her sinful nature reasserted itself, and she started sucking my dick with the power of a sorceress, and we fornicated fabulously until I came harder than the last time, all the while seeing stars and fireworks. We made plans to meet again, and she gave me her panties as a sensual memento of out grand copulation. She is incredible.
positive This agency rarely disappoints and saw Jenna, a cute, pretty American girl. VIPs read on. Jenna is very attractive and the photos on the agency's site are real. She keeps herself in good shape and has a toned body, with nice stomach, well defined abs. Got on the massage table and chatted with her about her work - she was quite shy but friendly and did light feathery touches on my back and kneaded out tension from my back quite well. On the flip, got to play with her great body and amazing breasts. Sucked on them and she moaned quietly, Lightly stroked her trimmed kitty area as well which was great and felt her getting wet. Overall a good time and YMMV - will repeat.
positive Easy to schedule appointment to her nice residential incall. When she opened the door to let me in I was surprised at how beautiful she was; too often its a disappointment relative to pics in ads. Had a great time with her and will repeat. She led me up to upstairs bedroom with a nice bed and had me get comfortable. Laid donation on dresser. House smelled very nice as she had been cooking in the kitchen. I like foreplay and appreciated her willingness to kiss and touch and take her time. She is quite beautiful and easy to talk with. Never felt rushed. After quite a bit of foreplay she was very wet and responsive. I went down on her, very clean, a real treat. She enjoys receiving oral but can only take so much. Enjoyed watch her legs quiver as I made her orgasm. Opted then for just a BBBJ, excellent skills and took her time. Ended up releasing all over myself and she lovingly cleaned me up and I was on my way. Very nice experience and I will repeat.
positive Bored one night and looking and found CiCi's ad and gave her a call. She showed up as promised, looking amazing. Non VIP book with confidence. I met her at the door and she was just as described and in her pics. Nice curvy lady. We went upstairs and talked about her services. I elected for the full hour of GFE. Boys.....let me tell you, it is GFE service. Nice make out session, lots of touching, kissing, tongue, everything. Then she had me get comfy and slid down my body for a BBBJ. Holy shit, she gives head like a she's starving and it's a buffet. She loves sucking cock, and provides full amazing attention to you. How you want it is how she gives it. It's amazing. I almost popped, and she slowed down and edged me. After a bit of that i knew i had to have her. I suited up and she guided my cock in her tight, wet pussy. It was phenomenal. She played with my nipples, kissed me, and fucked me like a good girl. I blew my load, and we cuddled for a short bit. I can't recommend her highly enough. One of my next visits i'm going to take her up on a greek lesson.
positive Bella is a loving and caring provider I would plan to see again Bella was very gentle and loving with me; lovely tit fuck with very happy ending. I would recommend to anyone looking for a lovely big titled girl. Bella rubbed every part of my body with her tits and oil. When she worked my balls and scrotum I was in heaven. Fucking her tits was exactly what I was looking for. I came with total abandon.
positive Definitely above average, but has a bit of weight on her (not all of it is fat). Breasts are big and feel nice but a bit saggy. Other than that attitude is great but I feel like there are better options out there for the money. She was a bit late but nothing big. When I entered she greeted me with a hug and made me comfortable with water and choice of music. She had only lingerie on below her robe. Went straight to undressing and made out for awhile. Gave me a nice BBBJ and then started to put the condom off. Stopped her and asked her to finish me with her mouth. BJ was pretty good but not the best I had (I like when the suction is hard). No CIM, and she wipes me off with some kleenex. We chat for awhile and fondle each other. She sits on my face and I lick her clit. She has the largest clit/pussy lips I've ever seen lol. I get hard and off to round 2 w/ condom on. Start with cowgirl, switch to doggy, then finished with mish. Overall, a pretty good experience, great attitude, pretty good service, but not my style of girl. Would recommend if you like latinas that aren't spinners (but not chubs).
positive I have been checking out China's profile for a while but never took the plunge as there were no reviews. I finally decided to follow up on her after seeing a review and I am glad I did. Standard 2 call system got me to her room. Really had a good time and will definitely repeat. VIPs read on... Guys, I am not really the chatty type but I was overall impressed with this girl. She has a certain look that normally doesn't catch my attention but he has a nice shape on her and those tits were perfect! I give her a call and she sends me a text with the addy and I am on my way. I get to the spot and calls her again to be let into the bldg. Once at her room we do the LE check and chat it up for a few to break the ice. We handle the business side and get ready to get down to business. I am staring at her petite little frame with those big tits and nice sized ass and just start to think about how I am going to smash this chick. She starts me out with a HJ which I am not particularly fond of but hey, it is what it is. She applies some coconut oil to jr and tells me it assist in killing germs and helps to make the condom stay on. I have to google first part but wasn't worried about the second part. After jr began to wake up she applies the hat with her mouth and begins a nice CBJ. Nice amount of spit, suction and head movement. My hands were too cold for me to try to touch the box or massage her nice tits but I will be sure to do that next time! After a few minutes I couldn't wait any longer and told her to turn around for K9. It was a nice slow fit at first but she began to get accustomed to me and things picked up. I am gripping them hips as I begin to pound that pussy deeper and deeper. She spreads her legs some more so I can really get up in there and it started to feel better. After a few minutes I told her to turn around for mish. We started in mish but I had to place those legs on my shoulders and really get deep and her facial expressions let me know she was feeling it. She wasn't much of a moaner/groaner but her grimaces let me know what time it was. A few minutes later I turned her over for the lazy dog and after a few strokes I filled the bag. She clinched jr with pussy muscles after I came and she has good control. I stayed in that pussy for a minute or so and then went to the bathroom to clean up. Overall I had a really good time with shorty and got upset with myself that I didn't take the plunge earlier. I have moved her on my ATF list so I will be a repeat customer. She says that she doesn't normally do new clients so I guess I caught her at the right time!
positive Verification was simple via two previous provider references, all handled via texts. I was able to get an appointment with just under two hour notice. I received directions to the neighborhood. Then texted on arrival for final specifics, directions were clear and concise, easy-peasy. Vicky is an attractive lady, was happy to see me and I was greeted with a kiss and hug upon entry. Non-VIPs, Vicky was skilled and a great time... VIPs read on... Vicky has a banging body, long dark hair and a pretty face. She was wearing a cute pink and white belly shirt, skirt ensemble. She took me by the hand,and we headed of to the shower. Once there the action started quickly with preview BBbJ and a very nice RJ/HJ combo. Ive never been an RJ guy, not anti-RJ just never really chased it. She plunged in for it quick, who am I to argue? I stepped out of the shower to dry off while she finished her quick shower. From there it was off to the bed where we started with me on my back and Vicky picking up where she left off with the BBBJ & RJ. I'm on the girthy side so I was pleased by her DT'ing ability. Maybe 5-10 mins into it and me not being up for a two-pop nite, I pulled her up for the cover and next phase of the action. She put the cover on and it was CG time. She worked, put the effort in for a while and it was my turn. We flipped to mish, great eye contact, she was "present" which I really appreciated. We moved to an inspired K9 and I was getting close to finishing which doesnt always happen with the cover so kudos to Vicky for getting me there. But I didnt want to pop with the cover and requested a BBBJ finish and she obliged enthusiastically. For the finale I stood, she knelt before me and worked me to a fantastic CIM crescendo. As we cleaned up we were both all smiles & good vibes. After a nice hug goodbye I headed home feeling great.
positive I wanted to see her after to reading her reviews, but her ad is what caught my attention. Decided to go for the 1hr long session which is all-inclusive. Began with some light chatting to break the ice. I seem to have some nice chemistry and the fact that we had somethings in common certainly helped. Started off kissing her body from neck to her toes, before going down on her. She responding with squirms and moans, clearly enjoying me eating her out. Took her mish for a while then and finished up with doggie. I didnt get the see the show, but not an issue. I was worn out from the first round so I didnt go for seconds although it was available. Maybe next time.
positive Farrah showed me good times, I would repeat. Farrah is a very sweet and pretty girl. She dressed to impress in a nice tight fit dress per my request. We chatted a bit but soon went on DFK. It is warm Florida so the clothes came right off after I asked her to turn around and showed me her nice body. I started with kissing her nice and soft boobs, and went on DATY. Her kitty was fresh, and she came once while I was down there. Then her turn to do BBBJ, nice eye contact and hands, almost lost it there but wanted to feel her deep in her pussy. The cover went on, and we started with cowgirl, she knows how to move. Then we went on Doggy until I lost it in missionary. We chatted a bit about life and she got me up again down there with some nice stroking. Another BBBJ and went on another cover, we did missionary for a good while until I lost it again. Farrah is a very sweet girl and I will see her again when I go back to Orlando.
positive I saw Paige three times before she headed back down to Florida. Overall I had a remarkable time with her, great personality, very easy to talk to and easy to contact. She is the girl in the photos, but looks better in person. She is very eager to please and has a great overall vibe. VIPs I will repeat if she is every around again. Each time I saw Paige it felt like she was hotter and I got to know her better and better. Treat her well and with respect and she will do the same for you. She is very cautious and will provide CBJ, not bad at all, great effort and motion. Wonderfully cute smile and face, amazing tall lean body and very responsive pussy. I tell you, I could spend all day there if I could and believe me, I spent a good amount of time there. Incredibly clean and well taken care of, never any issues with any of the visits I've had. I wish she did offer BBBJ but overall I can't complain too much. From missionary, to cow girl, to doggie, every position provided an amazing view of her. I tell you what, this girl loves to kiss, tounge, no tounge, cuddle and all. Provides as close to GFE as possible without some of the GFE mentioned (BBBJ). I hope that she comes back up around NJ as I would definitely see her for an extended stay. Sure the are better providers around, but for me, she was great and I loved every minute I had with her.
positive I was out in LA for business twice in a one month span and I actually saw Angie both times. The first time I saw her ad and contacted her. She replied immediately and we handled everything via text and email. The pics in her ad were representative of her but after the appointment was made she emailed me new pics that were the real deal. She is amazingly beautiful and has a very hot body. She came by my room and it was the best visit I have ever had. She is a consummate GFE professional and will quickly become an ATF. Angie is amazing. Since the outcall visit was 90 min minimum we took some time just to get to know each other. I bought a bottle of wine and we sat on the bed drinking and talking. The clothes slowly started to come off and that naturally progress into a BBJ that was great. I returned the favor with some DATY. It was all very slow an sensual. The cover came on and she climbed on top for some cowgirl. We rolled over to mish and then finished in doggie. After we exhausted ourselves we cleaned up with a dual shower and called it a night. There was enough time for another pop but I was well satisfied. The whole experience was perfect. The second time I saw Angie it was like hanging out with an old friend. It was a lot more intimate and different than anything I have experienced before. She is once in a lifetime and I hope to see her again. Treat he right!
positive I've used this agency before, as well as others. This one has been good about the age of the lady. Pure .... took my breath away. Hair was so nice, curves like the picture, only nicer in person. She seems older in the pics for some reason. She was really just the girl next door who happens to be super hot. Would def repeat! Standard mouthwash and shower. Nice kisser. She is really pretty did I already mention? Uses her tongue to kiss a lot. grind in the shower gets me started. in the bedroom she bbba'd as much as I could take. view of her pretty face, and backside in the mirror was amazing. she rode first. had a little trouble because its not so small, but she was just amazing grinding, bouncing, just enjoying herself. Doggie - from the backside I thought I would lose it. I'm pretty sure she came. She collapsed flat on her belly because I think I was punishing her a little much. I lost it. Did not go for two since my session was only 40. She is a nice, nice girl and I wish I had a girl like her, well you know what I mean. She is not a nasty nasty girl like others I've run into. I.e, she didn't dive into my backside - I'm not into that so I'm glad she didn't do that because I like kissing her lips/toungue throughout. Just near perfect IMO. I caught her last day. Hope she returns.
positive As usual XO doesnt dissapoint. Sasha looks gorgeus in the pictures. In person a little less glam but very attractive with great smile. OPened the door and she was waiting in a tight white dress. After I came out of the shower she was lying in bed totally nude with a big smile on her face. I knew it would be a great hour Sasha is very friendly and down to earth. English is better than some of the other XO providers. Her body is very nubile and her breasts are nice if not a little droopy but they are real for sure. She started with a very sensual massage kissing my whole body. This got me very excitied as I went for FIV/FIA. After a while she went for BBBJ with nice deep throat technique. I was going to pop so I stopped her and got inside. Did a little Mish, CG, RCG, and ended in K9. She has a beautiful ass and I couldnt contain myself anymore and dropped the cup. We talked for a while, I was too tired for round 2 so I took a shower and left. Had a great time, would repeat.
positive Simple 2 call system. I have seen her before and I knew what to expect. Sessions are more expensive now than they were. She didn't disappoint though. Harley has been around since last summer and she is a very tight bodied, thin and sexual person. She opened the door and gave me a hug and kiss on the mouth. We made out a bit, but she told me she was getting over a cold and wanted to make sure I didn't get sick. I had a short session, so we got down to business quickly. We got naked and she got on top of me and teased my dick with her pussy. I asked her to sit on my face and she did - I went DATY for a few minutes while she moaned loudly until she wanted the dick in her. She popped on the cover and hopped on and went hard fucking me. She was very into it and she went on top of me with her either fucking, grinding or me fucking her for a few minutes. I flipper her over and went mish to finish. When it was over, she didn't jump off, but let us stay together for a few minutes and let me pull out when I was ready. She let's you kiss her while it's happening and she'll reciprocate. She's a great time and I wish I had the $ to go have a longer session.
positive Great girl, shes legit. Prior reviews are all accurate. I would see again. This is a difficult review to write for a few reasons. First I must follow the TER guidelines so I am limited in my ability to give her a higher mark than I did, because I would have. When I started this hobby I was looking first and foremost for a cool girl. Someone chill I could talk with and get along with. Having that chemistry is important to me. She is a cool girl, no doubt. The second reason its hard to review is because I don't want to hold against her what I learned that night. I learned I really dont like covers, at all. I guess its been so long without using them that the feeling is just not there for me. And she does everything covered. I 100% understand her decision to do that, I try to keep myself clean to borderline ocd levels. But it really kills my mood having a manhood strangled by a piece of plastic. She also doesn't kiss, and turns out I enjoy that as well. And she's a girl you really want to kiss. She is a beautiful girl, just at the other reviews say. CG skilz are bananas and K9 she looks like a god. So it leaves me with a dilemma. Continue to see a cool girl with made skilzs and try a different type of cover and no kissing. Or continue the search? Guess time will tell!
positive I had seen amanda's thorn's website and i emailed to book an appointment. she needed to verify me . it had been awhile and i was nervous about giving my work info but she seemed so nice and told me that in the future she would happily give me a reference. so i trusted her and i am glad i did . A wonderful girl. i went to where she was staying in Boston a great hotel on the waterfront and i emailed her when i reached the the hotel and she got right back with her room number. my heart was pounding but as soon as i knocked on the door it opened and i was greeted by a beatufiul girl next door type she led me into the room we sat and just talked for about 15 min before her hand started to rest on my thigh and we were off to the races I asked if she would undress first which she gladly did. she was standing in front of me totally nude it was such a turn on. she then got on her knees as I sat on the bed and she took off my shoes and my socks and then unbuckled my pants and slipped them off and then helped my take off my shirt and tie . i had never been undressed like that by a woman and it was a turn on. we got on the bed and started kissing and then she slid down my body and took my cock into her mouth. i loved the way she looked at me with her big brown eyes as my cock was in her mouth. she played with my balls and took them into her mouth her blow job skills were equisite. i then wanted to go down on her . Her pussy was moist and delicous and she seemed to really enjoy my efforts. On went a condom and i fucked her from behind and her pussy was warm and i loved watching my cock slide into her. I came faster then i wanted and she said it was okay. off came the condom and she cleaned me up a little and she then started sucking my cock again. it felt wonderful but i knew today it was not going to happen a second time. i did not care it just felt so so good. it was well past our time and i had to go. I really had a great time with a great girl. I am so happy that i contacted her .
positive Met Brylee at a motel as she does outcall and drives herself. She pulled into the parking lot and I immediately noticed a very attractive woman. We went went together to our room and the fun began ... I will reppeat We both chit chatted a bit as we removed or clothes and the atmosphere was relaxed and easy, She is nice and friendly like an old friend. We layed and the bed for a few minutes and cuddled and then the fun began. She slid down the bed with her mouth rubbing my stomach and took me into her mouth very slow and easy. She kept a smooth steady rhythm sucking my cock and before I could blow she asked how I wanted her. I slipped on the cover and she came up to ride me cowgirl with her hands on my chest and hair in my face. We enjoyed that for awhile when she spun around and I entered her doggie from the rear .Boy what a nice view. I didn't last long before I exploded and we both collapsed on the bed. We chatted a bit before it was time to go. A very enjoyable time.
positive Bella has been on my radar for a while every time I read her reviews I decide to contact her till we finally make it , she worth the waiting and defiantly will repeat Contacted Bella via text messages we shecduled a late afternoon date. And I went to her town house in a good decent community where she guided me over the phone she opened the door and we made our way upstairs to her room where I left the donation and both get comfortable quickly where I asked for a shirt over her titis which I wasn't able to hold my hand from eating and squeezing them, we started LFK soon to DFK she is a great kisser we get closer I get rid of the shirt and I started diving into her tits kissing licking eating they are beautiful she then slides them on my cock I have to lay back and just watch her great tits hides my cock between them til it appeared touching her lips where she gave me an amazing BBJ I can't resist she jumped for a CG position where I kept fucking her pussy while she is fucking my mind with her eyes moaning tits and her great kissing way where I decided to enjoy more when we switched to mis and fucked like crazy till we both cum together Was one of the great experiences and definitely will repeat
positive The pics are definitely not her-- She is at least partially latina/puerto rican (Nothing wrong with this, but since ethnicity says white here I just want to be clear). She still looks similar to the pics, more attractive in my opinion. The breat size and look is similar to the pics-- amazing. She was talkative at the beginning and end of the session, in a friendly way. Go check her out, you won't be disappointed; I'm considering repeating but enjoy trying new things so I probably won't. Called her up and set up an immediate session very easily. She doesn't respond to texts, though after talking to you on the phone she is okay with it-- She likes to hear the voice of the person on the other end of the line, very reasonable in this business. Got to the fairly nice Hotel (not upscale but not a motel) and contacted her for the room number, went up and she let me in. Quick LE check, brief small talk while I put the donation on the dresser ($250 agreed to beforehand for 1 hour, not asked about). We moved to the action pretty quickly and she gave a great CBJ and got her amazing tits involved. It was great quality and went on for a while. After she asked about positions, then we went into CG, RCG, Doggie, Mish, then I popped about 40 minutes into the session. Second pop would have been extra ($50) and I was feeling satisfied. Cleaned up in the shower, said my goodbyes and moved on. She gave some friendly advice (I had left some of my stuff outside the bathroom and she told me I shouldn't do that, other girls might take advantage; stupid on my part, I'm new to this.. she warned me about it and didn't take anything though, great girl). Next time I would probably go for 30 minute session if I repeat. Price is really the only drawback here; $250 for one pop seems on the high side. Despite my feelings about the price I did not feel rushed at any point, but I didn't get very close to the hour I paid for so I'm not sure how strict she is on the time. She is really hot and has a great attitude though.
negative very friendly on phone, seems like a good choice at the time. Arrive a very cheap hotel, and knock on door. Greeted by very thin girl, and room was a mess. Trash all over floor. I think she lives in room full time. Bathroom sink had mildew and green slime growing in it. She is a smoker and room smells of smoke. Massage was OK, asked what she meant by fetish friendly, and she talked about her feet. Thin, but sexy.. Got undressed, and l on bed for message, She took her top off, and had small breasts but nipples were nice.. Very thin, but thought we would go further. With Massage got nice uncovered BJ, Has a nice tongue, around the head.. But that's when it went south, Little touching, no offer of more.. She is a clock watcher...I would not repeat.
positive I decide to contact Paige through her ad on another site.. I am a sucker for thick women.. She was nice and delivered a nice time. I will repeat. Contact her was very easy through her phone.. she asked me some basic question and then we were good to go. I drove to her hotel/motel.. she was sharing her room with another provider. They asked me if I was interested in a threesome but my finances didn't allow me to indulge. She gave me a slow decent bbbj on the edge of her bed.. I let her continue for a while.. It felt good and I was getting relaxed. I asked her to jump on my cock.. and she did. She covered me up and rode me for a good five minutes. She is very tight.. her pussy is young and fresh. Then I asked her to bend over so I could fuck her doggie.. the view of her big ass drove me quickly over the edge.. I clean up and say bye. I will see her again. good value if you like thick girls.
positive I saw Jenny's ad come up for Charlotte and loved her pics. So I went To see if she had any reviews and saw that she had a few and they were very positive. So I decided to contact her. Her assistant is very Responsive and got my references checked out quick and we arranged our date She even moved some time around for me which was very nice. On the morning of our date I got a sweet Text from Jenny to see if I was close. As soon as I got there I texted her and up to the room in an upscale hotel I went. Once I got to the room the a beautiful and very sexy young was behind the door! Guys don't worry that she doesn't have any face pics up because she is beautiful! And has an incredible sexy body! She had this form fitting dress on that showed all of her curves! I gave her a hug and knew I was in for a good time! Go see her! You be very thankful you did! VIP's read for the juicy details! Jenny's assistant had emailed me about Jenny wanting you to take a shower first eve if you just had before you went to see her. So after the hug and a quick chat I went to take a quick shower. I came out of the bathroom and around the corner with nothing on and she was still in her tight dress but that was no problem for me. I love helping a sexy woman out if her clothes! We quickly embraced and started DFK which I love. I started running my hands over her sexy body! Let me tell you guys she is in absolutely perfect shape! Incredible body! We laid down on the bed making out! She is a wonderful kisser! I ran my hands up her dress feeling her incredible ass! Damn perfect! We kept kissing for a few minutes and she sat up so we could get her undressed! I took her bra off to see her perfect tits and nipples! I started sucking on them and she seemed to love every second! Her nipples got hard and I stArted rubbing her pussy over her panties! She then pushed me back a little and started down towards my rock hard cock! She has great oral skills! She started off licking the head of my cock and slowly jacking me too! She then kept taking More and more of my cock in her mouth and the sight of this sexy woman sucking my cock hard as so nice! I pulled her up after about 5 minutes and told her it was her turn! I love eating pussy and I knew I was going to enjoy kicking her sweet juices! I went back to sucking on her perfect tits and worked my way down her stomach to her thighs and teasing her clit with a few kicks. I started blowing gently on her clit and ran my fingers over her pussy lips. She liked this. And I picked up kicking her clit and fingering her pussy! She was very responsive and told me how good it felt. I wanted to make her cum! And she tasted so good. She was arching her back and grabbing my head and she had a nice organsim and I kicked it all up! I gave her a big kiss and as I sat up she took my cock back in her mouth and started sucking me hard. I was fingering her pussy. We moved into 69 and the sight of her sweet pussy and ass in my face was pure joy! I sucked on her clit and then started fucking her pussy with my to tongues and she was sucking my cock so good. I then gave her sweet ass a quick lick and asked her if she liked that and she did! I began to swirl my tongue around her sweet little ass and she started sucking my cock even harder! So I started fucking her ass with my tongue and she loved it! Fuck it was so hot now! We were licking and sucking each other so good. We both said let's fuck! She got the cover and she straddled me reverse CG! Damn her pussy is so tight! She felt so good! We started slow! I loves feeling hr sliding up and down on my cock! She then picked up the speed and I grabbed her arms and pulled them behind her and started fucking her hard! I then grabbed her tits and played with her clit as she leaned back! She can fuck! She has the perfect body and knows how to use it! I usually love to change positions but it felt so damn good I blew my load while deep inside of her! It felt so damn good! She collapsed back on me and we kissed deep! She is wonderful!! After she got up and got me a warm wet towel always a great gesture! And we then laid there and talked like old friends. She is very intelligent and has a very sweet personality! I can't wait to see her again! She may have vaulted into my ATF! I just wish she lived closer! Treat her right guys please! She is a true GFE experience and you should run to see her! I know I will see her every time she comes to town!
positive TraveliNg through pdx And did some shopping while in town. Saw an ad for Adriannah with discount pricing and saw that she also had a few reviews so reached out via both board and phone. Within an hour I received a text asking what was up. We agreed to meet at her place near the convention center and I enjoyed our time together. Would be willing to repeat but only for hhr. All communication was via text. I had to reach out to her at the agreed upon time and was asked to wait 10 minutes bc she was "driving." Got to a nice hotel and she opened the door after a light knock. I was very pleased at she is the girl from the ad pictures and they are recent. She's young but not new. She asked what I liked but seemed to not pay much attention to my response. We started with BBBJ. Her skills are excellent but she stopped mid way to update me with her rules: No lfk, no dfk, no cim or anywhere on her, no fingers, no msog. I didn't complain bc the price was discounted for the hour anyway and not being from the area I don't know what would be the norm around these parts. Back to BBBJ which is great she's even able to dt pretty well. But when she gets tired she asks if I'm ready for the hat. I say yes. She asks my fav positions... Then proceeds to tell me how bad she is at RCG. I settle for CG to start. After a few minutes we move so that I'm standing at the edge and driving home with her legs up in the air. The view is great, I really find her quite attractive and her pussy is picture perfect. Eventually she rolls onto her side and I finish hard and fast while squeezing her little ass cheeks. I'm spent and all in all it was $$.5 well spent. Take away the rules and teach her how to have some intelligent convo and this girl could be making a fortune. But for now she's pricing to match her services.
positive It was my 2nd time seeing her. First one was quite enjoyable so I decided to try again. When I get to the door, oUT comes this pretty lady with a nice blue dress. We showered and off we went. After getting out of the shower she proceeded to dry me off and massage me a bit on the bed. She then started going down on me with the most aggressive BJ I've every gotten. So aggressive in fact that it was starting to get sore. Clearly she enjoyed it too because she wouldn't slow down even though I asked her too multiple times. After what seemed like a 15 minute BJ, she mounted me and started riding me hard. Definitely not as intense as the BJ though. After a spirited session I finally gave in and unloaded. No second pops for me this time. She gave me a really good massage that actually relieved some of my shoulder stiffness a good deal. Gotta give props for that. We chatted a little bit in Korean about her life in Korea and the US. She certainly isn't shy I'll giver her that. Took another shower shared anot her deep kiss and out the door I went. Of course having given her the donation. rvice was quite good and intense. However, I never felt a deep emotional connection. She seemed a bit standoffish and self centered. Also, during sex, she only gave me she wanted and ignored my requests which was a bit of a turnoff. Physical service was great. Emotionally I was left wanting somewant. Because of this, I probably won't see her again, but if you want a steamy, wild experience go give her a call. Score: 8
positive Two calls and you are there. Greeted in the side entrance for le check. Was surprised it is the girl in the pictures. Cute and energetic willing to please but dose have a retinue. Will repeat. Sat the donation down and went to freshen up. she never touched it. Nice start. We got undressed and those are some amassing tits. She has you sit on the edge of the bed and dose a very erotic lap dance. Her pussy is wet and likes to rub on your leg. Reached around and grabbed a hand full of those tits, WOW nice and firm. Played with her kitty with one hand and a tit with the other wile she dose a grinding lap dance. Then she has me stand at the foot of the bed and she gets on all fours facing me. Applies the cover and dose a decent CBJ. Not bad but grabbed her hair and face fucked a little. Then she spun around and put her ass up to the edge of the bed. I asked if she would like for me to DTAY but she said she " likes cock in side of her" Well how can you refuse. Started pounding away and after a few minutes she has a big O . Creams my cock and almost running down her leg. I then asked for MISS. She rolls over and we get up on the bed. Great tits bouncing they don't fall or go to the side. Start pounding hard and finish in the cover. She goes to the bathroom with me and gets a warm washcloth. we clean up. A little small talk, very pleasant and say our good bus. Will repeat.
negative Met Carlie early morning on a weekend. She greeted me in a beautiful silky robe. she was incredibly warm and welcoming from the start. She instantly made me feel at ease. I took a shower and it was on for one of the hottest, steamy, passionate session. I stepped out of the shower and we got comfortable on the bed. It immediately turned into a deep passionate dfk and it last quite some time. Carli is an amazing kisser. Then I moved down to give her a long session of daty and she came with a loud moan and her body convulsing. I was very turned on. She then went down to give me one of the best bbbj's I've had with a lot of tongue, dt, and bls. Then she climbed up and gave me a nice massage p2p. I couldn't take it anymore so the cover went on and we went into missionary. I came pretty quickly given all the foreplay and how hot she was. We chatted for a while. She's definitely engaging in conversations too. Then went for a second session which was pretty much the repeat of the first but just as good. I came again and was exhausted by the end. This was definitely one of the best sessions I've had in a long time. Can't wait to see Carli again.
positive Rosie's pictures are a great representation of this young Jewish girl. Her breasts are larger and less perky than anticipated but she is a beautiful GND type. Highly recommended and delivers as advertised. Rosie has amazing, fair skin with fairly extensive tattoos. Intellectually she is charming and bookish. Her breasts are larger than the photos portray but not perky/protruded. She has a natural black bush unlike reported in the metadata. She wore gray woolly socks which weren't too enamoring but this was minor for what was on the whole an excellent experience. Rosie arrived right on time and quickly engaged with a BJ, which she delivered startlingly well. She was friendly and fully willing to tea bag and rode cowgirl style for a short period before performing for an extended time in missionary and reverse missionary position. She gives an excellent HJ that aims to please. Highly recommended - you get what you see on the website which hasn't always been the case.
positive Everything was typical with regards to setup and arrival once you've been vetted by the agency. Yumi is very attractive and really aims to please. She does not speak english which does make the experience unique. Service is excellent, but helped me realize that the verbal engagement is something that I prefer. If that's not your thing, then Yumi is a great time. I arrived on time and got the room number and went up. Walk in and there is a really attractive girl lying in the bed. I knew she didn't speak english on the way in so I knew we'd have to figure out some communication. It was kinda like being in a foreign country and trying to order a meal at a restaurant-lots of pointing and grunting. Eventually we figured it out and the pointing and grunting continued. We undressed and she began BBBJ. She was trying, but I think I was having a little trouble getting into it. I think she read that and lead me over to the desk. Here's where she did the hottest thing. She put one leg up on the desk and asked me to do her from behind. There was a mirror behind the desk so I could enjoy her while looking at her. This was very hot. After enjoying this for a while, she had me sit in a chair and then reversed mounted me. She began to bounce on me. She really put forth a lot of effort here and between that and her perfect ass I couldn't take it and released. She seems like a really nice girl and if she spoke english I think she'd be a repeat for me.
positive Texted Bella the previous week we met. She required the normal referral check with other providers. I unfortunately stopped the process the first time I reached out to Bella because when I went out to find her reviews, I found the WRONG Bella. I apologized sincerely to her for stopping the process and mistaking her with the wrong reviews. To her amazing credit, she accepted my apology and allowed me to come see her the following week when I visited her area again. I met her at her place as at a time we both agreed. Very cute! We headed in her apartment up the stairs to her bedroom. Doesn't take long for the kissing and petting to begin. Cloths come off and very soon....(VIPs read on) Very soon I am giving to her oral. She loves this very much! I take her to a full "O" and she gets very wet. She then starts oral on me. She is very skilled here. After she gets Jr. to "Rock Hard" state, I start fucking her in mish style. She thrust as I thrust and this angle feels very good. We fuck for a very long spell and we both blow. Brief break and we decide to do greek, it was my first time for this so she had to help me with doggie style. This was a very good experience and it didn't take me long to blow a second time. She was very kind and very patient and was not rushed at all. We talked, hugged, cuddled and enjoyed oral, intercourse and anal multiple ways. She is a great provider and really aims to please. Bella is worth seeing!
positive Saw Devin several times and she hasn't disappointed me yet. She has became one of my ATF and have repeated several times. Treat her right and she treats you right. Devin greats me with a hug and dfk. She likes to make small talk which is fine. We get naked and she straddles me and begins to kiss me and grind on me. We lay back in the bed and we kiss some more while I finger her. I roll over and she begins to give me a bj. Her blow job is good. When it is time to fuck, Devin gets on top and rides, which I like. I can see her big tits and thick nipples and also allows me to pinch and suck them. We go from her too to missionary which she really seems to like. I finish on her tits and we continue to clean up and talk. Non rushed session and I really enjoy her
positive Called Leya talked for a few and she texted me the address and I headed over. She was very nice on the phone so I thought I would take a chance. Vips read on. Knocked on the door and she answered gave her a hug and tried to kiss but she said no kissing allowed. She is very particular with her face and feels if anything touches her face she will break out but whatever. Put the donation down got undressed as did she and I dove in right away and started to lick away. I had to she her squirt and that she did a few times actually. It was then my turn and she gave me a decent BBBJ nothing great but ok. She did this for a few minutes and then I told her to assume the position and I banged her doggie till I blew my load in the cover. I discarded the condom in the toilet washed up got dressed and we said our goodbyes. Overall it was ok for the price and to see her squirt but I will not repeat once was enough. I will take my Hard earned elsewhere.
positive Mint is a beautiful woman. The location is easy enough to find. Standard two call system. My only complaint would be the down time when the woman leaves the room to get/do something. While you're paying for an hour, it actually seems like less. Great command of english and friendly. I saw Mint show up in the city and called to make a reservation. Easy enough to make an appointment, house fee is $$, while GFE will run an additional $.5 so be prepared. Table shower is great and worth it. After TS we headed to the room where Mint had me lay down face down and started to rub my back lightly, she asked me to flip where and started to BBBJ me. She's really good and going deep and stroking my shaft. She asked if I was ready and I said yes! On went the had and Mint asked me to go on top. I enter Mish and am having a great time kissing and pounding her. I then ask her for DS, which she complies and is stroking my package while I'm going balls deep. Great view here, her ass is wonderful to look at. I see her tiny asshole and think, "man I wish I could fuck that!" I ask her to flip and then I really am moving and grooving and let go in the bag. She cleans me up and then comes to lay down with me. I ask her questions and we chat for a bit, then she asks if I want a massage and I say yes! Nice rub across my back, really working my muscles. When she's done, she grabs a towel and cleans me up. She helps me dress, I help her, we kiss and I'm on my way. I would repeat with Mint as often as I could.
positive This was my second time visiting J Lyeen. The PO is very professional and helpful. Directions were are always very clear. The area is very discrete and parking is was never a problem. Being in the valley is also a plus as it is much closer to me than other Kgirls in WLA and traffic is never that bad. I arrived and went up after receiving a text saying that J Lyeen is ready and the door opened. This was very memorable hour. J Lyeen is the best provider I have seen in terms of looks and performance but most importantly she was much more passionate during our time than any other provider and I'm gutted that she left. If she comes back, make sure to see her, I know I will. J Lyeen has a very beautiful face and a great body. The only reason I gave her a 9 instead of a 10 is because her implants are very hard and her ass is a little small, but apart from that she is a gem. I had asked for J Lyeen to wear yoga pants and a sports bra and that's exactly what she was wearing. She greeted me with a DFK and then we headed for the bedroom after I handed the donation. She was about to take her clothes off for the shower but I told that I had already showered and sat her next to me on the bed. We went onto a make out frenzy. Very intense DFK with lip biting. We were still fully clothed and grinding against each other. I slightly pulled her pants down and started licking her every where finally getting to her beautiful shaved pussy. She was very responsive as I kept eating her pussy until she got very moist then I started fingering her while we DFK. By this point I was very hard so I was taking my clothes off in a rush while she was grabbing a condom. We started fucking hard in mish while her legs were still bound by the pants. She was scathing my back and lightly choking me as I was her. She was moaning all the time we were fucking and I felt a lot of convulsions and thought she came a few times but then again these girls can be pretty damn well actresses. We Then we moved on to ds. Then flat ds where she arched her back allowing me to reach under her and rub her clit while we were fucking. I then grabbed her and we got off the bed. She was having trouble moving as the yoga pants were below her knees by now (yes, she was still in her clothes). I started fucking her against the wall with one hand around her neck and the other rubbing her pussy. I then backed up to lean on the bed and she backed up with me careful not to let my cock slip out of her tight pussy. She held my knees and started fucking me by moving fast up and down my cock until she got tired. I then took her clothes off and sat her on that high chair in her room. I started fucking her again while we intensely kiss. I then held on to the chair and went as fast and hard as I possibly can until she was moaning very loudly and I felt the convulsions again and started kissing her. I was concerned that we might run out of time and I'm yet to cum so I checked the time and only 25 minutes had gone by. We then changed positions with me on the chair and she is on her knees licking my balls while taking the condom of my cock. She gave me a very enthusiastic BBBJ with lots of saliva and BLS but no real deepthroating. I then pushed her head slightly down and she pushed my legs back and started to vigorously rim me. She lubed my dick and started jerking me with 2 hands while licking my asshole until I exploded inside her mouth. She kept my dick inside her mouth for awhile and she didn't go the bathroom to clean up so I'm assuming she swallowed. She then offered a massage which was mediocre but it doesn't matter as that's not what I'm there for. It just gave me a chance for a quick nap before round 2 which started with reciprocal orals and followed similar to round 1. We showered and got dressed. She gave me a kiss at the door and said she'll miss me. I told her I'll see her later having no idea that she'll be gone short after. I was out only a couple of minutes overtime. She was very passionate during our time. We were somehow kissing in every position we did and she didn't mind at all that I was a little bit rough and went completely off script and led the session. I'm dying to see her again and I'm relentlessly checking if she is coming back. If she comes back and you're able to see her don't hesitate.
positive Saw that Jenny was going to be in town as she is normally from the North Carolina area. Went on to her website and saw her pictures and was very intrigued. You can only contact her through email, she has no phone number. Made contact by email and received a response within 24 hours. Went through verification process where she asked me for some references which I provided. Then settled on a time and day in The Seacaucus area. Got in a text message from her after providing her with my cell phone number to let me know that she was ready. She was staying in a nice hotel and once I got the call I went inside. Went to the room and open the door and saw a gorgeous gorgeous girl. The photos did not do her justice. Once inside the room she was wearing a short dress that showed off her amazing physique. She speaks English very well and it looks like she had a nose job but her face was still very very attractive. Put the donation down on the table and then she asked me to go and take a shower in the bathroom. I did, which I actually don't like to do, because it de-sensitizes me, but I'm not going to say no. Came out and she took off her dress and was in a black bra and panties. I felt her rock hard body and spent some time on her great breasts. I tried kissing her but she would not oblige. She avoided my face and I didn't press the issue. She then gave me a very good bbbj with good eye contact. I asked her to sit on my face which she did. After about 5 minutes, I asked her to fuck. She putt on the conform and we did cowgirl then missionary then doggie. Got tired and took off condom and laid back down on the bed for more bbbj. As I was ready to cum, I said do out loud and she jacked me off till I finished on her hands. She then went to the bathroom and came back and handed me a warm washcloth. I am a one pop guy so I then took another shower. When I came back out she was in a robe with her hair up. Said goodbye and that was that. Overall very nice person. Extremely hot, just somewhat reserved. We just didn't click the way I wanted.
positive Lynn works for an agency. She is petite and thin but has amazing breasts that are just beautiful. She is friendly and has a great attitude. You will have fun if you are OK with a non GFE performance. I will repeat. Lynn answers her calls and there is practically no screening. Two call system gets you to her. The hotel is very nice and upscale and she moves around from one to another depending on the day. She had a really tight dress and huge heels when I walked in the room. She checks in with the agency when you arrive and the clock starts but I was never rushed. I went for the hour and 2 pops which was well worth it. She has an average face but her body is model material with fantastic firm perky real tits. I couldn't keep my hands or mouth off them and she didn't mind. She puts on a cover for both oral and full service but she is very good at both. The sight of her tits bouncing in cowgirl mad me lose it pretty quickly for round one. I was better in round two where we did mish and doggy. I finished lazy doggy which was fun since she knows how to grind the right way. She is also chatty and very friendly and won't rush you at all. Overall I had a great time and I will go back.
positive I've used Flawless a few times in the past and have had good to great experiences (never average). Juli Ann is one of my favorite ladies from Flawless so far. She is sweet, intelligent, beautiful, sensuous, and a rockstar in bed. Her English is limited, but she speaks several other languages, so we were able to communicate in Spanish. Definitely recommend. Juli Ann let me in the room and immediately started making me feel welcome with kisses and groping. Within a minute we were in our underwear, and she pulled me to the bed. We talked for a bit to get to know each other while she massaged my penis, and after a minute or two of that, she climbed up onto me and started DFK while giving me a proper HJ. When I was fully hard, she turned around and started giving me a BBBJ. I asked if we could move so she could continue on her knees in front of the mirror for my viewing pleasure, and she was happy to do it. I watched her beautiful toned body while receiving a soft and sensuous blowjob. At one point, she turned to look at me through the mirror and winked. So sexy. I think she doesn't allow CIM because she was persuading me to move on to sex. I'm one to go with the flow, and besides she's got an amazing body, so why not? So she stood up and we started grinding in front of the mirror. Watching myself with this lovely Brazilian was a huge turn-on and I did not regret too much that she did not do BBJTC NQNS. She put a condom on me and moved on from grinding to standing doggy in the mirror. I was holding her perfect round breasts as we both thrusted back and forth into each other. She was moaning and groaning the whole time. Plus, she was in heels; What a champ! Pretty soon I came, and we lied on the bed for a good ten or fifteen minutes talking about life. She is very intelligent, super educated, and has a real career in Brazil, but does this for the money (wages are low in Brazil, even for professionals). She is a great conversationalist if you can overcome the language barriers. When I commented that she is way over-qualified for escorting, she reminded me jokingly that in the bed room there is only passion, and she climbed onto me again and we started round two. I asked for more blowjob, and she crawled to the end of the bed to give me one while I lied down. I asked her to go deep, and she tried, but she is not capable of DT ("A" for effort though). By the time I was fully erect, she put on a cover, climbed on top of me and rode me cowgirl. Again, she has an amazing body and it was a huge turn on to watch her loudly take pleasure in bouncing on my cock. After a while, we rolled over for missionary. I pulled her legs over my shoulders and started going at it full speed, full depth. She made it very clear that she was enjoying it. She started shaking and gasping from orgasms while flexing her v-muscles to apply extra pressure on my cock. It was too much for me and I blew my load simultaneously. After we washed up, we talked until the hour was over, and kissed each other goodbye. Definitely worth a repeat.
positive Had the itch and came across Julie's ad. After a little research, I texted for donation and location. 15 minutes later, I was at her hotel. Julie is very easy to talk to and strives to please. I had a really good time and would repeat Julie agreed to see me on short noticed. I got to her hotel very quickly and she asked me to wait about 10 minutes. That was no big deal. After 10 minutes, she gave me the room number and I quickly went to her room. I knocked lightly and the door was opened by Julie. She has a very pretty face with an awesome smile. after 5 minutes of chit chat, off came the clothes and play time started. Julie started off with a nice bbbj. After 5 minutes or so checked to see if I was ready for the condom, which I was. Julie has a little baby damage to her tummy area but this was not a big deal for me. The view from doggie was very nice. Julie has an awesome ass. The vocals were nice as she kept calling out my name. We went at this for about 15 minutes and I asked if we could finish with oral. Julie obliged. I popped in her mouth and she excused herself to the bathroom to spit and clean up. She returned with a wash cloth and helped me clean up. Julie is easy to talk to and loves to please. She told me during our session that she had an "o" too. Julie and enjoys what she does and is very good at it. I will see her again.
positive I live out in the boonies, so I always try to get outcalls when I can. Normally this is a hassle, but Brittany agreed to it right away. The only catch is she relies on taxis, so I had to add that onto her normal price, making her more expensive than other girls I've gotten to do outcalls. You can tell she's on hard times -- she's still nice looking, but the life is wearing on her. Still, she gives a solid performance and her enthusiasm is top notch, much better than other providers who operate in the area. I will definitely repeat. So we get into my bedroom and undress. We do a little foreplay and I go down on her for a few minutes to get her wet. Then she offers to give me a blowjob, says she really loves sucking dick. I lay back on the bed and she goes right down on me with no condom. She's a high quality cock sucker -- no teeth, plenty of hand action on my balls -- and after about five minutes I let her know I'm about to cum. She doesn't stop and swallows my load straight down. At this point I expect her to give me the brush off and leave, but instead she asks if I'll be able to get it up again in the time we have left. Yes, guys, it's the mythical double pop! I say hell yes and offer to get her something to drink while I recover. She checks her phone and does some texting. After a little while, I start playing with myself to see if I can get myself hard again. She sees what I'm doing and gets right back in their with her mouth. Takes about two minutes for her to convince my cock to go another round. Once I'm hard I consider asking to mount up, but she left her purse in the living room so she'd have to go and get it for a condom and at that point I didn't want to stop. Of course being the second BJ of the day, I lasted close to twenty minutes this time, but she didn't let up once. I came in her mouth a second time and she swallowed it again.
positive saw this young beauty website online and decide to give it a try. contact through email and screen is fast since i am a member of a screen website that she use. get into date info and party time. set up an early appointment. she mailed me detail how to meet her, very discrete and nice environment. a young and very beautiful girl opened the door and the juicy begins...... saw she visit chicago and contact her the day she arrived. lucky got an early morning appointment. she has a cell phone but only can be reached 10 minutes before your appointment, you can get her number only you get approved. after the screen, you will get her contact info and meeting detail. very nice which i like discrete. arrived early in the morning and she open the door for me. i am a hobbyist but she is definitely young and energetic. a young body and love to have fun attitude. we kissed before we went to bed. lfk and dfk. then she helped me take care of my cloth. i taste her nicely young and tight pussy before she give me the best bbbj i ever had. almost come at there. then i decide to feel her better. she put a condom on me and do the cow girl first. it was very tight and she seems have little trouble to take me junior in. after a few try, i was complete in and it feel extremely tight and good. i fucked her hard in different position. mish, doggy. then i was so excited to come. however, she exhaust me. i had some rest and little talk before she kiss me goodbye. will repeat when she returns/visit again
positive I contacted Scarlett via text which she responded to fairly quickly. I arranged to meet her at her incall in Boulder. I had hoped to meet her in Denver to avoid the drive. However I was in the mood to play with her so I made the road trip. It was a chilly January night but things were soon to heat up. I thought I would be late but as I got close to her location she texts me and says she's running late. Oh well what's a few more minutes? She asked to meet her in a public place near her incall. I got a text and she said she's on her way. A few minutes later I'm standing at the location where we were to meet and I see this sexy hottie in a deep blue dress coming my way. I knew then this was going to be a great night! We said our hellos and headed back to her place. I'm admiring her sexiness as we walk to her place. A nice incall on the outskirts of Boulder. We talk a little to get comfortable and move to kissing. Her pictures on her website make her look tall which in reality she's about 5-2 and a dynamite small woman! Great dfk and hands moving to all the right places. We move to her bed and the clothes are flying off. We kiss some more and I decide I am ready to ramp things up. I start Daty and enjoy her wetness. I seem to be hitting the right spots as she is moaning and gyrating. A short time later she gives me a rush of her juices. I often wonder if sometimes the responses are fake. Not this time, this was a great orgasm for her. She says it's my turn and she moves between my legs and starts an incredible bbbj. She started slow and then was deep throating me with no hesitation and no gagging. Damn I just hate it when that happens. I almost lost it right then but decided to make her stop and go for her pussy. She asks do you want to use a female condom. This was a first. She gets ready and mounts me cowgirl and goes at it me with enthusiasm. Omg I couldn't hold back any longer and unloaded in the condom. We talked for awhile and I was hoping for round two. My time was up so I said my good byes. I would definetly recommend Scarlett if you want to have a great time with a sexy petite hottie!
positive Contacted Talia at gfesessions.com and had the opportunity for Cindy Jane to meet me at my location. Beautiful petite girl. As the other reviews mentioned, she did seem a bit demure at first, but I thoroughly enjoyed her sweet personality. Pure GFE. I cant wait to repeat. I was met with a very pretty, petite girl when I opened the door. Looks just like her photos. Also mentioned before, she does appear to have a slight alt alt vibe with the ink and piercings, but found her not aloof, just sweet. After coming in and getting comfortable, it was nice to get to know her a little with a bit of conversation. It felt like it put the mood at ease and was a smooth transition to making out a little with her then getting undressed. She has beautiful breasts and an amazing ass on a petite frame. The make out session quickly progressed to 69 where we spent quite a bit of time. It was an amazing view and felt incredible with her hot little body going to town on me. Then we started out with up mish and passionate kissing. Trying to last a little longer, I maneuvered for her to flip over face down. It felt too amazing being so close against her, so didnt last much longer. Then we relaxed for a few minutes after, we took a very enjoyable close shower, dried off, and hung out on the bed for a while to chat and caress. Was a fun time hearing a few of her stories. This progressed once again to a bit more making out and another amazing grind session in missionary. Totally unrushed after  and she eventually departed with a kiss and a hug. I definitely look forward to our next visit!
positive Flaked on by another provider and have been wanting to visit Chantel so gave her a call and didn't get an answer initially. Was gonna count the day as a bust until I got a message to call back. Did just that and arranged an appointment later in the evening. She's friendly, amazing body and as pretty as her pictures. I got accommodated and had an overall enjoyable, though Non-GFE, time. Also found out she had someone in the bathroom towards the end though it didn't bother me much. Although business oriented, Non-VIPs, would recommend and repeat. VIPs continue. I should note I only visited for a short stay which is why my session was slightly rushed towards the end although I plan to visit again for an hour to get a better grasp of what's on the menu. Her body for the size is incredible: Nice athletic figure, although her face is dolled up for her photos, still has great natural beauty. Nice natural perky B cups and the butterfly tat she has on that soft ass is just delicious. Could not wait to get into that. Was greeted by her upon arrival in just a towel. Chatted for a bit before handing over the donation and both undressing. She stopped to mess with her phone, which gave me a bit of extra groping time, as she didn't count my time towards her business. This is when I found out she doesn't do kissing or licking on any part of her body. Once fully undressed she dropped her towel and got right to business: Condom on, lubed up and behind that butterfly ass of hers. So naturally because this was a quickie, I mainly interested in only doggy with her. Though everything was good, I had to keep adjusting her in a comfortable doggy position because she was constantly sinking into the bed after some strokes. Had to be a bit gentle with her as she didn't want me to move too fast or hard. Not too much to explain because the session was only about 20 minutes or so but did a little downward doggy and came inside the condom. Unsure of if she'll allow cumming anywhere on her body but would probably think not. When I finished she helped me get cleaned up, chatted a slight bit then parted ways with a hug and went on my day. Will be seeing her for an hour's stay if she remains in the area. Would recommend and will definitely be coming back with hopefully more info on her menu.
positive Another hot & sexy lady from Phoenix Fantasy. So many choices & all of them so far have been great. Jade is super sexy & a great dirty girl. I met Jade at the nice & safe in-call location. Behind the door stood sexy Jade - dressed in sexy lingerie & heels as I requested. I gave & received a nice hug & a kiss. I then had Jade give me a little show - admire her some. We ended up in the bedroom - I went to the bathroom for a quick refreshing & went back to the bedroom naked - and finding Jade moving seductively on the bed. I joined her & began to move my hands all over her sexy body. Plus some lfk & dfk as we rolled around on the bed. I had her take off her top so I could suck her tits/nipples. Had her give me a BBBJ - was awesome & then moved to her pussy. I licked & chewed on her nice & tight pussy - using my fingers inside & outside - just an awesome pussy. Had her go back to a great BBBJ for pop #1! For round 2, had Jade put on her 2nd lingerie outfit - and then strut around the bed some. I then had Jade get on the bed and slowly pull off her panties & then rub/spread her pussy for me, moving to a vibrator in her pussy. Love watching girls masturbate & Jade is a pro! Rubbed my dick some watching her & as getting hard, then had Jade bend over the bed so I could fuck her doggie style. Moved to having Jade lay on the edge of the bed with her great ass propped up on a pillow & then drove my dick again into her pussy. Driving my dick into her hard & holding her shoulders tight until I exploded inside her. What a hot & sexy girl - did everything I expected & wanted!
positive Made the call and set up time and texted when I was close She stayed on phone to help guild me in and was waiting at door I will repeat VIP read on. Had read some of her reviews and its hard to find a provider with her skills and rules . Samantha is a sweetheart and is very nice young lady she took my hand and lead me to her bedroom and then jumped in bed and said can you warm me up . Well I can try .We laid cuddled together talking like we knew each other for a long time I asked if she liked massages and that's when the fun started We both undressed and I started massaging her backside for about 5 min. then had her turn over She has a very small looking pussy and I had to start rubbing her clit and then went in for a taste Wow how sweet she is I was licking her clit and fingering her tight pussy and she started shaking and sqessing her legs together and had a good O I looked up at her and she had the sexiest smile I thought id go for 2 and this time she really shook and said she wanted me in her and I never stopped till she had her third I couldn't believe I was able to hold back I asked her to give me some head to see if the reviews there were right on and yes they were I had to stop her so I could try doggie and wow she felt great I know I was over my 30 min. but she never said a word . I will be going back If you are looking for a hard body she might not be for you but if you like sweet young ladies that make you feel like your wanted She is the one. o
positive She was easy to schedule once providing qualifying info. She gave me hotel info once appt was made and texted me with room number as i approached hotel. I entered upscale hotel to find her in tight, form fitting dress and nicely made up. She hugged and kissed me in welcome. Having read her rules I placed envelope on bureau and excused myself to shower. When I came out she was sitting on the bed. We kissed some more and i felt her body and then I had her stand up to unwrap the beautiful package. She is as good looking as everyone has said before me. All in all, it was a very nice afternoon and I do recommend her. VIP, read on. I asked to start with BJ and asked and was told to not CIM. The BJ was nice but not anything special Of course knowing I could not CIM I was somewhat put off, focusing on enjoying myself but not losing control. Once I came she cleaned me up with a warm towel. We lay next to each other kissing a bit and my licking and sucking her very nice nipples. She asked if I'd like to see her play with her vibrator and I said sure. After a short time I was ready to try for second cup. I asked for cover and she lubed me up and jumped on top. We did cg and mish until she told me she like doggie. I pulled her to edge of bed so I could stand up and enjoyed her from behind. we then went to what was my favorite position with her, lazy doggie. I was able to grind into her while playing with her tits. I never did come again but she was more than willing to entertain my every effort. Go see this beautiful girl.
positive Had my eye on Madison and was pleased when I met her. photos are close but may not be her. She is very pretty with a small well bosomed body. She knows how to make you feel great Entered the apartment and we kissed deeply as she seemed to like that I was pleasant looking and have a very good bod. She took my hand and took me into the bedroom where we undressed and went through the pleasantries of getting to know each other. She is great kisser which means a lot to me as I like the sensuous type of love making. Showered and massaged each other before she dropped to her knees and sucked me softly. IN the bedroom she continued to suck my dick before she rolled me over and gave me an extensive rim job. I reciprocated with a long Y session and a lot of fingering and fondling. We explored each other through a long robust 69 session before we tried all the positions. MISH, cowgirl, reverse cowgirl ~ I then picked her up and banged her against the door before laying her not he bed and banging away in doggy. I pulled out and had her sit on my face while she sucked me off and took every drop. A wonderful session and a fun girl with a final bbbj in the shower. I left a happy man.
positive Have been with her both in LA and OC two call system arrive at condo get codes to go up and meet wonderful Darby. Non VIPs she is one of the best I've had service is just amazing!! Greets with a long sensual DFK at the door she can DFK for long makes my shaft go hard even as I'm writing this. Remove shoes and go in to her room and continue DFK donation out of the way and she comes back I'm usually showered when I see her we start right away BbbJ 69 mish good moaning omg she can come again and again she shivers done with round one. Quick shower and light chit chat nice smile in close up she looks like Asian version of Jessica Biel imho round two was a long mish with DFK ending with a shiver that I can't describe one of the best!! Book if she is available
positive Seen her a few times, she will come to you or has a decent house to go to. Small bbw who loves to please and is easy to talk to. Overall wonderful time. VIPs read on She came in and gave me a hug. We went to the bedroom and started undressing and getting relaxed. She doesn't take off her top, but pulls it down to reveal her nice breasts. She started with a nice BBBJ, she doesn't let you finish in her mouth but great nonetheless, she will let you go multiple times if you can in one session. She is pretty submissive and will do anything you want. I tried positions with her and things most people won't do. She is great riding and really gets into it. Her favorite is doggy and her big ass looked nice from behind. It was a wonderful time and I finished very happily. I would definitely see her again and I would recommend her.
positive I had a small gap in my work schedule open up and thought I would try to squeeze in a half hour of fun. Called several local girls and got several unanswered or unavailable phones. First to answer was Brittany, a tall blond. She was able to see me in 30 minutes for a half hour. Usual two call system, one when leaving and one when arriving. Second got me the room number and I went up. She met me at the door with jeans and a top on. I gave her the donation and we both got immediately comfortable. This girl is really pretty, with long blond hair and a flawless body. Doesn't like to kiss and quite protective, but worth a visit by looks alone. We launched into a series of activities that began with chest play (nipples stand at attention with just a little stimulation), daty, fiv (squirming but no visible O). I gave her a backrub as an excuse to see that great ass and finger her from behind. Then on to my turn. She put on the cover for a CBJ, but with enthusiasm on her knees. That got me going so I asked to move on and for her to lay on the edge of the bed a standing mish, which was really enjoyable to watch. That is where we finished. We both went to the washroom to clean up and then back to the bedroom to get dressed. Nice girl, a little more enthusiasm would be good. No kiss beyond a peck. Thing is, I am willing to forego some of the activities I like because she is just so good looking and that body is pretty much flawless, if you like small chests.
positive Called my reliable booker on Saturday and she gave her Sunday lineup. Pick Mari for the following morning. Confirmed in the morning, and was on my way. Arrived and got the numbers. I must have taken the longest possible way around to get to her door. I didnt knock, but the door open with Mari, in a see through body suit, hiding behind the door. Since I was a little late, and holding things up, she escorted me straight to her room, where she began to undress me for the shower. For the non-VIPs, shes the girl in the pictures. Very attractive, thin, with beautiful and soft man made Cs adorned with long plump nipples that will melt in your mouth. And, eat your Wheaties, because shes not going to be giving you any time to rest; in a good way. We did the usual mouthwash and shower routine, with some LF and DFK, P2P and a preview BBBJ, which came too close to not being a preview after all. But, she knew I was on the edge, so pulled away just in time. We finished up and went back to her room where she gave me a nice sensuous back, leg and arm massage, using her mouth and breasts. It was great feeling her thick and luscious nipples caressing the crack between my butt cheeks. Then, came some very pleasurable rimming. Not particularly robust and deep, but very sensuous; the way I like it. Then, the flip for some more BBBJ. Mari seems to really enjoy herself in this activity, and shes extremely good at it. Nice and slow, with a lot of attention to the boys, and a lot of smiles and eye contact. This ended with a toe curling orgasm. But, she kept on working it and the boys, and I another orgasm a few minutes later. The kind that feels so good, you laugh out loud. We didnt really rest at all. We went straight to DATY with her sitting on my face, looking down at me while a enjoyed the scene, and caressing her breasts. It wasnt too long before Mari was working for a second pop. Despite some more excellent BBBJ, P2P, and various positions, she had left me completely satiated, so it would not come to pass. If you like a very attractive, thin spinner with a very plump, luscious nipples, and non-stop action, Mari is your girl. I will be making plans to visit her again, soon.
positive Took a few attempts, but finally connected. Set up meeting. When the time came headed out and got to the location. Called and she had to come down to let me in. We texted each other right out side the hotel. We greeted each other and headed up. Conversed on the way and when we got to room, it was really relaxed as we talked. Took care of business and it as up hill from there. She is as advertised and worth the time. We took our time and undressed. I went on o wash up, just my choice and when I returned she was sitting on the bed in her teddy. Short and sweet and to the point. She is a squirter. Once I got her started, the flow did not stop. Her breast were recently pierced, but they were fair game. Light kissing, then heavy groping, and slid several FIV. She was very receptive, so hit her up for DATY. She blew and the flow began. Soaked her teddy, and slid her towel under her hips. She is a gusher and between DATY and fingering she was overflowing. We took a break to reposition on the bed and she was down at my dick. She gives a nice BBBJ. I was pretty close and could have blown my load. She covered me up and I slid in mish, was having a great time and we shifted to CG. I was happy with letting her wo k me over, then I remembered I wanted to tap her doggie. Didn't get the chance, she was flowing again and hit super overdrive. She rocked her hips and clamped down with her pussy muscles. The feeling was too much and I blew my load in the cover. My hips were covered in her juices. Wow, she made sure she was enjoying the ride as much as I was and let's just say I enjoyed the ride a lot. Enough said.
positive Sami is an older woman with the sex drive of a teenager. Engaging with her in a series of sexts was very exciting and made our time together highly charged. Her personality and her looks are amazing and she delivers as promised with enthusiasm. She made our time together erotically fun for both of us. Definitely a keeper. After some scheduling challenges we got together at her very nice hotel in the morning. I like the morning since I'm at my best. She dressed as I'd asked in some sexy lingerie and greeted me at the door with a DFK that was a harbinger of things to cum. We shared some mimosas then I started to explore her body. She is a true submissive and takes directions very well. I love to explore all parts of a woman's body and she clearrly enjoed my activities. After some ass play I proceeded to lick her pussy and play with toys in her ass. This play brought her to several deep orgasms and made for a fun start. She is great at DT and after some extended BBBJ i finally exploded in her mouth and she took it all down her throat. Once of the best experiences of my hobbying career. Sami is a woman who loves sex and loves to be told what to do and then does it. She is a mature woman with a great body and a fabulous personality and attitude to match. Treat her right and she will definitely reciprocate.
positive A two call system to an agency that I have worked with before. I saw Carly's pictures and thought I would take a chance. Everything went smooth and I was at an upscale apartment at the appointed time. I went to the door and I was greeted by a beautiful goddess in sexy lingerie. Non-Vip's I highly recommend. VIP's read on... Carly and I chatted as we came in the door and she gave me a nice hug and a light kiss. Very sweet and she offered me a water and I said yes. We moved to the bedroom and we continued to chat and get to know each other a little and I was playing it cool though I was soooo horny and couldn't to start to undress her. I washed up and came back to the bedroom and we started to kiss while standing. I love to kiss and she is a good kisser! She pulled off my shirt and undid my belt. I loved her touch. I undid her bra and laid her back on the bed. I kissed my down her neck and started to kiss, fondle and suck her tits. She was very responsive and continued to lick my down to her belly button. While I was down there I pulled down her sexy panties. I loved getting my first glimpse at her beautiful pussy with nice full lips and a clit that was begging for my tongue! I took my time and enjoyed some spectacular DATY. Carly encouraged me with moans and playing with my hair. I stayed down for as long as it took to give a powerful O. She then returned the favor with some wet, sloppy BBBJ and I couldn't wait to get the cover on. She had a brand I had never seen before and it was so thin and comfortable it felt like I didn't have one on. It was fantastic. I started on top and it was so sensual and sexy. We kissed and had great eye contact as I slowly made love to that sexy, wet pussy. The pace started to quicken and she told me "fuck me harder" and started to really pump her pussy hard. Shit it felt good to pound this sexy goddess. We flipped over and got to experience her on top. She is so into it and she rode me good. I loved sucking her tits while she grinded my rock hard cock. I then picked her up and fucked her standing and then I layed her on the edge of the bed and put her legs over my shoulders. This is great position for pounding and pounding I did. I pulled out for minute and went down for some quick DATY. I then re-entered her wetness and knew it was time to finish strong! I went at her hard with her telling me to "go harder". I pulled out and came on her stomach and tits and it was a sweet release. We had some more small talk and then my time was up. I highly recommend and I will be back.
positive I haven't been to KP in a while and when I saw Miranda's pics, I had to call Mike up and see her before she leaves. I made an afternoon appointment and Mike gave me the directions to the new place. I had an amazing time and will repeat before Miranda leaves town. Vips read on. I didn't know Mike had a new location for Oak Brook, so I was surprised when I got texted the address after I made my appointment. I made my way over to the new apartment after work and it was just as nice as the old location. I got a bit lost, but still made my appointment on time. I got to the location and called Mike for the room. I went up and behind the door was this smoking hot Korean girl from the west coast. She led me in and gave me a quick dfk. I grabbed her ass and pulled her close for some more dfk by the door. She was just as tall as me with heels on and her top was falling off to the side to reveal her nice big tits. They looked natural and I could barely cup them in my hand as I followed her into the bedroom. Quickly stripped down and followed Miranda to the bathroom. Mandatory mouthwash, hand wash, and popped into the shower. I was scrubbed down head to toe. Miranda was teasing with some lfk and then dropped to her knees toward the end for a preview bbbj. Nice suction and some nice dt swallowing my whole shaft. I got out and dried as quick as possible so I could get to the main event. I started face down on the bed and she started kissing my whole body going from arm to arm, neck to back, and all the way down to rimming while stroking my cock to full hardness. She flipped me over and started with a nice hard bbbj. She moved her pussy over to me after a few minutes and we started 69 until I had Miranda put a the hat on and start in cg. What a sight to see, she has a hard body with almost a six pack since she told me she hikes alot. Nice d-cup boobs just bouncing up and down while I was matching her thrust for thrust. I knew I was going to pop soon, so I had Miranda get in Mish and started just going as fast and hard as I could. Miranda arches her back upward squeezing her tits while in Mish and I just lose it in the hat. I was so exhausted from the session I could not get a 2nd pop in, but Miranda was more than willing. I plan on coming back as she is here for two weeks before she goes back west. Don't miss out.
positive I have a thing for exotic Hispanic women and when I was in Dallas I just had to meet the beautiful Allegra Hope. I have been seeing a regular Hispanic woman there over the last few years. I always see her each and every time I am in Dallas, but she recently relocated to another state so I was in search for someone new in Dallas. Now there is no shortage of beautiful women in Texas, but when I discovered Allegras profile I just had to meet here. She is hot as they come and has that Hispanic look that I was looking for in a provider. I sent her a request and provided my references for her to review and after a quick screening; we were all set for our date. Allegra was fantastic about keeping in touch via email prior to my arrival and I loved our email exchanges before I got to Dallas. I was staying in a very nice hotel that required a key card so I had to find a discreet place to meet her. Allegra is pretty classy so I was not worried about her showing up to my hotel looking out of place. I decided to meet her on the 2nd floor of my luxury hotel instead of the main lobby or bar area. This particular hotel was adjacent to a shopping mall so there were plenty of discrete places to meet without being seen by prying eyes. Allegra was on time and told me she was on her way up to meet me at the requested location. I saw her coming up the escalator of the hotel and I was extremely pleased with what I was seeing. I had once again made a smart decision (at least) based upon her appearance. You know the type? Long dark black hair, golden brown skin and ample cleavage that will make a mans heart skip a beat. Furthermore, after reading her (few) reviews I was not worried about what she would be like behind closed doors. In fact, I was giddy with anticipation. It was pouring down rain on this day and Allegra still looked smoking hot. She was wearing a cotton stripped sweater, tight jeans and black boots that amplified her beautiful curvy body. Voluptuous in all the right places. We hugged each other and took a seat on a nearby sofa upstairs in the hotel and got to know each other a little better. I enjoyed this time as we talked like we were old friends catching up on a rainy day. I loved her sexy accent too. Hubba, Hubba. Eventually we were ready to get down to business so we headed up to my room to get better acquainted. When I opened the door to my hotel room Allegra walks in and I shut the door behind us. I turn around and she gives me a nice wet kiss and it was on from there. Allegra is an amazing kisser and I loved the way her lips met mine. She is also a super sweet lady that I could not wait to see without any clothes on. I relaxed while she went into the bathroom to freshen up and when she came out we wasted no time going at it. I sat back in a chair and Allegra helped me remove my clothes and I did the same to her. Allegra was dressed in sexy matching black panties and bra that displayed her sexy body. I loved looking at those nice big tits bursting out of that bra and rubbing her soft smooth legs with my hands. Her boobs are MM, but feel soft to the touch and they are very responsive to oral stimuli. I loved grouping and sucking all over those soft melons and they really turned me on. Allegra was into it and I could tell she was getting worked up when I stuck my hands between her legs. Since I was fully aroused with my man hood sticking straight up; she knew exactly what to do with it. We moved over to the bed and I pulled out my cock and put it in Allegras mouth. I was rock hard as she devoured my shaft deep into her mouth for a BBBJ. I like POV action and Allegra was amazing sucking my cock; looking up at me with those big brown eyes of hers. Her BBBJ was way above average and she had great oral skills. I was enjoying this so much that I turned her over and hung her head off the bed to face fuck her upside down. Allegra loved it and she has a great gag reflex and she can really DT. I was rubbing her pussy at the same time and she was in frenzy as she sucked my cock. I eventually had to repay the favor so I took a turn DATY and she really seemed to enjoy my efforts. I dove into her sweet pussy; sucking and licking her clit like a man on a mission. I love giving head as much I like receiving it. My cock was so stiff that I had to fuck her at this point. Allegra climbed on top of me and gave me a SS to really get my motor running. I let her rub all over my cock with her pussy and I think she actually orgasamed from doing since she was screaming like crazy. We covered up and she climbed on top of me and started riding me. Her pussy was so wet that no lube was needed. Allegra was like a lady on a mission as she bounced up and down on my cock. She knew from my commands that I loved what she was doing. I eventually turned over and pounded her in K9. I asked her to rub my balls as I slammed in and out of her box; pulling it out at the tip and then slowly guiding it back in deep. Allegra liked the various pace and tempo of my thrusts because I could feel her body spasm when I hit the right spot. I wanted to fuck in MISH so I could Kiss her and suck on her tits some more. She was so wet that I was not going to be able to last much longer and I loved the way she screamed in Spanish. I told her to remove the cover because I wanted more of her mouth on my cock. Allegra did as I asked and I stood up on the bed. She got down on her knees and started sucking my cock with great vigor. She was slurping, sucking and stroking my cock good until I exploded in her mouth. She took every fucking drop and didnt miss any of it. I love a BBBJCIM and she relished in my enthusiasm of this crescendo finish. I had booked a multi hour appointment so we had plenty of time for more action. Allegra got up and got me a hot towel to clean me up. Afterwards we just lied in bed together talking and enjoying each others company. It turned out she knew someone who I liked quite a bit, but who was no longer in Dallas. Its a small world. Allegra then asked me if I wanted a FBSM so I accepted. She had a nice touch as she massaged my body from head to toe. Allegra and I kissed and made out in the bed until I was ready to go again. I had no problem after she started blowing me again. She really knows how to get me excited too. I eventually covered up after letting her suck my cock for a while until I was ready to get back inside of her pussy. She rolled on a cover and I fucked her all over again until I couldnt hold back any more from the sex. I enjoyed the first orgasm so much that I decided I wanted another CIM finish. Allegra wasted no time in sucking my cock again. She had to really work at this one, but she was determined to get me off again. I let her blow me until I exploded deep in her mouth for cup number two. She was amazed at the amount of cum that came out of my dick this time around; and so was I to be honest. We collapsed in each others arms after the second round of sex in a sweaty mess. After our time was up, Allegra and I took a hot steamy shower together. This was a nice way to end our evening because it was actually pretty romantic washing each other up in the shower. Its always my favorite way to end a date. Whats not to like about lathering a beautiful woman up with soap all over her body? I wish I could have produced a 3rd cup in the shower because Allegra would have fucked me in the shower, but I had nothing left after the 2nd pop. We toweled each other off and got dressed. I walked Allegra out to her car and I thanked her for seeing me and providing one hell of a hot session. She thanked me back with a goodbye kiss and headed home. I got a really nice message from her afterwards thanking me for a wonderful time. She said she would love to see me again so I have no doubt that I will be repeating in the future. The next time it will be with one of her equally hot friends.
positive Called Lake (owner) and scheduled a visit with Sara. Arrived on time and she greeted me wearing a silk robe and heels. The apartment was set up like a business (MP) with drinks and snacks in the fron room. A sheet was hung to divide the room into two areas. Sara directed me back and had me get comfortable and lay face down. Sara immediately dropped her robe and took her bra aff revealing two magnificent natural puppies. Once the mass started she took no time until she began using her entire body to slowly rub my back and shoulders. Her tits felt great as they rubbed against my back. She then massaged my arms and finished each arm/hand by sucking and licking each finger. After a few minutes of rubbing my legs and teasing my cock every few seconds she had me flip. A few minutes of a chest and thigh massage while she let me caress her legs and ass. She the started the main event while I continued to play with her. She kept her panties on, but I was able to feel how wet she was getting. She finished by getting on the table and let me suck/lick her nipples for a few minutes. She then turned around and sat on my chest putting her ass in my face as she finished the HE. Definitely will return soon.
positive I have seen a number of Eastern European MILFs and they almost always deliver a great experience. I was not disappointed this time. She has a few miles on her but she is sexy in appearance and knows how to provide a satisfying experience. She shares the apartment with other girls from Hungary and over the years, I have seen several others who have been part of this group. The general modus operandi is to advertise photos of girls who are roughly similar to the girl you're going to see. In Cristina's case, that was true and the model was about 10 years younger. She is still in good shape; a sexy blond lady who looks good with clothes on and off. Nothing sags on her. The reason to use this service is because the ladies really know how to provide a GFE experience. They provide all of the services you expect, DFK, BBJ, DATY and CFS. And they also seem to enjoy it, if you are willing to give them some attention, too. Cristina was very responsive when we started DFK in the nude and allowed me to slide a finger in vagina; this led to some DATY and before long, she was signing and shaking. If it wasn't an orgasm, it was a great performance. Her pussy was very juicy. Her BBJ was wonderful; just the right amount of pressure. I could have laid back and come from it, but our interaction was very intense, with lots of changing of positions and moving around, and dirty talk. Eventually, I entered her in a doggie position and didn't hold out very long. After a little cleanup, she started blowing me again; I can't come more than once in an hour but let her do it for five minutes. It was pleasant but at my age, I don't know how long I'd need before a second round, but its much longer than an hour. I plan to repeat.
positive A super nice time with a lovely girl, highly recommend Ace Getting into the gated community was a bit weird, buit once in was a nice unit, and clean. The usual shower and blue toast followed by some heaving petting and some kissing..... Overall i had a great time with Ace, she stayed with the standard k-gil routine of massage, lots of uncovered oral with eye contact. The rimming, which im not a huge fan of, but went with the flow. I blew in her mouth for the first one, and after spitting it out we went for number two in various positions...ended up in a hand job that got a little messy. we finished with some more massage, i needed it, and i was so spent i forgot my glasses walking out the door...
positive Saw Raven was visiting South Dakota so I gave her a call. Two-call system and set up a date to see her at her hotel. Kept in contact as I was on my way. I was thrilled when a voluptuous sexy red greeted me at the hotel, a nice embrace and a kiss that started soft and only got better and sweeter. Highly recommend Raven who was so sexy and fun!!! She met me at the door in a a sexy little t-shirt outfit and looked so welcoming. Gave me a nice long hug and once she slipped out of the T, I knew we were in for fun. Looked great. Fantastic attitude and body to match. Wonderful tits she wanted played with. The hotel was decent enough and darkened, helping to set us at ease. Started with CBJ - I kept moving her hair to get a nice view of that pretty little face. Went to lazy dog, mish, CG, Doggie(real nice with this little spinner), CBJ, HJ, and then she swallowed me at the climax. Nice girl and very sexy with her attitude. Definite repeat.
positive Operator was nice to perform quick verification and get me set up that night. And boy what an experience it was with Tamara. She was on time and dressed appropriately and discretely! She walked in with a sweet friendly smile and a hug! VIPs read on. In short, I will always repeat with this agency and specifically seek Tamara! Great experience. She is my ATF! I was going to fly back the next day so operator was kind to get me verified and setup the same night. And I would never forget this experience. Tamara came in like a friend, chatted a bit. We started with a loooong kiss that turned into a hot DFK and foreplay. After about 5 min we undressed each other and went on with DFK. She loves kissing and me too :). Then we went into 69. It was the sweetest DATY and apparently she came twice. I rimmed her as well and she loved it. I came in her mouth and she kept on sucking my junior nonstop. We stayed in 69 for a while. After I was ready for round 2, we fucked for a bit but since she is so good at sucking and loves to CIM, I obliged and finished with CIM again. We caressed and just laid there for 10 min. Chatted a bit. She is a good conversational but soft spoken person. We were way over our time and realized that after getting reminder from operator :). This is one of my best encounter and I will continue to repeat whenever I am in town.
positive Texted Agency and went to upscale apartment in south suburb. I'm glad I pick Miranda you just can't go wrong with this Agency.. VIP read on.. First she greeted me with a light kiss, then she guided me to bathroom for shower. She gave me a preview BJ in the shower, but didn't wanted to finish there. We moved to bedroom for DFK and went to 69. The view of ass is turned me up so much, so we sucked each other like who can make a cum first. I wanted to be inside her, so condom is on for some serious pounding on every position. My last position was in missionary and couldn't take it anymore, so I pulled out the condom and guided my JR to her mouth for finish. She gladly accepted and sucked it until it dry. She went to bathroom for cleaned herself and came back for little chat. Her English was good enough for conversation. Great girl with eager to please the man and will definitely will repeat, before she leave the town.
positive Emma is a great find. Enjoys what she does and does a great job while doing it Emma is a cute spinner who truly enjoys her job. Nothing mechanical about her. She provides a great massage and loses her clothing as she works leading to a great view. Its so refreshing getting someone who doesn't rush and teases along the way. On the flip she allows respectful touching and likes to look into your eyes. She strokes and then moves away never building up too fast. She has a great ass and breasts and truly enjoys being touched. She strokes to a great finish and doesn't stop until you are finished. Definitely will repeat
positive This little lady was amazing. I decided to book her for 2 hours. We met for drinks in the casino to calm our nerves (well maybe just mine) and started by having a nice and light conversation to get acquainted before heading to my room. She was dressed very beautifully with a curve hugging red dress and classy heels so she didn't stand out too much. VIP Read on... Once we entered the room we sat down on the couch and chatted about everything from my life to her life and everything in between. Buy the time we were ready to get down to business it felt more like i was hooking up with friend than anything. I excused myself to use the restroom and when I came out she was lying on the bed in nice lingerie. We proceeded with some LFK to DFK and some boob sucking... Let me tell you, they were meant to suck on. From there we proceeded to remove the rest of our clothes and she started to give me an amazing BBBJ. She definitely has little to no gag reflex and deep throated me with little effort. While she was blowing me I started to finger her and man is she tight. As good as she was giving it to me I returned in kind by trying my best to get her off with my fingers. She also made sure to pay attention to my balls and her moans while sucking on them drove me crazy. I then told her I wanted to DATY. She smelled and tasted amazing. I could have stayed down there for a while but after she had her O she told me how bad she needed to get fucked. She put a cover on me and we started with doggy till I got a cramp in my hamstring ( I knew I should have skipped leg day at the gym before flying out.) From there she flipped over for some mish. As i built up a head of steam the sight of her boobs bouncing to the rhythm of my thrusts almost sent me over the edge on more than one occasion. Unfortunately for me, between how tight she was and the fact that it has been a while since I have gotten any I popped much sooner than I would have liked. After we finished we played in bed and talked while I tried to will myself to get up again but unfortunately I was out of steam. Sadly I found out at the end of the night that she is getting out of the business and is planning on moving at the end of the month. Gentleman, book her while you can. I can guarantee you will not be disappointed.

